BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 101 2007 c 522 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,522,000))
$34,807,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,598,000))
$36,871,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,680,000))
$72,238,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $56,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5926
(construction industry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute
House Bill No. 1741 (oral history). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $194,000 of the general fund state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the legislature to contract
for an independent economic and actuarial analysis of health care
reform proposals that represent a range of approaches to addressing
affordability and quality of, and access to, health care services in
Washington state. The economic and actuarial analysis shall address
the impact of each proposal on:
(a) The number of uninsured;
(b) The scope of health benefit coverage;
(c) The cost and affordability of health care to individuals,
businesses, and government, including redistribution of amounts
currently spent, reductions in hospital charity care, and any savings;
(d) Employment;
(e) Consumer choice;
(f) Administrative costs; and
(g) The extent to which each proposal promotes improved health
outcomes; prevention and early intervention; chronic care management;
use of effective and appropriate services; and use of medical homes.
The results of the economic and actuarial analysis shall be submitted
to the governor and the legislature on or before October 1, 2008.

Sec. 102 2007 c 522 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,483,000))
$26,990,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,196,000))
$29,912,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $467,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,146,000))
$57,369,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $56,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5926
(construction industry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute
House Bill No. 1741 (oral history). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the legislature to contract for
an independent economic and actuarial analysis of health care reform
proposals that represent a range of approaches to addressing
affordability and quality of, and access to, health care services in
Washington state. The economic and actuarial analysis shall address
the impact of each proposal on:
(a) The number of uninsured;
(b) The scope of health benefit coverage;
(c) The cost and affordability of health care to individuals,
businesses, and government, including redistribution of amounts
currently spent, reductions in hospital charity care, and any savings;
(d) Employment;
(e) Consumer choice;
(f) Administrative costs; and
(g) The extent to which each proposal promotes improved health
outcomes; prevention and early intervention; chronic care management;
use of effective and appropriate services; and use of medical homes.
The results of the economic and actuarial analysis shall be submitted
to the governor and the legislature on or before October 1, 2008.

Sec. 103 2007 c 522 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,377,000))
$3,378,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,155,000))
$3,194,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,568,000))
$6,608,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions in this section, the committee
may adjust the due dates for projects included on the committee's
2007-09 work plan as necessary to efficiently manage workload.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the joint legislative audit and review
committee to conduct a review of the method used to determine lease
rates for state-owned aquatic lands. The review shall include
classification of current lease base and lease rates by category of use
such as marinas; a review of previous studies of formulas for
state-owned aquatic land leases; and identification of pros and cons of
alternative approaches to calculating aquatic lands lease rates. The
committee shall complete the review by June 2008.
(3) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the joint legislative audit
and review committee to conduct an evaluation and comparison of the
cost efficiency of rental housing voucher programs versus other housing
projects intended to assist low-income households, including
construction and rehabilitation of housing units. The study will
consider factors including administrative costs, capital costs, and
other operating costs involved in operating voucher and other housing
programs. The study will compare the number of households that can be
served by voucher and other housing programs, given a set amount of
available funds. The department of community, trade, and economic
development, the housing finance commission, housing authorities,
community action agencies, and local governments shall provide the
joint legislative audit and review committee with information necessary
for the study. The joint legislative audit and review committee shall
solicit input regarding the study from interested parties, including
representatives from the affordable housing advisory board, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the housing
finance commission, representatives from the private rental housing
industry, housing authorities, community action agencies, county and
city governments, and nonprofit and for-profit housing developers. The
joint legislative audit and review committee shall present the results
of the study to the legislature by December 31, 2008.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for a cost analysis of the programs and
activities administered by the department of fish and wildlife. In
conducting the study, the committee shall specifically identify the
total costs that support both hunting and fishing programs as well as
nongame programs, including appropriate shares of the agency's
administrative and indirect costs. The committee shall compare the
cost analysis to revenues that currently support the programs,
including the level of support received from game licenses and fees.
The committee shall base its analysis on available management
information and shall provide the results of its analysis to the
legislature by January 2008.
(5) $164,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the joint legislative audit and review
committee to analyze gaps throughout the state in the availability and
accessibility of services identified in the federal adoption and safe
families act as directed by Substitute House Bill No. 1333 (child
welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall conduct an analysis of the
qualifications required to become a social worker I, II, III, or IV
within the department of social and health services children's
administration. The committee shall conduct an analysis of the
qualifications used by other states for equivalent categories of social
workers. The committee shall analyze the strengths and weaknesses of
Washington's qualifications relative to the other states. The findings
shall be reported to the legislature by December 1, 2007.
(7) Within amounts provided in this section, the committee shall
conduct a review of the eligibility requirements and eligibility review
processes that apply to any state program that offers individual health
care coverage for qualified recipients.
(8) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(9) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1488 (oil spill program). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) Within the amounts provided in this section, the committee
shall review the constitutional, case law, and statutory objectives and
obligations of the department of natural resources' management of
state-owned aquatic lands. The review will include an assessment of
the degree to which the management practices of the department and
other agencies are meeting these objectives and complying with legal
obligations.
(11) $38,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House
Bill No. 2641 (education performance agreements). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a preaudit for a
comprehensive review of boards and commissions. The preaudit study
will inventory the existing boards/commissions, identify criteria for
selecting entities for further review, propose the scope and objectives
of those reviews, and identify resource and schedule options for the
committee to consider before proceeding.
(13) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall develop
a framework for future efforts to quantify and analyze health care
spending across all sectors of the state. This effort would focus on
identifying the relevant types of spending in the public and private
sectors, the availability of information on each of those types of
spending, and the extent to which that available information could be
tracked over time. In conducting this work, the committee shall work
with the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee
and the University of Washington's institute for health metrics and
evaluation, as appropriate. The committee shall provide a report by
January 2009.

Sec. 104 2007 c 522 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,023,000))
$9,057,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,198,000))
$9,251,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,313,000))
$18,400,000

Sec. 105 2007 c 522 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,810,000))
$4,811,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,301,000))
$5,302,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,186,000))
$10,188,000

Sec. 106 2007 c 522 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,255,000))
$7,392,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,510,000))
$7,730,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,765,000))
$15,122,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $150,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $55,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to
implement the task force on domestic violence as requested by section
306 of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5470 (dissolution
proceedings). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 107 2007 c 522 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,231,000))
$2,268,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,259,000))
$2,294,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,490,000))
$4,562,000

Sec. 108 2007 c 522 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,779,000))
$16,092,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,819,000))
$17,315,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,598,000))
$33,407,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $100,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
chapter 34, Laws of 2007 (Senate Bill No. 5351, court of appeals
judges' travel).

Sec. 109 2007 c 522 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,011,000))
$30,659,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,148,000))
$34,308,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,071,000))
$24,110,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,223,000))
$24,511,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,437,000))
$39,439,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($153,240,000))
$159,377,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for court-appointed special
advocates in dependency matters. The administrator for the courts,
after consulting with the association of juvenile court administrators
and the association of court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad
litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer court-appointed
special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution of
funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally
accessible to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian
ad litem programs. The administrator for the courts shall not retain
more than six percent of total funding to cover administrative or any
other agency costs. Funding distributed in this subsection shall not
be used to supplant existing local funding for the court-appointed
special advocates program.
(2) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, $1,500,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $1,500,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for school districts for petitions to juvenile court
for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035.
The office of the administrator for the courts shall develop an
interagency agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to
allocate the funding provided in this subsection. Allocation of this
money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions
filed. This funding includes amounts school districts may expend on
the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified
mail or by personal service or for the performance of service of
process for any hearing associated with RCW 28A.225.030.
(3)(a) $1,640,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,641,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, $6,612,000 of the public safety and education
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $6,612,000 of
the public safety and education account--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court
administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in
need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The administrator for
the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula
shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition
processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average
per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a fiscal year
ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for
the purpose of distributing funds.
(4) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions
from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to
section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs
for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW
43.135.060.
(5) $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the completion of the juror pay pilot
and research project.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for improving interpreter services
at the trial court level.
(a) Of these amounts, $340,000 for fiscal year 2008 is provided
solely to assist trial courts in developing and implementing language
assistance plans. The administrator of the courts, in consultation
with the interpreter commission, shall adopt language assistance plan
standards consistent with chapters 2.42 and 2.43 RCW. The standards
shall include guidelines on local community input, provisions on
notifying court users on the right and methods to obtain an
interpreter, information on training for judges and court personnel,
procedures for identifying and appointing an interpreter, access to
translations of commonly used forms, and processes to evaluate the
development and implementation of the plan.
(b) Of these amounts, $610,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $950,000
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to assist trial courts with
interpreter services. In order to be eligible for assistance, a trial
court must have completed a language assistance plan consistent with
the standards established in (a) of this subsection that is approved by
the administrator of the courts and submit the amounts spent annually
on interpreter services for fiscal years 2005, 2006, and 2007. The
funding in this subsection (b) shall not be used to supplant existing
funding and cannot be used for any purpose other than assisting trial
courts with interpreter services. At the end of the fiscal year,
recipients shall report to the administrator of the court the amount
the trial court spent on interpreter services.
(c) $50,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $50,000 for fiscal year 2009
are provided solely to the administrator of the courts for
administration of this subsection. By December 1, 2009, the
administrator of the courts shall report to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature: (i) The number of trial courts
in the state that have completed a language assistance plan; (ii) the
number of trial courts in the state that have not completed a language
assistance plan; (iii) the number of trial courts in the state that
received assistance under this subsection, the amount of the
assistance, and the amount each trial court spent on interpreter
services for fiscal years 2005 through 2008 and fiscal year 2009 to
date.
(7) $443,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $543,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5470 (dissolution proceedings). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse. Within the amounts provided:
(a) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for developing training materials for the
family court liaisons.
(b) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for reimbursement costs related to
the family law handbook;
(c) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for distribution to counties to
provide guardian ad litem services for the indigent for a reduced or
waived fee;
(d) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementing the data tracking
provisions specified in sections 701 and 702 of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5470 (dissolution).
(8)(a) $20,458,000 of the judicial information systems account--state appropriation is provided solely for the development and
implementation of the core case management system. In expending the
funds provided within this subsection, the following conditions must
first be satisfied before any subsequent funds may be expended:
(i) Completion of feasibility studies detailing linkages between
the objectives of the core case management system and the following:
The technology efforts required and the impacts of the new investments
on existing infrastructure and business functions, including the
estimated fiscal impacts to the judicial information systems account
and the near general fund accounts; the alignment of critical system
requirements of varying size courts at the municipal, district, and
superior court level with their respective proposed business processes
resulting from business process engineering, and detail on the costs
and other impacts to the courts for providing critical business
requirements not addressed by new common business processes; the
specific requirements and business process needs of state agencies
dependent on data exchange with the judicial information system; and
the results from a proof of implementation phase; and
(ii) Discussion with and presentation to the department of
information systems and the information services board regarding the
impact on the state agencies dependent on successful data exchange with
the judicial information system and the results of the feasibility
studies.
(b) The judicial information systems committee shall provide
quarterly updates to the appropriate committees of the legislature and
the department of information systems on the status of implementation
of the core case management system.
(c) The legislature respectfully requests the judicial information
systems committee invite representatives from the state agencies
dependent on successful data exchange to their regular meetings for
consultation as nonvoting members.
(((10))) (9) $534,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No.
5320 (public guardianship office). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding
is provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2557 (trial
court operations).
(11) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding
is provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2533 (utility
pole attachments).
(12) $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for an access and accommodations
coordinator to address access to the courts by persons with
disabilities.

Sec. 110 2007 c 522 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,014,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,016,000))
$18,516,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,066,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,025,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,250,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,251,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,622,000))
$55,122,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The amounts provided from the public safety and education
account appropriations include funding for expert and investigative
services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.
(2) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to expand the parents representation
program into Whatcom county.
(3) Of the amounts appropriated in this section for the criminal
defense pilot project, $492,000 of the equal justice subaccount of the
public safety and education account--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is for providing public defense counsel to consult with and
provide legal representation to juvenile offenders for their initial
court appearances, in accordance with RCW 10.101.020(4). These funds
shall not be used to supplant local government expenditures. The
office shall develop criteria for the distribution of these funds to,
at a minimum, the following counties: Adams, Asotin, Benton, Clallam,
Cowlitz, Franklin, Garfield, Grays Harbor, Kittitas, Kitsap, Okanogan,
Pacific, Skagit, Wahkiakum, Whitman, Walla Walla, and Yakima. Counties
receiving these funds shall report to the office the number of juvenile
offenders who were represented by public defense attorneys at their
initial appearances in juvenile court, including the type of hearing.

Sec. 111 2007 c 522 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,614,000))
$6,615,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,758,000))
$6,759,000
((General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000))
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$6,000,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $715,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,122,000))
$20,089,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5224 (salmon office). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(2) $2,000,000 of the economic development and strategic reserve
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to
provide support and assistance to victims of the December 2007 storms
and floods in Chehalis and Centralia.

Sec. 112 2007 c 522 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,941,000))
$33,741,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,774,000))
$22,173,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,312,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,390,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $768,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,791,000))
$15,401,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,103,000))
$29,213,000
Charitable Organization Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($124,335,000))
$117,254,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($13,104,000)) $13,290,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely to reimburse
counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs
and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures.
Counties shall be reimbursed only for those odd-year election costs
that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) (($2,421,000)) $2,556,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($3,893,000)) $3,965,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for the verification of initiative and referendum petitions,
maintenance of related voter registration records, and the publication
and distribution of the voters and candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $118,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29A.52.330.
(4)(a) $2,465,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $2,501,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2007-09 biennium. The funding level
for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in
this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The
office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once
all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(5) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for humanities Washington's "we
the people" community conversations program.
(6) $122,000 of the charitable organization education account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1777 (charitable organizations). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(7) $575,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for settlement costs and attorney fees
resulting from the resolution of Washington Association of Churches, et
al. v. Reed, United States District Court Western District of
Washington at Seattle, Case No. CV06-0726RSM.
(8) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding is
provided to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2917 (voter
registration and info).
(9) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2807 (judicial
candidate info).
(10) The office of the secretary of state may not reduce any
services related to elections during the 2007-09 biennium.

Sec. 113 2007 c 522 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $348,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($317,000))
$467,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($665,000))
$815,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office shall assist the department of personnel on
providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal,
state, local, and tribal government employees. The training sessions
shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal
sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the training sessions
shall be recouped through a fee charged to the participants of each
session. The department of personnel shall be responsible for all of
the administrative aspects of the training, including the billing and
collection of the fees for the training.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the office to engage a contractor to
conduct a detailed analysis of the achievement gap for Native American
students; analyze the progress in developing effective government-to-government relations and identification and adoption of curriculum
regarding tribal history, culture, and government as provided under RCW
28A.345.070; recommend a comprehensive plan for closing the achievement
gap pursuant to goals under the federal no child left behind act for
all groups of students to meet academic standards by 2014; and identify
performance measures to monitor adequate yearly progress. The
contractor shall conduct the analysis starting with the call to action
paper by the multi-ethnic think tank and as guided by the tribal leader
congress on education, the Washington state school directors
association, and other appropriate groups. The contractor shall submit
a study update by September 15, 2008, and submit a final report by
December 30, 2008, to the governor, the superintendent of public
instruction, the state board of education, the P-20 council, the basic
education finance task force, and the education committees of the
legislature.

Sec. 114 2007 c 522 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($252,000))
$552,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($509,000))
$809,000
The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the commission to engage a contractor
to conduct a detailed analysis of the achievement gap for Asian
American students; recommend a comprehensive plan for closing the
achievement gap pursuant to goals under the federal no child left
behind act for all groups of students to meet academic standards by
2014; and identify performance measures to monitor adequate yearly
progress. The contractor shall conduct the analysis starting with the
call to action paper by the multi-ethnic think tank and as guided by
the former members of the Asian Pacific Islander American think tank
and other appropriate groups. The contractor shall submit a study
update by September 15, 2008, and submit a final report by December 30,
2008, to the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the
state board of education, the P-20 council, the basic education finance
task force, and the education committees of the legislature.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the commission to engage a contractor
to conduct a detailed analysis of the achievement gap for Pacific
Islander American students; recommend a comprehensive plan for closing
the achievement gap pursuant to goals under the federal no child left
behind act for all groups of students to meet academic standards by
2014; and identify performance measures to monitor adequate yearly
progress. The contractor shall conduct the analysis starting with the
call to action paper by the multi-ethnic think tank and as guided by
the former members of the Asian Pacific Islander American think tank
and other appropriate groups. The contractor shall submit a study
update by September 15, 2008, and submit a final report by December 30,
2008, to the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the
state board of education, the P-20 council, the basic education finance
task force, and the education committees of the legislature.

Sec. 115 2007 c 522 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,687,000))
$15,689,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $183,000 of the state treasurer's service account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1512 (linked deposit program). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(2) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2829
(homeownership security account).

Sec. 116 2007 c 522 s 123 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $794,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $829,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,188,000))
$15,503,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,811,000))
$17,126,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $752,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $762,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for staff and related costs to
verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.
(3) $1,000 of the appropriation from the auditing services
revolving account--state is provided solely for an adjustment to the
agency lease rate for space occupied and parking in the Tacoma Rhodes
Center. The department of general administration shall increase lease
rates to meet the cash gain/loss break-even point for the Tacoma Rhodes
Center effective July 1, 2007.
(4) $313,000 of the auditing services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 3193 (whistleblower protections). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 117 2007 c 522 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,250,000))
$6,262,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,656,000))
$6,838,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,951,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,143,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,199,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,323,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($224,635,000))
$233,047,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($245,427,000))
$254,033,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.
(3) $9,446,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for increases in salaries and benefits
of assistant attorneys general effective July 1, 2007. This funding is
provided solely for increases to address critical recruitment and
retention problems, and shall not be used for the performance
management program or to fund general administration. The attorney
general shall report to the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by October
1, 2008, and provide detailed demographic information regarding
assistant attorneys general who received increased salaries and
benefits as a result of the appropriation. The report shall include at
a minimum information regarding the years of service, division
assignment within the attorney general's office, and client agencies
represented by assistant attorneys general receiving increased salaries
and benefits as a result of the amount provided in this subsection.
The report shall include a proposed salary schedule for all assistant
attorneys general using the same factors used to determine increased
salaries under this section. The report shall also provide initial
findings regarding the effect of the increases on recruitment and
retention of assistant attorneys general.
(4) $69,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6001 (climate change). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $44,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5972
(surface mining reclamation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2479 (wireless number disclosure). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(7) $110,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3274 (port district contracting). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(8) $365,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2449 (child care center employees). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(9) $786,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3205 (child long-term well-being). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) $492,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3121 (construction industry). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(11) $220,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3139 (industrial insurance orders). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(12) The agency shall submit a staffing model that supports the
need for increased resources due to casework associated with the
sexually violent predator population to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 31,
2008.

Sec. 118 2007 c 522 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($756,000))
$815,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($781,000))
$807,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,537,000))
$1,622,000

Sec. 119 2007 c 522 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,652,000))
$64,539,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,867,000))
$71,361,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($251,537,000))
$253,123,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,680,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,775,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,735,000))
$3,760,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,977,000
Tourism Promotion and Development Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $415,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,000))
$18,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,180,000))
$1,221,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,385,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,644,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,660,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,840,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,327,000))
$26,827,000
((Homeless Families Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000))
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $635,000
Affordable Housing Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,200,000))
$14,650,000
Community Preservation and Development Authority
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Home Security Fund Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,200,000))
$16,700,000
Independent Youth Housing Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($495,365,000))
$493,560,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center for work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities. The
center shall not pay any increased indirect rate nor increases in other
indirect charges above the absolute amount paid during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium.
(2) $1,658,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,658,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for multijurisdictional drug task
forces.
(3) $1,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to fund domestic violence legal
advocacy.
(4) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall contract with a lender or contract collection agent to
act as a collection agent of the state. The lender or contract
collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and
deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected
shall be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest earned in the
account may be retained by the lender or contract collection agent, and
shall be considered a fee for processing payments on behalf of the
state. Repayments of loans granted under this chapter shall be made to
the lender or contract collection agent as long as the loan is
outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the chapter.
(5) $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided to support a task force on human
trafficking.
(6) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5092 (associate development organizations). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(7) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the community services block
grant program.
(8) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department to implement the
innovation partnership zone program.
(a) The director shall designate innovation partnership zones on
the basis of the following criteria:
(i) Innovation partnership zones must have three types of
institutions operating within their boundaries, or show evidence of
planning and local partnerships that will lead to dense concentrations
of these institutions:
(A) Research capacity in the form of a university or community
college fostering commercially valuable research, nonprofit
institutions creating commercially applicable innovations, or a
national laboratory;
(B) Dense proximity of globally competitive firms in a
research-based industry or industries or of individual firms with
innovation strategies linked to (a)(i) of this subsection. A globally
competitive firm may be signified through international organization
for standardization 9000 or 1400 certification, or other recognized
evidence of international success; and
(C) Training capacity either within the zone or readily accessible
to the zone. The training capacity requirement may be met by the same
institution as the research capacity requirement, to the extent both
are associated with an educational institution in the proposed zone;
(ii) The support of a local jurisdiction, a research institution,
an educational institution, an industry or cluster association, a
workforce development council, and an associate development
organization, port, or chamber of commerce;
(iii) Identifiable boundaries for the zone within which the
applicant will concentrate efforts to connect innovative researchers,
entrepreneurs, investors, industry associations or clusters, and
training providers. The geographic area defined should lend itself to
a distinct identity and have the capacity to accommodate firm growth;
(iv) The innovation partnership zone shall designate a zone
administrator, which must be an economic development council, port,
workforce development council, city, or county.
(b) By October 1, 2007, and October 1, 2008, the director shall
designate innovation partnership zones on the basis of applications
that meet the criteria in this subsection, estimated economic impact of
the zone, and evidence of forward planning for the zone.
(c) If the innovation partnership zone meets the other requirements
of the fund sources, then the innovation partnership zone is encouraged
to use the local infrastructure financing tool program, the sales and
use tax for public facilities in rural counties, the job skills program
and other state and local resources to promote zone development.
(d) The department shall convene at least one information sharing
event for innovation partnership zone administrators and other
interested parties.
(e) An innovation partnership zone shall provide performance
measures as required by the director, including but not limited to
private investment measures, job creation measures, and measures of
innovation such as licensing of ideas in research institutions,
patents, or other recognized measures of innovation.
(9) $430,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($1,935,000)) $430,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the economic
development commission to work with the higher education coordinating
board and research institutions to: (a) Develop a plan for recruitment
of ten significant entrepreneurial researchers over the next ten years
to lead innovation research teams, which plan shall be implemented by
the higher education coordinating board; and (b) develop comprehensive
entrepreneurial programs at research institutions to accelerate the
commercialization process.
(10) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to the cascade land
conservancy to develop and demonstrate one or more transfer of
development rights programs. These programs shall involve the purchase
or lease of development rights or conservation easements from family
forest landowners facing pressure to convert their lands and who desire
to keep their land in active forest management. The grant shall
require the conservancy to work in collaboration with family forest
landowners and affected local governments, and to submit an interim
written progress report to the department by September 15, 2008, and a
final report by June 30, 2009. The department shall transmit the
reports to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature.
(11) $155,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1422 (addressing children and families of incarcerated
parents). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $180,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $180,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for KCTS public television to
support programming in the Spanish language. These funds are intended
to support the addition of a bilingual outreach coordinator to serve
Latino adults, families and children in western and central Washington;
multimedia promotion on Spanish-language media and website integration;
the production of targeted public affairs programs that seek to improve
education and the quality of life for Latinos; and to establish
partnerships with city and county library systems to provide
alternative access to the v-me Spanish language channel via the
internet.
(13) $1,000,000 of the tourism and promotion account--state
appropriation is provided for Substitute House Bill No. 1276 (creating
a public/private tourism partnership). Of this amount, $280,000 is for
the department of fish and wildlife's nature tourism infrastructure
program; $450,000 is for marketing the 2010 Olympic games; and $50,000
is for the Washington state games.
(((15))) (14) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the African chamber of
commerce of the Pacific Northwest to support the formation of trade
alliances between Washington businesses and African businesses and
governments.
(((16))) (15) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the emergency food
assistance program.
(((17) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department's individual
development account program.
(18))) (16) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the energy facility site
evaluation council to contract for a review of the status of pipeline
utility corridor capacity and distribution for natural gas, petroleum
and biofuels in southwest Washington. The council shall submit its
findings and recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2007.
(((19))) (17) (($1,813,000)) $513,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,813,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a
pilot program to provide transitional housing assistance to offenders
who are reentering the community and are in need of housing as
generally described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6157
(offender recidivism). The department shall operate the program
through grants to eligible organizations as described in RCW
43.185.060. A minimum of two programs shall be established in two
counties in which community justice centers are located. The pilot
programs shall be selected through a request for proposal process in
consultation with the department of corrections. The department shall
select the pilot sites by January 1, 2008.
(a) The pilot program shall:
(i) Be operated in collaboration with the community justice center
existing in the location of the pilot site;
(ii) Offer transitional supportive housing that includes individual
support and mentoring available on an ongoing basis, life skills
training, and close working relationships with community justice
centers and community corrections officers. Supportive housing
services can be provided directly by the housing operator, or in
partnership with community-based organizations;
(iii) In providing assistance, give priority to offenders who are
designated as high risk or high needs as well as those determined not
to have a viable release plan by the department of corrections; and
(iv) Provide housing assistance for a period of up to twelve months
for a participating offender.
(b) The department may also use up to twenty percent of the funds
in this subsection to support the development of additional supportive
housing resources for offenders who are reentering the community.
(c) The department shall collaborate with the department of
corrections in the design of the program and development of criteria to
determine who will qualify for housing assistance, and shall report to
the legislature by November 1, 2008, on the number of offenders seeking
housing, the number of offenders eligible for housing, the number of
offenders who receive the housing, and the number of offenders who
commit new crimes while residing in the housing.
(((20))) (18) $288,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for community transition
coordination networks and county service inventories as generally
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6157 (offender
recidivism). Funds are provided for: (a) Grants to counties to
inventory services and resources available to assist offenders
reentering the community; (b) a grant to the Washington institute for
public policy to develop criteria for conducting the inventory; and (c)
the department of community, trade, and economic development to assist
with the inventory and implement a community transition coordination
network pilot program.
(((21) $75,000)) (19) $150,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 ((and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are)) is provided solely for
a grant to the center for advanced manufacturing to assist domestic
businesses to compete globally.
(((22))) (20) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to the
developmental disabilities council to contract for legal services for
individuals with developmental disabilities entering or currently
residing in the department of social and health services division of
developmental disabilities community protection program.
(((23))) (21) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to Safe Havens to
provide supervised visitation for families affected by domestic
violence and abuse.
(((24))) (22) $408,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $623,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile
courts to expand the number of participants in juvenile drug courts
consistent with the conclusions of the Washington state institute for
public policy evaluation of effective programs to reduce future prison
populations.
(((25))) (23) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5652 (microenterprise development), including grants to
microenterprise organizations for organizational capacity building and
provision of training and technical assistance. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((26))) (24) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to ((establish the state
economic development commission as an independent state agency
consistent with)) implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5995
(economic development commission). ((If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(27))) (25) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support international trade
fairs.
(((28))) (26) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for a study to survey best
practices for smart meters/smart grid/smart appliance technology and
the range of applications for smart meters around the country. The
survey shall include, but is not limited to, utilities using smart
meters to: (a) Meter responses to time-of-use pricing, (b) meter
savings from direct load control programs, (c) manage operations costs,
(d) identify power outages, (e) meter voluntary interruptible power
programs, (f) facilitate pay-as-you-go programs, and (g) enhance
billing operations. The study will compare the survey results with
Washington's electric utility power system including considerations of
electricity price variations between peak and off-peak prices, seasonal
price variations, forecast demand, conservation goals, seasonal or
daily distribution or transmission constraints, etc., to identify the
applications where smart meters may provide particular value to either
individual consumers, individual Washington electric utility power
systems, or the overall electric power grid in Washington, and to
meeting state conservation and energy goals. The department shall
complete the study and provide a report to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2007.
(((30))) (27)(a) (($500,000)) $250,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 ((is)) and $250,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for the fiscal year 2009 are provided for a
pilot program to provide assistance for three jurisdictions to enforce
financial fraud and identity theft laws. Three pilot enforcement areas
shall be established on January 1, 2008, two in the two largest
counties by population west of the crest of the Cascade mountains and
one in the largest county by population east of the crest of the
Cascade mountains. Funding received for the purpose of this subsection
through appropriations, gifts, and grants shall be divided equally
between the three pilot enforcement areas. This funding is intended to
provide for additional deputy prosecutors, law enforcement, clerical
staff, and other support for the prosecution of financial fraud and
identity theft crimes. The funding shall not be used to supplant
existing funding and cannot be used for any purpose other than
enforcement of financial fraud and identity theft laws. Appropriated
state funds must be used to match gifts and grants of private-sector
funds for the purposes of this subsection, and expenditure of
appropriated state funds may not exceed expenditure of private funds.
(b) The department shall appoint a task force in each county with
a pilot enforcement area. Each task force shall include the following
members:
(i) Two members from financial institutions;
(ii) One member of the Washington association of county
prosecutors;
(iii) One member of the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs;
(iv) One member of the Washington state association of municipal
attorneys; and
(v) One law enforcement officer.
(c) The task force in each county shall provide advice and
expertise in order to facilitate the prosecutor's efforts to prosecute
and reduce the incidence of financial fraud and identity theft crimes,
including check fraud, chronic unlawful issuance of bank checks,
embezzlement, credit/debit card fraud, identity theft, forgery,
counterfeit instruments, organized counterfeit check rings, and
organized identity theft rings.
(((31))) (28) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to Grays Harbor
county for activities associated with southwest Washington coastal
erosion investigations and demonstrations.
(((32))) (29) $112,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to the retired
senior volunteer program.
(((33))) (30) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to the Benton and
Franklin county juvenile and drug courts. The grant is contingent upon
the counties providing equivalent matching funds.
(((34))) (31) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to the Seattle
aquarium for a scholarship program for transportation and admission
costs for classrooms with lower incomes, English as second language or
special needs.
(((35))) (32) $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the long-term care
ombudsman program.
(((36))) (33) $425,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $425,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the Washington state
association of counties for the county training program.
(((37))) (34) $495,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $495,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the northwest agriculture
business center.
(((38))) (35) (($200,000)) $40,000 of the general fund
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 ((is)) and $160,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
a program to build capacity and promote the development of nonprofit
community land trust organizations in the state. Funds shall be
granted through a competitive process to community land trusts with
assets under one million dollars, and these funds shall be used for
operating costs, technical assistance, and other eligible capacity
building expenses to be determined by the department.
(((39))) (36) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to centro latino to provide
adult basic education that includes but is not limited to: English as
a second language, Spanish literacy training, work-readiness training,
citizenship classes, programs to promote school readiness, community
education, and entrepreneurial services.
(((40))) (37) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to resolution Washington to
build statewide capacity for alternative dispute resolution centers and
dispute resolution programs that guarantee that all citizens have
access to a low-cost resolution process as an alternative to
litigation.
(((41))) (38) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $2,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1303 (cleaner
energy). Of these amounts, $487,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely as pass-through
funding to the department of ecology to conduct the climate advisory
team stakeholder process and related staffing, analysis, and public
outreach costs. The department shall retain (($1,500,000)) $1,013,000
for expenditures related to the operations of the energy freedom
authority, and the support of the vehicle workgroup and the carbon
market stakeholder workgroup and any other activities required of the
department by the bill. The department shall enter into interagency
agreements with other agencies to implement the bill in the following
amounts: (a) $1,500,000 shall be provided to the climate impacts group
at the University of Washington for climate assessments; (b) $200,000
shall be provided to the University of Washington college of forest
resources for identification of barriers to using the state's forest
resources for fuel production; and (c) $800,000 shall be provided to
the Washington State University for analyzing options for market
incentives to encourage biofuels production. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((42))) (39) $347,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and (($348,000)) $398,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to Western
Washington University to support small business development centers and
underserved economic development councils with secondary research
services. Of the amounts in this subsection, $500,000 is intended for
research services and shall be divided evenly between 25-50 small
business development centers and underserved economic development
councils and $195,000 shall be used to develop infrastructure, training
programs, and marketing materials. Of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $50,000 is for the small business
development center in Renton.
(((43))) (40) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for a study on improving the
effectiveness of the growth management act. Topics may include but are
not limited to: How best to meet and finance infrastructure and
service needs of growing communities; how to provide incentives to
accommodate projected growth and protect resource lands and critical
areas; and how local governments are prepared to address land use
changes associated with climate change.
(((44))) (41) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and (($75,000)) $175,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the Poulsbo
marine science center.
(((45))) (42) $1,625,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $1,625,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating
and capital equipment and facility grants to the following public
television and radio stations: KPBX/KSFC, $863,525; KPLU, $733,525;
KVTI, $108,550; KDNA, $29,205; KSER, $338,325; KNHC, $146,620; KSPS,
$568,750; and KBTC, $461,500.
(((46))) (43) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the safe and drug free
schools and communities program.
(((47))) (44) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the University of
Washington's college of forest resources center for international trade
in forest products.
(((48))) (45) $471,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $471,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely as pass-through funding to
Walla Walla community college for its water and environmental center.
(((49))) (46) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a contract with a food
distribution program for communities in the southwestern portion of the
state and for workers impacted by timber and salmon fishing closures
and reductions. The department may not charge administrative overhead
or expenses to the funds provided in this subsection.
(((50))) (47)(a) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for a study to examine the
fiscal health of counties. The study shall address spending and
revenues, as well as the demographic, geographic, social, economic, and
other factors contributing to or causing financial distress. The study
shall also examine the financial efficiencies, cost savings, and
improved levels of service that may be gained by authorizing noncharter
counties greater flexibility in altering their forms of governance,
including consolidating or merging constitutional or statutory
functions or structures.
(b) The department of community, trade, and economic development
may contract or consult with any agency, organization, or other public
or private entity as it deems necessary in order to complete the study
required under this section. The study may contain options and actions
for consideration by the governor and the legislature, but at minimum
shall recommend the changes to constitutional and statutory law
necessary to provide counties with the legal authority required to
implement the changes in governmental structures and functions needed
to promote optimum financial efficiency and improved services. The
study shall be transmitted to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and the governor by December 1, 2007.
(((51))) (48) $2,136,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $2,136,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
operation and expense of the "closing the achievement gap-flight
program" of the Seattle public schools during the 2007-09 biennium.
The funds will be used in support of a collaboration model between the
Seattle public schools and the community. The primary intent for this
program is to close the academic achievement gap for students of color
and students in poverty by promoting parent and family involvement and
enhancing the social-emotional and the academic support for students.
By June 30, 2009, the Seattle public schools will provide and
evaluation of the impact of the activities funded on class size,
graduation rates, student attendance, student achievement, and closing
the achievement gap.
(((52))) (49) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 ((and)), $1,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $200,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for crime victim service centers.
(((53))) (50) $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for House Bill No. 1038
(electric transmission lines). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((54))) (51) $1,000,000 of the independent youth housing account
is provided for Second Substitute House Bill No. 1922 (youth housing
program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((55))) (52) $227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $127,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year ((2008)) 2009 are provided solely for Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1636 (development rights). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((56))) (53) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for Substitute House Bill No. 1037
(electrical transmission). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((57))) (54) $131,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 ((and $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are)) is provided solely for Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1705 (health sciences and services). ((If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(58))) (55) $881,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $882,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to: (a)
Work with a statewide asset building coalition to design, implement,
and fund a public education and outreach campaign; and (b) initiate,
expand, and strengthen community-based asset building coalitions by
providing them with technical assistance and grants. The department
shall conduct an application process and select at least twelve sites
by October 31, 2007. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, no
more than 10 percent may be used by the department to administer the
technical assistance and grant program. The department shall report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the status of the
grant and technical assistance program by December 1, 2008.
(((59))) (56) $15,200,000 of the affordable housing account--state
appropriation and $16,200,000 of the home security fund account--state
appropriation are provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1359 (affordable housing). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((60))) (57) $350,000 of the community preservation and
development authority account--state appropriation is provided solely
for Substitute Senate Bill No. 6156 (development authorities). If this
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(58) $750,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 and $712,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the
office of crime victims advocacy to provide additional support for
sexual assault victim advocates in county courts. The office of crime
victims advocacy shall enter into agreement with county prosecuting
attorney victim witness units to increase support services to victims
of sexual assault. These funds shall be contracted with the 39 county
prosecuting attorneys' offices to support victim-witness services. The
funds must be prioritized to ensure a full-time victim-witness
coordinator in each county. The office may retain only the amount
currently allotted for this activity for administrative costs.
(59) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding
is provided to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
1115 (homelessness).
(60) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1727 (growth management planning). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(61) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding
is provided to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2444 (offender
internet info).
(62) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding
is provided to implement House Bill No. 2527 (rural county definition).
(63) $126,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2683 (affordable housing for all). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(64) $76,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3115 (small business incubators). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(65) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding
is provided to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 3142 (rapid response
loan program).
(66) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3180 (housing investments). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(67) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3216 (wave/tidal energy technology). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(68) $41,000 of the building code council account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2575 (fire sprinkler systems). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(69) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2712 (criminal street gangs). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(70) $207,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2815 (green collar jobs). The amount provided in this
subsection includes $50,000 for the analysis under section 8(1) of the
bill. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.
(71) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Substitute House Bill No. 3120
(construction tax incentive). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(72) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2798 (local food production). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(73) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2844 (urban forestry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 120 2007 c 522 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($608,000))
$726,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($631,000))
$839,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,239,000))
$1,565,000

Sec. 121 2007 c 522 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,175,000))
$24,110,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,323,000))
$24,285,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,588,000))
$23,949,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,270,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,627,000))
$74,060,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($75,000)) $33,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and (($75,000)) $58,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided for a contract with the
Ruckelshaus center to continue the agricultural pilot programs that
identify projects to enhance farm income and improve natural resource
protection. Specific work will include project outreach and
refinement, stakeholder support, staffing the oversight committee,
seeking federal and private match funding, and further refining the
list of projects to be recommended for funding.
(2) (($175,000)) $155,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and (($175,000)) $254,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided for a contract
with the Ruckelshaus center to fund "proof-of-concept" model and
projects recommended by the oversight committee, as provided in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) $580,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $580,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the association of Washington
cities and the Washington state association of counties for improving
project permitting and mitigation processes.
(4) $320,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $320,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the office of regulatory
assistance to develop statewide multiagency permits for transportation
infrastructure and other projects that integrate local, state, and
federal permit requirements and mitigation standards.
(5) $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5122 (regulatory assistance programs). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(6) (($165,000)) $190,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and (($115,000)) $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely ((for a
study to develop)) to implement chapter 139, Laws of 2007 (student
transportation funding) which requires development of two options for
a new K-12 pupil transportation funding formula. ((The office of
financial management shall contract with consultants with expertise in
both pupil transportation and K-12 finance formulas. The office of
financial management and the contractors shall consult with the
legislative fiscal committees and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction. The office of financial management shall submit a
final report to the governor, the house of representatives
appropriations committee, and senate ways and means committee by
November 15, 2008.))
(7) $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for financial assistance to local
government agencies in counties representing populations of fewer than
350,000 residents for the acquisition and development of streamlined
permitting technology infrastructure through an integrated business
portal approach. Grant awards may not exceed $100,000 per local
government agency per fiscal year. The funding must be used to acquire
and implement permit tracking systems that can support and are
compatible with a multijurisdictional, integrated approach. Prior to
granting funds, the office of regulatory assistance shall ensure that
the proposed systems and technology are based on open-industry
standards, allow for future integration of processes and sharing of
data, and are extendable.
(8) (($810,000)) $474,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and (($495,000)) $831,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
implementation of sections 50 through 57 (health resources strategy) of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon
commission on health care). If the bill is not enacted by June 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement section 3 of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5248 (preserving the viability of
agricultural lands). Funds are provided for a contract with the
Ruckelshaus center to examine conflicts between agriculture activities
and critical areas ordinances. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) The education data center within the office of financial
management may convene a work group to assess the feasibility, costs,
and benefits of a higher education data system that uses privacy-protected student-level data.
(11) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding
is provided to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
2631 (regulatory assistance office).
(12) The department shall track all expenditures and FTE
utilization in state government related to work on Initiative Measure
No. 960 requirements, and shall provide a report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by November 1, 2008.
(13) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the office of financial
management to assist in efforts to identify approaches to addressing
affordability and quality of, and access to, health care services in
Washington state. Part of that effort must include contracting for a
public involvement effort that includes conducting meetings in all
congressional districts of the state and providing other venues for
participation, including a web site; providing information to
Washingtonians regarding affordability and quality of, and access to,
health care services in Washington state; and presenting information
and seeking public input regarding the findings of the economic
analysis of health care proposals completed under sections 101(3) and
102(3) of this act. The results of the public input process shall be
reported to the governor and the legislature on or before December 1,
2008.

Sec. 122 2007 c 522 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,037,000))
$33,042,000

Sec. 123 2007 c 522 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,106,000))
$23,910,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,794,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,900,000))
$25,800,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall coordinate with the
governor's office of Indian affairs on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal
government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal
historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal
governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through
a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department
shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the
training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the
training.

Sec. 124 2007 c 522 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,382,000))
$26,386,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section may not
be expended by the Washington state lottery for any purpose associated
with a lottery game offered through any interactive electronic device,
including the internet.

Sec. 125 2007 c 522 s 133 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $261,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($276,000))
$426,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($537,000))
$687,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $150,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the
commission to engage a contractor to conduct a detailed analysis of the
achievement gap for Hispanic students; recommend a comprehensive plan
for closing the achievement gap pursuant to goals under the federal no
child left behind act for all groups of students to meet academic
standards by 2014; and identify performance measures to monitor
adequate yearly progress. The contractor shall conduct the analysis
starting with the call to action paper by the multi-ethnic think tank
and as guided by the Latino/a educational achievement project and other
appropriate groups. The contractor shall submit a study update by
September 15, 2008, and submit a final report by December 30, 2008, to
the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, the state board
of education, the P-20 council, the basic education finance task force,
and the education committees of the legislature.

Sec. 126 2007 c 522 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Dependent Care Administrative Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($448,000))
$241,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,885,000))
$49,172,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,783,000))
$49,863,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $15,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1261 (duty disability service credit). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $43,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1680
(emergency medical technician service credit). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) $72,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1649 (judges' past service credit purchases). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $33,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1262 (plan 1 post retirement employment). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $315,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed House
Bill No. 2391 (gainsharing revisions). If neither bill is enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $12,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate
Bill No. 5014 (contribution rates). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $17,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate
Bill No. 5175 (retirement annual increases). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to design a plan for the operation
of a universal voluntary retirement accounts program, and then seek
approval from the federal internal revenue service to offer the plan to
workers and employers in Washington on a tax qualified basis. Features
of Washington voluntary retirement accounts plan include a defined
contribution plan with a limited pre-selected menu of investment
options, administration by the department of retirement systems,
investment oversight by the state investment board, tax-deferred
payroll deductions, retirement account portability between jobs, and a
two-tier system with workplace based individual retirement accounts
open to all workers, and a deferred compensation 401(k)-type program or
SIMPLE IRA-type program open to all employers who choose to participate
for their employees. As part of this process, the director shall
consult with the department of financial institutions, the state
investment board, private sector retirement plan administrators and
providers and other relevant sectors of the financial services
industry, organizations promoting increased economic opportunities for
individuals, employers, workers, and any other individuals or entities
that the director determines relevant to the development of an
effective and efficient method for implementing and operating the
program. As part of this process, the director shall evaluate the most
efficient methods for providing this service and ways to avoid
competition with existing private sector vehicles. The director shall
undertake the legal and development work to determine how to implement
a universal voluntary retirement accounts program, managed through the
department of retirement systems directly or by contract. By December
1, 2008, the director shall report to the legislature on the program's
design and any required changes to state law that are necessary to
implement the program.
(9) $81,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
House Bill No. 2887 (judges' service credit purchases). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(10) $51,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
Second Substitute House Bill No. 3019 (partial year service credit for
school district employees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $147,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
House Bill No. 3005 (transferring public employees' retirement system
plan 2 members to the school employees' retirement system plan 2). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 127 2007 c 522 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($97,793,000))
$98,151,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($101,158,000))
$106,762,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,846,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000
Waste Tire Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Real Estate Excise Tax Grant Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,370,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($211,303,000))
$217,265,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $71,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for the implementation of Substitute House Bill
No. 1002 (taxation of vessels). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $31,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1891
(prescription drugs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount in this subsection shall lapse.
(3)(a) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to conduct a study of the taxation
of electronically delivered products. The legislature recognizes that
chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1981), Laws of 2007,
relates to specific types of electronically delivered products and does
not address the taxation of numerous other types of electronically
delivered products. Therefore, a policy question remains concerning
the sales and use taxation of other electronically delivered products.
(b)(i) To perform the study, the department of revenue shall be
assisted by a committee. The committee shall include four legislative
members appointed as follows:
(A) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate; and
(B) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(ii) The department of revenue shall appoint additional members
with balanced representation from different segments of government and
industry, and shall consider representation from the following areas:
Small and large businesses that generate, deliver, or use
electronically delivered products; financial institutions; insurers;
persons with expertise in tax law in an academic or private sector
setting; and persons experienced in working with computers and
electronically delivered products. The department of revenue shall
appoint additional members from the department with expertise in the
excise taxation of electronically delivered products.
(iii) The committee shall choose its chair from among its
membership.
(iv) The department and committee shall review the following
issues: The provision of explicit statutory definitions for
electronically delivered products; the current excise tax treatment of
electronically delivered products in the state of Washington and other
states as well as the tax treatment of these products under the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement; the administration, costs, and
potential recipients of the tax exemptions provided in chapter . . .
(Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1981), Laws of 2007; and
alternatives to the excise taxation of electronically delivered
products.
(v) Legislative members of the committee are reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members of
the committee, except those representing an employer or organization,
are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(c) The department shall report its preliminary findings and
recommendations to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature
by November 30, 2007. The department shall provide the final report of
its findings and recommendations to the appropriate fiscal committees
of the legislature by September 1, 2008.

Sec. 128 2007 c 522 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD
State Investment Board Expense Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,266,000))
$24,468,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,500,000 of the state investment board expense account--state
appropriation is provided solely for development of an investment data
warehouse. This funding is intended to replace existing funding from
nonbudgeted funds, with the intent that further expenditures for this
project be made only by appropriation.
(2) $1,791,000 of the state investment board expense account is
provided for compensation and incentives for investment officers. Of
this amount, $852,000 is provided solely for implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 3149 (state investment board personnel
compensation). The state investment board shall include funding for
any future salary increases authorized under RCW 43.33A.100 in the
agency's budget request submitted in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW
in advance of granting related salary increases. The biennial salary
survey required under RCW 43.33A.100 shall also be provided to the
office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the
legislature as part of the state investment board's biennial budget
submittal.

Sec. 129 2007 c 522 s 139 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL
County Research Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $847,000
City and Town Research Services -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,458,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($200,000))
$225,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,705,000))
$5,730,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $25,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 3274 (port district
contracting). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 130 2007 c 522 s 141 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($577,000))
$591,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($580,000))
$595,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,655,000
General Administration Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,951,000))
$37,379,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,763,000))
$42,220,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((2))) (1) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the temporary emergency
food assistance program.
(2) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1332 (affordable
housing).
(3) $391,000 of the general administration services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of costs associated with the planning of agency moves
out of the general administration building.
(4) During the 2007-09 biennium the department will not reduce
services or increase rates to state agencies. Furthermore, the
department shall work with the office of financial management in order
to end the practice of cross-subsidization between business lines
within the general administration services account. State agency rates
developed for the 2009-11 biennium must reflect the actual cost of
services provided to state agencies pursuant to RCW 39.34.130 and
federal rules. By August 31, 2008, the department shall submit to the
office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
legislature balance sheets for each line of business that shall inform
the basis for agency rate development for the forthcoming biennium.
(5) The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the legislature that responds
to each of the state auditor's motor pool audit recommendations by
August 31, 2008. This report shall consist of recommendations that
have been adopted by the department, progress made towards achieving
those recommendations not yet completed, and justification for why the
department is unable to fulfill any of the recommendations in the
report.

Sec. 131 2007 c 522 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,102,000))
$2,762,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,088,000))
$1,838,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($700,000))
$1,920,000
((Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000))
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $695,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $705,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,690,000))
$14,320,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($2,340,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely to connect eastern state hospital
to the integrated hospital information system, which is intended to
improve operations and allow greater interactions between the hospital
and community clinics, including electronic transmission of inpatient
data to outpatient clinics that will provide care following discharge.
Connection to this network will allow consultation with specialists and
provide access to training for staff. Prior to any purchase of goods
or services, a feasibility plan must be approved by the information
services board.
(2) $1,250,000)) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to support the
operations of the digital learning commons.
(((3) $1,000,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to conduct a
pilot project to develop an emergency medical response health
management record system. The department shall contract to provide
health management record services, such as those developed with
patients in Whatcom county, to provide integrated care management that
are web-services enabled. The record system developed by the pilot
project will begin to provide services to emergency medical personnel
within two years in at least King, Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom
counties. The requirements of the pilot project contract shall require
the initial development of specific evaluation criteria and a report on
the performance of the system according to those criteria no later than
June 30, 2009.
(4))) (2) $1,012,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $338,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for an evaluation of the
information technology infrastructure capacity for institutions
operated by the department of social and health services, department of
veterans affairs, and department of corrections. The evaluation will
detail the status of the participating institutions' infrastructure and
recommend an improvement strategy that includes the use of electronic
medical records. The department shall report back to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on its findings by January 1, 2009.
(((5))) (3) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for deposit into the data
processing revolving account.

Sec. 132 2007 c 522 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,574,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,340,000))
$46,486,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,914,000))
$48,060,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $464,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5717 (market conduct oversight). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) $71,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
section 17 (reduce health care administrative costs) in accordance with
Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on health care). If the
section is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $613,000 of the insurance commissioners regulatory account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of House Bill No. 3067 (life settlements model act). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $286,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the
insurance commissioner to convene a work group of health care
providers, carriers, and payers, to identify and develop strategies to
achieve savings through streamlining administrative requirements and
procedures, as recommended in the report submitted pursuant to section
17, chapter 259, Laws of 2007. By December 1, 2008, the commissioner
shall submit a report to the governor and the legislature that
identifies the five highest priority goals for achieving significant
efficiencies and reducing health care administrative costs, and a plan
to accomplish these goals.

Sec. 133 2007 c 522 s 147 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,910,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,953,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,517,000))
$13,430,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($195,858,000))
$174,519,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($208,238,000))
$191,812,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $91,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5859 (retail liquor licenses). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(2) $2,070,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the liquor control board to operate an
additional 29 state stores on Sundays by September 1, 2007. The board
shall determine the impacts on sales as a result of operating the
additional stores on Sunday. In doing so, the liquor control board
shall also examine the sales of state and contract liquor stores in
proximity to those stores opened on Sundays to determine whether Sunday
openings have reduced the sales of other state and contract liquor
stores that are not open on Sundays. The board shall present this
information to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature by January 31, 2009.

Sec. 134 2007 c 522 s 149 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Public Service Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,403,000))
$31,407,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,195,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,535,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,293,000))
$36,297,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In accordance with RCW 81.66.030, it is the policy of the state
of Washington that the costs of regulating the companies transporting
persons with special needs shall be borne by those companies. For each
company or class of companies covered by RCW 81.66.030, the commission
shall set fees at levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of
supervising and regulating the companies or classes of companies.
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
commission may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if
the increases are necessary to fully fund the cost of supervision and
regulation.
(2) In accordance with RCW 81.70.350, it is the policy of the state
of Washington that the cost of regulating charter party carrier and
excursion service carriers shall be borne by those entities. For each
charter party carrier and excursion service carrier covered by RCW
81.70.350, the commission shall set fees at levels sufficient to fully
cover the cost of supervising and regulating such carriers. Pursuant
to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the commission
may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the
increases are necessary to fully fund the cost of the program's
supervision and regulation.
(3) The general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is
provided solely to conduct a survey to identify factors preventing the
widespread availability and use of broadband technologies. The survey
must collect and interpret reliable geographic, demographic, cultural,
and telecommunications technology information to identify broadband
disparities in the state. The commission shall consult appropriate
stakeholders in designing the survey. The names and identification
data of any person, household, or business participating in the survey
are exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW. The
commission shall report its finding to the appropriate legislative
committees by December 31, 2007.

Sec. 135 2007 c 522 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,439,000))
$12,430,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,812,000))
$13,170,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($107,611,000))
$129,634,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,114,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,852,000))
$23,154,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($55,553,000))
$86,757,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($374,000))
$814,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $341,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $556,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,269,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($243,923,000))
$310,241,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($12,924,000)) $27,852,000 of the disaster response account -- state appropriation and (($55,769,000)) $100,553,000 of the disaster
response account -- federal appropriation may be spent only on disasters
declared by the governor and with the approval of the office of
financial management. The military department shall submit a report
quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative
fiscal committees detailing information on the disaster response
account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the
account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting
date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2007-2009
biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) $556,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- state
appropriation and $1,269,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- federal appropriation are provided solely for response and recovery
costs associated with the February 28, 2001, earthquake. The military
department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing earthquake
recovery costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual
expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and
(e) estimates of future payments by biennium. This information shall
be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and by amount paid on
behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The military
department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2007-2009 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(3) $61,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) This amount shall not be allotted until a spending plan is
reviewed by the governor's domestic security advisory group and
approved by the office of financial management;
(c) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; incremental changes from the
previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security expenditures by
the state and local governments with this federal funding; and matching
or accompanying state or local expenditures; and
(d) The department shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing homeland security revenues and expenditures for
the previous fiscal year by county and legislative district.
(4) Within the funds appropriated in this section, the department
shall implement Substitute House Bill No. 1507 (uniformed service
shared leave).
(5) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($1,000,000)) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the military
department to contract with the Washington information network 2-1-1 to
operate a statewide 2-1-1 system. The department shall provide the
entire amount for 2-1-1 and shall not take any of the funds for
administrative purposes.
(6) Within the appropriation in this section sufficient funding is
provided to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1675 (public notices).

Sec. 136 2007 c 522 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,246,000))
$3,247,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,353,000))
$3,354,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,315,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,914,000))
$9,916,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $112,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $107,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2361 (higher education
exempt employees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 137 2007 c 522 s 152 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,087,000))
$1,114,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,033,000))
$1,776,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,651,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,785,000))
$4,555,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 2115 (heritage barn preservation). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $571,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $500,000 of the nonappropriated skeletal human remains
assistance account are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2624 (human remains). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 138 2007 c 522 s 153 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,890,000))
$1,893,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,942,000))
$1,953,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,832,000))
$3,846,000

Sec. 139 2007 c 522 s 154 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
State Convention and Trade Center Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,910,000))
$44,773,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operating
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,750,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($90,660,000))
$98,523,000

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 201 2007 c 522 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES. (1)
Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health
services shall initially be allotted as required by this act.
Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of
moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in
this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that
purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act.
(4) The department is authorized to develop an integrated health
care program designed to slow the progression of illness and disability
and better manage medicaid expenditures for the aged and disabled
population. Under this Washington medicaid integration partnership
(WMIP), the department may combine and transfer such medicaid funds
appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 209 of this act as may
be necessary to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 13,000 persons during the 2007-2009 biennium. The amount
of funding assigned to the pilot projects from each program may not
exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act for individuals
covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the health condition
of persons enrolled in the pilot project, times the number of clients
enrolled in the pilot project. In implementing the WMIP pilot
projects, the department may: (a) Withhold from calculations of
"available resources" as set forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the
capitated rate for individuals enrolled in the pilots; and (b) employ
capitation financing and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration
with health care service contractors licensed by the office of the
insurance commissioner and qualified to participate in both the
medicaid and medicare programs. The department shall conduct an
evaluation of the WMIP, measuring changes in participant health
outcomes, changes in patterns of service utilization, participant
satisfaction, participant access to services, and the state fiscal
impact.
(5)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2008, unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2008 among programs
after approval by the director of financial management. However, the
department shall not transfer state moneys that are provided solely for
a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this
subsection.
(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2008
caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the medical
assistance, long-term care, foster care, adoption support, and child
support programs, the department may transfer state moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose. The department shall not
transfer funds, and the director of financial management shall not
approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the
objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the
expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall
notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written
notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of
the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and
appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or
transfers.

Sec. 202 2007 c 522 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($313,898,000))
$316,725,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($327,462,000))
$348,814,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($468,668,000))
$492,069,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$2,187,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,251,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,254,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,298,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,126,199,000))
$1,175,466,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,063,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,063,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the category of services
titled "intensive family preservation services."
(2) $945,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $993,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to seventeen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $322,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(4) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a foster parent retention
program. This program is directed at foster parents caring for
children who act out sexually.
(5) The providers for the 31 HOPE beds shall be paid a (($1,000))
$1,020 base payment per bed per month, and reimbursed for the remainder
of the bed cost only when the beds are occupied.
(6) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.
(7) Within amounts appropriated in this section, priority shall be
given to proven intervention models, including evidence-based
prevention and early intervention programs identified by the Washington
state institute for public policy and the department. The department
shall include information on the number, type, and outcomes of the
evidence-based programs being implemented in its reports on child
welfare reform efforts.
(8) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $429,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase services provided through children's
advocacy centers.
(9) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a street youth program in
Spokane.
(10) $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, (($49,000)) $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, and (($41,000)) $34,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1472 (child welfare). ((If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.))
(11) $858,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $809,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $715,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5774
(background checks), including sections 6 and 7. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $4,962,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $4,586,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $9,548,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
a statewide automated child welfare information system.
(13) $126,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $55,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5321 (child
welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $707,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $680,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $594,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1334 (child welfare proceedings). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $2,237,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $2,238,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $1,918,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1333 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $137,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $137,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $118,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1287
(foster children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department to contract with the
Washington state institute for public policy to study evidence-based,
cost-effective programs and policies to reduce the likelihood of
children entering and remaining in the child welfare system, including
both prevention and intervention programs. If the department does not
receive $100,000 in matching funds from a private organization for the
purpose of conducting this study, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse. The study shall be completed by April 30,
2008. The department shall cooperate with the institute in
facilitating access to data in their administrative systems. The board
of the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust the due
date for this project as necessary to efficiently manage workload.
(18) $103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, (($98,000)) $407,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and (($201,000)) $48,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1131 (passport to
college). This includes funding to develop, implement, and administer
a program of educational transition planning for youth in foster care
as specified in the bill. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) The department shall continue spending levels for continuum of
care in region one at the same level allotted during the 2005-2007
biennium.
(20) Within the amounts provided, the department shall develop and
implement a two-tiered reimbursement rate schedule for children from
birth through twenty-four months of age and children twenty-five months
of age through age five served by the medicaid treatment child care
program. The department shall work in collaboration with contracted
providers of the program to develop the rate schedule, taking into
consideration such factors as higher staff level and small group size
requirements for each age group. The department shall implement the
rate schedule no later than January 1, 2008, and neither reimbursement
rate in the two-tiered schedule shall be lower than the reimbursement
rate level from the 2007 fiscal year.
(21) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $35,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 1624 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(22) $49,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $35,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of chapter 384, Laws of 2007.
(23) $857,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $140,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 3145 (foster parent licensing). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(24) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $38,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2679
(students in foster care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $535,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $251,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 3205 (child long-term well-being). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(26) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for a pilot program to colocate a domestic
violence advocate in at least one office of the children's
administration.

Sec. 203 2007 c 522 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($87,795,000))
$87,822,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($91,182,000))
$90,800,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,799,000))
$5,682,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,098,000))
$1,898,000
Reinvesting in Youth--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,414,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,458,000))
$21,975,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,568,000))
$22,085,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,510,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($235,195,000))
$236,557,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $353,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $353,000 of the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation for fiscal year
2009 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice
assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code
revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to
provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $3,078,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation and $500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,078,000 of the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation and $500,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile
code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended
to provide funding for county impacts associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed to
counties as prescribed in the current consolidated juvenile services
(CJS) formula.
(3) $1,030,000 of the general fund--state appropriation and
$2,686,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,030,000 of the general fund--state appropriation and $2,686,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants pursuant
to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided
in this subsection may be used solely for community juvenile
accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of
programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,506,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,506,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $2,669,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,066,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile
courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state
institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report:
"Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional
family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training
and interagency coordination programs or other programs with a positive
benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County juvenile courts
shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation administration for funding
for program-specific participation and the administration shall provide
grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment
costs identified by the institute.
(6) $1,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for expansion of the following
treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration
programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy
in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to
Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime
Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated
transitions and aggression replacement training. The administration
may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited
number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective
manner.
(7) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall provide a
block grant, rather than categorical funding, of consolidated juvenile
services funds, community juvenile accountability act grants, the
chemically dependent disposition alternative, and the special sex
offender disposition to county juvenile courts, or groups of courts,
including the Pierce county juvenile court. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the family policy council shall
jointly write criteria for awarding and administering block grants to
county juvenile courts. In developing the criteria, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the family policy council shall seek
the advice of the Washington state institute for public policy. The
criteria shall address, but not be limited to:
(a) The selection of courts for participation in the block grant;
(b) The types of evidence-based programs and practices to which the
funds will be applied. The evidence-based programs and practices shall
either be consistent with those cost-beneficial options identified by
the Washington state institute for public policy in its October 2006
report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates," or be new
approaches that have the potential to demonstrate positive returns for
the taxpayer; and
(c) The protocols for participating courts to collect information
on the effectiveness of programs funded under the block grant,
including: (i) Developing intermediate client outcomes based on the
risk assessment tool currently used by juvenile courts and in
coordination with the juvenile rehabilitation administration; (ii)
reporting treatment outcomes including a process evaluation to the
juvenile rehabilitation administration and the family policy council by
June 20, 2008, and an outcome evaluation of recidivism and benefit-cost
results submitted within eighteen months of the initiation of the
treatment, when follow-up data are available. The courts shall develop
these evaluations in consultation with the juvenile rehabilitation
administration, the family policy council, and the Washington state
institute for public policy; and (iii) documenting the process for
managing block grant funds on a quarterly basis and provide this report
to the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the family policy
council.
(8) $73,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $98,000 of the
Washington auto theft prevention authority account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 204 2007 c 522 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($302,674,000))
$305,109,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($312,997,000))
$321,254,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($380,003,000))
$382,020,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,948,000))
$16,286,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,007,622,000))
$1,024,669,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $103,989,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $104,080,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for persons and
services not covered by the medicaid program. These funds shall be
distributed proportionally to each regional support network's
percentage of the total state population.
(b) $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to contract for development and initial implementation
of high-intensity program for active community treatment (PACT) teams,
and other proven program approaches that the department concurs will
enable the regional support network to achieve significant reductions
during fiscal year 2008 and thereafter in the number of beds the
regional support network would otherwise need to use at the state
hospitals.
(c) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 222 per day
throughout fiscal year 2008. Beginning January 1, 2009, the number of
nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support networks at
eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The number of nonforensic
beds allocated for use by regional support networks at western state
hospital shall be 777 per day during the first and second quarters of
fiscal year 2008, and 677 per day from January 2008 through August
2008. Beginning September 2008, the number of nonforensic beds
allocated for use by regional support networks at western state
hospital shall be 647 per day until May 2009, at which time the bed
allocation shall be 617 beds per day. Beginning January 2008, beds in
the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) are not included in the
preceding bed allocations. Beginning that month, the department shall
separately charge regional support networks for persons served in the
PALS program ((and for use of state hospital beds for short-term
commitments)).
(d) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(e) ((Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the
department shall contract with the Clark county regional support
network for development and operation of a project demonstrating
collaborative methods for providing intensive mental health services in
the school setting for severely emotionally disturbed children who are
medicaid eligible. Project services shall be delivered by teachers and
teaching assistants who qualify as, or who are under the supervision
of, mental health professionals meeting the requirements of chapter
275-57 WAC. The department shall increase medicaid payments to the
regional support network by the amount necessary to cover the necessary
and allowable costs of the demonstration, not to exceed the upper
payment limit specified for the regional support network in the
department's medicaid waiver agreement with the federal government
after meeting all other medicaid spending requirements assumed in this
subsection. The regional support network shall provide the required
nonfederal share of the increased medicaid payment provided for
operation of this project.
(f))) At least $902,000 of the federal block grant funding
appropriated in this subsection shall be used for the continued
operation of the mentally ill offender pilot program.
(((g))) (f) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for mental
health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county
or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental
health services upon release from confinement. The department is
authorized to transfer up to $418,000 of these amounts each fiscal year
to the economic services program for purposes of facilitating prompt
access after their release from confinement to medical and income
assistance services for which defendants and offenders may be eligible.
(((h))) (g) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants for
innovative mental health service delivery projects. Such projects may
include, but are not limited to, clubhouse programs and projects for
integrated health care and behavioral health services for general
assistance recipients. These amounts shall supplement, and not
supplant, local or other funding currently being used for activities
funded under the projects authorized in this subsection.
(((i))) (h) The department is authorized to continue to expend
federal block grant funds and special purpose federal grants through
direct contracts, rather than through contracts with regional support
networks, and to allocate such funds through such formulas as it shall
adopt.
(((j))) (i) The department is authorized to continue to contract
directly, rather than through contracts with regional support networks,
for children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(((k))) (j) $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, and $4,500,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment. Coordination of these services will be done in partnership
between the mental health program and the aging and disability services
administration.
(((l))) (k) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the
state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative.
These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support
services provided by regional support networks through other state and
federal funding.
(((m) $2,979,000)) (l) $2,981,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, (($3,249,000)) $3,248,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and
(($2,040,000)) $2,016,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to modify the department's proposed new payment
rates for medicaid inpatient psychiatric services. Under the
department's proposed rate system, effective August 1, 2007, each
hospital's inpatient psychiatric payment rate would have been set at a
percentage of that hospital's estimated per diem cost for psychiatric
inpatient care during the most recent rebasing year. Within the amount
provided in this subsection (1)(m), beginning August 1, 2007, each
hospital's inpatient psychiatric payment rate shall instead be set at
the greater of a percentage of: (i) The hospital's estimated per diem
cost for psychiatric inpatient care during the most recent rebasing
year; or (ii) the statewide average per diem cost for psychiatric
inpatient care during the most recent rebasing year, adjusted for
regional wage differences and for differences in medical education
costs. At least thirty days prior to implementing adjustments to
regional support network medicaid capitation rates and nonmedicaid
allocations to account for changes in psychiatric inpatient payment
rates, the department shall report on the proposed adjustments to the
appropriations committee of the house of representatives and the ways
and means committee of the senate.
(((n))) (m) $6,267,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $6,462,000 of the general fund--((federal)) state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase
nonmedicaid psychiatric inpatient payment rates over fiscal year 2005
levels. It is expected that nonmedicaid rates will be set at
approximately 85 percent of each hospital's medicaid psychiatric
inpatient rate. At least thirty days prior to implementing adjustments
to regional support network medicaid capitation rates and nonmedicaid
allocations to account for changes in psychiatric inpatient payment
rates, the department shall report on the proposed adjustments to the
appropriations committee of the house of representatives and the ways
and means committee of the senate.
(((o) $7,363,000)) (n) $7,396,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, (($15,028,000)) $15,146,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $13,927,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to
increase regional support network medicaid capitation rates and
nonmedicaid allocations by 3.0 percent effective July 1, 2007, and by
an additional 3.0 percent effective July 1, 2008. The federal portion
of these rate increases is contingent upon federal approval. (i) The
legislature intends and expects that regional support networks and
community mental health agencies will use at least 67 percent of the
amounts provided in this subsection(1)(o) to increase compensation for
direct care personnel above and beyond usual and customary wage
increases. To this end, regional support networks shall report to the
department by October 15, 2007, on planned uses of the rate increases
within their network area. The report shall describe the direct care
job classifications to which increases are to be provided; the number
of full-time equivalent personnel employed in each classification; the
annualized dollar and percentage increases to be provided each
classification; the annualized dollar value of the direct care
compensation increases provided, in total and as a percentage of the
total rate increase; and the number of personnel in each job
classification covered by a collective bargaining agreement. The
department shall summarize and analyze the regional plans, and report
findings, options, and recommendations to the legislature by December
1, 2007. (ii) Regional support networks shall maintain documentation
of how the rate increases have been applied. Such documentation shall
be subject to audit by the department. (iii) For purposes of this
subsection (1)(o), "direct care staff" means persons employed by
community mental health agencies whose primary responsibility is
providing direct treatment and support to people with mental illness,
or whose primary responsibility is providing direct support to such
staff in areas such as client scheduling, client intake, client
reception, client records-keeping, and facilities maintenance.
(((p))) (o) $2,021,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,683,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1456 (mental health
professionals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. For purposes of
organizing and delivering training as required by the bill, the
department may retain up to fifteen percent of the amount appropriated
for fiscal year 2008, and up to ten percent of the amount appropriated
for fiscal year 2009. The remainders shall be distributed to regional
support networks proportional to each network's percentage of the total
state population.
(p) $3,236,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $1,418,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation are provided solely to enable the department to contract
with Pierce county human services for the provision of community mental
health services to include crisis triage, evaluation and treatment, and
mobile crisis services. The legislature intends for this to be one-time funding while a replacement regional support network is being
secured. The department is authorized to reserve $402,000 general
fund--state and $201,000 general fund--local of these amounts for
reasonable costs incurred by Pierce county under the provision of
mental health crisis and related services that exceed reimbursement
levels contracted by the department. In order to receive these funds,
Pierce county must demonstrate to the department that the total cost of
mental health services provided by the county in accordance with formal
agreements has exceeded the revenues received from the department and
third party payers for these services. The department shall determine
the documentation that is required.
(q) $593,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,780,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are solely to provide long term involuntary treatment
act (ITA) judicial costs in accordance with RCW 71.05.320 for Pierce
and Spokane counties.
(r) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for one-time grants for emergent financial
relief for clubhouses. In order to receive these funds, the clubhouse
must be able to demonstrate need to the department. The department
shall develop and implement a simplified application form. The
clubhouses shall provide financial documentation to the department as
requested to support their application. The amounts and quantity of
the individual grants shall be at the discretion of the department.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($142,545,000))
$138,340,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($139,286,000))
$137,104,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($146,401,000))
$146,188,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,064,000))
$66,986,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,058,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($492,354,000))
$495,676,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state ((mental)) psychiatric hospitals may use funds
appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through
hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do
so.
(b) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state
hospital and adjacent areas.
(c) $18,575,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $9,675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to operate on a temporary basis
five additional adult civil commitment wards at the state psychiatric
hospitals. The legislature intends for these wards to close, on a
phased basis, during the 2007-09 biennium as a result of targeted
investments in community services for persons who would otherwise need
care in the hospitals.
(d) (($125,000)) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and (($125,000)) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for safety
training ((and for)), behavioral intervention training, and protective
equipment for staff at eastern and western state hospitals. Protective
equipment shall include shields, helmets, gloves, and body protection.
(e) $304,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a community partnership
between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support
community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding
western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(e)
are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time
community service officer at the city of Lakewood.
(f) $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to pilot a direct care nurse
staffing plan for two high incident wards at eastern state hospital and
four high incident wards at western state hospital. The pilot provides
funding to fully staff registered nurses, licensed practical nurses,
and mental health technicians in accordance with the state psychiatric
hospitals direct care staffing review and recommendations. The
department shall have the authority to fill the positions with any mix
of these direct care nursing staff so long as a good faith effort is
made to first hire and recruit positions in accordance with the direct
care nurse staffing plan. The department shall monitor outcomes for
improved patient and staff safety and provide a written report to the
legislature by October 1, 2009.
(g) $617,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $334,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to cover additional operating
costs related to the October 11th, 2007, laundry fire at western state
hospital.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,892,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,192,000))
$2,469,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,195,000))
$3,278,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,279,000))
$7,639,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $1,189,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $140,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of sections 4, 7,
10, and other provisions of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1088
(children's mental health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. Funds are
also appropriated in sections 207 and 209 of this act for
implementation of 5, 8, and 11 of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1088.
(b) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $80,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2690 (mental health first aid train-the-trainer program). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(c) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for a review of residential drift in
partnership with the Washington institute for mental illness research
and training. The review shall include a statewide analysis of the
county of origin for patients placed in eastern and western state
psychiatric hospitals and the concentration of people with severe and
persistent mental illness in communities proximate to these hospitals.
The results of this review shall be reported to the legislature by
October 30, 2008.
(d) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for a mental health nonmedicaid cost study
and the development of a mental health nonmedicaid budgeting tool in
partnership with the Washington state institute for public policy. The
mental health division shall work in consultation with the Washington
state institute for public policy to establish methodology and
parameters for the study and the budgeting tool. Cost data shall be
gathered from thirteen regional support networks. A final report is
due to the legislature by December 1, 2008, and shall include a cost
analysis that considers cost differentials according to urban and rural
settings; an empirical review of mental health prevalence data; and the
growth of involuntary treatment over time and its effects on outpatient
treatment.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,966,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,060,000))
$5,160,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,604,000))
$7,606,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,630,000))
$17,732,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $164,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the institute for public policy to continue the
longitudinal analysis directed in chapter 334, Laws of 2001 (mental
health performance audit), to build upon the evaluation of the impacts
of chapter 214, Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders), and to assess
program outcomes and cost effectiveness of the children's mental health
pilot projects as required by chapter 372, Laws of 2006.
(b) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department to contract with a
facilitator to coordinate a review and make recommendations on:
(i) Ward sizes at eastern and western state hospitals and patient
case mix by ward;
(ii) Discharge practices for state hospitals to include the child
and study treatment center; and
(iii) Community placements to include placements for adults and
children.
By October 15, 2008, the department shall provide to the
legislature recommendations for system improvement to include a
cost/benefit analysis. The department shall include representation
from regional support networks in the review and development of
recommendations for discharge practices and community placements.

Sec. 205 2007 c 522 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($346,600,000))
$348,327,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($373,776,000))
$383,224,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($633,258,000))
$638,870,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,354,538,000))
$1,371,325,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The entire health services account appropriation, $615,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $892,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and
$2,546,011 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for health care benefits for agency home care workers who are
employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours a week. The
state contribution to the cost of health care benefits per
participating worker per month shall be no greater than $532.00 in
fiscal year 2008 and $585.00 in fiscal year 2009.
(b) Individuals receiving family support or high school transition
payments as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental
payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW
74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.
(c) $4,903,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $9,295,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $15,016,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for community residential and support
services. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for (i)
residents of residential habilitation centers who are able to be
adequately cared for in community settings and who choose to live in
those community settings; (ii) clients without residential services who
are at immediate risk of institutionalization or in crisis; (iii)
children who are at risk of institutionalization or who are aging out
of other state services; and (iv) current home and community-based
waiver program clients who have been assessed as having an immediate
need for increased services. The department shall ensure that the
average cost per day for all program services other than start-up costs
shall not exceed $300. In order to maximize the number of clients
served and ensure the cost-effectiveness of the waiver programs, the
department will strive to limit new client placement expenditures to 90
percent of the budgeted daily rate. If this can be accomplished,
additional clients may be served with excess funds, provided the total
projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed the amounts
estimated. The department shall electronically report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days following
each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served with these
additional community services, where they were residing, what kinds of
services they were receiving prior to placement, and the actual
expenditures for all community services to support these clients.
(d) (($2,799,000)) $2,399,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $5,961,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and (($9,268,000)) $8,849,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
expanded community services for persons with developmental disabilities
who also have community protection issues. Funding in this subsection
shall be prioritized for (i) clients being diverted or discharged from
the state psychiatric hospitals; (ii) clients participating in the
dangerous mentally ill offender program; (iii) clients participating in
the community protection program; and (iv) mental health crisis
diversion outplacements. The department shall ensure that the average
cost per day for all program services other than start-up costs shall
not exceed (($349)) $320 in fiscal year 2008 and $356 in fiscal year
2009. In order to maximize the number of clients served and ensure the
cost-effectiveness of the waiver programs, the department will strive
to limit new client placement expenditures to 90 percent of the
budgeted daily rate. If this can be accomplished, additional clients
may be served with excess funds if the total projected carry-forward
expenditures do not exceed the amounts estimated. The department shall
implement the four new waiver programs such that decisions about
enrollment levels and the amount, duration, and scope of services
maintain expenditures within appropriations. The department shall
electronically report to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the number of
persons served with these additional community services, where they
were residing, what kinds of services they were receiving prior to
placement, and the actual expenditures for all community services to
support these clients.
(e) $13,598,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $16,354,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $8,579,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for family support programs for
individuals with developmental disabilities. Of the amounts provided
in this subsection (e), $1,096,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,852,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are for state-only services
for individuals with developmental disabilities, as described in Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5467 (developmental disabilities). By
January 1, 2008, and by November 1, 2008, the department shall provide
a status report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature on the individual and family services program for people
with developmental disabilities, which shall include the following
information: The number of applicants for funding; the total number of
awards; the number and amount of both annual and one-time awards,
broken down by household income levels; and the purpose of the awards.
(f) (($1,577,000)) $1,692,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, (($3,480,000)) $3,645,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and
(($2,105,000)) $2,397,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for employment and day services. Priority
consideration for this new funding shall be young adults with
developmental disabilities living with their family who need employment
opportunities and assistance after high school graduation. Services
shall be provided for both waiver and nonwaiver clients. In order to
maximize the number of clients served, the department may serve
additional nonwaiver clients with unspent funds for waiver clients,
provided the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed
the amounts estimated.
(g) $160,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $140,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5467 (developmental disabilities). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(h) ((The department shall collect data from the counties related
to employment services. This data shall include, but not necessarily
be limited to, information pertaining to: (i) The average length of
time clients utilize job coaching services, (ii) the percentage of
clients utilizing job coaching services from zero to three months, four
to six months, seven to nine months, ten to twelve months, and twelve
months or more, (iii) within the monthly grouping, the percentage of
clients utilizing job coaching services from zero to five hours per
week, five to ten hours per week, ten to twenty hours per week, and
twenty or more hours per week. This data shall be provided to the
appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007.
(i))) The department shall phase-in a full implementation of a
seventeen care level payment system for community residential
providers. Amounts appropriated in this subsection are sufficient to
increase provider payment rates by 6.0 percent, effective July 1, 2007,
((and by an additional 2.0 percent, effective July 1, 2008,)) for
boarding homes, including those currently receiving exceptional care
rates((; and)). Effective July 1, 2008, the provider payment rate
allocation for boarding homes shall be no more than 3.0 percent below
the provider's June 30, 2008, payment rate allocation. This will be in
effect until such time as the rates are consistent between adult family
homes and boarding homes for delivery of the same patient care levels.
Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient to increase
provider payment rates by 3.2 percent, effective July 1, 2007, and on
average, by an additional ((2.0)) 5.8 percent, effective July 1, 2008,
for adult family homes, including those currently receiving exceptional
care rates.
(i) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the purpose of settling all claims in
the Washington Federation of State Employees, et. al v. State of
Washington, Thurston County Superior Court Cause No. 05-2-02422-4. The
expenditure of this appropriation is contingent on the release of all
claims in this case, and total settlement costs shall not exceed the
appropriation in this subsection (i). If settlement is not executed by
June 30, 2008, the appropriation in this subsection (i) shall lapse.
(j) $910,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $951,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the development and implementation of a federal
home and community-based care waiver to provide intensive behavior
support services to up to one hundred children with developmental
disabilities who have intense behaviors, and their families.
(i) To receive services under the waiver, the child must have a
developmental disability and: (A) Meet an acuity measure, as
determined by the department, indicating that the child is at high risk
of needing an out-of-home placement; (B) be eligible for developmental
disabilities services and a home and community-based care waiver
program; (C) reside in his or her family home or temporarily in an
out-of-home placement with a plan to return home; and (D) have family
that demonstrates the willingness to participate in the services
offered through the waiver, and is not subject to a pending child
protective services referral.
(ii) The department shall authorize, contract for, and evaluate the
provision of intensive in-home services that support the ability of the
child to remain at home with their parents or relatives. Intensive
behavior support services under the waiver shall be provided directly
or by contract, and may include, but are not limited to: (A) Behavior
consultation and management, therapies and respite care; (B) minor home
or motor vehicle modifications and transportation; (C) specialized
nutrition and clothing; (D) training of families and other individuals
working with the child; and (E) inclusion in community activities.
(k) $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $205,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for an increased vendor rate to supported living
providers located in Snohomish county.
(l) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for a pilot project in at least one county
to provide working age adults with severe and profound developmental
disabilities a choice between employment-related services and community
access services. The pilot shall be administered through the chosen
county's employment and day programs authorized under chapter 71A.14
RCW.
(i) Persons eligible to receive community access services are
persons with severe and profound developmental disabilities for whom
efforts have been made over a six month period to arrange for
employment in a group or individual supported employment setting for at
least fifteen hours per week, without locating a suitable employment
opportunity.
(ii) Community access services offered under the pilot program may
include independent living skills training, community participation,
social skills, self-advocacy skills, recreational skills, continuing
education classes, active supervision, and transportation.
(iii) Per person expenditures for community access services under
the pilot program shall not exceed the average per capita expenditure
by the county for employment services under its current employment and
day programs.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,765,000))
$80,469,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,873,000))
$83,309,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($171,836,000))
$174,754,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,613,000))
$22,203,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,614,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($358,701,000))
$366,349,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The developmental disabilities program is authorized to use
funds appropriated in this section to purchase goods and supplies
through direct contracting with vendors when the program determines it
is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for services provided to community
clients provided by licensed professionals at the state rehabilitation
centers. The division shall submit claims for reimbursement for
services provided to clients living in the community to medical
assistance or third-party health care coverage, as appropriate, and
shall implement a system for billing clients without coverage.
(c) $642,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to fulfill its
contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to
provide transportation, building space, and other support services as
are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of
students living in residential habilitation centers.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,273,000))
$2,262,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,377,000))
$2,372,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,821,000))
$2,841,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,471,000))
$7,475,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: As part of the needs assessment
instrument, the department shall collect data on family income for
minor children with developmental disabilities and all individuals who
are receiving state-only funded services. The department shall ensure
that this information is collected as part of the client assessment
process.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,843,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,875,000

Sec. 206 2007 c 522 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($699,089,000))
$700,341,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($741,478,000))
$755,352,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,539,010,000))
$1,534,719,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,563,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,448,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,444,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,444,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($440,000))
$1,212,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,005,916,000))
$3,017,523,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire health services account appropriation, $10,456,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008,
$11,370,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009, and $26,778,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for health care benefits for agency home care workers
who are employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours a
week. The state contribution to the cost of health care benefits per
eligible participating worker per month shall be no greater than
$532.00 in fiscal year 2008 and $585.00 per month in fiscal year 2009.
(2) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed (($158.11))
$159.03 for fiscal year 2008 and shall not exceed (($164.18)) $164.89
for fiscal year 2009. For all nursing facilities, the direct care,
therapy care, support services, and operations component rates
established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW shall be adjusted for
economic trends and conditions by 3.2 percent effective July 1, 2007.
For all nursing facilities, adjustments for economic trends and
conditions effective July 1, 2008, shall be as follows: The direct
care component shall be adjusted by 4.1 percent; the therapy care and
operations components shall be adjusted by 0.5 percent; and the support
services component shall be adjusted by 3.2 percent.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue certificates of capital authorization that result in up to
$16,000,000 of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy
in fiscal year 2008; up to $16,000,000 of increased asset value
completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2009; and up to
$16,000,000 of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy
in fiscal year 2010.
(4) Adult day health services shall not be considered a duplication
of services for persons receiving care in long-term care settings
licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW.
(5) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not qualify
for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval
and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 600
persons at any time.
(b) The second waiver program shall include coverage of in-home
care. Enrollment in this second waiver shall not exceed 200 persons at
any time.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(d) If it is necessary to establish a waiting list for either
waiver because the budgeted number of enrollment opportunities has been
reached, the department shall track how the long-term care needs of
applicants assigned to the waiting list are met.
(6) $1,840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
chore services program.
(7) The department shall establish waiting lists to the extent
necessary to assure that annual expenditures on the community options
program entry systems (COPES) program do not exceed appropriated
levels. In establishing and managing any such waiting list, the
department shall assure priority access to persons with the greatest
unmet needs, as determined by department assessment processes.
(8) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $250,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on health care). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(9) $168,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $182,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for a review of the costs and benefits of a fair rental
system to reimburse capital expenditures. The department must report
its findings to the joint legislative task force on long-term care
residential facility payment systems by July 1, 2009.
(10)(a) (($8,755,000)) $1,827,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year ((2009 and $9,348,000)) 2008, $9,948,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and
$12,481,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely to increase nursing facility payment rates.
(b) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to contract with an outside entity
to review the current medicaid payment methodology for nursing
facilities and make recommendations for revisions to, restructuring of,
or replacement of the existing payment methodology no later than
October 1, 2007, to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature.
(c) A joint legislative task force on long-term care residential
facility payment systems shall review ((and develop)) recommendations
((related to payment methodologies)) of the department on long-term
care residential facility payment systems for the care of
medicaid-eligible residents of nursing homes, boarding homes, and adult
family homes in Washington state.
(i) Membership of the task force shall consist of eight
legislators. The president of the senate shall appoint two members
from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate. The speaker of
the house of representatives shall appoint two members of each of the
two largest caucuses of the house of representatives. Each body shall
select representatives from committees with jurisdiction over health
and long-term care and fiscal matters. The task force expires January
1, 2010.
(ii) The task force will review and provide comments on department
recommendations for a new noncapital payment system and report to the
legislature by January 1, 2009.
(iii) The task force will review and provide comments on capital
rate components to the legislature by December 30, 2009.
(((ii) The task force shall give strong consideration to the
following principles in the course of its deliberations:
(A) A continuum of residential care settings should be available to
medicaid-eligible vulnerable adults so as to honor consumer choice;
(B) Payment methodologies for care provided in adult family homes,
boarding homes, and nursing homes should be based upon resident acuity,
with payment rates that recognize the impact of differing state and
federal regulatory requirements upon facility costs, but also address
current disparities in payments to facilities serving residents with
similar nursing or personal care needs;
(C) Payment methodologies should be designed to support retention
of qualified direct care staff through training, wages, and benefits
offered to direct care staff, with special consideration given to
nursing homes, boarding homes, and adult family homes that care for a
disproportionate number of medicaid-eligible residents relative to
their peer facilities;
(D) Performance measures related to critical issues such as staff
retention and resident outcomes should be developed, with payment
linked to facility performance on the measures; and
(E) Payment methodologies should be simplified, with greater
predictability and stability in payments.
(iii) The task force shall:
(A) Review and consider the recommendations submitted in accordance
with (b) of this subsection;
(B) Consider input from long-term care stakeholders with respect to
the principles in (c)(ii) of this subsection;
(C) Review the current payment methodologies for nursing homes,
boarding homes, and adult family homes, giving strong consideration to
the principles in (c)(ii) of this subsection, and make recommendations
for revisions to, restructuring of, or replacement of existing payment
methodologies. The recommendations related to payments made in fiscal
year 2009 shall be consistent with the amounts appropriated in this
subsection.
(iv) The task force shall complete its review and submit its
recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 31, 2007.
(v))) (iv) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by
senate committee services and the house of representatives office of
program research.
(((vi))) (v) Legislative members of the task force shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(((vii))) (vi) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly
by the senate and the house of representatives. Task force
expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities and
operations committee and the house of representatives executive rules
committees, or their successor committees.
(((viii) The task force expires December 31, 2007.
(10))) (11) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the
department is authorized to expand the number of boarding homes and
adult family homes that receive exceptional care rates for persons with
Alzheimer's disease and related dementias who might otherwise require
nursing home care. The department may expand the number of licensed
boarding home facilities that specialize in caring for such conditions
by up to 100 beds. Effective July 1, 2008, the department shall be
authorized to provide adult family homes that specialize in caring for
such conditions with exceptional care rates for up to 50 beds. The
department will develop standards for adult family homes to qualify for
such exceptional care rates in order to enhance consumer choice.
(((11))) (12) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $816,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2111 (adult family homes). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((12) $440,000)) (13) $1,212,000 of the traumatic brain injury
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation
of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2055 (traumatic brain injury). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((13))) (14) Within amounts appropriated in this section and in
section 205 of this act, the department of social and health services
shall:
(a) Determine how geographic differences in community residential
provider payments affect provider and workforce turnover;
(b) Examine alternative community residential provider payment
systems that account for differences in direct care labor costs in
various areas of the state, including alternative peer groupings in its
payment systems that take such factors into account; and
(c) Submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the
office of financial management and to the appropriate fiscal committees
of the legislature by June 30, 2008.
(((14))) (15) The department shall phase-in a full implementation
of a seventeen care level payment system for community residential
providers. Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient to
increase provider payment rates by 6.0 percent, effective July 1, 2007,
((and by an additional 2.0 percent, effective July 1, 2008,)) for
boarding homes, including those currently receiving exceptional care
rates((; and)). Effective July 1, 2008, the provider payment rate
allocation for boarding homes shall be no more than 3.0 percent below
the provider's June 30, 2008, payment rate allocation. This will be in
effect until such time as the rates are consistent between adult family
homes and boarding homes for delivery of the same patient care levels.
Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient to increase
provider payment rates by 3.2 percent, effective July 1, 2007, on
average, and by an additional ((2.0)) 5.8 percent, effective July 1,
2008, for adult family homes, including those currently receiving
exceptional care rates.
(((15))) (16) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department contract for an
evaluation of training requirements for long-term care workers as
generally described in Second Substitute House Bill No. 2284 (training
of care providers).
(17) The department shall contract for housing with service models,
such as cluster care, to create efficiencies in service delivery and
responsiveness to unscheduled personal care needs by clustering hours
for clients that live in close proximity to each other.
(18) $3,394,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $1,002,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of sections 4, 6, 8, and 9 of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2668 (relating to long term
care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $944,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $945,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2693 (required basic training and certification of long-term care
workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 207 2007 c 522 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($592,774,000))
$586,369,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($627,148,000))
$623,355,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,053,264,000))
$1,040,350,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,920,000))
$30,833,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,592,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,305,698,000))
$2,285,499,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($334,377,000)) $344,694,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, (($347,597,000)) $363,284,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and
(($827,774,000)) $733,276,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst
program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the
department may provide assistance using state-only funds for families
eligible for temporary assistance for needy families. Within the
amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department shall:
(a) Establish a ((post-TANF)) career services work transition
program;
(b) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Outcome data regarding job retention and wage progression
shall be reported quarterly to appropriate fiscal and policy committees
of the legislature for families who leave assistance, measured after 12
months, 24 months, and 36 months. The department shall also report the
percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance for
needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months;
(c) Submit a report by October 1, 2007, to the fiscal committees of
the legislature containing a spending plan for the WorkFirst program.
The plan shall identify how spending levels in the 2007-2009 biennium
will be adjusted to stay within available federal grant levels and the
appropriated state-fund levels;
(d) Provide quarterly fiscal reports to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on the amount expended from general fund--state and general fund--federal by activity;
(e) When determining eligibility for temporary assistance for needy
families and general assistance unemployable, treat the following
resources as exempt:
(i) A motor vehicle with an equity value up to ten thousand
dollars;
(ii) Retirement savings accounts; and
(iii) All other resources, including any excess of values exempted,
not to exceed five thousand dollars or other limit as set by the
department, to be consistent with limitations on resources and
exemptions necessary for federal aid assistance.
(2) Up to $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 of the amounts in subsection (1) of this section
are for the WorkFirst pathway to engagement program. The department
shall collaborate with community partners and represented staff to
identify additional services needed for WorkFirst clients in sanction
status. The department shall contract with qualified community-based
organizations to deliver such services, provided that such services are
complimentary to the work of the department and are not intended to
supplant existing staff or services. The department shall also
contract with community-based organizations for the provision of
services for WorkFirst clients who have been terminated after six
months of sanction. Contracts established pursuant to this subsection
shall have a performance-based component and shall include both
presanction termination and postsanction termination services. Clients
shall be able to choose whether or not to accept the services. The
department shall develop outcome measures for the program related to
outreach and reengagement, reduction of barriers to employment, and
client feedback and satisfaction. Nothing in this subsection is
intended to modify a collective bargaining agreement under chapter
41.80 RCW or to change the state's responsibility under chapter 41.80
RCW. The department shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007, on program
implementation and outcomes. The department also shall report on
implementation of specialized caseloads for clients in sanction status,
including average caseload size, referral process and criteria, and
expected outcomes for specialized caseloads.
(3) $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $187,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $396,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of section 8 of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1088 (children's mental health). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $152,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $482,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1009 (child support schedule). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase naturalization
services. These amounts shall supplement and not supplant state and
federal resources currently provided by the department for this
purpose.
(6) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase limited English
proficiency pathway services. These amounts shall supplement and not
supplant state and federal resources currently provided by the
department for this purpose.
(7) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $5,782,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $6,431,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5244 (deficit reduction act). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall: (a) Increase the state supplemental payment by $1.77 per month
beginning July 1, 2007, and by an additional $1.83 per month beginning
July 1, 2008, for SSI clients who reside in nursing facilities,
residential habilitation centers, or state hospitals and who receive a
personal needs allowance; and (b) decrease other state supplemental
payments.
(9) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department for the data
tracking provisions specified in sections 701 and 702 of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5470 (dissolution proceedings). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) $1,552,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,552,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6016 (workfirst program). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(11) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department to award grants
to small mutual assistance associations or small community-based
organizations that contract with the department for immigrant and
refugee assistance services. The funds shall be awarded to demonstrate
the impact of providing funding for a case worker in the community
organization on the refugees' economic self-sufficiency through the
effective use of social services, and financial and medical assistance.
(12) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2798 (local farms and healthy kids). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(13) $465,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to increase the gross income limits on
basic food eligibility for food stamps to 200 percent of the federal
poverty level.
(14) $656,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to the department to increase immigration
and naturalization services. These funds shall not supplant state and
federal resources currently provided by the department for this
purpose.

Sec. 208 2007 c 522 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND
SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,445,000))
$66,087,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,663,000))
$69,580,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($138,942,000))
$144,307,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $632,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,752,000))
$17,557,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,538,000))
$22,186,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,538,000))
$22,186,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,567,000))
$1,464,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,044,000))
$6,461,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,043,000))
$6,460,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($349,310,000))
$357,066,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,786,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,785,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the parent child assistance
program. The department shall contract with the University of
Washington and community-based providers for the provision of this
program. For all contractors, indirect charges for administering the
program shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.
(2) $11,113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $14,490,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $14,269,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the expansion of chemical
dependency treatment services for adult medicaid eligible and general
assistance-unemployable patients authorized under the 2005-07 biennial
appropriations act. By September 30, 2007, the department shall submit
an expenditure and program report relating to the patients receiving
treatment and other services pursuant to the funding provided in this
subsection (2), as well as to other patients receiving treatment funded
by the department. The report shall be submitted to the office of
financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature. Subsequent updates to this report shall be
provided by January 31 and July 31 of each fiscal year of the 2007-09
biennium. The reports shall include, but not necessarily be limited
to, the following information: (a) The number and demographics
(including categories) of patients served; (b) geographic distribution;
(c) modality of treatment services provided (i.e. residential or
out-patient); (d) treatment completion rates; (e) funds spent; and (f)
where applicable, the estimated cost offsets in medical assistance on
a total and per patient basis.
(3) $698,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $698,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $154,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the expansion authorized under the 2005-07 biennial
appropriations act of chemical dependency treatment services for minors
who are under 200 percent of the federal poverty level. The department
shall monitor the number and type of clients entering treatment, for
purposes of determining potential cost offsets.
(4) (($250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to contract for
the following: (a) A pilot program in Pierce county for family
therapeutic court services that include chemical dependency treatment
with use of the prometa protocol; and (b) an independent evaluator to
evaluate the efficacy of the treatment with the prometa protocol under
the pilot program as compared to other drug treatment and to no
treatment.)) $298,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $264,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the cost of eight youth inpatient
beds at the central Washington comprehensive mental health's children's
co-occurring disorders inpatient program, scheduled to open in January
2009.
(5) $2,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the continuation of two integrated
crisis response/secure detoxification pilot programs and two intensive
case management pilot programs codified in chapter 70.96B RCW. The
appropriation extends the pilot programs and the accompanying study
required by RCW 70.96B.800 for an additional year.

Sec. 209 2007 c 522 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,589,266,000))
$1,602,827,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,665,304,000))
$1,671,096,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,305,197,000))
$4,345,307,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,076,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($350,259,000))
$388,946,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($385,215,000))
$421,883,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $646,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,312,963,000))
$8,447,781,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the department is authorized to disregard recoveries by
Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined
in RCW 48.104.030.
(3) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to continue podiatry services for medicaid-eligible adults.
(4) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to provide an adult dental benefit that is at least
equivalent to the benefit provided in the 2003-05 biennium.
(5) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The
public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the
required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the
payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules.
It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental
to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated
and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the
legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall
not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues
retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The
supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final
cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final
medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost
settlements shall be at the department's discretion. During either the
interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the department
shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental
payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper
payment limit. The department shall apply federal rules for
identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper
payment limit.
(6) $1,111,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,110,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $5,402,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation, $1,590,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $1,591,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
grants to rural hospitals. The department shall distribute the funds
under a formula that provides a relatively larger share of the
available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate share
of low-income and medically indigent patients and (b) have relatively
smaller net financial margins, to the extent allowed by the federal
medicaid program.
(7) $10,546,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $10,546,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $19,725,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for grants to nonrural
hospitals. The department shall distribute the funds under a formula
that provides a relatively larger share of the available funding to
hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate share of low-income and
medically indigent patients and (b) have relatively smaller net
financial margins, to the extent allowed by the federal medicaid
program.
(8) The department shall continue the inpatient hospital certified
public expenditures program for the 2007-2009 biennium. The program
shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated
by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or
state psychiatric institutions. The department shall submit ((a))
reports to the governor and legislature by November 1, 2007, and by
November 1, 2008, that evaluate((s)) whether savings continue to exceed
costs for this program. If the certified public expenditures program
in its current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the
department shall submit a report to the governor and legislature
detailing cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal
resources as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2008
and fiscal year 2009, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall
retain (a) one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable
hospital cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable
by medical assistance; and (b) one hundred percent of the federal
portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment
allowable under federal regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall
be established using an allowable methodology that approximates the
cost of claims submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each
hospital in the program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be
compared to a baseline amount that is the total of (a) the total
payment for claims for services rendered during the fiscal year
calculated according to the methodology employed by the legislature in
the omnibus appropriations act for implementation in fiscal year 2008
and (b) disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and
retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 that pertain to
fiscal year 2005. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the
hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the
hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share
hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match.
If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount,
the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between
payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount.
Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year
and is subject to an interim ((cost)) settlement within eleven months
after the end of the fiscal year. A final ((cost)) settlement shall be
performed within two years after the end of the related fiscal year.
To the extent that either ((a final cost)) settlement determines that
a hospital has received funds in excess of what it would have received
under the methodology in place in fiscal year 2008 as described in this
subsection, the hospital must repay ((these)) the excess amounts to the
state when requested. (($74,066,000)) $61,728,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, of which $6,570,000 is
appropriated in section 204(1) of this act and the balance in this
section, and (($59,776,000)) $57,894,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated
in section 204(1) of this act and the balance in this section, are
provided solely for state grants for the participating hospitals.
(9) (($7,314,000)) $5,087,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, (($7,800,000)) $9,100,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and
(($48,995,000)) $65,577,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
are provided solely for development and implementation of a replacement
system for the existing medicaid management information system. The
amounts are conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements
of section 902 of this act.
(10) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the department shall
provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if
eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.
(11) The department is authorized to use funds appropriated in this
section to purchase goods and supplies through direct contracting with
vendors when the department determines it is cost-effective to do so.
(12) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(13) The department shall, within available resources, continue
operation of the medical care services care management pilot project
for clients receiving general assistance benefits in King and Pierce
counties. The project may use a full or partial capitation model that
includes a mechanism for shared savings.
(14) $1,688,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,689,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to incorporate a mental health
service component to the pilot project established pursuant to
subsection (13) of this section. Addition of the mental health service
component authorized in this subsection is contingent upon the managed
care contractor or the participating counties providing, alone or in
combination, matching funds in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to
one-ninth of the amounts appropriated in this subsection. The mental
health service component may include care coordination, mental health
services, and integrated medical and mental health service delivery for
general assistance clients with mental health disorders, as well as
primary care provider training and education. The department shall
provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2009, on costs, savings, and any outcomes or quality
measures associated with the pilot projects during calendar year 2007
and 2008. To the extent possible, the report shall address any impact
that the mental health services component has had upon clients' use of
medical services, including but not limited to primary care physician's
visits, emergency room utilization, and prescription drug utilization.
(15) $341,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,054,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $1,461,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1201 (foster care youth medical). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(16) (($6,529,000)) $6,728,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($6,651,000)) $8,563,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely to provide full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries with
medicare part D prescription drug copayment coverage in accordance with
chapter 3, Laws of 2007 (part D copayment drug program).
(17) The department shall conduct a study to determine the
financial impact associated with continuing to cover brand name
medications versus the same medication in its generic form. The study
shall account for all rebates paid to the state on each product studied
up until the point where the generic form is less expensive, net of
federally required rebates. The department shall submit its report to
the legislative fiscal committees by December 1, 2007.
(18) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $268,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the first two years of a four-year project by the Seattle-King county health department to improve
management of symptoms and reduce complications related to asthma among
medicaid eligible children. The department shall contract with the
Seattle-King county health department to have trained community health
workers visit medicaid eligible children in their homes to identify and
reduce exposure to asthma triggers, improve clients' self-management
skills, and coordinate clients' care with their primary care and
specialty providers. The contract shall include an evaluation of the
impact of the services provided under the contract on urgent
physician's visits, emergency room utilization, and inpatient
hospitalization.
(19) (($2,450,000)) $1,529,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($1,950,000)) $2,871,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for development and implementation of an outreach program as
provided in chapter 5, Laws of 2007 (Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5093, health services for children). By December 15, 2007, the
department shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on the progress of implementing the following activities:
(a) Feasibility study and implementation plan to develop online
application capability that is integrated with the department's
automated client eligibility system;
(b) Development of data linkages with the office of superintendent
of public instruction for free and reduced-price lunch enrollment
information and the department of early learning for child care subsidy
program enrollment information;
(c) Informing insurers and providers when their enrollees'
eligibility is going to expire so insurers and providers can help
families reenroll;
(d) Outreach contracts with local governmental entities, community
based organizations, and tribes;
(e) Results of data sharing with outreach contractors, and other
contracted entities such as local governments, community-based
organizations, tribes, health care providers, and insurers to engage,
enroll, and reenroll identified children;
(f) Results of efforts to maximize federal matching funds, wherever
possible; and
(g) Plans for sustaining outreach programs proven to be successful.
(20) $640,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to:
(a) Pay the premiums associated with enrollment in a medicare
advantage plan for those full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries, as
defined in RCW 74.09.010, who were enrolled on or before November 14,
2006 in a medicare advantage plan sponsored by an entity accredited by
the national committee for quality assurance and for whom the
department had been paying Part C premium as of November 2006; and
(b) Undertake, directly or by contract, a study to determine the
cost-effectiveness of paying premiums for enrollment of full benefit
dual eligible beneficiaries in medicare advantage plans in lieu of
paying full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries' medicare cost-sharing.
The study shall compare the cost and health outcomes experience,
including rates of nursing home placement and costs for groups of full
benefit dual eligible beneficiaries who are enrolled in medicare
advantage plans, in medicare special needs plan or in medicare fee-for-service. The study shall compare the health status and utilization of
health and long-term care services for the three groups, and the impact
of access to a medical home and specialty care, over a period of two
years to determine any differences in health status, health outcomes,
and state expenditures that result. The department shall submit the
results of the study to the governor and the legislature by June 30,
2009. The department is authorized to accept private cash and in-kind
donations and grants to support the study and evaluation.
(c) Track enrollment and expenditures for this population on
department monthly management reports.
(21) $756,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $1,193,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, $1,261,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $2,448,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement sections
5, 7, 8, and 11 of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1088 (children's
mental health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(22) $288,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $277,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $566,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon comm/health care). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(23) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department of social and health
services, in consultation with the health care authority and the
employment security department, to prepare and submit a report and
recommendations to the governor and the legislature related to coverage
of low-wage workers enrolled on state plans who are employed by
employers with more than fifty employees. The report shall address
multiple approaches, including but not limited to the proposal included
in House Bill No. 2094 (taxpayer health care fairness act). The
discussion of each approach included in the report should identify how
the approach would further the goal of shared responsibility for
coverage of low-wage workers, obstacles to implementation and options
to address them, and estimated implementation costs. The report shall
be submitted on or before November 15, 2007. The agencies shall
establish a workgroup, which shall be closely involved and consulted in
the development of the report and recommendations under this
subsection. The workgroup shall include the following participants:
Persons or organizations representing large employers in the retail,
agricultural and grocery trades, other large employers, organizations
representing employees of large employers, organizations representing
low-wage employees of large employers, state and local governmental
entities as employers, and organizations representing employees of
state and local governmental entities. In addition, the workgroup
shall include three members from each of the two largest caucuses of
the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker, and three
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed
by the president of the senate.
(24) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2993 (studying continuity of medical assistance). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(25) $165,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, $269,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, and $425,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 3059 (lead blood level testing). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(26)(a) Within the appropriations in this section, sufficient
funding is provided to the department of social and health services and
the employment security department to develop an implementation plan
that would:
(i) Allow applicants and recipients of unemployment insurance to
request assistance with health coverage for household members, and
(ii) Authorize the exchange of information between the employment
security department and the department of social and health services to
more efficiently determine eligibility for health coverage under
chapter 74.09 RCW.
(b) The plan developed in (a) of this subsection should address
permissible uses of federal employment security funding and
infrastructure, identification of any necessary statutory changes, and
cost information.
(c) The plan shall be submitted in a report to the governor and
legislature by November 15, 2008.
(27)(a) Within the appropriations in this section, sufficient
funding is provided to the department to prepare a fiscal analysis of
increasing the Medicaid categorically needy income level and medically
needy income level to one hundred percent of the federal poverty level,
as adjusted for family size. In developing the fiscal analysis, the
department shall consider and present both potential costs and cost
offsets, including:
(i) Per capita cost reductions that could result from current
medically needy clients having access to continuous coverage through
the categorically needy program;
(ii) Reductions in the number of clients receiving long term care
services that might result from clients having increased access to
Medicaid coverage for medical needs;
(iii) The impact on economic services administration staffing
needs, including savings associated with reduced medically needy
caseloads;
(iv) The impact on the department's automated eligibility and
payment systems to implement the categorically needy income level and
medically needy income level to one hundred percent of the federal
poverty level; and
(v) The impact on regional support networks, including additional
Medicaid revenues, potentially reduced demand for nonmedicaid funded
services, and changes in utilization of emergency room and hospital
services that might result from continuous access to mental health
services.
(b) The department shall submit the analysis in (a) of this
subsection to the governor and the health policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature by November 1, 2008.
(28) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $50,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of the agency's responsibilities in
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2549 (medical homes). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 210 2007 c 522 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,986,000))
$11,543,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,336,000))
$13,076,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($90,886,000))
$92,975,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,793,000))
$1,975,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($120,117,000))
$119,685,000

Sec. 211 2007 c 522 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,103,000))
$52,506,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,219,000))
$55,755,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,322,000))
$108,261,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $134,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2756 (commitment center
calls). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 212 2007 c 522 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,438,000))
$40,502,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,504,000))
$42,311,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,730,000))
$65,334,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($810,000))
$1,526,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,226,000))
$700,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,226,000))
$1,752,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,408,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $913,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $926,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($143,181,000))
$155,372,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the expansion of the
Washington state mentors program, which provides technical assistance
and training to mentoring programs that serve at-risk youth.
(2) $1,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington council for
prevention of child abuse and neglect to expand its home visitation
program.
(3) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the family policy council for
distribution as grants to community networks in counties with county
juvenile courts participating in decategorization of funding through
the juvenile rehabilitation administration. The council shall provide
grants of up to $50,000 per fiscal year to the Pierce County-Tacoma
urban community network and additional community networks supporting
counties or groups of counties in evaluating programs funded through a
block grant by the juvenile rehabilitation administration. Funds not
used for grants to community networks supporting counties or groups of
counties participating in the decategorization block grants shall
lapse.
(4) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project through the governor's juvenile justice advisory committee.
(5) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the continuation of the
postpartum depression campaign, including the design and production of
brochures in various languages, a radio public service announcement,
and other outreach and training efforts.
(6) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to expand and enhance the juvenile
detention alternatives initiative. This funding is intended to add
three new program sites, support the addition of a data analyst, and to
provide resources for the state to participate in annual national
conferences.
(7) (($144,000)) $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008, (($111,000)) $87,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and (($136,000)) $101,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1422
(incarcerated parents). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $7,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of chapter 465, Laws of 2007.
(9) $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $804,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $581,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the development of a project plan, time line, and
budget plan for a more flexible payment system for independent home
care providers and others who collectively bargain for wages and
benefits.

Sec. 213 2007 c 522 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($59,460,000))
$59,188,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($59,497,000))
$59,998,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,255,000))
$57,183,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($176,212,000))
$176,369,000

Sec. 214 2007 c 522 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$1,000,000
((General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000))
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,885,000))
$4,979,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,074,000))
$56,078,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account--
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $529,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($274,666,000))
$271,478,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($300,580,000))
$303,765,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($637,734,000))
$637,929,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents eligible
to participate in the basic health plan as subsidized enrollees and
home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
that choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(4) (($1,984,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and)) $6,315,000 of the health
services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 ((are)) is
provided solely for additional enrollment in the basic health plan. If
available basic health plan slots are exceeded, the authority shall
maintain a waiting list and provide for notification when slots become
available.
(5) Appropriations in this act include specific funding for health
records banking under section 10 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission).
(6) $11,934,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $11,834,000 of the health services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
funding for health care services provided through local community
clinics.
(7) $784,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008, $1,676,000 of the health service account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $540,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, and $22,480,000 of the state health care
authority administrative account--state appropriation are provided for
the development of a new benefits administration and insurance
accounting system.
(8) (($2,137,000)) $1,639,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($1,000,000)) $3,183,000 of the
health services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for section 5 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1569 (health insurance partnership board) and related provisions of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon
commission on health care). An additional $1,000,000 of the health
services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided
solely for implementation of premium subsidies to low-income employees
of small employers participating in the health insurance partnership,
as generally described in Second Substitute House Bill No. 2537
(modifications to the health insurance partnership).
(9) $664,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $664,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
implementation of the Washington quality forum, pursuant to section 9
of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon
commission). If the section is not enacted by June 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $600,000 of the state health care authority administrative
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation
of the state employee health pilot, pursuant to section 41 of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission). If
the section is not enacted by June 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) $250,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $250,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for continuation
of the community health collaborative grant program in accordance with
chapter 67, Laws of 2006 (E2SSB 6459). The applicant organizations
must assure measurable improvements in health access within their
service region, demonstrate active collaboration with key community
partners, and provide two dollars in matching funds for each grant
dollar awarded.
(12) $731,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $977,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the dental
residency program, including maintenance of the existing residency
positions and the establishment of six additional resident positions in
fiscal year 2008 (four in eastern Washington and two in the Seattle
area), and five additional positions in fiscal year 2009.
(((14))) (13) Appropriations in this act include funding for
sections 14 (reducing unnecessary emergency room use) and 40 (state
employee health program) of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5930 (blue ribbon commission).

Sec. 215 2007 c 522 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,444,000))
$3,386,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,350,000))
$3,796,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,345,000))
$1,527,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,139,000))
$8,709,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $115,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $190,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 3193 (whistleblower
protections). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 216 2007 c 522 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,123,000))
$18,341,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,124,000))
$18,638,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,267,000))
$36,999,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $216,000 of the accident account--state
appropriation and $512,000 of the medical aid account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 3139 (industrial insurance orders).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 217 2007 c 522 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $806,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,537,000))
$15,680,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,340,000))
$21,800,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,322,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,807,000))
$51,216,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) During the 2007-2009 biennium, the criminal justice training
commission is authorized to raise existing fees charged for firearms
certification for security guards in excess of the fiscal growth factor
established pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the
actual costs of conducting the certification programs and the
appropriation levels in this section.
(2) $2,390,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($956,000)) $1,809,000 of the
public safety and education account--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 are provided solely for ten additional basic law enforcement
academies in fiscal year 2008 and ((four)) nine additional basic law
enforcement academies in fiscal year 2009. ((Continued funding for
these additional academies is contingent upon the result of an office
of financial management forecast for future student demand for basic
law enforcement academies at the criminal justice training centers in
Burien and Spokane.))
(3) $1,044,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,191,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs to continue to develop, maintain, and operate the jail booking
and reporting system (JBRS) and the statewide automated victim
information and notification system (SAVIN).
(4) $28,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the
implementation of chapter 10, Laws of 2007 (SSB 5191, missing persons).
(5) $5,400,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $6,922,000 of the
Washington auto theft prevention authority account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) $150,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $150,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely ((for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1333 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse)) to deliver multi-disciplinary team training sessions aimed at improving the coordination
of, and communication between, agencies involved in the investigation
of child fatality, child sexual abuse, child physical abuse, and
criminal neglect cases.
(7) $25,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5987 (gang-related
offenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $50,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $50,000 of the public safety and
education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for support of the coalition of small police agencies
major crimes task force. The purpose of this task force is to pool its
resources and to establish an efficient and cooperative approach in
addressing major violent crimes.
(9) $20,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5315 (forest
fires/property access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $5,000,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address
and residency of all registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders
under RCW 9A.44.130. The Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs shall:
(a) Enter into performance based agreements with units of local
government to ensure that registered offender address and residency are
verified:
(A) For level I offenders, every twelve months;
(B) For level II offenders, every six months;
(C) For level III offenders, every three months; and
(D) For the purposes of this subsection, unclassified offenders and
kidnapping offenders shall be considered at risk level I, unless in the
opinion of the local jurisdiction a higher classification is in the
interest of public safety.
(b) Collect performance data from all participating jurisdictions
sufficient to evaluate the efficiency and effectiveness of the address
and residency verification program.
(c) Submit a report on the effectiveness of the address and
residency verification program to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and senate on September 1,
2009.
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs may retain up
to three percent of the amount provided in this subsection for the cost
of administration. Any funds not disbursed for address and residency
verification or retained for administration may be allocated to local
prosecutors for the prosecution costs associated with failing to
register offenses.
(11) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $1,000,000 of the public safety and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2712
(criminal street gangs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $305,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for a grant program to pay for the costs
of local law enforcement agencies participating in specialized crisis
intervention training.

Sec. 218 2007 c 522 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,711,000))
$8,716,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,879,000))
$9,511,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,386,000))
$15,390,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,607,000))
$16,621,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($923,000))
$918,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,718,000))
$42,130,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,961,000))
$1,955,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,996,000))
$3,984,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($228,998,000))
$234,918,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,622,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($239,248,000))
$237,905,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,186,000
Medical Aid Account--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,653,000))
$1,843,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,667,000))
$3,685,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($597,875,000))
$604,814,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,413,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for conducting utilization reviews of physical and
occupational therapy cases at the 24th visit and the associated
administrative costs, including those of entering data into the
claimant's file. The department shall develop and report performance
measures and targets for these reviews to the office of financial
management. The reports are due September 30th for the prior fiscal
year and must include the amount spent and the estimated savings per
fiscal year.
(2) $2,247,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5920
(vocational rehabilitation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $822,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for vocational services professional staff salary
adjustments necessary to recruit and retain positions required for
anticipated changes in work duties as a result of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5920 (vocational rehabilitation). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse. Compensation for anticipated changes to work duties is subject
to review and approval by the director of the department of personnel
and is subject to collective bargaining.
(4) $8,000,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely to establish a program of safety and health as
authorized by RCW 49.17.210 to be administered under rules adopted
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, provided that projects funded involve
workplaces insured by the medical aid fund, and that priority is given
to projects fostering accident prevention through cooperation between
employers and employees or their representatives.
(5) $600,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract with one or more
independent experts to evaluate and recommend improvements to the
rating plan under chapter 51.18 RCW, including analyzing how risks are
pooled, the effect of including worker premium contributions in
adjustment calculations, incentives for accident and illness
prevention, return-to-work practices, and other sound risk-management
strategies that are consistent with recognized insurance principles.
(6) $181,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$181,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5443 (workers'
compensation claims). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $558,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5290
(workers' compensation advisory committees). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) $104,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $104,000 of the public safety and
education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $361,000
of the accident account--state appropriation, and $361,000 of the
medical aid account--state appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5675 (workers'
compensation benefits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $730,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(10) $437,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$437,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5053
(industrial insurance ombudsman). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $74,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$74,000 of the medical aid--state appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5915 (notices to
employers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $605,000 of the accident account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for a study of the incidence of
permanent total disability pensions in the state's workers'
compensation system. To conduct the study, the department shall
contract with an independent researcher that has demonstrated expertise
in workers' compensation systems. When selecting the independent
researcher, the department shall consult the labor and business members
of the workers' compensation advisory committee and, if the labor and
business members of the workers' compensation advisory committee agree
on a particular independent researcher, the department shall select
that independent researcher. The study must consider causes of the
recent increase in permanent total disability cases, future anticipated
permanent total disability trends, a comparison of Washington's
permanent total disability claims experience and injured workers with
other states and jurisdictions, the impact of the standard for finding
workers employable on the incidence of permanent total disability
pensions, and the impact of vocational rehabilitation under RCW
51.32.095 on the incidence of permanent total disability pensions. The
department shall report to the workers' compensation advisory
committee, the house of representatives commerce and labor committee,
and the senate labor, commerce, research and development committee on
the results of the study on or before July 1, 2008.
(13) $1,089,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$192,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of chapter 27, Laws of 2007 (ESHB 2171, crane
safety).
(14) $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation and
$192,000 of the manufactured home installation training account--state
appropriation are provided solely for Substitute House Bill No. 2118
(mobile/manufactured homes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $224,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, $741,000 of the accident account--state appropriation, and
$741,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 3121
(construction industry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $595,000 of the electrical certificate account--state
appropriation and $193,000 of the plumbing certificate account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1597 (plumbing and electrical licenses). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(17) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3349 (residential contractors). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(18) $110,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$110,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 3139 (industrial
insurance orders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $107,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$107,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for Substitute House Bill No. 3255 (workers' compensation
coverage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $408,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$72,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is provided
solely for Substitute House Bill No. 2602 (victims' employment leave).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 219 2007 c 522 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,876,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,907,000))
$2,042,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,783,000))
$3,918,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $224,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 1220 (sentence review board). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 220 2007 c 522 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,124,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,183,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
((Veterans Innovations Program Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,437,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,754,000))
$4,317,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,126,000))
$5,264,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,249,000))
$5,652,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($972,000))
$1,025,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,987,000))
$3,317,000
Veterans Innovations Program Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,437,000
Veteran Estate Management Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,396,000))
$17,757,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $440,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $560,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to
implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5164 (veterans'
conservation corps). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,340,000))
$7,948,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,894,000))
$7,206,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,333,000))
$43,126,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,197,000))
$31,574,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,764,000))
$89,854,000

Sec. 221 2007 c 522 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($81,288,000))
$81,582,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,032,000))
$88,867,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($480,735,000))
$478,466,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($111,257,000))
$120,186,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,247,000))
$154,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,419,000))
$66,098,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,610,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,064,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,991,000))
$19,132,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,518,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,975,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,013,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,415,000))
$3,530,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,068,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,512,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,482,000))
$3,920,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $294,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,122,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,663,000))
$50,924,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,870,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,005,773,000))
$1,033,879,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department is authorized to raise existing fees charged for
its fee-supported programs in excess of the fiscal growth factor
pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section.
(2) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive,
and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not
anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require
expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated
unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services
authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) $877,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1099
(dental professions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 2304 (cardiac care services). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(5) $138,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $220,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for an evaluation of chronic care
provider training.
(6) $51,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5297 (sex education). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1837 (nonambulatory persons). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $201,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2087 (health care facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $293,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for public service announcements
regarding childhood lead poisoning, information pamphlets, rule
development, and for early identification of persons at risk of having
elevated blood-lead levels, which includes systematically screening
children under six years of age and other target populations identified
by the department. Priority will be given to testing children and
increasing the registry in the lead surveillance program.
(10) $101,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $81,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $6,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1414 (ambulatory surgical facilities). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) $55,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1397 (massage therapy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $58,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5398
(specialty hospitals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $224,000 of the oyster reserve land account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(14) $571,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $458,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1106 (hospital acquired infections). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(15) $4,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($1,000,000)) $7,900,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for department
of health-funded family planning clinics to increase the capacity of
the clinics to provide family planning and reproductive health services
to low-income men and women who are not otherwise eligible for services
through the department of social and health services medical assistance
program and for clinical or other health services associated with
sexually transmitted disease testing through the infertility prevention
project. Of these amounts, the department is authorized to expend up
to $1,000,000 of its general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009 for services provided in fiscal year 2008, if necessary, to offset
reductions in federal funding.
(16) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is for one-time funding to purchase and store antiviral
medications to be used in accordance with the state pandemic influenza
response plan. These drugs are to be purchased through the United
States department of health and human services to take advantage of
federal subsidies.
(17) $147,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department of health to
provide relevant information on measures taken to facilitate expanded
use of reclaimed water pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6117 (reclaimed water). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the lifelong AIDS alliance to
restore lost federal funding.
(19) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for medical nutritional therapy
for people with HIV/AIDS and other low-income residents in King county
with chronic illnesses.
(20) $645,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $645,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the neurodevelopmental center
system, which provides therapy and medical services for young, low-income children with developmental disabilities.
(21) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to continue the autism task force
established by chapter 259, Laws of 2005, through June 30, 2008. The
task force shall:
(a) Review and continue to refine criteria for regional autism
centers throughout Washington state based on community needs in each
area, and address the role of autism centers within the larger context
of developmental disabilities;
(b) Prioritize its December 2006 recommendations and develop an
implementation plan for the highest priorities. The plan should detail
how systems will coordinate to improve service and avoid duplication
between state agencies including the department of social and health
services, department of health, office of superintendent of public
instruction, as well as school districts, autism centers, and local
partners and providers. The plan shall also estimate the costs of the
highest priority recommendations and report to the legislature and
governor by December 1, 2007;
(c) Compile information for and draft the "Washington Service
Guidelines for Individuals with Autism - Birth Through Lifespan" book
described in the task force's recommendations. Funding to print and
distribute the book is expected to come from federal or private
sources; and
(d) Monitor the federal combating autism act and its funding
availability and make recommendations on applying for grants to assist
in implementation of the 2006 task force recommendations. The
department of health shall be the lead agency in providing staff for
the task force. The department may seek additional staff assistance
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
committee staff of the legislature. Nonlegislative members, except
those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses.
(22) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of the
Washington state hepatitis C strategic plan.
(23) $142,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5403 (animal massage practitioners). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(24) $174,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5503 (athletic trainers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $75,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5292 (physical therapist assistants). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(26) $94,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6032 (medical use of marijuana). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(27) $386,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $384,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5894 (large on-site sewage
systems). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(28) $1,721,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of sections 11 and 12 (medical
information) of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue
ribbon commission on health care). If the sections are not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(29) $10,000,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $10,000,000 of the health
services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for distribution to local health jurisdictions and for the costs
of administering the public health related sections of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on health
care), subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) During the month of January 2008, and January 2009, the
department of health shall distribute funds appropriated in this
section to local health jurisdictions, less an amount not to exceed
five percent for the costs of administering the public health related
sections of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue
ribbon commission on health care). The amount of funding for
distribution to a jurisdiction before the administrative deduction
shall be the greater of: (i) One hundred thousand dollars; or (ii) (A)
a base level of funding of seventy-five thousand dollars plus the per
capita amount, for a jurisdiction with a population of four hundred
thousand persons or fewer; or (B) a base level of funding of twenty-five thousand dollars plus the per capita amount, for a jurisdiction
with a population greater than four hundred thousand persons. Amounts
distributed under this subsection must be used to fund core public
health functions of statewide significance as defined in Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on
health care).
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Per capita amount" means an amount equal to seven million five
hundred thousand dollars multiplied by the proportion of the population
of the jurisdiction in the previous calendar year to the population of
the state in the previous calendar year.
(ii) "Population" means the number of persons as last determined by
the office of financial management. If the jurisdiction comprises a
single county, "population" means the number of persons in the county.
For a jurisdiction comprising two or more counties, "population" means
the number of persons in all counties comprising the jurisdiction.
(iii) "Local health jurisdiction" or "jurisdiction" means a county
board of health organized under chapter 70.05 RCW, a health district
organized under chapter 70.46 RCW, or a combined city and county health
department organized under chapter 70.08 RCW.
(c) The department may adopt rules necessary to administer this
subsection.
(30) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $35,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation are provided solely for an evaluation of the economic
benefits to the state's health care system of the midwifery licensure
and regulatory program under chapter 18.50 RCW. In particular, the
department shall contract with a consultant to conduct a review of
existing research literature on whether these economic benefits exceed
the state expenditures to subsidize the cost of the midwifery licensing
and regulatory program under RCW 43.70.250. The evaluation shall
include an assessment of the economic benefits to consumers who elect
to have out-of-hospital births with midwives, including any reduced use
of procedures that increase the costs of childbirth. The department
shall submit the report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature by January 1, 2008. ((If Engrossed House Bill No.
1667 (health professions licensing fees) is enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection are provided solely for the
purposes of that bill.))
(31) $147,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department of health to
convene a work group to develop recommendations regarding the need to
regulate those individuals currently registered with the department of
health as counselors. The department of health shall submit
recommendations of the work group to the legislature and governor by
November 15, 2007. Based on the recommendations of the work group, the
department of health shall draft credentialing guidelines for all
registered counselors by January 1, 2008. Guidelines shall include
education in risk assessment, ethics, professional standards, and
deadlines for compliance.
(32) $76,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $1,278,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Fourth
Substitute House Bill No. 1103 (health professions). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(33) $558,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2674 (counselor credentialing). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(34) $312,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2805 (cord blood collection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(35) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $115,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2647 (children's safe products). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(36) $19,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2015
(genetic counselors). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(37) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2549 (patient centered care). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(38) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of section 7 of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2668 (relating to long-term
care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(39) $164,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory program
to offset a reduction in revenue from fees. There shall be no change
to the current annual fees for new or renewed licenses for the
midwifery program. The department shall convene the midwifery advisory
committee on a quarterly basis to address issues related to licensed
midwifery.
(40) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department's efforts to prevent
the spread of methicillin resistant staphylococcus aureus and other
multidrug resistant organisms by providing hospitals with support for
their activities relating to surveillance, outbreak investigation, and
lab testing. Of the amount in this subsection, $100,000 is provided
for the department to pay for genetic testing of methicillin resistant
staphylococcus aureus and other multidrug resistant organisms for
hospitals investigating outbreaks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS. The appropriations to the
department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the
programs and in the amounts specified herein. However, after May 1,
2008, after approval by the director of financial management and unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2008 between
programs. The department shall not transfer funds, and the director of
financial management shall not approve the transfer, unless the
transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum
extent possible, the expenditure of state funds and not federal funds.
The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate
fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing
seven days prior to approving any deviations from appropriation levels.
The written notification shall include a narrative explanation and
justification of the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by
budget unit and appropriation, both before and after any allotment
modifications or transfers.

Sec. 223 2007 c 522 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,968,000))
$57,387,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,911,000))
$53,813,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $169,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,467,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,504,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($115,325,000))
$115,646,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $9,389,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the completion of phase three of the
department's offender-based tracking system replacement project. This
amount is conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of
section 902 of this act.
(b) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the establishment and support
of a statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its
members representatives of community-based mental health treatment
programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors and
commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities. The
council will begin to investigate and promote cost-effective approaches
to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental
disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of
offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing,
employment, and job training needs.
(c) $169,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely
for the implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No.
1001 (auto theft). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(d) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1422 (incarcerated parents).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(e) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department shall
seek contracts for chemical dependency vendors to provide chemical
dependency treatment of offenders in corrections facilities, including
corrections centers and community supervision facilities, which have
demonstrated effectiveness in treatment of offenders and are able to
provide data to show a successful treatment rate.
(f) $314,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $294,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for four additional staff to
collect and analyze data for programs funded through the offender
reentry initiative and collect, analyze, and disseminate information
required by the GMAP process, performance audits, data requests, and
quality assessments and assurances.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($617,042,000))
$602,505,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($664,710,000))
$664,044,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,490,000))
$4,165,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,050,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,338,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,492,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,492,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,301,364,000))
$1,289,236,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as a recovery
of costs.
(b) The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership
program at the Washington corrections center for women at a level at
least equal to that provided in the 1995-97 biennium.
(c) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(d) During the 2007-09 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(e) The Harborview medical center shall provide inpatient and
outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in department of
corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the average rate that
the department has negotiated with other community hospitals in
Washington state.
(f) $358,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $980,000 of the
Washington auto theft prevention authority account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(g) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1097 (vulnerable adults). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(h) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1319 (correctional agency employee). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(i) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1592 (sentence review board). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(j) $544,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $496,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for development of individual
reentry plans to prepare offenders for release into the community as
generally described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6157
(offender recidivism). Individual reentry plans shall be based on an
assessment of the offender using a standardized and comprehensive tool.
The individual reentry plan may be one document, or may be a series of
individual plans that combine to meet the requirements. The individual
reentry plan shall, at a minimum, include:
(i) A plan to maintain contact with the inmate's children and
family, if appropriate. The plan should determine whether parenting
classes, or other services, are appropriate;
(ii) A description of the offender's education, certifications,
work experience, skills, and training; and
(iii) A plan for the offender during the period of incarceration
through reentry into the community that addresses the needs of the
offender including education, employment, substance abuse treatment,
mental health treatment, and family reunification. The individual
reentry plan shall be updated as appropriate during the period of
incarceration, and prior to the inmate's release to address public
safety concerns, consistency with the offender risk management level
assigned by the department, housing, and connecting with a community
justice center in the area in which the offender will be residing, if
a community justice center is located in that area.
(iv) If the appropriation in this subsection is not sufficient for
this program, the department shall prioritize the use of available
funds.
(k) $191,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2621 (vehicular homicide/assault). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($129,063,000))
$133,157,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($140,462,000))
$148,650,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,317,000))
$9,319,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,680,000))
$9,682,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($291,322,000))
$304,024,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the
department of corrections is authorized to enter into financial
contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the purposes
indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
This authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option
to purchase or lease-purchase work release beds in facilities
throughout the state for $8,561,000.
(c) $1,167,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,295,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the establishment and
operation of community justice centers by the department as generally
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6157 (offender
recidivism). At a minimum, a community justice center shall include:
(i) A violator program to allow the department to utilize a range
of available sanctions for offenders who violate conditions of their
supervision;
(ii) An employment opportunity program to assist an offender in
finding employment;
(iii) On-site services or resources for connecting offenders with
services such as mental health and substance abuse treatment,
transportation, training, family reunification, and community services;
and
(iv) The services of a transition coordinator to facilitate
connections between the former offender and the community. The
transition coordinator shall provide information to former offenders
regarding services available to them in the community including, but
not limited to housing assistance, employment assistance, education,
vocational training, parent education, financial literacy, treatment
for substance abuse, mental health, anger management, and shall assist
offenders in their efforts to access needed services.
(v) If the appropriation in this subsection is not sufficient for
this program, the department shall prioritize the use of available
funds.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($987,000))
$1,001,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,347,000))
$2,369,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,334,000))
$3,370,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (($110,000)) $124,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($110,000))
$132,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009
are provided solely for transfer to the jail industries board. The
board shall use the amounts provided only for administrative expenses,
equipment purchases, and technical assistance associated with advising
cities and counties in developing, promoting, and implementing
consistent, safe, and efficient offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,026,000))
$35,036,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,175,000))
$35,192,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,201,000))
$70,228,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $35,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for expenditures
related to the Farrakhan v. Locke litigation.

Sec. 224 2007 c 522 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,566,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,636,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,702,000))
$17,704,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,924,000))
$22,926,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $4,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for an
adjustment to the agency lease rate for space occupied and parking in
the Tacoma Rhodes center. The department of general administration
shall increase lease rates to meet the cash gain/loss break-even point
for the Tacoma Rhodes center effective July 1, 2007.

Sec. 225 2007 c 522 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,000))
$185,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($265,906,000))
$265,918,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,877,000))
$33,881,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($253,644,000))
$250,495,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,273,000))
$31,275,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,055,000))
$34,105,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($616,875,000))
$615,919,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,578,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from funds made available to
the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
These funds are authorized to provide direct services to unemployment
insurance claimants and providing job search review.
(2) $2,300,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to continue implementation of chapter 4, Laws
of 2003 2nd sp. sess. and for implementation costs relating to chapter
133, Laws of 2005 (unemployment insurance).
(3) (($12,348,000)) $18,162,000 of the unemployment compensation
administration account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts
made available to the state by section 903(d) of the social security
act (Reed Act). This amount is authorized to continue current
unemployment insurance functions and department services to employers
and job seekers.
(4) $372,000 of the administrative contingency account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5653 (self-employment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $12,054,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to fund the unemployment insurance tax
information system (TAXIS) technology initiative for the employment
security department.
(6) $430,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to replace high-risk servers used by the
unemployment security department.
(7) $503,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to provide a system to track computer
upgrades and changes for the unemployment security department.
(8) $183,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from the amounts made
available to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act
(Reed Act). This amount is authorized to conduct a feasibility study
to integrate job search data systems.
(9) $2,331,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized for hardware and software to ensure the
ongoing, reliable operation of the telecenters.
(10) $488,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized for the relocation of the WorkSource office
in Lakewood.
(11) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2082 (field of dreams program). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(12) $155,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided solely for Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3121 (construction industry). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 301 2007 c 522 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $524,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $548,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,056,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,137,000

Sec. 302 2007 c 522 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,030,000))
$50,099,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,941,000))
$51,643,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($83,365,000))
$83,531,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,648,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,073,000))
$4,228,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,961,000))
$4,161,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter
Control -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,701,000))
$19,703,000
State Drought Preparedness -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,000
Vessel Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,438,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $702,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,490,000))
$15,137,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,894,000))
$17,249,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $373,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,269,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($98,184,000))
$99,155,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $381,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,154,000))
$19,366,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,900,000))
$37,406,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,777,000
((Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000))
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,410,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,902,000))
$5,904,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,328,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,614,000))
$12,616,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,266,000))
$2,814,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,697,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,297,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($465,315,000))
$468,498,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of
Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(2) $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $209,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $200,000 of the general fund--private local
appropriation are provided solely to implement activities associated
with a regional haze program. Funds shall be collected and expended in
accordance with the terms of the contract entered into with affected
businesses and the department of ecology.
(3) $2,000,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to local governments outside of Puget
Sound for municipal storm water programs, including but not limited to,
implementation of phase II municipal storm water permits, source
control for toxics in association with cleanup of contaminated sediment
sites, and source control programs for shellfish protection districts
where storm water is a significant contributor.
(4) Fees approved by the department of ecology in the 2007-09
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(5) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $927,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to improve the performance of
wetland mitigation. Of this amount, $55,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $55,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support
a wetland in Whatcom county. The program will engage local, state, and
federal agencies, private investors, property owners, and others in the
creation of one or more wetland banks and other measures to protect
habitat functions and values while accommodating urban growth in the
region. Priority shall be given to state and local government
partnerships for wetland characterization. The department shall issue
a report of its findings and recommendations on how wetland mitigation
success can be improved to the office of financial management and the
appropriate policy committees of the legislature.
(6) $260,000 of the state toxics control account -- state
appropriation is provided solely to support pesticide container
recycling activities in Washington.
(7) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a pilot project to provide
grants to two local government jurisdictions located in the Puget Sound
area to improve compliance with existing environmental laws. Grant
funds shall be used for providing information on existing requirements,
providing technical assistance necessary to comply on a voluntary
basis, and taking enforcement action.
(8) $1,257,000 of the reclamation account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5881 (water
power license fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(9) $694,000 of the underground storage tank account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5475 (underground storage tanks). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(10) $2,026,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for local governments located near
hazardous waste clean-up sites, including Duwamish Waterway,
Commencement Bay, and Bellingham Bay, to work with small businesses and
citizens to safely manage hazardous and solid wastes to prevent the
contamination.
(11) $876,000 of the state toxics control account and $876,000 of
the local toxics control account are provided solely for public
participation grants related to toxic cleanup sites within and around
Puget Sound.
(12) (($1,000,000)) $831,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($1,000,000)) $1,169,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely to implement watershed plans. Of this amount, (($110,000))
$313,650 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008
and (($160,000)) $646,350 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support the implementation of
the WRIA 1 watershed plan and the Bertrand watershed improvement
district plan, including but not limited to implementation of the
Nooksack River basin stream gauging program, study of the feasibility
of a public utility district pipeline in the Bertrand watershed ((and
$250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008
and $350,000 of the general fund-- state appropriation for fiscal year
2009 are provided solely to study water storage and augmentation in the
Bertrand watershed and $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for plan preparation and
development in the Fishtrap watershed)), study and construction of
water storage and augmentation in the Bertrand watershed, and
preparation and development of the next subbasin watershed plan agreed
to by the Bertrand instream flow policy group.
(13) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2220 (shellfish). The department shall develop, by
rule, guidelines for the appropriate siting and operation of geoduck
aquaculture operations to be included in any master program under the
shorelines management act. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for convening a stakeholder group
to recommend establishing a sustainable statewide regional CBRNE/Hazmat
response capability.
(15) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement key recommendations
and actions identified in the "Washington's Ocean Action Plan:
Enhancing Management of Washington State's Ocean and Outer Coast". The
department shall provide a progress report on implementing this plan to
the appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 31,
2008.
(16) (($300,000)) (a) $464,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($300,000)) $136,000 of the
general fund-- state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6001 (climate
change). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(b) The climate action team shall review the current infrastructure
capacity and time needed to add new infrastructure capacity in meeting
goals identified in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6001 (climate
change).
(17) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to oversee
beach seaweed removal in the west Seattle Fauntleroy community. The
department may spend up to $25,000 of this amount for its cost of
administration.
(18) (($405,000)) $693,000 of the state toxics control account is
provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5421
(environmental covenants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(19) $99,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a marshland study of key areas
of salmon habitat along the Snohomish river estuary.
(20) $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $132,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $19,000 of the oil spill prevention account
appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute activities as
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership).
(21) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department to contract with the
U.S. institute for environmental conflict resolution, a federal agency,
to develop a pilot water management process with three federally
recognized treaty Indian tribes. $50,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the northwest
Indian fisheries commission to help establish the pathway for the
process in federal agencies.
(22) $319,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $241,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6117 (reclaimed water). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(23) $53,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5552 (penalties for oil spills). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(24) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department to convene a
shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee, composed of a balanced
representation from interested state regulatory agencies, Native
American tribes, local governments and the environmental and shellfish
farming communities. The group will be facilitated by the office of
regulatory assistance and will address federal, state, and local
regulatory issues related to shellfish farming.
(25) Within the appropriations provided in this section for the
development of water supplies in the Columbia river basin, the
department shall assist county governments located east of the crest of
the Cascade mountain range that: Have an international border; or
border a county with an international boundary and a county with four
hundred thousand or more residents, to identify water supply projects
to compete for funding from the Columbia river basin water management
program. The department shall provide technical assistance as needed
to further refine priority projects identified by these counties. The
department shall consider and balance regional water supply needs in
its funding allocation decisions made as a part of this program.
(26) Within the appropriations provided in this section the
department shall develop guidance for data quality assurance for future
groundwater availability and characterization studies conducted by and
for various state and local entities. The department shall survey
existing groundwater studies and provide a list of them on its Internet
site. In consultation with local governments and Indian tribes,
watershed planning units, the United States, and other interested
parties, the department shall assess the need for additional
groundwater studies in the state and their relative priorities and
shall develop an action plan for funding and carrying out future
groundwater studies.
(27) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for coordinating with the University of
Washington to assess the current energy profile of Washington state
pulp and paper mills. The energy consumption and energy generation
capability will be determined for both steam and electrical power. In
addition, the sources and types of fuels used in various boilers will
be assessed.
(28) $195,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for a grant to Walla Walla Community
College's water and environmental center.
(29) $333,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2647 (children's safe products). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(30) $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $822,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2815 (green collar jobs). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(31) $59,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2882 (lead-containing products). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(32) $59,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 3186
(beach management districts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(33) Within the appropriations provided in this section sufficient
funding is provided to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 3227 (Hood Canal water quality).
(34) Within the appropriations provided in this section the
department shall ensure that standard statewide protocols for surface
water monitoring are developed and included in status and trends
monitoring to utilize information from other entities, including other
state agencies, local governments, and volunteer groups.
(35)(a) $2,000,000 of the Columbia river water delivery account
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to affected counties
as defined in Second Substitute House Bill No. 3309 to mitigate for
negative impacts caused by releases of Lake Roosevelt water for the
purposes described in that bill. The criteria for allocating these
funds shall be developed by the department in consultation with
affected local governments.
(b) $150,000 of the Columbia river water delivery account
appropriation is provided solely for the department to retain a
contractor to perform an independent analysis of legislative options to
protect rural communities in northeast Washington from disproportionate
economic, agricultural, and environmental impacts when upstream water
rights are purchased and transferred for use, or idled and used as
mitigation, in a downstream watershed or county. Before retaining a
contractor, the department shall consult with affected counties as
defined in Second Substitute House Bill No. 3309. The contractor
selected shall conduct the independent analysis and develop a report
describing options and recommended actions. The department of ecology
shall provide the report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2008.
(c) If Second Substitute House Bill No. 3309 (Columbia river water
discovery account) is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(36) $210,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to clean up naturally occurring
asbestos from Swift Creek.

Sec. 303 2007 c 522 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,365,000))
$48,912,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,166,000))
$49,993,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,545,000))
$5,745,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,116,000))
$1,560,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,839,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,606,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($146,660,000))
$148,678,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2007-09 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for project scoping and cost estimating
for the agency's 2009-11 capital budget submittal.
(4) $2,255,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for costs associated with relocating the
commission's Tumwater headquarters office.
(5) $272,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $271,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for costs associated with
relocating the commission's eastern Washington regional headquarters
office.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for replacing vehicles and
equipment.
(7) $1,611,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,428,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for planned and emergency
maintenance of park facilities.
(8) $1,700,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the recreational boating safety
program.
(9) $954,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,007,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operations of Cama Beach
state park.
(10) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5219 (weather and avalanche center). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(11) $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5463 (forest fire protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) (($42,000)) $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and (($42,000)) $9,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (public lands
management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $264,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $217,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to establish a pilot lifeguard
program at Lake Sammamish and Nolte state parks. The department shall
complete a comprehensive risk analysis to determine if expansion of the
lifeguard program or other drowning risk reduction measures should be
implemented. The department shall report its findings to the office of
financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature
by July 1, 2009.
(14) (($232,000)) $455,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and (($233,000)) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
development of a long-range plan for Fort Worden state park, including
architectural and site design guidelines, business and operations
implementation, site and facilities use plan, and for the department to
convene a task force to recommend alternative governance structures for
the park.
(15) $1,600,000 of the parks renewal stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely for operating state parks, developing
and renovating park facilities, undertaking deferred maintenance,
enhancing park stewardship and other state park purposes, pursuant to
Substitute House Bill No. 2275 (raising funds for state parks).
Expenditures from the amount provided in this subsection shall not
exceed actual revenues received under Substitute House Bill No. 2275.
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2514 (orca whale protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 304 2007 c 522 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ((INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION)) RECREATION
AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,557,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,409,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,819,000
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicles Activities Program
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,004,000
Boating Activities Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,153,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $16,025,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the forest and fish agreement
rules. These funds shall be allocated to the department of natural
resources and the department of fish and wildlife.
(2) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute
activities as described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372
(Puget Sound partnership).
(3) $2,000,000 of the boating activities account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1651 (boating activities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 305 2007 c 522 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,134,000))
$1,144,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,161,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,295,000))
$2,305,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
condition and limitation: $10,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for employee
retirement buyout costs.

Sec. 306 2007 c 522 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,889,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,913,000))
$2,948,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,178,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,301,000))
$5,301,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,326,000))
$5,576,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,607,000))
$17,892,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for supplementary basic funding
grants to the state's lowest-income conservation districts. The
supplementary grant process shall be structured to aid recipients in
becoming financially self-sufficient in the future.
(2) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5108 (office of farmland preservation). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the pioneers in conservation
program to provide grants through a competitive process to agricultural
landowners for projects that benefit fish and wildlife restoration and
farm operations. Grants must be matched by an equal amount or more
from nonstate sources with priority for projects identified in the
Puget Sound Chinook salmon recovery plan and the Puget Sound
partnership strategy.
(4) $78,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $72,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute
activities as described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372
(Puget Sound partnership).
(5) $250,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for livestock nutrient program cost
share for the poultry industry.
(6) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for support of conservation resource
management.

Sec. 307 2007 c 522 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($55,453,000))
$56,158,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,743,000))
$54,810,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,666,000))
$52,671,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,447,000))
$37,451,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,070,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $268,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,628,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,024,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $754,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $842,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,508,000))
$64,329,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,552,000))
$34,556,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,288,000))
$13,290,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,991,000))
$2,491,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,923,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $486,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
((Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000))
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,751,000))
$5,001,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,104,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $417,000
Wildlife Rehabilitation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($352,000))
$270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($344,547,000))
$347,808,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall use the department of printing for
printing needs. Funds provided in this section may not be used to
staff or fund a stand-alone printing operation.
(2) $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(3) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(4) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(5) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
army corps of engineers.
(6) The department shall assist the office of regulatory assistance
in implementing activities consistent with the governor's regulatory
improvement program. The department shall support and provide
expertise to facilitate, coordinate, and simplify citizen and business
interactions so as to improve state regulatory processes involving
state, local, and federal stakeholders.
(7) $634,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for operations and fish production costs
at department-operated Mitchell act hatchery facilities.
(8) ((Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall implement a joint management and collaborative enforcement
agreement with the confederated tribes of the Colville and the Spokane
tribe.)) $609,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department to implement a pilot
project with the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation to
develop expanded recreational fishing opportunities on Lake Rufus Woods
and its northern shoreline and to conduct joint enforcement of lake
fisheries on Lake Rufus Woods and adjoining waters, pursuant to state
and tribal intergovernmental agreements developed under the Columbia
River water supply program.
(a) For the purposes of the pilot project:
(i) A fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville
Tribes shall satisfy the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on the
waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(ii) The Colville Tribes have agreed to provide to holders of its
nontribal member fishing permits a means to demonstrate that fish in
their possession were lawfully taken in Lake Rufus Woods;
(iii) A Colville tribal member identification card shall satisfy
the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on all waters of Lake Rufus
Woods;
(iv) The department and the Colville Tribes shall jointly designate
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods for the purposes
of enhancing access to the recreational fisheries on the lake; and
(v) The Colville Tribes have agreed to recognize a fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470 or RCW 77.32.490 as satisfying the nontribal
member fishing permit requirements of Colville tribal law on the
reservation portion of the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and at designated
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(b) The director, in collaboration with the Colville Tribes, shall
provide an interim report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2008. The
report shall describe the status of the pilot project, and make
recommendations as needed to fully implement the project, pursuant to
the state and tribal agreement on Lake Rufus Woods.
(9) $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue the ballast water
management program in Puget Sound and expand the program to include the
Columbia river and coastal ports.
(10) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for hatchery facility maintenance
improvements.
(11) $440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $409,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for estimates of juvenile
abundance of federally listed salmon and steelhead populations. The
department shall report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature with a letter stating
the use and measurable results of activities that are supported by
these funds.
(12) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the strategic budget and
accountability program.
(13) $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute activities as
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership).
(14) Prior to submitting its 2009-11 biennial operating and capital
budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office of
financial management, the department shall contract with the hatchery
scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This review
shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent with HSRG
recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the requests based on
their contributions to protecting wild salmonid stocks and meeting the
recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate whether the proposed
requests are being made in the most cost effective manner. The
department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the office of
financial management and the appropriate legislative committees by
October 1, 2008.
(15) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5447 (coastal Dungeness crab). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(16) $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5463 (forest fire protection). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(17) $89,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $89,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6141 (forest health). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(18) $204,000 of the aquatic invasive species enforcement account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5923 (aquatic invasive species). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(19) (($42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (public lands management). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(20))) $352,000 of the wildlife rehabilitation account is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5188 (wildlife
rehabilitation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((21))) (20) $77,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department of fish and
wildlife to participate in the upper Columbia salmon recovery plan
implementation, habitat conservation plan hatchery committees, and the
priest rapids salmon and steelhead agreement hatchery technical
committee.
(((22))) (21)(a) Within existing funds, the department of fish and
wildlife shall sell the upper 20-acre parcel of the Beebe springs
property.
(b) Proceeds from the sale are to be used to develop the Beebe
springs natural interpretive site. Up to $300,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
the development of the Beebe springs natural interpretive site. The
department shall not expend more than the amount received from the sale
proceeds.
(((25))) (22) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $49,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Substitute House
Bill No. 2049 (marine resource committees). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((26))) (23) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a study of introducing
oxygen to the waters of Hood Canal. The study shall propose a location
in a small marine area where a large number of bottom-dwelling fish
species exist, and analyze the impact of injected dissolved oxygen on
aquatic life. The department shall report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the results of the study and recommend
whether to proceed with a project to inject oxygen into Hood Canal.
(((27))) (24) $1,310,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely to replace state wildlife
account funds for the engineering program and (($1,190,000)) $610,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 are
provided solely to replace state wildlife account funds for the
hydraulic project permitting program, including the development of a
permit fee schedule for the hydraulic project approval program to make
the program self supporting. Fees may be based on factors relating to
the complexity of the permit issuance. The fees received by the
department must be deposited into the state wildlife account and shall
be expended exclusively for the purposes of the hydraulic project
permitting program. By December 1, 2008, the department shall provide
a permit fee schedule for the hydraulic project approval program to the
office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the
legislature.
(((28))) (25) $245,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $245,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department to work in
cooperation with the department of natural resources to assist with the
implementation of the wild horse coordinated resource management plan.
Implementation may include providing grant funding to other state and
nonstate entities as needed.
(((29))) (26) $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to develop
siting guidelines for power generation facilities, provide technical
assistance for permitting, support voluntary compliance with the
guidelines, and to conduct bird and wildlife assessments on state lands
most eligible for wind power leases.
(((31))) (27) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2220 (shellfish). The department shall develop and
maintain an electronic database for aquatic farmer registration. If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(28) During the 2007-09 biennium, the department shall not make a
permanent closure of any hatchery facility currently in operation.
(29) Within existing funds, the department shall continue
implementing its capital program action plan dated September 1, 2007,
including the purchase of the necessary maintenance and support costs
for the capital programs and engineering tools. The department shall
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature, its progress in implementing the plan,
including improvements instituted in its capital program, by September
30, 2008.
(30) $46,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2514 (orca whale protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(31) $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 3186
(beach management districts). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(32) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1147 (damage to livestock from wildlife). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(33) The department shall complete an inventory of department
purchased or leased lands acquired for mixed agriculture and fish and
wildlife habitat and provide for each purchase or lease agreement the
cost and date of the agreement, the previous use of the land, any
agreement or deed specifying continuing use of the land, and the
current management cost and status of each parcel of purchased or
leased lands. The department shall provide the inventory to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(34) $289,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $301,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for selective fisheries.
(35) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department to work with the
northwest straits commission to provide training to the British
Columbia ministry of environment and other Canadian partners on methods
used to remove derelict gear in marine waters along the United States
and Canada border. This amount is provided on a onetime basis and is
contingent upon an equal match from Canada. In addition, $50,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided
solely for removal of derelict gear in Washington waters.
(36) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for a review of the effectiveness of the
department's existing hydraulic project approval process and outcomes.
(37) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for stream channel restoration of Wiley
Slough to enhance fish passage.
(38) $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Ebey Island property management costs.
(39)(a) A work group on Electron dam salmon passage is established,
with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iii) The department of fish and wildlife shall appoint at least
one representative from each of the following entities: The department
of fish and wildlife, Puyallup Tribe of Indians, and Puget Sound
energy.
(b) The department of fish and wildlife shall provide staff support
to the work group.
(c) The work group shall study possible enhancements for improving
outbound juvenile salmon passage at Electron dam on the Puyallup river.
(d) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(e) The expenses of the work group, other than travel expenses of
legislative members, shall be paid within existing funds from the
department of fish and wildlife.
(f) The work group shall present its findings and recommendations
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2009.
(g) This section expires January 1, 2009.

Sec. 308 2007 c 522 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,497,000))
$51,302,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,818,000))
$52,317,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,235,000))
$27,862,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,413,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,165,000))
$58,173,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,318,000))
$4,235,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,536,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,773,000))
$7,964,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($96,177,000))
$96,209,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,295,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$7,000,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,348,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,360,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,337,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $570,000
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $982,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,652,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,064,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($318,654,000))
$328,733,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($122,000)) $1,021,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($162,000)) $1,043,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for deposit into the agricultural college trust management
account and are provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of
Washington State University's agricultural college trust lands.
(2) (($11,463,000)) $15,170,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, (($13,792,000)) $13,542,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $5,000,000
of the disaster response account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for emergency fire suppression. None of the general fund and
disaster response account amounts provided in this subsection may be
used to fund agency indirect and administrative expenses. Agency
indirect and administrative costs shall be allocated among the agency's
remaining accounts and appropriations.
(3) Fees approved by the department of natural resources and the
board of natural resources in the 2007-09 biennium are authorized to
exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.
(4) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $199,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to work with
appropriate stakeholders and state agencies in determining how
privately owned lands, in combination with other land ownership such as
public and tribal lands, contribute to wildlife habitat. The
assessment will also determine how commercial forests, forest lands on
the urban fringe, and small privately-owned forest lands that are
managed according to Washington's forest and fish prescriptions, in
combination with other forest management activities, function as
wildlife habitat now and in the future.
(5) (($2,500,000)) $5,500,000 of the forest and fish support
account--state appropriation is provided solely for adaptive
management, monitoring, and participation grants to tribes. If federal
funding for this purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse. The department shall compile the outcomes of
these grants annually and submit them to the office of financial
management by September 1 of 2008 and 2009.
(6) $400,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife. If federal funding for this purpose is reinstated, this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) The department shall prepare a feasibility study that analyzes
applicable business processes and develops the scope, requirements, and
alternatives for replacement of the department's current suite of
payroll-support systems. The department shall use an independent
consultant to assist with the study, and shall submit the completed
analysis to the office of financial management, the department of
personnel, and the department of information services by August 1,
2008.
(8) $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue interagency agreements
with the department of fish and wildlife and the department of ecology
for forest and fish report field implementation tasks.
(9) All department staff serving as recreation-management trail
stewards shall be noncommissioned.
(10) $112,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for spartina eradication efforts. The
department may enter into agreements with federal agencies to eradicate
spartina from private lands that may provide a source of reinfestation
to public lands.
(11) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to convene and
staff a work group to study issues related to wildfire prevention and
protection. The work group shall be composed of members representing
rural counties in eastern and western Washington, fire districts,
environmental protection organizations, industrial forest landowners,
the agricultural community, the beef industry, small forest landowners,
the building industry, realtors, the governor or a designee, the
insurance commissioner or a designee, the office of financial
management, the state fire marshal or a designee, the state building
code council, and the commissioner or public lands or a designee. The
work group shall issue a report of findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by August 1, 2008.
(12) $249,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute activities as
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership).
(13) $2,000,000 of the derelict vessel removal account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6044 (derelict vessels). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(14) (($42,000)) $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and (($42,000)) $34,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (public lands
management). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $14,000 of the forest development account--state appropriation
and $52,000 of the resources management cost account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5463 (forest fire protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(16) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the removal of one or two large
floating dry docks off Lake Washington near the Port Quendall site in
north Renton.
(17) $547,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $726,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6141 (forest health). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(18) $22,000 of the surface mining reclamation account--state
appropriation and $22,000 of the resources management cost account--state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5972 (surface mining reclamation). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts in this subsection
shall lapse.
(19) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $250,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation are provided solely to extend the 2005-2007 contract with
the University of Washington college of forestry resources for
additional research and technical assistance on the future of
Washington forests. Reports shall be submitted by June 30, 2009, to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the following topics:
(a) An exploration of the potential markets for renewable energy
from biomass from Washington forests, especially from material removed
from eastern Washington forests as part of forest health improvement
efforts. This exploration shall assess the feasibility of converting
large amounts of underutilized forest biomass into useful products and
green energy by providing required analyses needed to efficiently
collect and deliver forest biomass to green energy end users. The role
of transportation and processing infrastructure in developing markets
for such material for both clean energy and value-added products shall
be included in the exploration. The college shall coordinate with
Washington State University efforts to identify what new biological,
chemical, and engineering technologies are emerging for converting
forest biomass to clean and efficient energy.
(b) Recommendations for the college's northwest environmental forum
for retaining the highest valued working forest lands at risk of
conversion to nonforest uses. These recommendations should include an
examination of means to enhance biodiversity through strategic
retention of certain lands, as well as economic incentives for
landowners to retain lands as working forests and provide ecosystem
services. The recommendations shall consider the health and value of
the forest lands, the rate of loss of working forest lands in the area,
the risk to timber processing infrastructure from continued loss of
working forest lands, and the multiple benefits derived from retaining
working forest lands. The recommendations shall prioritize forest
lands in the Cascade foothills, which include the area generally
encompassing the nonurbanized lands within the Cascade mountain range
and drainages lying between three hundred and three thousand feet above
mean sea level, and located within Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish, King,
Pierce, Thurston, and Lewis counties.
(20) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Chelan county, as the chair of
the Stemilt partnership, to perform the following:
(a) Work with private and public land management entities to
identify and evaluate land ownership possibilities;
(b) Allocate up to $10,000 to the department of fish and wildlife
to perform technical studies, baseline assessments, environmental
review, due diligence, and similar real estate evaluations; and
(c) Implement real estate transactions based on the results of the
studies.
(21) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for health benefits to Washington
conservation corps employees.
(22) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for staff support for the natural
heritage program to integrate, analyze, and provide bird area
information, and for state designations and mapping support, among
other activities.
(23) $48,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2220 (shellfish). The department shall participate in a
shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee, convened by the department
of ecology. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(24) $150,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5445 (cost-reimbursement agreements). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $191,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to coordinate with
the Puget Sound partnership to complete a final habitat conservation
plan for state-owned aquatic lands and an environmental impact
statement by June 2009.
(26) $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2844 (urban forestry). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(27) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2471 (Washington geological survey). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(28) $20,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No.
3186 (beach management districts). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(29) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to complete maps of lower Hood Canal,
including subsurface geologic layers, lithology, digital layers, and
maps to identify liquifiable sediments for hazard mitigation. The
department shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on maps that were produced by December 1, 2008.

Sec. 309 2007 c 522 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,071,000))
$14,073,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,152,000))
$14,304,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,441,000))
$11,443,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $422,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,062,000
Energy Freedom Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $618,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,120,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,051,000))
$48,207,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees and assessments approved by the department in the 2007-09
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(2) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department, in
addition to the authority provided in RCW 17.26.007, may enter into
agreements with federal agencies to eradicate spartina from private
lands that may provide a source of reinfestation to public lands.
(3) $78,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $72,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute activities as
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership).
(4) $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $63,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a study to evaluate the use of
sugar beets for the production of biofuels.
(5) $275,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $275,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for direct allocation, without
deduction, to the Washington tree fruit research commission,
established under chapter 15.26 RCW, for development and implementation
of a pest management transition program to reduce the use by the tree
fruit industry of certain organophosphate insecticides.
(6) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for distribution to counties with
weed boards to control invasive weeds. Of this amount, $150,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $150,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely to control Japanese knotweed in counties with weed boards.
(7) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for pass through funding to the
nonprofit opportunities industrialization center to provide training to
agricultural workers related to farm skills, English as a second
language, and other skills.
(8) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2798 (local food production). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 310 2007 c 522 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($799,000))
$745,000

Sec. 311 2007 c 522 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$370,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$630,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,155,000))
$1,190,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,458,000))
$3,660,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,459,000))
$4,245,000
State Toxics Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,610,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,072,000))
$14,705,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($1,000,000)) $600,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, (($1,000,000)) $1,400,000 of the
water quality account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and
$2,500,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation are
provided solely for the education of citizens through attracting and
utilizing volunteers to engage in activities that result in
environmental benefits.
(2) $2,208,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008, $2,209,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, (($500,000)) $370,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, (($500,000))
$630,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009,
and $1,155,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, then
$2,208,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $2,209,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, $1,155,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation, $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are appropriated to the office of the governor for
operation of the Puget Sound action team.
(3) To implement the 2007-09 Puget Sound biennial plan required by
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership),
funding is provided solely for Puget Sound recovery activities in the
budgets of selected agencies and institutions of higher education,
including the department of agriculture, department of community, trade
and economic development, conservation commission, department of
ecology, department of fish and wildlife, department of health,
interagency committee for outdoor recreation, department of natural
resources, state parks and recreation commission, the Puget Sound
partnership, University of Washington, and Washington State University.
During the 2007-09 biennium, moneys are provided solely for these
agencies and institutions of higher education as provided for in LEAP
document PSAT-2007.
(4) $305,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for an outcome monitoring program
first for Puget Sound and Washington's coastline and then across the
remaining salmon recovery regions across the state. In planning and
carrying out this program, the department of ecology shall seek and
respond to guidance from the Puget Sound partnership.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 401 2007 c 522 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,727,000))
$1,730,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$2,092,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($762,000))
$763,000
Cemetery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,484,000))
$3,492,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,883,000))
$9,257,000
Master License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,072,000))
$14,434,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,086,000))
$3,090,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,684,000))
$1,683,000
Business Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,190,000))
$11,470,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000
Funeral Directors And Embalmers Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($597,000))
$596,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,000))
$56,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,438,000))
$49,559,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is the policy of the state
of Washington that the cost of each professional, occupational, or
business licensing program be fully borne by the members of that
profession, occupation, or business. For each licensing program
covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall set fees at levels
sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering the licensing
program, including any costs associated with policy enhancements funded
in the 2007-09 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the
2007-09 fiscal biennium, the department may increase fees in excess of
the fiscal growth factor if the increases are necessary to fully fund
the costs of the licensing programs.
(2) $230,000 of the master license account--state appropriation is
provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1461
(manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3349 (residential contractors). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $64,000 of the business professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2759 (bail bond agents). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 402 2007 c 522 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,903,000))
$38,968,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,102,000))
$32,117,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,629,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,223,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,510,000))
$5,715,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,476,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,532,000))
$2,732,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $572,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,155,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,244,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,936,000))
$8,036,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $502,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,007,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,429,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,928,000))
$10,152,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($119,505,000))
$119,144,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $233,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $282,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $357,000 of the fingerprint identification
account--state appropriation are provided solely for workload
associated with implementation of the federal Adam Walsh Act -- the
Children's Safety and Violent Crime Reduction Act of 2006.
(2) In accordance with RCW 10.97.100 and chapter 43.43 RCW, the
Washington state patrol is authorized to perform and charge fees for
criminal history and background checks for state and local agencies,
and nonprofit and other private entities and disseminate the records.
It is the policy of the state of Washington that the fees cover, as
nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs of performing
criminal history and background checks activities. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the Washington state
patrol may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the
increases are necessary to fully fund the direct and indirect cost of
the criminal history and background check activities.
(3) $200,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the
state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12
construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the
state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide
these services only to those districts that are located in counties
without qualified review capabilities.
(4) (($250,000)) $350,000 of the fire service training account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement the provisions of
Senate Bill No. 6119 (firefighter apprenticeship training program). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) Funding is provided in the DNA database account-nonappropriated
for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2713 (DNA
identification).
(6) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for efforts to reduce the number of
convicted offender biological samples awaiting DNA analysis.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
Sec. 501 2007 c 522 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
(1) STATE AGENCY OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,815,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,147,000))
$25,381,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,551,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,513,000))
$68,747,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $11,920,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $12,362,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Within the
amounts provided in this subsection, the superintendent shall recognize
the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have
demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning
requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award. The
students selected for the award must demonstrate understanding through
completion of at least one of the classroom-based civics assessment
models developed by the superintendent of public instruction, and
through leadership in the civic life of their communities. The
superintendent shall select two students from eastern Washington and
two students from western Washington to receive the award, and shall
notify the governor and legislature of the names of the recipients.
(b) $1,080,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $815,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities. Within the amounts provided, the board shall implement the
provisions of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving
mathematics and science education) for which it is responsible,
including: (i) Develop a comprehensive set of recommendations for an
accountability system; (ii) adopt high school graduation requirements
aligned with international performance standards in mathematics and
science and, in conjunction with the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, identify no more than three curricula that are
aligned with these standards; and (iii) review all requirements related
to the high school diploma as directed by section 405, chapter 263,
Laws of 2006.
(c) $4,779,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($6,033,000)) $6,315,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the
professional educator standards board for the following:
(i) $930,000 in fiscal year 2008 and (($1,070,000)) $1,284,000 in
fiscal year 2009 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington
professional educator standards board, including administering the
alternative routes to certification program, pipeline for paraeducators
conditional scholarship loan program, and the retooling to teach math
conditional loan program. Within the amounts provided in this
subsection (1)(d)(i), the professional educator standards board shall:
(A) Revise the teacher mathematics endorsement competencies and
alignment of teacher tests to the updated competencies; (B) review
teacher preparation requirements in cultural understanding and make
recommendations for strengthening these standards; (C) create a new
professional level teacher assessment; (D) expand the alternative
routes to teacher certification program for business professionals and
instructional assistants who will teach math and science; ((and)) (E)
revise requirements for college and university teacher preparation
programs to match a new knowledge- and skill-based performance system;
and (F) test implementation of a revised teacher preparation program
approach that is classroom experience-intensive and performance-based;
and
(ii) $3,269,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $4,289,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends provided through the alternative routes to certification
program administered by the professional educator standards board. Of
the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(d)(ii):
(A) $500,000 each year is provided solely for conditional
scholarships to candidates seeking an endorsement in special education,
math, science, or bilingual education;
(B) $2,210,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $3,230,000 for fiscal year
2009 are for the expansion of conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends for individuals enrolled in alternative route state
partnership programs and seeking endorsements in math, science, special
education or bilingual education as follows: (I) For route one interns
(those currently holding associates of arts degrees), in fiscal year
2008, 120 interns seeking endorsements in the specified subject areas
and for fiscal year 2009, an additional 120 interns in the specified
subject areas; and (II) for all other routes, funding is provided each
year for 140 interns seeking endorsements in the specified subject
areas;
(C) Remaining amounts in this subsection (1)(d)(ii) shall be used
to continue existing alternative routes to certification programs; and
(D) Candidates seeking math and science endorsements under (A) and
(B) of this subsection shall receive priority for funding;
(iii) $236,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the recruiting Washington
teachers program established in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5955
(educator preparation, professional development, and compensation).
(iv) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 provided in this subsection (1)(d) are for $4,000
conditional loan stipends for paraeducators participating in the
pipeline for paraeducators established in Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education); ((and))
(v) $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for conditional stipends for certificated teachers
pursuing a mathematics or science endorsement under the retooling to
teach mathematics or science program established in Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education). The
conditional stipends shall be for endorsement exam fees as well as
stipends for teachers who must also complete coursework; and
(vi) $67,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed House
Bill No. 2607 (English language learner students). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(d) $555,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 ((is)) and $867,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for increased attorney general
fees related to education litigation.
(e) $300,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($300,000)) $2,100,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for replacement
of the apportionment system, which includes the processes that collect
school district budget and expenditure information, staffing
characteristics, and the student enrollments that drive the funding
process.
(f) $78,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $78,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to provide direct services and
support to schools around an integrated, interdisciplinary approach to
instruction in conservation, natural resources, sustainability, and
human adaptation to the environment. Specific integration efforts will
focus on science, math, and the social sciences. Integration between
basic education and career and technical education, particularly
agricultural and natural sciences education, is to be a major element.
(g) $1,336,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,227,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the creation of a statewide
data base of longitudinal student information. This amount is
conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements in section
902 of this act.
(h) $325,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for comprehensive cultural
competence and anti-bias education programs for educators and students.
The office of superintendent of public instruction shall administer
grants to school districts with the assistance and input of groups such
as the anti-defamation league and the Jewish federation of Seattle.
(i) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy
of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial
literacy public-private partnership.
(j) $204,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $66,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5843 (regarding educational
data and data systems). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(k) $114,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $114,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1052 (legislative youth advisory council).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(l) $162,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $31,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1422 (children and families
of incarcerated parents). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(m) $28,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $27,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5098 (Washington college bound scholarship).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(n) $46,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5297 (regarding providing
medically and scientifically accurate sexual health education in
schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(o) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the office of superintendent of public
instruction to convene a workgroup to develop school food allergy
guidelines and policies for school district implementation. The
workgroup shall complete the development of the food allergy guidelines
and policies by March 31, 2008, in order to allow for school district
implementation in the 2008-2009 school year. The guidelines developed
shall incorporate state and federal laws that impact management of food
allergies in school settings.
(p) $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support a program to recognize
the work of outstanding classified staff in school districts throughout
the state.
(q) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $98,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support a full-time director of
skills centers within the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(r) $555,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $475,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to contract with the northwest
educational research laboratory (NWREL) to conduct two educational
studies. Specifically, NWREL shall:
(i) Conduct a study regarding teacher preparation, training, and
coordinated instructional support strategies for English language
learners, as outlined in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5841 (enhancing student learning opportunities and achievement). An
interim report is due November 1, 2008, and the final report is due
December 1, 2009. Both reports shall be delivered to the governor, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the appropriate
early learning, education, and fiscal committees of the legislature;
and
(ii) Conduct a study of the effectiveness of the K-3 demonstration
projects as outlined in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5841 (enhancing student learning opportunities and achievement). An
interim report is due November 1, 2008, and the final report is due
December 1, 2009. Both reports shall be delivered to the governor, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the appropriate
early learning, education, and fiscal committees of the legislature.
(s) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to contract with Washington State
University social and economic sciences research center (WSU-SESRC) to
conduct to educational research studies. The WSU-SESRC shall:
(i) Conduct a study which reviews chapter 207, Laws of 2002
(bullying in schools), evaluate the outcomes resulting from the
legislation, and to make recommendations for continued improvement.
The study shall, at a minimum, determine: (A) Whether the policies
have been developed and implemented in all elementary, middle, and high
schools; (B) whether there has been any measurable improvement in the
safety and civility of schools' climate and environment as a result of
the legislation; (C) whether there are still issues that need to be
addressed in light of the original intent of the legislation; and (D)
recommended actions to be taken at the school, district, and state
level to address the identified issues. Additionally, WSU-SESRC shall
research and identify effective programs and the components of
effective programs. A report shall be submitted to the education
committees of the legislature and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction by September 1, 2008.
(ii) Conduct an evaluation of the mathematics and science
instructional coach program as described in Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education). Findings
shall include an evaluation of the coach development institute,
coaching support seminars, and other coach support activities;
recommendations with regard to the characteristics required of the
coaches; identification of changes in teacher instruction related to
coaching activities; and identification of the satisfaction level with
coaching activities as experienced by classroom teachers and
administrators. An interim report is due November 1, 2008. The final
report is due December 1, 2009. Both the interim and final report
shall be presented to the governor, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, and the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature.
(t) $136,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2523 (world language supervisor). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(u) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
coordinate, in collaboration with educational service districts, a
system of outreach to school districts not currently maximizing their
eligibility for federal e-rate funding through the schools and
libraries program administered by the federal communications
commission. By December 15, 2008, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall issue a report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature identifying school districts that were eligible but did not
apply for e-rate funding for the last two years, and an estimate of the
amounts for which they were eligible in those years. The report shall
also include recommendations for following-up on the findings relative
to the e-rate program contained in the state auditor's performance
audit of educational service districts completed September, 2007.
(v) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2722 (achievement gap for African-American students).
The center for the improvement of student learning will convene an
advisory committee to conduct a detailed analysis of the achievement
gap for African-American students; recommend a comprehensive plan for
closing the gap pursuant to goals under the federal no child left
behind act for all groups of students to meet academic standards by
2014; and identify performance measures to monitor adequate yearly
progress. A study update shall be submitted by September 15, 2008, and
the committee's final report shall be submitted by December 30, 2008,
to the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, the governor, the P-20 council, the basic education finance
task force, and the education committees of the legislature. If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(w) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2598 (online
mathematics curriculum).
(x) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2635 (school
district boundaries and organization).
(y) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2918 (interstate
compact on educational opportunity for military children).
(z) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 3129 (online
learning programs for high school students to earn college credit).

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,783,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,459,000))
$16,544,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,890,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($87,132,000))
$87,217,000

The appropriations in this subsection are provided solely for the
statewide programs specified in this subsection and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at
educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of
public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to
provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.
(ii) $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the school safety center in
the office of the superintendent of public instruction subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(A) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(B) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(iii) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a school safety training
program provided by the criminal justice training commission. The
commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel, including school safety
personnel hired after the effective date of this section.
(iv) $40,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the safety center advisory
committee to develop and distribute a pamphlet to promote internet
safety for children, particularly in grades seven through twelve. The
pamphlet shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's
web site. To the extent possible, the pamphlet shall be distributed in
schools throughout the state and in other areas accessible to youth,
including but not limited to libraries and community centers.
(v) $10,344,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for safe and drug free schools and communities grants for drug
and violence prevention activities and strategies.
(vi) $271,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($271,000)) $396,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a
nonviolence and leadership training program provided by the institute
for community leadership. The program shall provide a request for
proposal process, with up to 80 percent funding, for nonviolence
leadership workshops serving at least 12 school districts with direct
programming in 36 elementary, middle, and high schools throughout
Washington state.
(vii) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a pilot youth suicide
prevention and information program. The office of superintendent of
public instruction will work with selected school districts and
community agencies in identifying effective strategies for preventing
youth suicide.
(viii) $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for programs to improve safety and
emergency preparedness and planning in public schools, as generally
described in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5097. The superintendent of
public instruction shall design and implement the grant program in
consultation with the educational service districts, the school safety
advisory committee, and the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs. The funding shall support grants to school districts
for the development and updating of comprehensive safe school plans,
school safety training, and the conducting of safety-related drills.
As a condition of receiving these funds, school districts must ensure
that schools (A) conduct at least one lockdown and one shelter in place
safety drill each school year, and (B) send updated school mapping
database information on an annual basis to the Washington association
of sheriffs and police chiefs.
(ix) $180,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2712 (concerning criminal street gangs). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(x) $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent to
contract with the Washington State University urban integrated pest
management program to (A) provide technical assistance to school
districts implementing integrated pesticide management programs; and
(B) provide assistance to the Washington state school directors
association in developing a statewide model policy for integrated pest
management. Washington State University must prepare an annual report
to the legislature regarding the technical assistance it has provided
to school districts in achieving IPM STAR certification from the IPM
Institute of North America. The report shall be due January 1, 2009,
and include information regarding the number of districts which have
received technical assistance; the nature and extent of the assistance;
each district's progress on obtaining IPM STAR certification for
integrated pest management; and the amount and nature of costs incurred
by Washington State University in providing technical assistance to
school districts and the Washington state school directors association.
(xi) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2884 (student discipline policies). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
$1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2008 and $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network
technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and
avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and
video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be
used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the
network.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $652,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,329,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to expand the special services
pilot project to include up to seven participating districts. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate these
funds to the district or districts participating in the pilot program
according to the provisions of RCW ((28A.630.015)) 28A.630.016. Of the
amounts provided, $11,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $11,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided for the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to conduct a study of the expanded special
services pilot.
(ii) $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operation of the Cispus
environmental learning center.
(iii) $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support vocational student
leadership organizations.
(iv) $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington civil liberties
education program.
(v) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers
scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community
involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer
mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(vi) $294,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $294,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Lorraine Wojahn dyslexia
pilot reading program in up to five school districts.
(vii) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for developing and disseminating
curriculum and other materials documenting women's role in World War
II.
(viii) $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for incentive grants for districts
and pilot projects to develop preapprenticeship programs. Incentive
grant awards up to $10,000 each shall be used to support the program's
design, school/business/labor agreement negotiations, and recruiting
high school students for preapprenticeship programs in the building
trades and crafts.
(ix) $3,220,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,220,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the dissemination of the
Navigation 101 curriculum to all districts, including disseminating
electronic student planning tools and software for analyzing the impact
of the implementation of Navigation 101 on student performance, and
grants to at least one hundred school districts each year for the
implementation of the Navigation 101 program. The implementation
grants will be limited to a maximum of two years and the school
districts selected shall represent various regions of the state and
reflect differences in school district size and enrollment
characteristics.
(x) $36,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the enhancement of civics
education. Of this amount, $25,000 each year is provided solely for
competitive grants to school districts for curriculum alignment,
development of innovative civics projects, and other activities that
support the civics assessment established in chapter 113, Laws of 2006.
(xi) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1573 (authorizing a statewide program for
comprehensive dropout prevention, intervention, and retrieval). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(xii) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the communities in school
program in Pierce county.
(xiii) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the office of superintendent
of public instruction to contract with a company to develop and
implement a pilot program for providing indigenous learning curriculum
and standards specific online learning programs based on the
recommended standards in chapter 205, Laws of 2005 (Washington's tribal
history). The specific content areas covered by the pilot program will
include social studies and science. The contractor selected will have
experience in developing and implementing indigenous learning curricula
and if possible will be affiliated with a recognized Washington state
tribe. The pilot program will be implemented in a minimum of three
school districts in collaboration with Washington tribes and school
districts. To the extent possible and appropriate, the pilot program
will involve organizations including, the University of Washington's
mathematics science and engineering achievement, the digital learning
commons, the virtual possibilities network, the museum of arts and
culture in Spokane, Eastern Washington University, and Washington State
University.
(xiv) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support and expand the
mentoring advanced placement program in current operation in southwest
Washington.
(xv) (($1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1051
(expanding high school completion programs). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(xvi))) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for program initiatives to address
the educational needs of Latino students and families. Using the full
amounts of the appropriations under this subsection, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with the Seattle
community coalition of compana quetzal to provide for three
initiatives: (A) Early childhood education; (B) parent leadership
training; and (C) high school success and college preparation programs.
Campana quetzal shall report to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction by June 30, 2009, regarding impact of the programs
on addressing the academic achievement gap, including high school drop-out rates and college readiness rates, for Latino students.
(xvi) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for a pilot project to encourage bilingual
high school students to pursue public school teaching as a profession.
Using the full amounts of the appropriation under this subsection, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall contract with
the latino/a educational achievement project (LEAP) to work with school
districts to identify and mentor not fewer than fifty bilingual
students in their junior year of high school, encouraging them to
become bilingual instructors in schools with high English language
learner populations. Students shall be mentored by bilingual teachers
and complete a curriculum developed and approved by the participating
districts.
(xvii) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for reimbursement to school districts for
costs associated with offering the preliminary scholastic aptitude test
(PSAT) to 9th grade students. School districts shall submit evidence
from the test provider to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction verifying the number of tests completed and scored. Within
the amounts provided, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall reimburse individual school districts for the number
of tests taken at a uniform statewide per test rate.
(xviii) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2870 (professional development for
instructional assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(xix) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the superintendent of public
instruction to convene a work group that includes representatives from
dual credit programs including representatives from high schools, the
tech prep program, the state board for community and technical
colleges, the public four-year institutions of higher education, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, the higher
education coordinating board, and the council of presidents to develop
a strategic plan for statewide coordination of dual credit programs
including but not limited to running start, college in the high school,
tech prep, advanced placement, and international baccalaureate. The
plan shall clearly articulate the purpose and definition of each
program, the goals associated with each program, the personnel required
both to administer and teach each program, the benefits to students,
and the barriers to access. The work group must provide the plan to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(xx) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding
is provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2709
(establish a price preference to purchase locally grown food).

Sec. 502 2007 c 522 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,448,333,000))
$4,436,719,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,474,199,000))
$4,483,629,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,387,000))
$4,705,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $341,624,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,273,543,000))
$9,266,677,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (e) through (g) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (d) through
(g) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) Forty-nine certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding;
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of
the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established
under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district
documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater than 53.2
certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students. For any school district documenting a lower certificated
instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio
achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding ratio to employ additional classified
instructional assistants assigned to basic education classrooms in
grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a district's staff ratio under
this section, funds used by the district to employ additional
classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified
instructional assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be
determined using the 1989-90 school year as the base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students may use allocations generated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of that required to maintain the
minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ
additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) shall only be expended to reduce class
size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional
funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction with a waiver allowed for skills centers in current
operation that are not meeting this standard until the 2008-09 school
year, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent vocational
students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic
education and vocational enhancement allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (g)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(i) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2007-08 and 2008-09
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(e) through (i) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each 2.95 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
fifty-nine average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
((14.13)) 14.11 percent in the 2007-08 school year and ((16.69)) 16.67
percent in the 2008-09 school year for certificated salary allocations
provided under subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of ((17.06))
17.04 percent in the 2007-08 school year and ((18.74)) 18.72 percent in
the 2008-09 school year for classified salary allocations provided
under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (h) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$9,703 per certificated staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a
maximum of (($9,907)) $10,309 per certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $23,831 per certificated
staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a maximum of (($24,331))
$25,319 per certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $18,489 per certificated
staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a maximum of (($18,877))
$19,644 per certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school year.
(d) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient to fund the
cost of the nonemployee related cost enhancements provided in
subsection (6) of this section for all impacted programs in sections
501 through 516 of this act for the 2008-09 school year. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall adjust accordingly any
internal references and the appropriate formula allocation factors in
sections 501 through 516 of this act. Furthermore, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction is hereby granted authority to
transfer appropriations among sections 501 through 516 of this act to
the extent required to fund these nonemployee related cost increases.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $555.20 for the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) $1,870,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,421,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1432 (granting service credit to educational
staff associates for nonschool employment). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of (($16,622,000))
$11,951,000 outside the basic education formula during fiscal years
2008 and 2009 as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $547,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2008
and a maximum of (($558,000)) $567,000 may be expended in fiscal year
2009;
(b) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,385,000 may be expended for the 2008 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,385,000 for the 2009 fiscal year. 20 percent of each fiscal year
amount may carry over from one year to the next;
(c) A maximum of (($390,000)) $393,000 may be expended for school
district emergencies;
(d) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs; and
(e) (($9,387,000)) $4,704,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation ((is)) and $3,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for allocations
for equipment replacement in vocational programs and skills centers.
((Each year of the biennium,)) For the 2007-2008 school year, the
funding shall be allocated based on $75 per full-time equivalent
vocational student and $125 per full-time equivalent skills center
student. For the 2008-09 school year, the funding shall be allocated
based on $48 per full time equivalent vocational student and $80 per
full time equivalent skills center student, but these allocations shall
be prorated by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
so that allocations do not exceed the amount provided in this
subsection.
(f) $2,991,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $4,403,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5790 (regarding skills centers). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 5.7 percent from the 2006-07 school year to the
2007-08 school year and ((5.1)) 6.0 percent from the 2007-08 school
year to the 2008-09 school year.
(12) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

Sec. 503 2007 c 522 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- BASIC EDUCATION
EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION. (1) The following calculations determine the
salaries used in the general fund allocations for certificated
instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units
under section 502 of this act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
shall be determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 2
by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP Document
1; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district shall be based on the
district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation
amounts shown on LEAP Document 2.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1" means the staff mix factors for certificated
instructional staff according to education and years of experience, as
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on ((March 24, 2007, at 07:29)) February 18, 2008, at 2:10
hours; and
(b) "LEAP Document 2" means the school year salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and
total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed
by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
((April 19, 2007, at 06:03)) February 18, 2008, at 2:10 hours.
(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors shall be applied to salary
adjustments at a rate of ((14.13)) 14.11 percent for school year 2007-08 and ((16.69)) 16.67 percent for school year 2008-09 for certificated
staff and for classified staff ((17.06)) 17.04 percent for school year
2007-08 and ((18.74)) 18.72 percent for the 2008-09 school year.
(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 MA+90
or PHD

32,746 33,630 34,547 35,465 38,412 40,310 39,260 42,207 44,107

33,187 34,083 35,011 35,970 38,948 40,836 39,696 42,674 44,560

33,607 34,512 35,450 36,483 39,452 41,359 40,135 43,104 45,012

34,039 34,953 35,901 36,967 39,930 41,884 40,552 43,513 45,468

34,464 35,418 36,372 37,474 40,455 42,423 40,988 43,969 45,938

34,902 35,861 36,824 37,988 40,958 42,965 41,432 44,403 46,410

35,353 36,291 37,287 38,508 41,464 43,482 41,887 44,843 46,860

36,145 37,097 38,106 39,394 42,393 44,467 42,739 45,737 47,812

37,304 38,308 39,340 40,735 43,775 45,925 44,079 47,120 49,269

39,562 40,646 42,091 45,202 47,425 45,434 48,547 50,770

41,967 43,516 46,669 48,966 46,861 50,014 52,310

44,984 48,204 50,547 48,328 51,550 53,891

46,404 49,781 52,194 49,853 53,126 55,540

51,397 53,882 51,431 54,741 57,226

53,020 55,632 53,056 56,471 58,977

54,400 57,080 54,435 57,939 60,511

55,487 58,220 55,523 59,097 61,720

BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 MA+90
or PHD

33,898 34,814 35,762 36,713 39,763 41,728 40,641 43,691 45,658

34,354 35,282 36,243 37,236 40,318 42,272 41,093 44,175 46,128

34,789 35,726 36,697 37,766 40,840 42,814 41,547 44,621 46,596

35,237 36,183 37,164 38,267 41,335 43,357 41,979 45,044 47,067

35,676 36,664 37,651 38,793 41,878 43,915 42,430 45,516 47,554

36,130 37,123 38,120 39,324 42,399 44,476 42,890 45,965 48,043

36,597 37,567 38,598 39,863 42,923 45,011 43,361 46,421 48,508

37,416 38,402 39,446 40,780 43,885 46,031 44,243 47,346 49,494

38,616 39,655 40,724 42,168 45,315 47,541 45,630 48,778 51,002

40,954 42,076 43,572 46,792 49,093 47,032 50,255 52,556

43,443 45,047 48,310 50,688 48,509 51,773 54,150

46,566 49,900 52,326 50,028 53,363 55,787

48,036 51,533 54,030 51,606 54,995 57,493

53,205 55,777 53,240 56,667 59,239

54,885 57,589 54,922 58,457 61,052

56,313 59,088 56,350 59,977 62,639

57,439 60,269 57,476 61,176 63,892))

MA+90

BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 or PHD.

34,591 35,525 36,463 37,463 40,576 42,581 41,471 44,585 46,592

35,057 36,004 36,984 37,997 41,142 43,136 41,933 45,078 47,071

35,500 36,456 37,447 38,538 41,675 43,689 42,397 45,533 47,548

35,957 36,923 37,924 39,050 42,180 44,244 42,837 45,965 48,030

36,406 37,414 38,421 39,586 42,734 44,813 43,298 46,447 48,526

36,869 37,882 38,899 40,128 43,265 45,385 43,767 46,905 49,025

37,345 38,335 39,387 40,678 43,800 45,932 44,247 47,370 49,500

38,181 39,187 40,253 41,613 44,782 46,972 45,147 48,314 50,506

39,406 40,466 41,557 43,031 46,242 48,512 46,563 49,775 52,045

41,791 42,936 44,463 47,749 50,097 47,994 51,282 53,630

44,331 45,968 49,298 51,725 49,501 52,832 55,257

47,518 50,920 53,395 51,051 54,454 56,928

49,018 52,586 55,135 52,661 56,119 58,669

54,293 56,917 54,329 57,825 60,450

56,007 58,767 56,045 59,653 62,300

57,465 60,296 57,502 61,203 63,920

58,613 61,501 58,651 62,427 65,198

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before
the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be
counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection,
the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this act, or any replacement schedules and
documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(7) The certificated instructional staff base salary specified for
each district in LEAP Document 2 and the salary schedules in subsection
(4)(a) of this section include two learning improvement days. A school
district is eligible for the learning improvement day funds only if the
learning improvement days have been added to the 180- day contract
year. If fewer days are added, the additional learning improvement
allocation shall be adjusted accordingly. The additional days shall be
limited to specific activities identified in the state required school
improvement plan related to improving student learning that are
consistent with education reform implementation, and shall not be
considered part of basic education. The principal in each school shall
assure that the days are used to provide the necessary school- wide,
all staff professional development that is tied directly to the school
improvement plan. The school principal and the district superintendent
shall maintain documentation as to their approval of these activities.
The length of a learning improvement day shall not be less than the
length of a full day under the base contract. The superintendent of
public instruction shall ensure that school districts adhere to the
intent and purposes of this subsection.
(8) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2)
and subsection (7) of this section.

Sec. 504 2007 c 522 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($161,665,000))
$161,280,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($348,871,000))
$423,126,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($243,000))
$282,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($510,779,000))
$584,688,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($444,366,000)) $518,910,000 is provided solely for the
following:
(a) A cost of living adjustment of 3.7 percent effective September
1, 2007, and another ((2.8)) 3.9 percent effective September 1, 2008,
pursuant to Initiative Measure No. 732.
(b) An additional one percent cost of living adjustment is provided
above the amount required by Initiative Measure No. 732, effective
September 1, 2008.
(c) Additional salary increases as necessary to fund the base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as listed for each
district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act.
Allocations for these salary increases shall be provided to all 262
districts that are not grandfathered to receive salary allocations
above the statewide salary allocation schedule, and to certain
grandfathered districts to the extent necessary to ensure that salary
allocations for districts that are currently grandfathered do not fall
below the statewide salary allocation schedule. These additional
salary increases will result in a decrease in the number of
grandfathered districts from the current thirty-four to twenty-four in
the 2007-08 school year and to thirteen in the 2008-09 school year.
(((c))) (d) Additional salary increases to certain districts as
necessary to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff as listed for each district in LEAP
Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act. These additional
salary increases shall ensure a minimum salary allocation for
certificated administrative staff of $54,405 in the 2007-08 school year
and (($57,097)) $58,264 in the 2008-09 school year.
(((d))) (e) Additional salary increases to certain districts as
necessary to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for
classified staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2,
defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act. These additional salary
increases ensure a minimum salary allocation for classified staff of
$30,111 in the 2007-08 school year and (($31,376)) $32,018 in the
2008-09 school year. For the 2008-09 school year, funds provided in
this subsection shall be used exclusively for additional salary
increases for classified staff and shall not be used to supplant any
other state or local funding for compensation for these staff.
(((e))) (f) The appropriations in this subsection (1) include
associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at rates ((13.49))
13.47 percent for the 2007-08 school year and ((16.05)) 16.03 percent
for the 2008-09 school year for certificated staff and ((13.56)) 13.54
percent for the 2007-08 school year and ((15.24)) 15.22 percent for the
2008-09 school year for classified staff.
(((f))) (g) The appropriations in this section include the
increased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all
relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Increases
for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this
act. Increases for special education result from increases in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act.
(((g))) (h) The appropriations in this section provide cost of
living and incremental fringe benefit allocations based on formula
adjustments as follows:

School Year

2007-08 2008-09

$1.08 (($2.04))
$2.59

$11.13 (($20.98))
$26.91

(($29.81))
$29.80 (($56.19))
$72.06

$7.00 (($13.20))
$16.93

(((h))) (i) The appropriations in this section include $925,000 for
fiscal year 2008 and (($1,940,000)) $2,429,000 for fiscal year 2009 for
salary increase adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) (($66,415,000)) $66,499,000 is provided for adjustments to
insurance benefit allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance
benefit allocations is $682.54 per month for the 2007-08 and 2008-09
school years. The appropriations in this section provide for a rate
increase to $707.00 per month for the 2007-08 school year and $732.00
per month for the 2008-09 school year. The adjustments to health
insurance benefit allocations are at the following rates:

School Year

2007-08 2008-09

$0.22 $0.45

(($1.49))
$1.50 $3.05

(($3.97))
$3.96 $8.01

$0.86 $1.75

(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

Sec. 505 2007 c 522 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($262,728,000))
$273,409,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($264,700,000))
$276,510,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($552,428,000))
$574,919,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $848,000 of this fiscal year 2008 appropriation
and a maximum of (($866,000)) $878,000 of the fiscal year 2009
appropriation may be expended for regional transportation coordinators
and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure
that data submitted by school districts for state transportation
funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual
transportation activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $44.84 per weighted mile in the 2007-08 school
year and (($45.48)) $45.68 per weighted mile in the 2008-09 school year
exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of
this act. Allocations for transportation of students transported more
than one radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based
on the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by
the per mile reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.
(5) $25,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for temporary assistance to school
districts for pupil transportation programs. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the joint
legislative audit and review committee, will develop a method of
allocating these funds to school districts. The allocation method
shall be based primarily on the findings and analysis from the joint
legislative and audit review committee's K-12 pupil transportation
study completed in December 2006.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide reimbursement funding to a school district only after the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was
purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or
a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote
based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall base
depreciation payments for school district buses on the five-year
average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the
final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall
be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that
school year.

Sec. 506 2007 c 522 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($532,192,000))
$543,469,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($566,174,000))
$581,276,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($435,735,000))
$435,692,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,561,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,548,662,000))
$1,574,998,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt the full
cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and
recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k),
chapter 372, Laws of 2006, and ensure that all school districts adopt
the method beginning in the 2007-08 school year.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
funds to school districts based on two categories: (a) The first
category includes (i) children birth through age two who are eligible
for the optional program for special education eligible developmentally
delayed infants and toddlers, and (ii) students eligible for the
mandatory special education program and who are age three or four, or
five and not yet enrolled in kindergarten; and (b) the second category
includes students who are eligible for the mandatory special education
program and who are age five and enrolled in kindergarten and students
age six through 21.
(5)(a) For the 2007-08 and 2008-09 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of students
ages birth through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten, as defined in subsection (4) of this section, multiplied
by the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
four enrollment and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
Each district's general fund -- state funded special education
enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent or 12.7 percent.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, (($30,690,000)) $53,926,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation and $29,574,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided for safety net awards for districts
with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the
amounts provided in subsection (5) of this section. If safety net
awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the ((amount
appropriated)) federal appropriation in this subsection (8) in any
fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal
discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds
shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee subject to
the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal sources. Differences in
program costs attributable to district philosophy, service delivery
choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety
net awards.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) Using criteria developed by the committee, the committee shall
then consider extraordinary costs associated with communities that draw
a larger number of families with children in need of special education
services.
(d) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(f) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor who shall be nonvoting
members of the committee; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
review and streamline the application process to access safety net
funds, provide technical assistance to school districts, and annually
survey school districts regarding improvement to the process.
(12) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund -- state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(13) A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for projects to provide special education
students with appropriate job and independent living skills, including
work experience where possible, to facilitate their successful
transition out of the public school system. The funds provided by this
subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.
(14) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
2009, and $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation shall be
expended to support a special education ombudsman program within the
office of superintendent of public instruction. The purpose of the
program is to provide support to parents, guardians, educators, and
students with disabilities. The program will provide information to
help families and educators understand state laws, rules, and
regulations, and access training and support, technical information
services, and mediation services. The ombudsman program will provide
data, information, and appropriate recommendations to the office of
superintendent of public instruction, school districts, educational
service districts, state need projects, and the parent and teacher
information center.
(15) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(16) A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation may be expended by the superintendent for projects
related to use of inclusion strategies by school districts for
provision of special education services.
(17) The superintendent, consistent with the new federal IDEA
reauthorization, shall continue to educate school districts on how to
implement a birth-to-three program and review the cost effectiveness
and learning benefits of early intervention.
(18) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(19) $262,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for two additional full-time
equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to
provide training and support to districts applying for safety net
awards.

Sec. 507 2007 c 522 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE
DISTRICTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,520,000))
$7,519,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,527,000))
$8,776,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,047,000))
$16,295,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) $1,662,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal
year 2008 and $3,355,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for regional professional
development related to mathematics and science curriculum and
instructional strategies. For each educational service district,
$184,933 is provided in fiscal year 2008 for professional development
activities related to mathematics curriculum and instruction and
$372,357 is provided in fiscal year 2009 for professional development
activities related to mathematics and science curriculum and
instruction. Each educational service district shall use this funding
solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff
with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional
development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures
related to providing regional professional development support. The
office of superintendent of public instruction shall also allocate to
each educational service district additional amounts provided in
section 504 of this act for compensation increases associated with the
salary amounts and staffing provided in this subsection (2).
(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.310.340, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.
(4) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2679 (educational outcomes for students in foster care). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 508 2007 c 522 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT
ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($202,394,000))
$203,555,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($212,310,000))
$220,100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($414,704,000))
$423,655,000

Sec. 509 2007 c 522 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,301,000))
$19,105,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,513,000))
$19,757,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,814,000))
$38,862,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) (($196,000)) $187,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and (($196,000)) $133,797 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to
maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related
support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not
sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated
instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following
types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the
department of social and health services for developmentally disabled
juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections,
and programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation
administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 510 2007 c 522 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY
CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,396,000))
$8,383,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,779,000))
$8,785,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,175,000))
$17,168,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of (($372.19)) $372.15
per funded student for the 2007-08 school year and (($378.17)) $378.13
per funded student for the 2008-09 school year, exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of
funded students shall be a maximum of 2.314 percent of each district's
full-time equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $170,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.
(4) $90,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $90,000 of
the fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided for the Washington
destination imagination network and future problem-solving programs.

Sec. 511 2007 c 522 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,278,000))
$66,757,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,567,000))
$104,460,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($125,325,000))
$104,662,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,616,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($417,786,000))
$428,495,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $19,966,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, (($19,946,000)) $33,698,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $15,870,000 of the
general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for development
and implementation of the Washington assessments of student learning
(WASL), including: (i) Development and implementation of retake
assessments for high school students who are not successful in one or
more content areas of the WASL; and (ii) development and implementation
of alternative assessments or appeals procedures to implement the
certificate of academic achievement. The superintendent of public
instruction shall report quarterly on the progress on development and
implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures.
Within these amounts, the superintendent of public instruction shall
contract for the early return of 10th grade student WASL results, on or
around June 10th of each year.
(b) Appropriations within this subsection are sufficient to
implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 3166 (concerning the
design of the state assessment system and the WASL). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided to implement this
bill in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) (($250,000)) $1,350,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation ((for fiscal year 2008, $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009,)) and (($10,750,000))
$1,950,000 of the education legacy trust account--state appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6023 (regarding alternative assessments), including
section 2 and section 5 of that act. If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
Additionally, the funding provided in this subsection is subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) The funding may be spent on reviewing, developing, and
implementing approved alternative assessments authorized in Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6023 (regarding alternative assessments).
(b) The funding may also be used for reviewing, developing, and
implementing end-of-course examinations pursuant to Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6023 (regarding alternative assessments).
(c) ((The funding may be used for)) Amounts provided in section 502
of this act are sufficient for any increased costs associated with
additional full-time equivalent students directly resulting from
additional course-taking requirements specified in Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6023 (regarding alternative assessments).
(d) (($4,900,000 of the funds provided in this subsection are
provided solely for allocations for school districts to purchase
diagnostic assessments as specified in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6023. By September 1, 2007, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall: (i) Negotiate an agreement with an
assessment vendor or vendors to secure competitive pricing for school
districts for high quality diagnostic assessment tools, and (ii)
provide quality comparison information to school districts regarding
various diagnostic assessment tools available. Of the funding
provided, a maximum of $100,000 may be spent by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for administrative support.
(e))) Beginning on September 1, 2007, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall submit quarterly reports to
the office of financial management and the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature detailing the actions taken
pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6023 (regarding
alternative assessments) and amounts spent of each aspect of the
legislation.
(3) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $4,400,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the development and implementation
of diagnostic assessments, subject to the following terms and
conditions:
(a) A maximum of $2,540,000 of the funding provided in this
subsection shall support the development and implementation of
voluntary classroom-based diagnostic assessments and progress
monitoring tools for all subject areas included in the WASL by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction; and
(b) $2,360,000 of the funding provided in this subsection is for
allocations to school districts to purchase assessment tools which
supplement the system of diagnostic tests developed by the office of
the superintendent of public instruction as described in (a) of this
subsection.
(4) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the second grade assessments.
(((4))) (5) $1,414,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,414,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for (a) the
tenth grade mathematics assessment tool that: (i) Presents the
mathematics essential learnings in segments for assessment; (ii) is
comparable in content and rigor to the tenth grade mathematics WASL
when all segments are considered together; (iii) is reliable and valid;
and (iv) can be used to determine a student's academic performance
level; (b) tenth grade mathematics knowledge and skill learning modules
to teach middle and high school students specific skills that have been
identified as areas of difficulty for tenth grade students; and (c)
making the modules available on-line.
(((5))) (6) $2,267,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $2,367,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation are provided solely to develop a system of mathematics
and science standards and instructional materials that are
internationally competitive and consistent with emerging best practices
research. Funding in this subsection shall fund all of the following
specific projects:
(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt revised state standards in mathematics as directed by Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science
education). Activities include conducting research at the request of
the state board of education, engaging one or more national experts in
mathematics selected by the board, and convening education
practitioners and community members in an advisory capacity regarding
revised standards in mathematics.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, shall research and
identify not more than three basic mathematics curricula as well as
diagnostic and supplemental instructional materials for elementary,
middle, and high school grade spans that align with the revised
mathematics standards.
(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt revised state standards in science as directed by Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science
education. Activities include conducting research at the request of
the state board of education, engaging one or more national experts in
science selected by the board, and convening education practitioners
and community members in an advisory capacity regarding revised
standards in science.
(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, shall research and
identify not more than three basic science curricula as well as
diagnostic and supplemental instructional materials for elementary,
middle, and high school grade spans that align with the revised science
standards.
(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
evaluate science textbooks, instructional materials, and diagnostic
tools to determine the extent to which they are aligned with the
revised science standards. Once the evaluations have been conducted,
results will be shared with science teachers, other educators, and
community members.
(f) Funding is provided for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to develop WASL knowledge and skill learning modules
to assist students performing at tenth grade level 1 and level 2 in
science.
(g) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $300,000 is
provided solely to the state board of education to increase capacity to
implement the provisions of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906
(improving mathematics and science education) and Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6023 (regarding alternative assessments).
(((6))) (7) $8,950,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation is provided solely for allocations to districts for
salaries and benefits for the equivalent of two additional professional
development days each school year for fourth and fifth grade teachers.
The allocations shall be made based on the calculations of certificated
instructional staff units for fourth and fifth grade provided in
section 502 of this act and on the calculations of compensation
provided in sections 503 and 504 of this act. Allocations made
pursuant to this subsection are intended to be formula-driven, and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide
updated projections of the relevant budget drivers by November 20,
2007, and by November 20, 2008. In the 2007-08 school year, the
professional development activities funded by this subsection shall be
focused on development of mathematics knowledge and instructional
skills and on improving instruction in science. In the 2008-09 school
year, the additional professional development shall focus on skills
related to implementing the new international mathematics and science
standards and curriculum. Districts may use the funding to support
additional days for professional development as well as job-embedded
forms of professional development.
(((7))) (8) $13,058,000 of the education legacy trust fund
appropriation is provided solely for allocations to districts for
salaries and benefits for the equivalent of three additional
professional development days for middle and high school math teachers
and the equivalent of three additional professional development days
for middle and high school science teachers. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules to determine
the number of math and science teachers in middle and high schools
within each district. Allocations made pursuant to this subsection are
intended to be formula-driven, and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide updated projections of the relevant
budget drivers by November 20, 2007, and by November 20, 2008.
Districts may use the funding to support additional days for
professional development as well as job-embedded forms of professional
development, consistent with the following:
(a) For middle school teachers during the 2007-08 school year the
additional math professional development funded in this subsection
shall focus on development of basic mathematics knowledge and
instructional skills and the additional science professional
development shall focus on examination of student science assessment
data and identification of science knowledge and skill areas in need of
additional instructional attention. For middle school teachers during
the 2008-09 school year the additional math professional development
shall focus on skills related to implementing the new international
mathematics standards and the additional science professional
development shall focus on skills related to implementing the new
international science standards.
(b) For high school teachers during the 2007-08 school year the
additional math professional development funded in this subsection
shall focus on skills related to implementing state math learning
modules, the segmented math class/assessment program, the collection of
evidence alternative assessment, and basic mathematics knowledge and
instructional skills, and the additional science professional
development shall focus on skills related to examination of student
science assessment data and identification of science knowledge and
skill areas in need of additional instructional attention. For high
school teachers during the 2008-09 school year the additional math
professional development shall focus on skills related to implementing
the new international mathematics standards and the additional science
professional development shall focus on skills related to implementing
the new international science standards.
(((8))) (9) $17,491,000 of the education legacy trust fund
appropriation is provided solely for allocations to districts for
specialized professional development in math for one math teacher and
one science teacher in each middle school and one math teacher and one
science teacher in each high school. The allocations shall be based on
five additional professional development days per teacher and an
additional allocation per teacher of $1,500 for training costs. In
order to generate an allocation under this subsection, a teacher must
participate in specialized professional development that leads to the
implementation of mathematics and science courses that add new rigor to
the math and science course offerings in the school. Allocations made
pursuant to this subsection are intended to be formula-driven, and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide
updated projections of the relevant budget drivers by November 20,
2007, and by November 20, 2008.
(((9))) (10) $5,376,000 of the education legacy trust account--state appropriation is provided solely for a math and science
instructional coaches program pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education). Funding shall
be used to provide grants to schools and districts to provide salaries,
benefits, and professional development activities to twenty-five
instructional coaches in middle and high school math in the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years and twenty-five instructional coaches in middle
and high school science in the 2008-09 school years; and up to $300,000
may be used by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to administer and coordinate the program. Each instructional coach
will receive five days of training at a coaching institute prior to
being assigned to serve two schools each. These coaches will attend
meetings during the year to further their training and assist with
coordinating statewide trainings on math and science.
(((10))) (11) (($1,500,000)) $1,133,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($1,500,000)) $1,133,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely to allow approved middle and junior high school career and
technical education programs to receive enhanced vocational funding
pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving
mathematics and science education). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide
allocations to districts for middle and junior high school students in
accordance with the funding formulas provided in section 502 of this
act. Although the allocations are formula-driven, the office of the
superintendent shall consider the funding provided in this subsection
as a fixed amount, and shall adjust funding to stay within the amounts
provided in this subsection.
(((11))) (12) $143,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $139,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for (a) staff at the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote
efforts to develop integrated math, science, technology, and
engineering programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b)
grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each
year professional development training for implementing integrated
math, science, technology, and engineering program in their schools.
(((12))) (13) $5,303,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $5,303,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for in-service
training and educational programs conducted by the Pacific science
center and for the Washington state leadership assistance for science
education reform (LASER) regional partnership coordinated at the
Pacific science center.
(((13) $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to support state college readiness
assessment fees for eleventh grade students. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall allocate funds for this
purpose to school districts based on the number of eleventh grade
students who complete the college readiness exam. School districts
shall use these funds to reimburse institutions of higher education for
the assessments students take and report to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction on the number of assessments
provided.))
(14) (($51,236,000)) $35,573,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation ((is)) and $8,084,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
grants for voluntary full-day kindergarten at the highest poverty
schools, as provided in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill 5841
(enhancing student learning opportunities and achievement). The office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide allocations
to districts for recipient schools in accordance with the funding
formulas provided in section 502 of this act. Each kindergarten
student who enrolls for the voluntary full-day program in a recipient
school shall count as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for
the purpose of making allocations under this subsection. Although the
allocations are formula-driven, the office of the superintendent shall
consider the funding provided in this subsection as a fixed amount, and
shall limit the number of recipient schools so as to stay within the
amounts appropriated each fiscal year in this subsection. The funding
provided in this subsection is estimated to provide full-day
kindergarten programs for 10 percent of kindergarten enrollment in the
2007-08 school year and ((20)) 15 percent of kindergarten enrollment in
the 2008-09 school year. Funding priority shall be given to schools
with the highest poverty levels, as measured by prior year free and
reduced priced lunch eligibility rates in each school. Additionally,
as a condition of funding, school districts must agree to provide the
full-day program to the children of parents who request it in each
eligible school. For the purposes of calculating a school district
levy base, funding provided in this subsection shall be considered a
state block grant program under RCW 84.52.0531.
(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, a maximum of
$272,000 may be used for administrative support of the full-day
kindergarten program within the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(b) Student enrollment pursuant to this program shall not be
included in the determination of a school district's overall K-12 FTE
for the allocation of student achievement programs and other funding
formulas unless specifically stated.
(15) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support a full-day kindergarten
"lighthouse" resource program at the Bremerton school district, as
provided in Engrossed Second Senate Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student
learning opportunities and achievement). The purpose of the program is
to provide technical assistance to districts in the initial stages of
implementing a high quality full-day kindergarten program.
(16) $3,047,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for three demonstration
projects for kindergarten through grade three. The purpose of the
grants is to implement best practices in developmental learning in
kindergarten through third grade pursuant to Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student learning
opportunities and achievement).
(17) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the development of a
leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent
organization to design, field test, and implement a state-of-the-art
education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the
state. Initial development of the content of the academy activities
shall be supported by private funds. Semiannually the independent
organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and
others to support the development and implementation of this program.
Leadership academy partners, with varying roles, shall include the
state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, and others as the independent organization shall
identify.
(18) $661,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $684,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
implement emerging best practices activities in support of classroom
teachers' instruction of students, with a first language other than
English, who struggle with acquiring academic English skills, as
outlined in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5841 (enhancing
student learning opportunities and achievement). Best practices shall
focus on professional development for classroom teachers and support of
instruction for English language learners in regular classrooms.
School districts qualifying for these grants shall serve a student
population that reflects many different first languages among their
students. The Northwest educational research laboratory (NWREL) shall
evaluate the effectiveness of the practices supported by the grants as
provided in section 501 of this act. Recipients of these grants shall
cooperate with NWREL in the collection of program data.
(19) $548,000 of the fiscal year 2008 general fund -- state
appropriation and $548,000 of the fiscal year 2009 general fund -- state
appropriation are provided solely for training of paraprofessional
classroom assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom
assistants as provided in RCW 28A.415.310.
(20) $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for mentor teacher assistance,
including state support activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and
28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in
this subsection may be used each fiscal year to operate a mentor
academy to help districts provide effective training for peer mentors.
Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be allocated to school
districts based on the number of first year beginning teachers.
(21) $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(22) (($98,761,000)) $105,765,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high
quality teachers and principals under Title II of the no child left
behind act.
(23)(a) $488,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $488,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a principal support
program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
contract with an independent organization to administer the program.
The program shall include: (i) Development of an individualized
professional growth plan for a new principal or principal candidate;
and (ii) participation of a mentor principal who works over a period of
between one and three years with the new principal or principal
candidate to help him or her build the skills identified as critical to
the success of the professional growth plan. Within the amounts
provided, $25,000 per year shall be used to support additional
participation of secondary principals.
(b) $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Each educational audit
shall include recommendations for best practices and ways to address
identified needs and shall be presented to the community in a public
meeting to seek input on ways to implement the audit and its
recommendations.
(24) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a high school and school
district improvement program modeled after the office of the
superintendent of public instruction's existing focused assistance
program in subsection (25)(b) of this section. The state funding for
this improvement program will match an equal amount committed by a
nonprofit foundation in furtherance of a jointly funded program.
(25) A maximum of $375,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and a maximum of $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided for summer
accountability institutes offered by the superintendent of public
instruction. The institutes shall provide school district staff with
training in the analysis of student assessment data, information
regarding successful district and school teaching models, research on
curriculum and instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve
instruction in reading, mathematics, language arts, social studies,
including civics, and guidance and counseling. The superintendent of
public instruction shall offer at least one institute specifically for
improving instruction in mathematics in fiscal years 2008 and 2009 and
at least one institute specifically for improving instruction in
science in fiscal year 2009.
(26) $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for the evaluation of mathematics
textbooks, other instructional materials, and diagnostic tools to
determine the extent to which they are aligned with the state
standards. Once the evaluations have been conducted, results will be
shared with math teachers, other educators, and community members for
the purposes of validating the conclusions and then selecting up to
three curricula, supporting materials, and diagnostic instruments as
those best able to assist students to learn and teachers to teach the
content of international standards. In addition, the office of the
superintendent shall continue to provide support and information on
essential components of comprehensive, school-based reading programs.
(27) $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the mathematics helping corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall not be
permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) The school improvement specialists shall provide the following:
(i) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(ii) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(iii) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(iv) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(v) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(vi) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(vii) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(28) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the improvement of reading
achievement and implementation of research-based reading models. The
superintendent shall evaluate reading curriculum programs and other
instructional materials to determine the extent to which they are
aligned with state standards. A report of the analyses shall be made
available to school districts. The superintendent shall report to
districts the assessments that are available to screen and diagnose
reading difficulties, and shall provide training on how to implement a
reading assessment system. Resources may also be used to disseminate
grade level expectations and develop professional development modules
and web-based materials.
(29) (($30,401,000)) $30,706,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for the reading first program under Title I
of the no child left behind act.
(a) $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 ((and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are)) is provided solely for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to award five grants to parent,
community, and school district partnership programs that will meet the
unique needs of different groups of students in closing the achievement
gap. The legislature intends that the pilot programs will help
students meet state learning standards, achieve the skills and
knowledge necessary for college or the workplace, reduce the
achievement gap, prevent dropouts, and improve graduation rates.
(b) The pilot programs shall be designed in such a way as to be
supplemental to educational services provided in the district and shall
utilize a community partnership based approach to helping students and
their parents.
(c) The grant recipients shall work in collaboration with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop
measurable goals and evaluation methodologies for the pilot programs.
$25,000 of this appropriation may be used by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to hold a statewide meeting to
disseminate successful strategies developed by the grantees.
(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
issue a report to the legislature in the 2009 session on the progress
of each of the pilot programs.
(30) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to support and award Washington
community learning center program grants pursuant to Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student learning
opportunities and achievement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(31) (($1,629,000)) $1,643,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($1,638,000)) $1,667,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely to eliminate the lunch co-pay for students in grades
kindergarten through third grade that are eligible for reduced price
lunch.
(32) $400,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the development of mathematics
support activities provided by community organizations in after school
programs. Pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving
mathematics and science education), the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall administer grants to community organizations
that partner with school districts to provide these activities and
develop a mechanism to report program and student success.
(33) $5,222,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($5,222,000)) $5,285,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for: (a) The
meals for kids program under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155; (b)
to eliminate the breakfast co-pay for students eligible for reduced
price lunch; and (c) for additional assistance for school districts
initiating a summer food service program.
(34) $1,056,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,056,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps.
The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing
comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more
schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs. Grants
provided under this section may be used by school districts for
expenditures from September 2007 through August 31, 2009.
(35) $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
provide a continuum of care for children and families to help children
become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall
contain local plans designed collaboratively with community service
providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which
the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible.
Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.
(36) $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate a process to
facilitate the evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses to
school districts which includes the following: Creation of a general
listing of the types of available online curriculum courses; a survey
conducted by each regional educational technology support center of
school districts in its region regarding the types of online curriculum
courses desired by school districts; a process to evaluate and
recommend to school districts the best online courses in terms of
curriculum, student performance, and cost; and assistance to school
districts in procuring and providing the courses to students.
(37) $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for the development and posting of web-based instructional tools, assessment data, and other information that
assists schools and teachers implementing higher academic standards.
(38) $333,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $333,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operation of the center
for the improvement of student learning pursuant to RCW 28A.300.130.
(39) $12,400,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for one-time allocations for
technology upgrades and improvements. The funding shall be allocated
based on $3,000 for each elementary school, $6,000 for each middle or
junior high school, and $11,000 for each high school. In cases where
a particular school's grade span or configuration does not fall into
these categories, the office of superintendent of public instruction
will develop an allocation to that school that recognizes the unique
characteristics but maintains the proportionate allocation identified
in this subsection.
(40) $250,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with office of
the superintendent of public instruction establishing a statewide
director of technology position pursuant to Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(41)(a) (($9,150,000)) $10,232,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($12,447,000)) $16,734,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject
to the following conditions and limitations:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,000 per
teacher in fiscal year 2008 and adjusted for inflation in fiscal year
2009;
(ii) For national board certified teachers who teach in schools
where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible
for the federal free or reduced price lunch program, an additional
$5,000 annual bonus to be paid in one lump sum; and
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications
for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full
school year receive bonuses in a pro-rated manner.
(b) Included in the amounts provided in this subsection are amounts
for mandatory fringe benefits. The annual bonus shall not be included
in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW 41.32.010(10).
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "schools where at least 70
percent of the student headcount enrollment is eligible for the federal
free or reduced price lunch program" shall be defined as: (i) For the
2007-08 and the 2008-09 school years, schools in which the prior year
percentage of students eligible for the federal free and reduced price
lunch program was at least 70 percent; and (ii) in the 2008-09 school
year, any school that met the criterion in (c)(i) of this subsection in
the 2007-08 school year.
(d) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the office
of superintendent of public instruction shall revise rules to allow
teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national
board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching at the
Washington school for the deaf or Washington school for the blind, to
receive the annual bonus amounts specified in this subsection if they
are otherwise eligible.
(e) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $377,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $577,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2775 (regarding
bonuses for instructional staff certified by the national board for
professional teaching standards). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(f) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $108,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $110,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2869 (extending
the national board for professional teaching standards bonus to
certificated principals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(42) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for grants to five skills centers to
develop and plan for implementation of integrated English language
development/career skills programs that pair English language
development teachers with career/technical education instructors in the
classroom. The office of the superintendent of public instruction and
skill center staff shall work with the state board for community and
technical colleges I-BEST program staff and local community and
technical college program staff to develop the program to assure
critical program elements are included and that the skill center
programs provide a seamless transition for high school students to the
community and technical college programs for students choosing that
pathway. The request for proposal or grant application shall be issued
no later than May 1, 2007, so that grant recipients can begin program
planning and development efforts on July 1, 2008. The superintendent
of public instruction shall provide the resulting implementation plans
to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 1, 2008.
(43) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to support public high schools'
participation in the FIRST robotics program. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall issue grants not to exceed
$10,000 per school to be used for teacher stipends, registration fees,
equipment, and other costs associated with direct participation in the
program. High poverty schools and schools starting up robotics
programs shall be given priority in funding.
(44) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to support the Chinese exchange program at
the Peninsula school district. The funding shall support scholarships,
educational programs, and travel costs for students facing financial
obstacles to participation in the program.
(45) $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of sections 105, 106,
107, 201, 204, 205, 301, 302, 303, 306, 309, and 310 of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2826 (regarding secondary career and
technical education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(46) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2798 (enacting the local farms-healthy kids
act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.
(47) $63,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2629
(educational services for students who are deaf or hearing impaired).
(48) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2597 (kindergarten entry assessment).

Sec. 512 2007 c 522 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,320,000))
$65,595,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,217,000))
$69,526,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,243,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($179,780,000))
$180,364,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of (($824.24))
$824.12 per eligible bilingual student in the 2007-08 school year and
(($840.25)) $840.13 in the 2008-09 school year, exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to 1.5 percent of the school
year allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section,
and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, solely for the central provision of assessments as
provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are
provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual
program students.
(5) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I Part C and English
language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III
of the elementary and secondary education act.
(6) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260, during the 2007-09 biennium, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall not make exit
of the transitional bilingual program contingent on passing both the
Washington language proficiency test and the Washington assessment of
student learning without prior legislative approval.

Sec. 513 2007 c 522 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,792,000))
$68,381,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,156,000))
$71,386,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,660,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . 45,953,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($550,561,000))
$546,380,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of (($220.37)) $220.34 per funded student
for the 2007-08 school year and (($224.73)) $225.42 per funded student
for the 2008-09 school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided under section 504 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the following as appropriate:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12
for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch in the prior school year; and
(ii) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch exceeded forty percent, subtract forty percent from
the district's percentage and multiply the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school
year.
(d) In addition to amounts allocated in (b) and (c) of this
subsection, an additional amount shall be allocated to a school
district for each school year in which the district's allocation is
less than the amount the district received for the general fund -- state
learning assistance program allocation in the 2004-05 school year. The
amount of the allocation in this section shall be sufficient to
maintain the 2004-05 school year allocation.
(2) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(3) Small school districts are encouraged to make the most
efficient use of the funding provided by using regional educational
service district cooperatives to hire staff, provide professional
development activities, and implement reading and mathematics programs
consistent with research-based guidelines provided by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund -- state or education legacy trust
funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(5) School districts are encouraged to coordinate the use of these
funds with other federal, state, and local sources to serve students
who are below grade level and to make efficient use of resources in
meeting the needs of students with the greatest academic deficits.
(6) $1,638,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2810 (enhancing resources and assistance in school districts
with concentrations of English language learners). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 514 2007 c 522 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- PROMOTING ACADEMIC
SUCCESS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,820,000))
$12,108,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,177,000))
$22,462,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,997,000))
$34,570,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) ((The)) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,
the amounts appropriated in this section are provided solely for
remediation for students who have not met standard in one or more
content areas of the Washington assessment of student learning in the
spring of their tenth grade year or on a subsequent retake. The funds
may be used for extended learning activities, including summer school,
before and after school, Saturday classes, skill seminars, assessment
preparation, and in-school or out-of-school tutoring. Extended
learning activities may occur on the school campus, via the internet,
or at other locations and times that meet student needs. Funds
allocated under this section shall not be considered basic education
funding. Amounts allocated under this section shall fund new extended
learning opportunities, and shall not supplant funding for existing
programs and services.
(2) School district allocations for promoting academic success
programs shall be calculated as follows:
(a) Allocations shall be made to districts only for students
actually served in a promoting academic success program.
(b) A portion of the district's annual student units shall be the
number of content area assessments (reading, writing, and mathematics)
on which eleventh and twelfth grade students were more than one
standard error of measurement from meeting standard on the WASL in
their most recent attempt to pass the WASL.
(c) The other portion of the district's annual student units shall
be the number of content area assessments (reading, writing, and
mathematics) on which eleventh and twelfth grade students were less
than one standard error of measurement from meeting standard but did
not meet standard on the WASL in their most recent attempt to pass the
WASL.
(d) Districts with at least one but less than 20 student units
combining the student units generated from (b) and (c) of this
subsection shall be counted as having 20 student units for the purposes
of the allocations in (e) and (f)(i) of this subsection.
(e) Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries and
benefits shall be determined using formula-generated staff units
calculated pursuant to this subsection. Ninety-four hours of
certificated instructional staff units are allocated per 13.0 student
units as calculated under (a) of this subsection and thirty-four hours
of certificated instructional staff units are allocated per 13.0
student units as calculated under (b) of this subsection. Allocations
for salaries and benefits for the staff units calculated under this
subsection shall be calculated in the same manner as provided under
section 503 of this act. Salary and benefit increase funding for staff
units generated under this section is included in section 504 of this
act.
(f) The following additional allocations are provided per student
unit, as calculated in (a) and (b) of this subsection:
(i) $12.80 in school year 2007-08 and (($13.07)) $13.26 in school
year 2008-09 for maintenance, operations, and transportation;
(ii) $12.29 in school year 2007-08 and (($12.55)) $12.73 in school
year 2008-09 for pre- and post-remediation assessments;
(iii) $17.41 in school year 2007-08 and (($17.77)) $18.03 in school
year 2008-09 per reading remediation student unit;
(iv) $8.19 in school year 2007-08 and (($8.36)) $8.49 in school
year 2008-09 per mathematics remediation student unit; and
(v) $8.19 in school year 2007-08 and (($8.36)) $8.49 in school year
2008-09 per writing remediation student unit.
(f) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute
school year allocations according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.
(3) By November 15th of each year, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and to the office of financial management on the use of
these funds in the prior school year, including the types of assistance
selected by students, the number of students receiving each type of
assistance, and the impact on WASL test scores. The office of the
superintendent for public instruction shall complete its review and
make adjustments to district reporting procedures to ensure consistency
of reporting categories and minimize district administrative workload.
(4) School districts may carry over from one year to the next up to
20 percent of funds allocated under this program((; however,)).
Carryover funds shall be expended for ((promoting academic success
programs)) extended learning activities as described in subsection (1)
of this section. Carryover funds may be expended for students eligible
for the promoting academic success program as described in subsection
(1) of this section or for ninth and tenth grade students determined to
be at risk of not passing one or more content areas of the WASL based
on eighth grade assessment scores.

Sec. 515 2007 c 522 s 517 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT
PROGRAM
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($423,414,000))
$423,369,000
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($446,357,000))
$444,970,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($869,771,000))
$868,339,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $450.00 per FTE student for the 2007-
08 school year and (($459.45)) $458.10 per FTE student for the 2008-09
school year. For the purposes of this section, FTE student refers to
the annual average full-time equivalent enrollment of the school
district in grades kindergarten through twelve for the prior school
year, as reported to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction by August 31st of the previous school year.
(2) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection (2).
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute the
school year allocation according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

Sec. 516 2007 c 522 s 519 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION. (1) Appropriations
made in this act to the office of superintendent of public instruction
shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent
allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between
sections of this act, except as expressly provided in subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2008, unless
specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director
of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may
transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2008 among
the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a
specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment;
employee compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special
education programs; institutional education programs; transitional
bilingual programs; and learning assistance programs.
(3) The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving
any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
Sec. 601 2007 c 522 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
The appropriations in sections 603 through 609 of this act are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.
(2)(a) The salary increases provided or referenced in this
subsection and described in section 603 and part IX of this act shall
be the only allowable salary increases provided at institutions of
higher education, excluding increases associated with normally
occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and professional
staff retention, and excluding increases associated with employees
under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW.
(b) For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW,
salary increases will be in accordance with the applicable collective
bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to
any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range
maximum for the class to which the employee's position is allocated.
(c) Each institution of higher education receiving appropriations
for salary increases under sections 604 through 609 of this act may
provide additional salary increases from other sources to instructional
and research faculty, exempt professional staff, teaching and research
assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under ((RCW
28B.16.015)) chapter 41.80 RCW. Any additional salary increase granted
under the authority of this subsection (2)(c) shall not be included in
an institution's salary base for future state funding. It is the
intent of the legislature that general fund--state support for an
institution shall not increase during the current or any future
biennium as a result of any salary increases authorized under this
subsection (2)(c).
(d) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other
state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from
institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes.
Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the
department of personnel for inclusion in the department's data
warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the
department of personnel for use by the reporting institutions,
including provisions for common job classifications and common
definitions of full-time equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts,
number of contract months, and funding sources shall be consistently
reported for employees under contract.
(e) By January 1, 2008, the office of financial management shall
work with the institutions of higher education, and with staff from the
legislative fiscal committees and the legislative evaluation and
accountability program, to identify ways in which the office's
"compensation impact model" should be revised or replaced to make the
system less costly for institutions to maintain, and more transparent,
informative, and useful to the legislature and institutions, while
providing information needed to accurately and efficiently negotiate
and budget employee compensation changes.
(3) The technical colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess
of the fiscal growth factor to conform with the percentage increase in
community college operating fees.
(4) The tuition fees, as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW, charged to
full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education for
the 2007-08 and 2008-09 academic years, other than the summer term,
shall be adjusted by the governing boards of the state universities,
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state board
for community and technical colleges. Tuition fees may be increased in
excess of the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.
For the 2007-08 academic year, the governing boards of the research
universities may implement an increase no greater than seven percent
over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate students
for the 2006-07 academic year. The regional universities and The
Evergreen State College may implement an increase no greater than five
percent over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate
students for the 2006-07 academic year. The state board for community
and technical colleges may implement an increase no greater than two
percent over tuition and fees charged to full-time resident students
for the 2006-07 academic year.
For the 2008-09 academic year, the governing boards of the research
universities may implement an increase no greater than seven percent
over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate students
for the 2007-08 academic year. The regional universities and The
Evergreen State College may implement an increase no greater than five
percent over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate
students for the 2007-08 academic year. The state board for community
and technical colleges may implement an increase no greater than two
percent over tuition and fees charged to full-time resident students
for the 2007-08 academic year.
In addition to the tuition authorization provided under this
subsection, amounts appropriated in this budget provide an amount
approximately equal to a one percent tuition increase per academic year
for the state board for community and technical colleges.
(5) For the 2007-09 biennium, the governing boards and the state
board may adjust full-time operating fees for factors that may include
time of day and day of week, as well as delivery method and campus, to
encourage full use of the state's educational facilities and resources.
(6) Technical colleges may increase their building fee in excess of
the fiscal growth factor until parity is reached with the community
colleges.
(7) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW
28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or
a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund
appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue
foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.
(8) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act are
authorized to increase summer term tuition in excess of the fiscal
growth factor during the 2007-09 biennium. Tuition levels increased
pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed the per credit hour rate
calculated from the academic year tuition levels adopted under this
act.
(9) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, community and technical colleges
are authorized to increase services and activities fee charges in
excess of the fiscal growth factor during the 2007-09 biennium. The
services and activities fee charges increased pursuant to this
subsection shall not exceed the maximum level authorized by the state
board for community and technical colleges.
(10) From within the appropriations in sections 603 through 609 of
this act, institutions of higher education shall increase compensation
for nonrepresented employees in accordance with the following:
(a) Across the Board Adjustments.
(i) Appropriations are provided for a 3.2 percent salary increase
effective September 1, 2007, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80,
41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except the certificated employees of the
state schools for the deaf and blind and employees of community and
technical colleges covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No.
732. Also included are employees in the Washington management service,
and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the director of
personnel.
(ii) Appropriations are provided for a 2.0 percent salary increase
effective September 1, 2008, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80,
41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except for the certificated employees of the
state schools of the deaf and blind and employees of community and
technical colleges covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No.
732. Also included are employees in the Washington management service,
and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the director of
personnel.
(iii) No salary increase may be paid under this subsection to any
person whose salary has been Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the
director of personnel.
(b) Salary Survey.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey, for
job classes more than 25 percent below market rates and affected
classes.
(c) Classification Consolidation.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's phase 4 job class
consolidation and revisions under chapter 41.80 RCW.
(d) Agency Request Consolidation.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's agency request job
class consolidation and reclassification plan. This implementation
fully satisfies the conditions specified in the settlement agreement of
WPEA v State/Shroll v State.
(e) Additional Pay Step.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for a
new pay step L for those who have been in step K for at least one year.
(f) Retain Fiscal Year 2007 Pay Increase.
For all classified state employees, except those represented by a
bargaining unit under chapter 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except
for the certificated employees of the state schools of the deaf and
blind and employees of community and technical colleges covered by the
provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732, funding is provided for
continuation of the 1.6 percent salary increase that was provided
during fiscal year 2007. Also included are employees in the Washington
management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the
director of personnel.
(g) The appropriations are also sufficient for the research and the
regional higher education institutions to (i) continue the 1.6 percent
salary increase that was provided during fiscal year 2007; and (ii)
provide average salary increases of 3.2 percent effective September 1,
2007, and of 2.0 percent effective September 1, 2008, for faculty,
exempt administrative and professional staff, graduate assistants, and
for all other nonclassified employees.

Sec. 602 2007 c 522 s 602 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) The appropriations in sections 603 through 609 of this act
provide state support for full-time equivalent student enrollments at
each institution of higher education. Listed below are the annual
full-time equivalent student enrollments by institutions assumed in
this act.

2007-08
Annual
Average 2008-09
Annual
Average

33,782 34,197

1,760 1,980

2,109 2,349

19,112 19,272

800 865

1,888 2,113

8,952 9,322

8,996 9,184

4,165 4,213

12,022 12,175

((136,022))
136, 102 ((138,977))
139, 057

(2) For the state universities, the number of full-time equivalent
student enrollments enumerated in this section for the Bothell, Tacoma,
Tri-Cities, and Vancouver campuses are the minimum levels at which the
universities should seek to enroll students for those campuses. At the
start of an academic year, the governing board of a state university
may transfer full-time equivalent student enrollments among campuses.
Intent notice shall be provided to the office of financial management
and reassignment of funded enrollment is contingent upon satisfying
data needed by the forecast division for tracking and monitoring state-supported college enrollment.

Sec. 603 2007 c 522 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($638,521,000))
$617,805,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($654,446,000))
$692,187,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,432,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,448,199,000))
$1,465,224,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,040,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation and $10,920,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are to expand general enrollments by 900 student
FTEs in academic year 2008 and by an additional 1,050 student FTEs in
academic year 2009.
(2) $5,720,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation and $11,440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are to expand high-demand enrollments by 650
student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 650 student FTEs
in fiscal year 2009. The programs expanded shall include, but are not
limited to, mathematics and health sciences. The state board shall
provide data to the office of financial management that is required to
track changes in enrollments, graduations, and the employment of
college graduates related to state investments in high-demand
enrollment programs. Data may be provided through the public
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(3) $1,960,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand early childhood education programs with a
focus on early math and science awareness by 100 student FTEs in fiscal
year 2008 and by an additional 150 student FTEs in 2009. The board
shall provide data to the office of financial management regarding math
and science enrollments, graduations, and employment of college
graduates related to state investments in math and science programs.
Data may be provided through the centralized higher education
enrollment system or through an alternative means agreed to by the
institutions and the office of financial management.
(4) $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW
28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support up to 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in each fiscal year.
(5) $3,813,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation and $7,625,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are for basic skills education enrollments at
community and technical colleges. Budgeted enrollment levels shall
increase by 625 student FTEs each year.
(6) $3,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $7,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase salaries and related
benefits for part-time faculty. It is intended that part-time faculty
salaries will increase relative to full-time faculty salaries after all
salary increases are collectively bargained.
(7) $7,350,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is to increase enrollment levels in the integrated basic education,
skills, and language program (I-BEST) by 250 student FTEs per year.
Each student participating on a full-time basis is budgeted and shall
be reported as a single FTE for purposes of this expansion.
(8) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the transitions math project.
This phase of work shall include the establishment of a single math
placement test to be used at colleges and universities statewide.
(9) $2,835,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is to increase enrollment in apprenticeship training programs by 150
student FTEs in each fiscal year.
(10) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the community and technical college system by 1,700
students each year. TRIO eligible students include low-income,
first-generation, and college students with disabilities. The state
board for community and technical colleges shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 65 percent for TRIO students and other low-income
and first-generation students served through this appropriation.
(11)(a) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures and targets in 2006. By July 31, 2007,
the state board for community and technical colleges and the higher
education coordinating board shall review and revise these targets
based on per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In
addition, the board shall compile comparable data from peer
institutions in the eight global challenge states identified in the
Washington Learns study.
(b) The targets previously agreed by the state board and the higher
education coordinating board are enumerated as follows:
(i) Increase the percentage and number of academic students who are
eligible to transfer to baccalaureate institutions to 18,700;
(ii) Increase the percentage and number of students prepared for
work to 23,490; and
(iii) Increase the percentage and number of basic skills students
who demonstrate substantive skill gain by 22,850.
The state board for community and technical colleges shall report
their progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of
this section to the higher education coordinating board prior to
November 1, 2009.
(12) $452,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for start-up and planning funds for two
applied baccalaureate degree programs at community and technical
colleges, of which one degree program must be at a technical college.
The applied baccalaureate degrees shall be specifically designed for
individuals who hold associate of applied science degrees, or
equivalent, in order to maximize application of their technical course
credits toward the applied baccalaureate degree.
(13) $2,502,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $5,024,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for faculty salary increments and
associated benefits and may be used in combination with salary and
benefit savings from faculty turnover to provide salary increments and
associated benefits for faculty who qualify through professional
development and training. To the extent general salary increase
funding is used to pay faculty increments, the general salary increase
shall be reduced by the same amount. The state board shall determine
the method of allocating to the community and technical colleges the
appropriations granted for academic employee increments, provided that
the amount of the appropriation attributable to the proportionate share
of the part-time faculty salary base shall only be accessible for
part-time faculty.
(14) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($50,000)) $375,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for higher
education student child care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(15) $2,725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for administration and customized
training contracts through the job skills program. The state board
shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor
and to appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature
regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant
awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of
the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these
funds.
(16) $504,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for 80 student FTEs in the existing four
applied baccalaureate degree programs at community and technical
colleges as authorized in chapter 28B.50 RCW.
(17) $4,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $4,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $15,000,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation are provided solely for implementation of
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1096 (postsecondary opportunities).
The state board shall seek additional private sector involvement and
support for the opportunity grants program. If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation shall lapse. Remaining amounts in this subsection shall
be used for an opportunity grant program to provide grants covering
community and technical college tuition and fees for up to 45 credits
and books or other materials to be awarded to eligible students.
Program participants will earn credentials or certificates in industry-defined occupations with a need for skilled employees.
(18) From within the funds appropriated in this section, community
and technical colleges shall increase salaries for employees subject to
the provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732 by an average of 3.7
percent effective July 1, 2007, and by an average of ((2.8)) 3.9
percent effective July 1, 2008.
(19) $3,434,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for increasing salaries for employees who
are subject to the provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732 by an
average of one percent effective July 1, 2008.
(20) From within the funds appropriated in this section, community
and technical colleges shall increase salaries for exempt professional
staff by an average of 3.2 percent effective September 1, 2007, and by
an average of 2.0 percent effective September 1, 2008.
(21) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for competitive grants to labor,
management, and college partnerships to develop or expand and evaluate
innovative training programs for incumbent hospital workers that lead
to careers in nursing and other high-demand health care fields.
(22) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the gateway center pilot project at
Highline community college for coaching and managing student
participants in the pilot program. The coach will be responsible for
credentials interpretation, evaluating prior learning experience,
ensuring licensure guidance, providing academic advising and
translation services, and helping establish employer relationships.
(23) $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2899 (adult literacy education). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(24) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to support online library resources
throughout the community and technical college system. Funds shall be
used to purchase licenses for specialized periodicals, journals, and
books and to increase student access to library materials.
(25) Within the appropriations in this section sufficient funding
is provided to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
3306 (electronic learning).
(26) $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the design, development, training, and
related expenses associated with a joint labor/management
apprenticeship program established under the auspices of an
international union representing aerospace workers, which will include
but not be limited to training in composite technology. Of this
amount, $2,150,000 may be used for program development, curriculum
development and equipment, training, and related expenses; and $850,000
shall be used to support 130 enrollment slots at no more than three
community and technical colleges with at least one college being
located east of the Cascade mountains, for related supplemental
instruction and related expenses. The state board for community and
technical colleges shall select the colleges using a joint selection
process between the state board and the joint labor/management
apprenticeship program.
(27) $1,178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to Edmonds community college for operating
expenses related to leasing the employment resource center.

Sec. 604 2007 c 522 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($373,680,000))
$373,726,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($390,058,000))
$390,843,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,181,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,621,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,448,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($820,288,000))
$821,119,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $15,744,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand general enrollments by 625 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 625 student FTEs in fiscal year
2009. Of these, 165 FTEs in 2008 and 165 FTEs in 2009 are expected to
be graduate student FTEs.
(2) $6,975,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand math and science undergraduate enrollments
by 250 student FTEs in each fiscal year. The programs expanded shall
include mathematics, engineering, and the physical sciences. The
university shall provide data to the office of financial management
that is required to track changes in enrollments, graduations, and the
employment of college graduates related to state investments in math
and science programs. Data may be provided through the public
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(3) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
Washington state academy of sciences, authorized by chapter 70.220 RCW.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
William D. Ruckelshaus center.
(5) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at the
University of Washington by 250 students each year. TRIO students
include low-income, first-generation, and college students with
disabilities. The student support services program shall report
annually to the office of financial management and the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the retention and
completion rates of students served through this appropriation.
Retention rates shall continue to exceed 85 percent for TRIO students
in this program.
(6) $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to establish the state
climatologist position.
(7) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 ((is)) and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus
center to identify and carry out, or otherwise appropriately support,
a process to identify issues that have led to conflict around land use
requirements and property rights, and explore practical and effective
ways to resolve or reduce that conflict. A report with conclusions and
recommendations shall be submitted to the governor and the chairs of
the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 31, 2007.
Work will continue after the submission of the initial report, to
include continuing research and the development of financial and policy
options and a progress report on fact finding efforts and stakeholder
positions due December 1, 2008.
(8) $3,830,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand health sciences capacity at
the University of Washington. Consistent with the medical and dental
school extension program appropriations at Washington State University
and Eastern Washington University, funding is provided to expand
classes at the University of Washington. Medical and dental students
shall take the first year of courses for this program at the Riverpoint
campus in Spokane and the second year of courses at the University of
Washington in Seattle.
(9) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall review and revise
these targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09
appropriations act. In addition, the board shall compile comparable
data from peer institutions in the eight global challenge states
identified in the Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and the University
of Washington are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the combined number of baccalaureate degrees conferred
per year at all campuses to 8,850;
(b) Increase the combined number of high-demand baccalaureate
degrees conferred at all campuses per year to 1,380;
(c) Increase the combined number of advanced degrees conferred per
year at all campuses to 3,610;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 74.7 percent;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 76.0 percent;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 93.0 percent;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 92 percent
at the Seattle campus and 92.5 percent at the Bothell and Tacoma
campuses, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
subsection.
The University of Washington shall report its progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(10) $750,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely to increase participation in international learning
opportunities, particularly for students with lower incomes who would
otherwise not have the chance to study, work, or volunteer outside the
United States.
(11) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for forestry research by the
Olympic natural resources center.
(12) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for coastal marine research by the
Olympic natural resources center.
(13) $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for increased education, training,
and support services for the families of children with autism, and for
the production and distribution of digital video discs in both English
and Spanish about strategies for working with people with autism.
(14) $2,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support for the
department of global health.
(15) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(16) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the rural technology initiative
(initiative) at the University of Washington and the transportation
research group (group) at the Washington State University to conduct an
economic analysis of the costs to safely provide log hauling services.
The initiative will be the lead investigator and administer the
project. Neither the University of Washington nor the Washington State
University may make a deduction for administrative costs. The project
shall rely upon the Washington state patrol for determination of basic
safe characteristics, consistent with applicable state and federal law.
The analysis shall include:
(a) An estimate of log haulers' cost to operate and maintain a
basic and safe log truck without operator including:
(i) Variable costs such as fuel, etc;
(ii) Quasi-variable costs such as:
(A) Tires, brakes, wrappers, and other safety related equipment;
(B) Vehicle insurance, taxes, fees, etc;
(C) Maintenance costs such as oil, lubrication, and minor repairs;
and
(D) Depreciation and replacement costs;
(b) The source of these cost estimates where possible should be
independent vendors of equipment and services or already existing
studies;
(c) A calculation of costs for safe operation expressed as per
mile, hour or load volume including consideration for regional
differences as well as off-road vs. on-road;
(d) An evaluation of comparable trucking services; and
(e) A review of log truck safety statistics in Washington state.
In conducting the analysis, the initiative shall consult with the
northwest log truckers cooperative, the Washington trucking
association, the Washington contract loggers association, the
Washington farm forestry association, and the Washington forest
protection association. By June 30, 2008, the initiative shall provide
a report of its findings to the legislature and governor and distribute
the findings to interested industry groups.
(17) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the Burke museum to support
science and social science educational programs including public
outreach programs, new educational programs and resources, web-based
interactive learning experiences, teacher training, and traveling
educational opportunities.
(18) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($150,000)) $300,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the institute
for learning and brain sciences.
(19) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the University of Washington
to gather data and conduct research associated with preparing the
basin-wide assessment and to solicit nominations for review and
submittal to the Washington academy of sciences for the creation of the
Puget Sound science panel pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership).
(20)(a) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the University of Washington
school of law loan repayment assistance program endowment fund. The
University of Washington shall conduct fund-raising activities to
increase private sector support of the endowment program and $250,000
of the appropriation in this subsection is contingent on a private
sector match. Funds in the law school repayment assistance program
endowment fund shall be used to provide graduates who pursue careers in
public interest legal positions with payment assistance toward their
student loan debt.
(b) The University of Washington law school shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2010, information about the loan repayment
assistance program. The report shall contain at least the following
information:
(i) A financial summary of the endowment program;
(ii) The number of individuals receiving assistance from the
program and information related to the positions in which these
individuals are working;
(iii) Any available information regarding the effect of the loan
repayment assistance program on student recruitment and enrollment; and
(iv) Other information the school of law deems relevant to the
evaluation of the program.
(c) In its rules for administering the program, the school of law
must make provision for cases of hardship or exceptional circumstances,
as defined by the school of law. Examples of such circumstances
include, but are not limited to, family leave, medical leave, illness
or disability, and loss of employment.
(d) The loan repayment assistance program must be available to
otherwise eligible graduates of the law school who work in positions
with nonprofit organizations or government agencies. Such positions
must be located within Washington state. Government agencies shall
include the various branches of the military.
(21) $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the University of Washington
geriatric education center to develop a voluntary adult family home
certification program. In addition to the minimum qualifications
required under RCW 70.128.120, individuals participating in the
voluntary adult family home certification program shall complete fifty-two hours of class requirements as established by the University of
Washington geriatric education center. Individuals completing the
requirements of RCW 70.128.120 and the voluntary adult family home
certification program shall be issued a certified adult family home
license by the department of social and health services. The
department of social and health services shall adopt rules implementing
the provisions of this subsection.
(22) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $97,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus
center for implementation of section 5 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3123 (nurse staffing). If section 5 of the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(23) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for an academic plan for an additional
branch campus to be located in the Snohomish/Island/Skagit county area
as directed in House Bill No. 2548 (UW at Everett). Top priorities for
the campus include expansion of upper division capacity for transfer
students and graduate students in high demand programs, with a
particular focus on science, technology, and engineering. The campus
may offer lower division courses linked to specific majors in fields
not addressed at local community colleges. The campus may also
directly admit freshmen and sophomores gradually and deliberately in
accordance with a campus plan to be submitted to the higher education
coordinating board. The academic plan is due to the legislature by
June 1, 2009.
(24) $88,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the university to increase mental
health professional staff by one full-time equivalent employee.
(25) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the marine sciences program to
continue studying the impacts to biota in Hood Canal from low dissolved
oxygen.

Sec. 605 2007 c 522 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($231,382,000))
$232,201,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($240,898,000))
$242,213,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,884,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($508,614,000))
$510,748,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,315,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand general enrollments by 290 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 300 student FTEs in fiscal year
2009.
(2) $3,525,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand math and science enrollments by 65 student
FTEs in fiscal year 2008, and by an additional 90 FTE students in
fiscal year 2009, of which 15 FTEs in each fiscal year are expected to
be graduate enrollments. The programs expanded shall include
mathematics, engineering, and the physical sciences. Fifty student
FTEs in each year will be shifted from general enrollments to high-demand, high-cost fields, and thus do not affect the enrollment levels
listed in section 602 of this act. The university shall provide data
to the office of financial management regarding math and science
enrollments, graduations, and the employment of college graduates
related to state investments in math and science programs. Data may be
provided through the public centralized higher education enrollment
system or through an alternative means agreed to by the institutions
and the office of financial management.
(3) $2,356,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is to expand bachelors-level, masters-level, and PhD enrollment at the
Tri-Cities and Spokane campuses by 45 FTE students in fiscal year 2008,
and by an additional 40 FTEs in fiscal year 2009.
(4) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for research and commercialization
in bio-products and bio-fuels. Of this amount, $2,000,000 shall be
targeted at the development of new crops to be used in the bio-products
facility at WSU-Tri-Cities. The remainder shall be used for research
into new bio-products created from agricultural waste to be conducted
in the Tri-Cities in a joint program between Washington State
University and Pacific Northwest national laboratories.
(5) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at Washington
State University by 250 students each year. TRIO students include
low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities.
The student support services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 85 percent for TRIO students in this program.
(6) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to promote the development of the
Spokane-based applied sciences laboratory into a strong,
self-sustaining research organization. The state funds shall be used
to recruit and retain at least three senior research scientists; to
employ business development and administrative personnel; and to
establish and equip facilities for computational modeling and for
materials and optical characterization.
(7) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
Washington state academy of sciences, under chapter 70.220 RCW.
(8) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
William D. Ruckelshaus center.
(9) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 ((is)) and $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus
center to identify and carry out, or otherwise appropriately support,
a process to identify issues that have led to conflict around land use
requirements and property rights, and explore practical and effective
ways to resolve or reduce that conflict. A report with conclusions and
recommendations shall be submitted to the governor and the chairs of
the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 31, 2007.
Work will continue after the submission of the initial report, to
include continuing research and the development of financial and policy
options and a progress report on fact finding efforts and stakeholder
positions due December 1, 2008.
(10) $6,360,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand health sciences offerings in
Spokane. The university shall enroll 20 student FTEs in fiscal year
2009 in a University of Washington medical school extension program at
the Riverpoint campus of WSU in Spokane. Students shall take the first
year of courses for this program at the Riverpoint campus in Spokane,
and shall do their clinical rotations and other upper level training in
the inland northwest.
(11) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for start-up and ongoing operation
of the Vancouver campus-based electrical engineering program.
(12) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall review and revise
these targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09
appropriations act. In addition, the board shall compile comparable
data from peer institutions in the eight global challenge states
identified in the Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and the Washington
State University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the combined number of baccalaureate degrees conferred
per year at all campuses to 4,170;
(b) Increase the combined number of high-demand baccalaureate
degrees conferred at all campuses per year to 630;
(c) Increase the combined number of advanced degrees conferred per
year at all campuses to 1,090;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 63.2 percent;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 65.4 percent;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 84.8 percent;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 92
percent, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
The Washington State University shall report its progress and
ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the
higher education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(13) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(14) $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support the unified agriculture
initiative at Washington State University. Funds are provided for
competitive agriculture grant funds, of which $400,000 is provided for
biological intensive and organic agriculture grants; for operating and
program support for the university's research and extension centers, of
which $735,000 is for maintenance and operations support for the Mount
Vernon research facility; and for positions to fill research gaps in
the development of value-added agricultural products and economically
and environmentally sustainable food production.
(15) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for support of basic operations
and research at the university's grizzly bear study center.
(16) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the energy development center
to establish certification standards and to process applications for
renewable energy cost recovery incentives, as provided in chapters 300
and 301, Laws of 2005.
(17) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Washington State University to
gather data and conduct research associated with preparing the basin-wide assessment and to solicit nominations for review and submittal to
the Washington academy of sciences for the creation of the Puget Sound
science panel pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5372 (Puget Sound partnership).
(18) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus
center for implementation of section 5 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3123 (nurse staffing). If section 5 of the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(19) $77,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the university to increase mental
health professional staff by one full-time equivalent employee.
(20) $160,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for administrative resources and personnel
necessary for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2963 (WSU
collective bargaining). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 606 2007 c 522 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,907,000))
$48,911,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,736,000))
$50,825,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,753,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,758,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($119,154,000))
$119,247,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $930,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand general enrollments by 130 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2009. Of these, 30 FTEs in 2009 are expected to be
graduate student FTEs.
(2) $1,170,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand high-demand undergraduate enrollments by 50
student FTEs in each fiscal year. The programs expanded shall include,
but are not limited to, mathematics, engineering, and health sciences.
The university shall provide data to the office of financial management
that is required to track changes in enrollments, graduations, and the
employment of college graduates related to state investments in
high-demand enrollment programs. Data may be provided through the
public centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(3) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at Eastern
Washington University by 250 students each year. TRIO students include
low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities.
The student support services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 85 percent for TRIO students in this program.
(4) $1,021,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the RIDE program. The program
shall enroll eight student FTEs in the University of Washington school
of dentistry in fiscal year 2009. Students shall take the first year
of courses for this program at the Riverpoint campus in Spokane, and
their second and third years at the University of Washington school of
dentistry.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall review and revise
these targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09
appropriations act. In addition, the board shall compile comparable
data from peer institutions in the eight global challenge states
identified in the Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and the Eastern
Washington University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 2035;
(b) Increase the number of high-demand baccalaureate degrees
conferred per year to 405;
(c) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 550;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 50.0 percent;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 61.0 percent;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 76.0 percent;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 81.0
percent, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
Eastern Washington University shall report its progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(6) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(7) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the university to increase mental
health professional staff by one full-time equivalent employee.

Sec. 607 2007 c 522 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,326,000))
$47,691,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,539,000))
$50,296,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,219,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,330,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($117,414,000))
$118,536,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,474,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to increase general enrollments by 70 FTE students in
fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 211 FTE enrollments in fiscal
year 2009. At least 30 of the additional fiscal year 2009 enrollments
are expected to be graduate students.
(2) $1,816,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is to increase math and science
enrollments by 105 FTE students in fiscal year 2008 and by an
additional 89 FTE students in fiscal year 2009. The university shall
provide data to the office of financial management regarding math and
science enrollments, graduations, and employment of college graduates
related to state investments in math and science enrollment programs.
Data may be provided through the centralized higher education
enrollment system or through an alternative means agreed to by the
institutions and the office of financial management.
(3) $1,801,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to increase high-demand undergraduate enrollments by
85 student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 70 FTE
students in fiscal year 2009. The programs expanded shall include, but
are not limited to, bilingual education and information technology.
The university shall provide data to the office of financial management
that is required to track changes in enrollments, graduations, and the
employment of college graduates related to state investments in high-demand enrollment programs. Data may be provided through the public
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(4) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at Central
Washington University by 250 students each year. TRIO students include
low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities.
The student support services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 85 percent for TRIO students in this program.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall review and revise
these targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09
appropriations act. In addition, the board shall compile comparable
data from peer institutions in the eight global challenge states
identified in the Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and the Central
Washington University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 2,050;
(b) Increase the number of high-demand baccalaureate degrees
conferred per year to 49;
(c) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 196;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 51.1 percent;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 72.3 percent;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 78.2 percent;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 86.6
percent, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
Central Washington University shall report its progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(6) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1497
(Central Washington University operating fee waivers). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, this appropriation shall lapse.
(7) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(8) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the university to increase mental
health professional staff by one full-time equivalent employee.

Sec. 608 2007 c 522 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,744,000))
$29,747,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,057,000))
$30,378,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,758,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,559,000))
$64,883,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $562,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand upper division math and science enrollments
by 22 student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 28 student
FTEs in fiscal year 2009.
(2) $260,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is for 20 student FTE graduate
enrollments in the masters in education program.
(3) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at The
Evergreen State College by 250 students each year. TRIO students
include low-income, first-generation, and college students with
disabilities. The student support services program shall report
annually to the office of financial management and the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the retention and
completion rates of students served through this appropriation.
Retention rates shall continue to exceed 80 percent for students served
in this program, with a goal of reaching a retention rate in excess of
85 percent.
(4) $614,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation is
provided solely to increase the number and value of tuition waivers
awarded to state-supported students.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the college and the board shall review and revise these
targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act.
In addition, the board shall compile comparable data from peer
institutions in the eight global challenge states identified in the
Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and The Evergreen
State College are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 1182;
(b) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 92;
(c) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 57.0 percent;
(d) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 72.8 percent;
(e) Improve the freshman retention rate to 73.9 percent;
(f) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 97.0
percent, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(g) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
The Evergreen State College shall report its progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(6) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(7) $435,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy (WSIPP) to assist the joint task force on basic education
finance created pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5627 (requiring a review and development of basic education funding).
The institute shall assist the joint task force in a review of the
definition of basic education and the development of options for a new
funding structure for K-12 public schools. ((If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.)) The task force on basic education as created in chapter 399,
Laws of 2007 shall consider the ruling of the King County Superior
Court in the matter of Federal Way School District v. The State of
Washington in developing recommendations for a new basic education
school finance formula. The task force's major structural
recommendations shall be submitted prior to the 2009 legislative
session for consideration during the 2009 legislative session. The
recommendations should include proposals that directly address the
issue of equity in salary allocations in the new school finance
formula.
(8) $180,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $180,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to study the program effectiveness and cost-benefit
of state-funded programs that meet the criteria of evidence-based
programs and practices, and emerging best practice/promising practice,
as defined in RCW 71.24.025 (12) and (13) for adult offenders in the
department of corrections, and juvenile offenders under state and local
juvenile authority.
(9) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to evaluate the effectiveness of current methods for
screening and treating depression in women who receive temporary
assistance for needy families (TANF), and to make recommendations for
their improvement.
(10) $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1472 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) Notwithstanding other provisions in this section, the
Washington state institute for public policy may adjust due dates for
projects included on the institute's 2007-09 workplan as necessary to
efficiently manage workload.
(12) $19,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy (WSIPP) to (a) conduct a national review of state
programs for youth transitioning out of foster care and analyze state
policies on eligibility requirements for continued foster care, age
thresholds for transition services, types of services provided, and use
of state funds to supplement federal moneys; and (b) survey foster
youth and foster parents in Washington regarding how well current
services are meeting the needs of youth transitioning out of foster
care to independence. The institute shall issue a preliminary report
by September 1, 2008, with a final report by December 31, 2008.
(13) $69,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy (WSIPP) to conduct an adult literacy study pursuant to
Substitute House Bill No. 2899 (adult literacy education). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(14) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the college to increase mental health
professional staff by one full-time equivalent employee.
(15) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy (WSIPP) for implementation of Second Substitute House
Bill No. 3121 (construction industry). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy to review and analyze teacher preparation in Washington
state and identify possible strategies for improving the effectiveness
of future teachers through:
(a) Strengthening the essential competencies and knowledge for
initial teacher certification and reducing unnecessary or lower
priority requirements;
(b) Increasing program capacity and degree production in high-demand subject areas;
(c) Enhancing the state's accountability for teacher preparation;
and
(d) Identifying barriers that constrain programs in the preparation
of effective teachers.
The institute shall also design a rigorous study of the
relationship between teacher effectiveness and teacher preparation
programs. The institute shall submit a preliminary report to the
education committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008, including
the study design, and a final report by December 1, 2009.

Sec. 609 2007 c 522 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,716,000))
$66,774,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,917,000))
$70,682,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,845,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($148,478,000))
$149,301,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $281,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand math and science enrollments by 8 student
FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 8 student FTEs in fiscal
year 2009. Programs expanded include cell and molecular biology. The
university shall provide data to the office of financial management
regarding math and science enrollments, graduations, and the employment
of college graduates related to state investments in math and science
enrollment programs. Data may be provided through the public
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(2) $4,013,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand general enrollments by 235 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 130 student FTEs in fiscal year
2009. Of these, 24 FTEs in each fiscal year are expected to be
graduate student FTEs.
(3) $920,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand high demand enrollments by 50 FTE students
in fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 15 FTE students in fiscal year
2009. Programs expanded include early childhood education and teaching
English as a second language. The university shall provide data to the
office of financial management regarding high-demand enrollments,
graduations, and employment of college graduates related to state
investments in high demand enrollment programs. Data may be provided
through the centralized higher education enrollment system or through
an alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(4) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of low-income and
first-generation students served in the student outreach services
program at Western Washington University by 500 students over the
biennium. The student outreach services program shall report annually
to the office of financial management and the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature on the retention and completion
rates of students served through this appropriation. Retention rates
shall continue to exceed 80 percent for students served in this
program, with a goal of reaching a retention rate in excess of 85
percent.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall review and revise
these targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09
appropriations act. In addition, the board shall compile comparable
data from peer institutions in the eight global challenge states
identified in the Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and the Western
Washington University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 2,968;
(b) Increase the number of high-demand baccalaureate degrees
conferred per year to 371;
(c) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 375;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 62.8 percent;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 61.4 percent;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 85.0 percent;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 95.6
percent, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
Western Washington University shall report its progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(6) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, the university shall
report progress towards developing and implementing outreach programs
designed to increase awareness of higher education to K-12 populations
to the higher education coordinating board by October 1st of each year.
(7) $1,169,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is for the advanced materials science and engineering program. The
program shall develop the advanced materials science and engineering
center for research, teaching, and development which will offer a minor
degree in materials science and engineering beginning in the fall 2009.
(8) $444,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $611,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for development of the biomedical
research activities in neuroscience (BRAIN) program. The program shall
link biology and chemistry curriculum to prepare students for
biomedical research positions in academia and industry.
(9) $485,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington state campus compact to
increase the number of college and university students mentoring
students in eighth through twelfth grades.
(10) $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the university to increase mental
health professional staff by one full-time equivalent employee.

Sec. 610 2007 c 522 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,922,000))
$6,923,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,954,000))
$7,301,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,342,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,218,000))
$18,566,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $169,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to maintain and update a
scholarship clearinghouse that lists every public and private
scholarship available to Washington students. The higher education
coordinating board shall develop a web-based interface for students and
families as well as a common application for these scholarships.
(2) $339,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $330,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5098 (the college bound scholarship). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1131 (the passport to college promise). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $152,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $191,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for administration of conditional
scholarships.
(5) Except for moneys provided in this section for specific
purposes, and to the extent that the executive director finds that the
agency will not require the full amount appropriated for a fiscal year
in this section, the unexpended appropriation shall be transferred to
the state education trust account established under RCW 28B.92.140 for
purposes of fulfilling unfunded scholarship commitments that the board
made under its federal GEAR UP Grant 1.
(6) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely to implement a capital facility and technology capacity study
which will compare the 10-year enrollment projections with the capital
facility requirements and technology application and hardware capacity
needed to deliver higher education programs for the period 2009-2019.
The ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) higher education
coordinating board shall:
(a) Develop the study in collaboration with the state board for
community and technical colleges, ((the higher education coordinating
board,)) four-year universities, and the Washington independent
colleges;
(b) Determine the 10-year capital facilities and technology
application and hardware investment needed by location to deliver
higher education programs to additional student FTE;
(c) Estimate operational and capital costs of the additional
capacity; and
(d) Report findings to the legislature on October 1, 2008.
(7) $120,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2591 (higher education data). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2783 (education transfer articulation). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(9) $14,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the higher education coordinating
board to convene a work group to: (a) Assess current institutional
practices in accepting prior learning credits; and (b) make
recommendations on implementation of the work group's findings. A
report is due to the legislature by December 1, 2008.

Sec. 611 2007 c 522 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,286,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($187,252,000))
$187,952,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,122,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,188,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($471,848,000))
$472,548,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($154,837,000)) $154,760,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, (($177,863,000)) $178,707,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $49,902,000
of the education legacy trust account appropriation for fiscal year
2008, $40,050,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, and $2,886,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for student financial aid payments
under the state need grant; the state work study program; the
Washington scholars program; and the Washington award for vocational
excellence. All four programs shall increase grant awards sufficiently
to offset the full cost of the resident undergraduate tuition increases
authorized under this act.
(2) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for
the state need grant shall be expanded to include students with family
incomes at or below 70 percent of the state median family income,
adjusted for family size. Awards for students with incomes between 66
percent and 70 percent of the state median shall be 50 percent of the
award amount granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the
median.
(3) To the extent that the executive director determines that the
agency will not award the full amount appropriated in subsection (1) of
this section for a fiscal year, unexpended funds shall be transferred
to the state education trust account established under RCW 28B.92.140
for purposes first of fulfilling the unfunded scholarship commitments
that the board made under its federal GEAR UP Grant 1.
(4) $7,400,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for investment to fulfill the scholarship
commitments that the state incurs in accordance with Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5098 (the college bound scholarship). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(5) $2,500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the gaining early awareness
and readiness for undergraduate programs project to at least 25
additional school districts.
(6) $1,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to encourage more students to teach
secondary mathematics and science. $500,000 of this amount is provided
to increase the future teacher scholarship and conditional loan program
by at least 35 students per year. $500,000 of this amount is provided
to support state work study positions for students to intern in
secondary math and science classrooms.
(7) $2,336,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1131 (passport to
college). Funds are provided for student scholarships, and for
incentive payments to the colleges they attend for individualized
student support services which may include, but are not limited to,
college and career advising, counseling, tutoring, costs incurred for
students while school is not in session, personal expenses, health
insurance, and emergency services. If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for community scholarship matching grants and its
administration. To be eligible for the matching grant, nonprofit
groups organized under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code must demonstrate they have raised at least $2,000 in new
moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
section. Groups may receive no more than one $2,000 matching grant per
year and preference shall be given to groups affiliated with
scholarship America. Up to a total of $46,000 per year of the amount
appropriated in this section may be awarded to a nonprofit community
organization to administer scholarship matching grants, with preference
given to an organization affiliated with scholarship America.
(9) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($75,000)) $400,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for higher
education student child care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(10) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1179 (state need grant). State need grants
provided to students enrolled in just three to five credit-bearing
quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits, shall not exceed
the amounts appropriated in this subsection. By November 1 of each
year, the board shall report to the office of financial management and
to the operating budget committees of the house of representatives and
senate on the number of eligible but unserved students enrolled in just
three to five quarterly credits, or the semester equivalent, and the
estimated cost of serving them. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $5,000,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1779 (GET ready for math and science). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2082 (field of dreams program). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 612 2007 c 522 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,780,000))
$62,449,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,707,000))
$76,979,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,360,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($326,853,000))
$331,794,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $47,919,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $56,437,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for early childhood education and
assistance program services.
(a) Of these amounts, $10,284,000 is a portion of the biennial
amount of state matching dollars required to receive federal child care
and development fund grant dollars.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1), the
department shall increase the number of children receiving early
childhood education and assistance program services by 2,250 slots.
(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1), the
department shall increase the minimum provider per slot payment to
$6,500 in fiscal year 2008. Any provider receiving slot payments
higher than $6,500 shall receive a 2.0 percent vendor rate increase in
fiscal year 2008. All providers shall receive a 2.0 percent vendor
rate increase in fiscal year 2009.
(2) $775,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $4,225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to: (a) Develop a quality rating
and improvement system; and (b) pilot the quality rating and
improvement system in multiple locations. Four of the pilot sites are
to be located within the following counties: Spokane, Kitsap, King, and
Yakima. The department shall analyze and evaluate the pilot sites and
report initial findings to the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(3) $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to contract for
child care referral services.
(4) $1,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally
relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers. This
includes funding for the department to conduct a random sample survey
of parents to determine the types of early learning services and
materials parents are interested in receiving from the state. The
department shall report the findings to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2008.
(5) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a child care consultation
pilot program linking child care providers with evidence-based and best
practice resources regarding caring for infants and young children who
present behavior concerns.
(6) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to expand the child care career
and wage ladder program created by chapter 507, Laws of 2005.
(7) $172,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department to purchase licensing
capability from the department of social and health services through
the statewide automated child welfare information system.
(8) $1,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a childcare grant program for
public community colleges and public universities. A community college
or university that employs collectively bargained staff to operate
childcare programs may apply for up to $25,000 per year from the
department per each type of the following programs: Head start,
childcare, early childhood assistance and education. The funding shall
only be provided for salaries for collectively bargained employees.
(9) Beginning October 1, 2007, the department shall be the lead
agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund
grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care
licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs
associated with child care subsidies. The department shall transfer a
portion of this grant to the department of social and health services
to partially fund the child care subsidies paid by the department of
social and health services on behalf of the department of early
learning.
(10) Prior to the development of an early learning information
system, the department shall submit to the education and fiscal
committees of the legislature a completed feasibility study and a
proposal approved by the department of information systems and the
information services board. The department shall ensure that any
proposal for the early learning information system includes the cost
for modifying the system as a result of licensing rule changes and
implementation of the quality rating and improvement system.
(11) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3168 (Washington state head start). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $158,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3269 (intervention specialist). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(13) The department shall use child care development fund money to
satisfy the federal audit requirement of the improper payments act
(IPIA) of 2002. In accordance with the IPIA's rules, the money spent
on the audits will not count against the five percent state limit on
administrative expenditures.

Sec. 613 2007 c 522 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,958,000))
$5,969,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,186,000))
$6,246,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,600,000))
$1,615,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,744,000))
$13,830,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to defend the state's interpretive
position in the case of Delyria & Koch v. Washington State School for
the Blind.
(2) $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009 is provided solely for increasing salaries for certificated
instructional staff by an average of one percent effective July 1,
2008.

Sec. 614 2007 c 522 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,731,000))
$8,858,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,015,000))
$9,164,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($232,000))
$316,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,978,000))
$18,338,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $84,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the operation of the shared
reading video outreach program. The school for the deaf shall provide
this service to the extent it is funded by contracts with school
districts and educational service districts.
(2) $18,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for increasing salaries for certificated
instructional staff by an average of one percent effective July 1,
2008.

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 701 2007 c 522 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT
LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($724,362,000))
$805,274,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($764,561,000))
$714,324,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,970,000))
$11,970,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($168,000))
$513,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,790,000))
$1,902,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retire
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,624,000))
$2,589,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,502,646,000))
$1,536,743,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
deposit into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 702 2007 c 522 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES

State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,553,000))
$22,535,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,204,000))
$5,135,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,204,000))
$5,135,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,961,000))
$32,805,000

Sec. 703 2007 c 522 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,068,000))
$26,848,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,825,000))
$27,728,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($136,332,000))
$135,967,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($191,225,000))
$190,543,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 704 2007 c 522 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,357,000))
$750,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,357,000))
$750,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,546,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,854,000))
$3,640,000

Sec. 705 2007 c 522 s 705 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL
Disaster Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$8,500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is for the
purpose of making allocations to the Washington state patrol for ((fire
mobilizations costs or to the department of natural resources for fire
suppression costs)) any Washington state fire service resource
mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster
authorized under RCW 43.43.960 and 43.43.964.

Sec. 706 2007 c 522 s 706 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- FIRE CONTINGENCY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$6,500,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$8,500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account for the purposes
specified in section 705 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS. The following sums, or so much thereof as may
be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise
indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations
for sundry claims. These appropriations are to be disbursed on
vouchers approved by the director of financial management, except as
otherwise provided, as follows:
(1) Reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of
self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110:
(a) George E. Linkenhoker, claim number SCJ 2008-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,628
(b) Charles A. Gardner, claim number SCJ 2008-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,715
(c) Judd Hurst, claim number SCJ 2008-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000
(d) Thomas J. Nelson, claim number SCJ 2008-04 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000
(e) William R. Sauters, Jr., claim number
SCJ 2008-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,408
(f) Michael E. Greene, claim number SCJ 2008-06 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500
(g) Jeffery A. Cobb, claim number SCJ 2008-08 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,600

Sec. 708 2007 c 522 s 716 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- WATER QUALITY CAPITAL ACCOUNT
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,135,000))
$19,260,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,260,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the water quality capital account. ((If House Bill
No. 1137 (water quality capital account) is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the appropriation in this section shall lapse.))

Sec. 709 2007 c 522 s 718 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2008. The sum of one hundred twenty-five
million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on June 30,
2008, from the total amount of unspent fiscal year 2008 state general
fund appropriations, exclusive of amounts expressly placed into
unallotted status by this act, is appropriated for the purposes of RCW
43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed ((seventy-five)) one hundred million dollars, is appropriated to the education
savings account.

Sec. 710 2007 c 522 s 719 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2009. The sum of one hundred twenty-five
million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on June 30,
2009, from the total amount of unspent fiscal year 2009 state general
fund appropriations, exclusive of amounts expressly placed into
unallotted status by this act, is appropriated for the purposes of RCW
43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed ((seventy-five)) one hundred million dollars, is appropriated to the education
savings account.

Sec. 711 2007 c 522 s 722 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- COUNTY SUBSTANCE ABUSE
PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($600,000))
$800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,200,000))
$1,400,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for allocation to counties that are eligible for
funding for chemical dependency or substance abuse treatment programs
pursuant to RCW 70.96A.325.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--FEDERAL REIMBURSEMENT FOR
HEALTH INSURANCE TRANSFERS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The United States department of health and
human services has determined that a portion of funds transferred from
the public employees' and retirees' insurance account in fiscal years
2006 and 2007, made pursuant to sections 805 and 806, chapter 372, Laws
of 2006, contained federal funds that were not authorized to be
included in the transfer. The appropriation in this section is
provided solely to reimburse the United States department of health and
human services in accordance with their determination letter that the
federal funds transferred from the public employees' and retirees'
insurance account were transferred in error and must be reimbursed to
the United States Treasury.

Sec. 713 2007 c 522 s 1621 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--TECHNOLOGY FUNDING
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,277,000
Special Technology Funding Revolving Account
Appropriation (((FY 2008))) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,964,000))
$35,222,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,241,000))
$61,499,000

The appropriations in this section are provided solely for deposit
to and expenditure from the data processing revolving account and are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section, for expenditure to the data
processing revolving account, are to be known as the "information
technology funding pool" and are under the joint control of the
department of information services and the office of financial
management. The department of information services shall review
information technology proposals and work jointly with the office of
financial management to determine the projects to be funded and the
amounts and timing of release of funds. To facilitate the transfer of
moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the state treasurer is
directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or
account to the special technology funding revolving account, hereby
created in the state treasury, in accordance with schedules provided by
the office of financial management pursuant to LEAP Document ITA-2007
as developed by the legislative evaluation and program committee on
April 20, 2007, at 13:01 hours.
(2) In exercising this authority, the department of information
services and the office of financial management shall:
(a) Seek opportunities to reduce costs and achieve economies of
scale by leveraging statewide investments in systems and data and other
common or enterprise-wide solutions within and across state agencies
that include standard software, hardware, and other information
technology systems infrastructure, and common data definitions and data
stores that promote the sharing of information across agencies whenever
possible;
(b) Ensure agencies incorporate project management best practices
and consider lessons learned from other information technology
projects; and
(c) Develop criteria for the evaluation of information technology
project funding proposals to include the determination of where common
or coordinated technology or data solutions may be established, and
identification of projects that cross fiscal biennia or are dependent
on other prior, current, or future related investments.
(3) In allocating funds for the routine replacement of software and
hardware, the information services board and office of financial
management shall presume that agencies should have sufficient funding
in their base allocation to pay for such replacement and that any
allocations out of these funds are for extraordinary maintenance costs.
(((5))) (4) Funds in the 2007-09 biennium may only be expended on
the projects listed on LEAP Document IT-2007, as generated by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on April
20, 2007, at 13:01 hours or as provided in subsections (10) and (11) of
this section. Future biennia allocations from the information
technology funding pool shall be determined jointly by the department
of information services and the office of financial management.
(((6))) (5) Beginning December 1, 2008, and every biennium
thereafter, the department of information services shall submit a
statewide information technology plan to the office of financial
management and the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee that supports a consolidated funding request. In alternate
years, a plan addendum shall be submitted that reflects any modified
funding pool request requiring action in the ensuing supplemental
budget session.
(((7))) (6) The department of information services shall report to
the office of financial management and the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee by October 1, 2007, and annually
thereafter, the status of planned allocations from funds appropriated
in this section.
(((8))) (7) State agencies shall report project performance in
consistent and comparable terms using common methodologies to calculate
project performance by measuring work accomplished (scope and schedule)
against work planned and project cost against planned budget. The
department of information services shall provide implementation
guidelines and oversight of project performance reporting.
(((9))) (8) The information services board shall require all
agencies receiving funds appropriated in this section to account for
project expenses included in an information technology portfolio report
submitted annually to the department of information services, the
office of financial management, and the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee by October 1st of each year. The
department of information services, with the advice and approval of the
office of financial management, shall establish criteria for complete
and consistent reporting of expenditures from these funds and project
staffing levels.
(((10))) (9) In consultation with the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee, the department of information
services shall develop criteria for evaluating requests for these funds
and shall report annually to the office of financial management and the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee by November
1st the status of distributions and expenditures from this pool.
(10) Up to $6,218,000 of the funds provided in this section may be
expended for the development of systems necessary for the
implementation of activities generally described in Substitute House
Bill No. 3305 (family leave insurance) and chapter 357, Laws of 2007.
Funds may not be spent for the development of these systems without the
prior approval of the information services board.
(11) Up to $2,430,000 of the funds provided in this section may be
expended to connect eastern state hospital to the integrated hospital
information system. Funds may not be spent for this purpose without
the prior approval of the information services board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
ADMINISTRATIVE ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,979,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,979,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,816,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,914,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the
health care authority administrative account.
(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and
accounts, the office of financial management shall transfer or direct
the transfer of sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account,
including local funds of state agencies and institutions of higher
education, to the health care authority administrative account in
accordance with LEAP document number H04-2008, dated February 21, 2008.
Agencies and institutions of higher education with local funds will
deposit sufficient money to the health care authority administrative
account.

Sec. 715 2007 c 522 s 728 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--COMMUNITY PRESERVATION AND
DEVELOPMENT ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the community preservation and development authority
account. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 6156 (community preservation
authorities) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the appropriation in this
section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--INDIVIDUAL DEVELOPMENT ACCOUNT
PROGRAM ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the individual development account program account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--SKELETAL HUMAN REMAINS
ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the skeletal human remains assistance account for
purposes of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2624 (human remains). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718 2007 c 522 s 713 (uncodified) is repealed.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 801 2007 c 522 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,325,000))
$7,654,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,656,000))
$47,557,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,999,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety
and education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,833,000))
$4,400,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,000))
$48,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly
funded autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,192,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation
for harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation
for distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($89,346,000))
$77,753,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,906,000))
$62,127,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,359,000))
$24,636,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for
liquor excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,472,000))
$49,397,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($93,399,000))
$82,148,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for local
government financial assistance distribution;
PROVIDED: That the legislature, in making this
appropriation for distribution under the formula
prescribed in RCW 43.08.290 for the 2007-09
biennium, ratifies and approves the prior
distributions, as certified by the department
of revenue to the state treasurer, made for the
2005-07 biennium from the appropriation in
section 801, chapter 372, Laws of 2006 as amended
by section 1701, chapter 522, Laws of 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,272,000))
$29,865,000
Streamline Sales and Use Tax Account Appropriation
for distribution to local taxing jurisdictions
to mitigate the unintended revenue redistribution
effect of the sourcing law changes . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,600,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation
for distribution. This amount is provided solely
for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 3309. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, this amount shall lapse . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,025,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($441,549,000))
$426,483,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 802 2007 c 522 s 805 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS.
State Treasurer's Service Account: For
transfer to the state general fund,
$10,000,000 for fiscal year 2008 and
(($10,000,000)) $21,000,000 for fiscal year
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,000,000))
$31,000,000
Education Legacy Trust Account: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account: For
transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operations Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the water
quality account, $12,200,000 for fiscal
year 2008 and $12,201,000 for fiscal
year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,401,000
Education Legacy Trust Account: For transfer
to the student achievement account for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,800,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance repayment
account, an amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance account,
(($3,600,000)) $7,200,000 for fiscal year 2008 and
$3,600,000 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,200,000))
$10,800,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer
to the job development account, $25,000,000
for fiscal year 2008 and $25,000,000 for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer
to the health services account, in an
amount not to exceed the actual amount
of the annual base payment to the tobacco
settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($165,915,000))
$168,111,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the
life sciences discovery fund, in an amount
not to exceed the actual amount of the
strategic contribution supplemental payment
to the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the water
quality account, $3,942,500 for fiscal year 2008
and $3,942,500 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,885,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account, $3,466,000
for fiscal year 2008 and $3,466,000 for fiscal year
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,932,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the tobacco
prevention and control account, (($10,226,552))
$10,523,000 for fiscal year 2008 and (($10,109,109))
$10,168,000 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,336,000))
$20,691,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamline
sales and use tax account for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,600,000

((If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5089 (streamlined sales tax) is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, this transfer shall lapse.))
General Fund: For transfer to the health services
account for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,500,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to the
disaster response account for fiscal year 2008 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE--STATE REVENUE FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fiscal year 2008 . . . . . . . . . . . . $422,012

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Revenues for the general fund are reduced
to correct for a prior period distribution shortage of $422,012. This
represents one time distributions to Jefferson County in the amount of
$352,196, and Klickitat County in the amount of $89,816, to be used in
accordance with RCW 82.14.370.

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 901 2007 c 522 s 910 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
COMPENSATION--NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS.
Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for
nonrepresented state employee health benefits for state agencies,
including institutions of higher education are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $707 per eligible employee for
fiscal year 2008. For fiscal year 2009 the monthly employer funding
rate shall not exceed (($732)) $561 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065, but in no case to increase the actuarial value of the plans
offered as compared to the comparable plans offered to enrollees in
calendar year 2007.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2008, through December 31, 2008, the
subsidy shall be $164.08. Starting January 1, 2009, the subsidy shall
be $182.89 per month.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $57.71 per month beginning
September 1, 2007, and (($65.97)) $60.40 beginning September 1, 2008;
(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $57.71 each month beginning September 1, 2007, and
(($65.97)) $60.40 beginning September 1, 2008, prorated by the
proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time
employee that the part-time employee receives. The remittance
requirements specified in this subsection shall not apply to employees
of a technical college, school district, or educational service
district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the
health care authority.

Sec. 902 2007 c 522 s 911 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE BENEFITS. The appropriations for state agencies, including
institutions of higher education are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, for represented employees outside the super
coalition under chapter 41.80 RCW, shall not exceed $707 per eligible
employee for fiscal year 2008. For fiscal year 2009 the monthly
employer funding rate shall not exceed (($732)) $561 per eligible
employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065, but in no case to increase the actuarial value of the plans
offered as compared to the comparable plans offered to enrollees in
calendar year 2007.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2008, through December 31, 2008, the
subsidy shall be $164.08. Starting January 1, 2009, the subsidy shall
be $182.89 per month.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $57.71 per month beginning
September 1, 2007, and (($65.97)) $60.40 beginning September 1, 2008;
(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $57.71 each month beginning September 1, 2007, and
(($65.97)) $60.40 beginning September 1, 2008, prorated by the
proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time
employee that the part-time employee receives. The remittance
requirements specified in this subsection shall not apply to employees
of a technical college, school district, or educational service
district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the
health care authority.

Sec. 903 2007 c 522 s 912 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION. Collective
bargaining agreements negotiated as part of the super coalition under
chapter 41.80 RCW include employer contributions to health insurance
premiums at 88% of the cost. Funding rates at this level are currently
$707 per month for fiscal year 2008 and (($732)) $561 per month for
fiscal year 2009. The agreements also include a one-time payment of
$756 for each employee who is eligible for insurance for the month of
June 2007 and is covered by a 2007-2009 collective bargaining agreement
negotiated pursuant to chapter 41.80 RCW, and the continuation of the
salary increases that were negotiated for the twelve-month period
beginning July 1, 2006, and scheduled to terminate June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
COMPENSATION--STATE EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS

General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($113,889,000)
Health Services Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($467,000)
Public Safety and Education Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($868,000)
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($26,000)
Water Quality Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($274,000)
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($16,948,000)
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($1,834,000)
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($23,112,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($157,418,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
the insurance premium rate reductions to state agencies, including
institutions of higher education, in sections 901, 902, and 903 of this
act, in accordance with LEAP document number H01 - 2008.

Sec. 905 2007 c 522 s 913 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
ACROSS THE BOARD SALARY ADJUSTMENTS. Appropriations for state
agency nonrepresented employee compensation adjustments in this act are
sufficient for across the board adjustments.
(1) Appropriations are for a 3.2 percent salary increase effective
September 1, 2007, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80,
41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except the certificated employees of the
state schools for the deaf and blind and employees of community and
technical colleges covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No.
732. Also included are employees in the Washington management service,
and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the director of
personnel.
The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 3.2 percent salary
increase effective September 1, 2007, for executive, legislative, and
judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum
salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected
officials.
(2) Appropriations are for a 2.0 percent salary increase effective
September 1, 2008, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80,
41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except for the certificated employees of the
state schools of the deaf and blind and employees of community and
technical colleges covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No.
732. Also included are employees in the Washington management service,
and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the director of
personnel. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 2.0
percent salary increase effective September 1, 2008, for executive,
legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system
rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries
for elected officials.
(3) No salary increase may be paid under this section to any person
whose salary has been Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the director
of personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
SUPPLEMENTAL COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--TEAMSTERS.
Appropriations in this act reflect the supplemental collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the brotherhood
of teamsters under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. Select
classifications will receive wage increases effective July 1, 2008, to
address recruitment and retention issues. Select employees covered
under this supplemental agreement will receive targeted increases to
the base salary and/or increases relating to assignment in a specific
geographic work location. These provisions are in addition to the
general terms of the collective bargaining agreement effective July 1,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY, PSE. Funding is provided for a collective
bargaining agreement that may be reached between Central Washington
University and the public school employees of Washington. Funding
provided is sufficient for the 2.0% salary increase to be effective
July 1, 2008, rather than September 1, 2008.

Sec. 908 RCW 28B.105.110 and 2007 c 214 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The GET ready for math and science scholarship account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) The board shall deposit into the account all money received for
the GET ready for math and science scholarship program from
appropriations and private sources. The account shall be
self-sustaining.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for scholarships to
eligible students and for purchases of GET units. Purchased GET units
shall be owned and held in trust by the board. Expenditures from the
account shall be an equal match of state appropriations and private
funds raised by the program administrator. During the 2007-09 fiscal
biennium, expenditures from the account not to exceed five percent may
be used by the program administrator to carry out the provisions of RCW
28B.105.090.
(4) With the exception of the operating costs associated with the
management of the account by the treasurer's office as authorized in
chapter 43.79A RCW, the account shall be credited with all investment
income earned by the account.
(5) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations
and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.
(6) Disbursements from the account shall be made only on the
authorization of the board.

Sec. 909 RCW 38.52.106 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 913 are each
amended to read as follows:
The Nisqually earthquake account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys may be placed in the account from tax revenues, budget transfers
or appropriations, federal appropriations, gifts, or any other lawful
source. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Moneys in the account shall be used only to support state and local
government disaster response and recovery efforts associated with the
Nisqually earthquake. During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer moneys from the Nisqually earthquake account
to the disaster response account for fire suppression and mobilization
costs. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may
also be used to support disaster response and recovery efforts
associated with flood and storm damage.

Sec. 910 RCW 41.45.230 and 2006 c 56 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The pension funding stabilization account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for payment of state
government employer contributions for members of the public employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school
employees' retirement system, and the public safety employees'
retirement system. During the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, expenditures
from the account may also be used for payment of the retirement and
annuity plans for higher education employees and for transfer into the
general fund. The account may not be used to pay for any new benefit
or for any benefit increase that takes effect after July 1, 2005. An
increase that is provided in accordance with a formula that is in
existence on July 1, 2005, is not considered a benefit increase for
this purpose. Moneys in the account shall be for the exclusive use of
the specified retirement systems and invested by the state investment
board pursuant to RCW 43.33A.030 and 43.33A.170. For purposes of RCW
43.135.035, expenditures from the pension funding stabilization account
shall not be considered a state program cost shift from the state
general fund to another account.

Sec. 911 RCW 43.08.190 and 2005 c 518 s 925 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury to be
known as the "state treasurer's service fund." Such fund shall be used
solely for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation
and administration of the state treasurer's office.
Moneys shall be allocated monthly and placed in the state
treasurer's service fund equivalent to a maximum of one percent of the
trust and treasury average daily cash balances from the earnings
generated under the authority of RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.080 other
than earnings generated from investment of balances in funds and
accounts specified in RCW 43.79A.040 or 43.84.092(4)(((b))). The
allocation shall precede the distribution of the remaining earnings as
prescribed under RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.092. The state treasurer
shall establish a uniform allocation rate based on the appropriations
for the treasurer's office.
During the ((2005-2007)) 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the state treasurer's service fund to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
fund.

Sec. 912 RCW 43.330.250 and 2005 c 427 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The economic development strategic reserve account is created
in the state treasury to be used only for the purposes of this section.
(2) Only the governor, with the recommendation of the director of
the department of community, trade, and economic development and the
economic development commission, may authorize expenditures from the
account.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be made in an amount
sufficient to fund a minimum of one staff position for the economic
development commission and to cover any other operational costs of the
commission.
(4) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may
also be transferred into the state general fund.
(5) Expenditures from the account may be made to prevent closure of
a business or facility, to prevent relocation of a business or facility
in the state to a location outside the state, or to recruit a business
or facility to the state. Expenditures may be authorized for:
(a) Workforce development;
(b) Public infrastructure needed to support or sustain the
operations of the business or facility; and
(c) Other lawfully provided assistance, including, but not limited
to, technical assistance, environmental analysis, relocation
assistance, and planning assistance. Funding may be provided for such
assistance only when it is in the public interest and may only be
provided under a contractual arrangement ensuring that the state will
receive appropriate consideration, such as an assurance of job creation
or retention.
(((5))) (6) The funds shall not be expended from the account
unless:
(a) The circumstances are such that time does not permit the
director of the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the business or facility to secure funding from other
state sources;
(b) The business or facility produces or will produce significant
long-term economic benefits to the state, a region of the state, or a
particular community in the state;
(c) The business or facility does not require continuing state
support;
(d) The expenditure will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state;
(e) The expenditure will not supplant private investment; and
(f) The expenditure is accompanied by private investment.
(((6))) (7) No more than three million dollars per year may be
expended from the account for the purpose of assisting an individual
business or facility pursuant to the authority specified in this
section.
(((7))) (8) If the account balance in the strategic reserve account
exceeds fifteen million dollars at any time, the amount in excess of
fifteen million dollars shall be transferred to the education
construction account.

Sec. 913 RCW 67.40.025 and 1988 ex.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
All operating revenues received by the corporation formed under RCW
67.40.020 shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center
operations account, hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in
the account, including unanticipated revenues under RCW 43.79.270, may
be spent only after appropriation by statute, and may be used only for
operation and promotion of the center. During the 2007-2009 fiscal
biennium, moneys in the account may also be transferred to the state
general fund.
Subject to approval by the office of financial management under RCW
43.88.260, the corporation may expend moneys for operational purposes
in excess of the balance in the account, to the extent the corporation
receives or will receive additional operating revenues.
As used in this section, "operating revenues" does not include any
moneys required to be deposited in the state convention and trade
center account.

Sec. 914 RCW 70.96B.800 and 2005 c 504 s 217 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington state institute for public policy shall evaluate
the pilot programs and make a preliminary report to appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007, and a final report
by ((September 30, 2008)) June 30, 2009.
(2) The evaluation of the pilot programs shall include:
(a) Whether the designated crisis responder pilot program:
(i) Has increased efficiency of evaluation and treatment of persons
involuntarily detained for seventy-two hours;
(ii) Is cost-effective;
(iii) Results in better outcomes for persons involuntarily
detained;
(iv) Increased the effectiveness of the crisis response system in
the pilot catchment areas;
(b) The effectiveness of providing a single chapter in the Revised
Code of Washington to address initial detention of persons with mental
disorders or chemical dependency, in crisis response situations and the
likelihood of effectiveness of providing a single, comprehensive
involuntary treatment act.
(3) The reports shall consider the impact of the pilot programs on
the existing mental health system and on the persons served by the
system.

Sec. 915 RCW 77.32.010 and 2006 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a recreational
license issued by the director is required to hunt for or take wild
animals or wild birds, fish for, take, or harvest fish, shellfish, and
seaweed. A recreational fishing or shellfish license is not required
for carp, smelt, and crawfish, and a hunting license is not required
for bullfrogs.
(2) A permit issued by the department is required to park a motor
vehicle upon improved department access facilities.
(3) During the 2007-09 fiscal biennium to enable the implementation
of the pilot project established in section 307 of this act, a fishing
permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville Tribes shall
satisfy the license requirements in subsection (1) of this section on
the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus
Woods, and a Colville Tribes tribal member identification card shall
satisfy the license requirements in subsection (1) of this section on
all waters of Lake Rufus Woods.

Sec. 916 RCW 83.100.230 and 2005 c 514 s 1101 are each amended to
read as follows:
The education legacy trust account is created in the state
treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for deposit into the
student achievement fund and for expanding access to higher education
through funding for new enrollments and financial aid, and other
educational improvement efforts. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium,
moneys in the account may also be transferred into the state general
fund.

Sec. 917 RCW 90.48.390 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 84 are each amended
to read as follows:
The coastal protection fund is established to be used by the
department as a revolving fund for carrying out the purposes of
restoration of natural resources under this chapter and chapter 90.56
RCW. To this fund there shall be credited penalties, fees, damages,
charges received pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and chapter
90.56 RCW, compensation for damages received under this chapter and
chapter 90.56 RCW, and an amount equivalent to one cent per gallon from
each marine use refund claim under RCW 82.36.330.
Moneys in the fund not needed currently to meet the obligations of
the department in the exercise of its powers, duties, and functions
under RCW 90.48.142, 90.48.366, 90.48.367, and 90.48.368 shall be
deposited with the state treasurer to the credit of the fund. During
the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the coastal protection fund may also be
used for a standby rescue tug at Neah Bay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 918 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 919 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

ACROSS THE BOARD SALARY ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 322
ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 122
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 284
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY, PSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 324
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
COMPENSATION
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 319
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE--SUPER COALITION INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 320
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 321
STATE EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 322
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 183
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 62
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING . . . . . . . . . . . . 299
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 167
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 132
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 55
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 126
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 187
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
STATE REVENUE FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 318
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 149
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 116
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 92
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 66
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 85
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 98
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 71
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 105
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 75
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 118
SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 115
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 115
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 131
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 282
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 165
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 307
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 296
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 122
INCENTIVE SAVINGS
FY 2008 . . . . . . . . . . . . 308
FY 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . 308
INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 131
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 56
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
COMMUNITY PRESERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 313
COUNTY SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 308
FEDERAL REIMBURSEMENT FOR HEALTH INSURANCE TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 309
FIRE CONTINGENCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 306
FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 306
HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY ADMINISTRATIVE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 312
INDIVIDUAL DEVELOPMENT ACCOUNT PROGRAM ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 313
SKELETAL HUMAN REMAINS ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 314
TECHNOLOGY FUNDING . . . . . . . . . . . . 309
WATER QUALITY CAPITAL ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 307
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 62
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 185
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 165
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 264
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 118
STATE INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 162
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 188
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 302
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 302
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 304, 305
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 315
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 316
STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 191, 258
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 215
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 232
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 229
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 206
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 230
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 252
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 230
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 231
PROMOTING ACADEMIC SUCCESS . . . . . . . . . . . . 254
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 222
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 219
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 223
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 256
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 251
SUPPLEMENTAL COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT
TEAMSTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 323
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 287
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 270
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 58
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 185
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 277
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 291
--- END ---