BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall require carriers to report such data as
the commissioner may determine are necessary for the evaluation of:
(a) The impact of the sale of association health plans on the
overall health care marketplace of this state; and
(b) The impact of association health plans that use claims data or
health factors in setting rates for small groups that are included in
an association plan.
(2) The data may include, but need not be limited to, the
following:
(a) The number of persons residing in Washington who receive health
benefit coverage through each association health plan underwritten or
administered by the carrier, and whether the association plan uses
claims data or health factors in setting rates for small groups
included in the plan;
(b) Demographic information regarding the persons covered in
association health plans and in small group plans;
(c) The average claims experience of persons covered by the
carrier's association health plans and by its small group plans;
(d) Eligibility requirements, underwriting criteria, and coverage
standards, including but not limited to association membership
requirements, health questions (if any) asked or used for the purpose
of considering eligibility or cost of coverage, and a description of
any other standard for eligibility or qualification for enrollment or
coverage;
(e) The methodology used by the carrier to determine the cost of
coverage for each association health plan; and
(f) Such other data as the commissioner may reasonably require.
(3) The commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section, including but not limited to the format and timing of data
reporting, and defining the years for which data must be provided.
(4)(a) Data, information, and documents provided by the carrier
pursuant to this section are exempt from public inspection and copying
under chapters 42.17 and 42.56 RCW to the extent that they contain
actuarial formula, statistics, and assumptions submitted in support of
setting rates for the association plans.
(b) The commissioner is authorized to use documents, materials, or
other information obtained pursuant to this section in the furtherance
of any regulatory activities, reports to the legislature, or legal
actions brought as a part of the commissioner's official duties.
(5) The commissioner shall submit a report based upon the
information obtained pursuant to this section to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives by January 1,
2009.

--- END ---