BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a lack of
information about mental health problems amongst the general public
leads to stigmatizing attitudes and prevents people from seeking help
early and seeking the best sort of help. It also prevents people from
providing support to family members, friends, and colleagues because
they might not know what to do. This lack of knowledge about mental
health problems limits the initial accessibility of evidence-based
treatments and leads to a lack of support for people with a mental
disorder from family, friends, and other members of the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall make available a one-time mental health train
the trainer first aid course that trains members of the public in how
to give initial help in mental health crisis situations and to support
people developing mental health problems. The mental health first aid
course will provide information about depression, anxiety disorders,
psychosis, and substance use disorder. Following completion of the
mental health first aid course, participants will know how to train
others to recognize the symptoms of these mental disorders; the
possible causes or risk factors for these disorders; the evidence-based
medical, psychological, and alternative treatments available; how to
give appropriate initial help and support to a person suffering one of
these disorders; and how to take appropriate action if a crisis
situation arises involving suicidal behavior, panic attack, stress
reaction to trauma, or threatening psychotic behavior. The mental
health first aid course shall include twelve hours of instruction and
shall be based on the program created by the department of psychiatry,
University of Melbourne in Australia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---