BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Beneficial interest" means ownership, through equity, debt, or
other means, of any financial interest. "Beneficial interest" does not
include ownership, through equity, debt, or other means, of securities,
including shares or bonds, debentures, or other debt instruments:
(a) In a corporation that is traded on a national exchange or over
the counter on the national market system;
(b) That at the time of acquisition, were purchased at the same
price and on the same terms generally available to the public;
(c) That are available to individuals who are not in a position to
refer patients to the health care entity on the same terms that are
offered to health care practitioners who may refer patients to the
health care entity;
(d) That are unrelated to the past or expected volume of referrals
from the health care practitioner to the health care entity; and
(e) That are not marketed differently to health care practitioners
that may make referrals than they are marketed to other individuals.
(2) "Compensation arrangement" means any agreement or system
involving any remuneration between a health care practitioner or the
immediate family member of the health care practitioner and a health
care entity. "Compensation arrangement" does not include:
(a) Compensation or shares under a faculty practice plan or a
professional corporation affiliated with a teaching hospital and
comprised of health care practitioners who are members of the faculty
of a university;
(b) Amounts paid under a good faith employment agreement between a
health care entity and a health care practitioner or an immediate
family member of the health care practitioner;
(c) An arrangement between a health care entity and a health care
practitioner or the immediate family member of a health care
practitioner for the provision of any services, as an independent
contractor, if:
(i) The arrangement is for identifiable services;
(ii) The amount of the remuneration under the arrangement is
consistent with the fair market value of the service and is not
determined in a manner that takes into account, directly or indirectly,
the volume or value of any referrals by the referring health care
practitioner; and
(iii) The compensation is provided in accordance with an agreement
that would be commercially reasonable even if no referrals were made to
the health care provider;
(d) Compensation for health care services pursuant to a referral
from a health care practitioner and rendered by a health care entity,
that employs or contracts with an immediate family member of the health
care practitioner, in which the immediate family member's compensation
is not based on the referral;
(e) An arrangement for compensation that is provided by a health
care entity to a health care practitioner or the immediate family
member of the health care practitioner to induce the health care
practitioner or the immediate family member of the health care
practitioner to relocate to the geographic area served by the health
care entity in order to be a member of the medical staff of a hospital,
if:
(i) The health care practitioner or the immediate family member of
the health care practitioner is not required to refer patients to the
health care entity;
(ii) The amount of the compensation under the arrangement is not
determined in a manner that takes into account, directly or indirectly,
the volume or value of any referrals by the referring health care
practitioner; and
(iii) The health care entity needs the services of the practitioner
to meet community health care needs and has had difficulty in
recruiting a practitioner;
(f) Payments made for the rental or lease of office space if the
payments are:
(i) At fair market value; and
(ii) In accordance with an arm's length transaction;
(g) Payments made for the rental or lease of equipment if the
payments are:
(i) At fair market value; and
(ii) In accordance with an arm's length transaction; or
(h) Payments made for the sale of property or a health care
practice if the payments are:
(i) At fair market value;
(ii) In accordance with an arm's length transaction; and
(iii) The remuneration is provided in accordance with an agreement
that would be commercially reasonable even if no referrals were made.
(3) "Direct supervision" means a health care practitioner is
present on the premises where the health care services or tests are
provided and is available for consultation within the treatment area.
(4) "Disciplining authority" means an agency, board, or commission
identified in RCW 18.130.040.
(5) "Faculty practice plan" means a tax exempt organization
established under Washington law by or at the direction of a university
to accommodate the professional practice of members of the faculty who
are health care practitioners.
(6) "Group practice" means a group of two or more health care
practitioners legally organized as a partnership, professional
corporation, foundation, nonprofit corporation, faculty practice plan,
or similar association:
(a) In which each health care practitioner who is a member of the
group provides substantially the full range of services that the
practitioner routinely provides through the joint use of shared office
space, facilities, equipment, and personnel;
(b) For which substantially all of the services of the health care
practitioners who are members of the group are provided through the
group and are billed in the name of the group and amounts so received
are treated as receipts of the group; and
(c) In which the overhead expenses of and the income from the
practice are distributed in accordance with methods previously
determined on an annual basis by members of the group.
(7) "Health care entity" means a business entity that provides
health care services for the:
(a) Testing, diagnosis, or treatment of human disease or
dysfunction; or
(b) Dispensing of drugs, medical devices, medical appliances, or
medical goods for the treatment of human disease or dysfunction.
(8) "Health care practitioner" means a person who holds a
credential issued by a disciplining authority identified in RCW
18.130.040 and provides health care services in the ordinary course of
business or practice of a profession.
(9) "Health care service" means medical procedures, tests, and
services provided to a patient by or through a health care entity.
(10) "Hospital" means a hospital as defined in RCW 70.41.020.
(11) "Immediate family member" means a health care practitioner's:
(a) Spouse;
(b) Child;
(c) Child's spouse;
(d) Parent;
(e) Spouse's parent;
(f) Sibling; or
(g) Sibling's spouse.
(12) "In-office ancillary services" means those basic health care
services and tests routinely performed in the office of one or more
health care practitioners. Except for a radiologist group practice or
an office consisting solely of one or more radiologists, "in-office
ancillary services" does not include:
(a) Magnetic resonance imaging services;
(b) Radiation therapy services; or
(c) Computer tomography scan services.
(13) "Provider-sponsored organization" means an entity that:
(a) Is a legal aggregate of providers operating collectively for
the purpose of providing health care services to medicare beneficiaries
under the federal medicare advantage program;
(b) Acts through a licensed entity, such as a partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership,
or sole proprietorship, that has authority over the entity's
activities; and
(c) Provides a substantial proportion of the health care services
required to be provided under the federal medicare advantage program
directly through providers or affiliated groups of providers.
(14) "Refer" means the act of issuing a referral.
(15) "Referral" means any act of directing a patient for health
care services. "Referral" includes:
(a) The forwarding of a patient by one health care practitioner to
another health care practitioner or to a health care entity outside the
health care practitioner's office or group practice; or
(b) The request or establishment by a health care practitioner of
a plan of care for the provision of health care services outside the
health care practitioner's office or group practice.
(16) "Related institution" means an adult family home as defined in
RCW 70.128.010, a boarding home as defined in RCW 18.20.020, or a
nursing home as defined in RCW 18.51.010.
(17) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of
this section, a health care practitioner may not refer a patient, or
direct an employee of or person under contract with the health care
practitioner to refer a patient, to a health care entity:
(a) In which the health care practitioner or the practitioner in
combination with one or more of the practitioner's immediate family
members owns a beneficial interest;
(b) In which one or more of the practitioner's immediate family
members owns a beneficial interest of three percent or greater; or
(c) With which the health care practitioner, one or more of the
practitioner's immediate family members, or the practitioner in
combination with one or more of the practitioner's immediate family
members has a compensation arrangement.
(2) A health care entity or a referring health care practitioner
may not present or cause to be presented to any individual, third-party
payor, or other person a claim, bill, or other demand for payment for
health care services provided as a result of a referral prohibited by
this chapter.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section applies to any arrangement or
scheme, including a cross-referral arrangement, that the health care
practitioner knows or should know has a principal purpose of assuring
indirect referrals that would be in violation of subsection (1) of this
section if made directly.
(4) The provisions of this section do not apply to:
(a) A health care practitioner when treating a member of a health
maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020 if the health care
practitioner does not have a beneficial interest in the health care
entity;
(b) A health care practitioner who refers a patient to another
health care practitioner in the same group practice as the referring
health care practitioner;
(c) A health care practitioner with a beneficial interest in a
health care entity who refers a patient to that health care entity for
health care services or tests, if the services or tests are personally
performed by or under the direct supervision of the referring health
care practitioner;
(d) A health care practitioner who refers in-office ancillary
services or tests that are:
(i) Personally furnished by:
(A) The referring health care practitioner;
(B) A health care practitioner in the same group practice as the
referring health care practitioner; or
(C) An individual who is employed and personally supervised by the
qualified referring health care practitioner or a health care
practitioner in the same group practice as the referring health care
practitioner;
(ii) Provided in the same building where the referring health care
practitioner or a health care practitioner in the same group practice
as the referring health care practitioner furnishes services; and
(iii) Billed by:
(A) The health care practitioner performing or supervising the
services; or
(B) A group practice of which the health care practitioner
performing or supervising the services is a member;
(e) A health care practitioner who has a beneficial interest in a
health care entity if, in accordance with rules adopted by the
secretary:
(i) The disciplining authority determines that the health care
practitioner's beneficial interest is essential to finance the health
care entity and provide health care services; and
(ii) The disciplining authority determines that the health care
entity is needed to ensure appropriate access for the community to the
services provided at the health care entity;
(f) A health care practitioner employed or affiliated with a
hospital, who refers a patient to a health care entity that is owned or
controlled by a hospital or under common ownership or control with a
hospital if the health care practitioner does not have a direct
beneficial interest in the health care entity;
(g) A health care practitioner or member of a single specialty
group practice, including any person employed or affiliated with a
hospital, who has a beneficial interest in a health care entity that is
owned or controlled by a hospital or under common ownership or control
with a hospital if:
(i) The health care practitioner or other member of that single
specialty group practice provides the health care services to a patient
pursuant to a referral or in accordance with a consultation requested
by another health care practitioner who does not have a beneficial
interest in the health care entity; or
(ii) The health care practitioner or other member of that single
specialty group practice referring a patient to the facility, service,
or entity personally performs or supervises the health care service or
procedure;
(h) A health care practitioner with a beneficial interest in, or
compensation arrangement with, a hospital or related institution or a
facility, service, or other entity that is owned or controlled by a
hospital or related institution or under common ownership or control
with a hospital or related institution if:
(i) The beneficial interest was held or the compensation
arrangement was in existence on January 1, 2008; and
(ii) Thereafter the beneficial interest or compensation arrangement
of the health care practitioner does not increase;
(i) A health care practitioner who refers a patient to a dialysis
facility, if the patient has been diagnosed with end stage renal
disease as defined in the medicare regulations pursuant to the federal
social security act;
(j) A health care practitioner who refers a patient to a hospital
in which the health care practitioner has a beneficial interest if:
(i) The health care practitioner is authorized to perform services
at the hospital; and
(ii) The ownership or investment interest is in the hospital itself
and not solely in a subdivision of the hospital; or
(k) A health care practitioner when treating an enrollee of a
provider-sponsored organization if the health care practitioner is
referring enrollees to an affiliated health care provider of the
provider-sponsored organization.
(5) A health care practitioner exempted from the provisions of this
section in accordance with subsection (4) of this section is subject to
the disclosure provisions of section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of
this section, a health care practitioner making a lawful referral shall
disclose the existence of the beneficial interest in accordance with
the provisions of this section.
(2) Prior to referring a patient to a health care entity in which
the practitioner, the practitioner's immediate family, or the
practitioner in combination with the practitioner's immediate family
owns a beneficial interest, the health care practitioner shall:
(a) Except if an oral referral is made by telephone, provide the
patient with a written statement that:
(i) Discloses the existence of the ownership of the beneficial
interest or compensation arrangement;
(ii) States that the patient may choose to obtain the health care
service from another health care entity; and
(iii) Requires the patient to acknowledge in writing receipt of the
statement;
(b) Except if an oral referral is made by telephone, insert in the
medical record of the patient a copy of the written acknowledgment;
(c) Place on permanent display a written notice that is in a
typeface that is large enough to be easily legible to the average
person from a distance of eight feet and that is in a location that is
plainly visible to the patients of the health care practitioner
disclosing all of the health care entities:
(i) In which the practitioner, the practitioner's immediate family,
or the practitioner in combination with the practitioner's immediate
family owns a beneficial interest; and
(ii) To which the practitioner refers patients; and
(d) Documents in the medical record of the patient that:
(i) A valid medical need exists for the referral; and
(ii) The practitioner has disclosed the existence of the beneficial
interest to the patient.
(3) The provisions of this section do not apply to:
(a) A health care practitioner when treating a member of a health
maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020 and the health
care practitioner does not have a beneficial interest in the health
care entity; or
(b) A health care practitioner who refers a patient:
(i) To another health care practitioner in the same group practice
as the referring health care practitioner;
(ii) For in-office ancillary services; or
(iii) For health care services provided through or by a health care
entity owned or controlled by a hospital.
(4) A health care practitioner who fails to comply with any
provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A health care practitioner shall
disclose the name of a referring health care practitioner on each
request for payment or bill submitted to a third-party payor, including
nonprofit health plans and fiscal intermediaries and carriers, that may
be responsible for payment, in whole or in part, of the charges for a
health care service, if the health care practitioner knows or has
reason to believe:
(a) There has been a referral by a health care practitioner; and
(b) The referring health care practitioner has a beneficial
interest in or compensation arrangement with the health care entity
that is prohibited under section 2 of this act.
(2) A health care practitioner who knows or should have known of
the practitioner's failure to comply with the provisions of this
section is subject to disciplinary action by the appropriate
disciplining authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) If a referring health care practitioner,
a health care entity, or other person furnishing health care services
collects any amount of money that was billed in violation of section
2(2) of this act and the referring health care practitioner, health
care entity, or other person knew or should have known of the
violation, the referring health care practitioner, health care entity,
or other person is jointly and severally liable to the payor for any
amounts collected.
(2) If a claim, bill, or other demand or request for payment for
health care services is denied under RCW 74.09.240 or section 7 or 8 of
this act the referring health care practitioner, health care entity, or
other person furnishing the health care services may not submit a
claim, bill, or other demand or request for payment to the person who
received the health care services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The failure of a health care practitioner to
comply with the provisions of this chapter is considered unprofessional
conduct and is subject to disciplinary action under chapter 18.130 RCW
by the appropriate disciplining authority under that chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "disciplining authority,"
"health care practitioner," "health care entity," and "health care
service" have the same meanings as provided in section 1 of this act.
(2) A health carrier may seek repayment from a health care
practitioner of any moneys paid for any claim, bill, or other demand or
request for payment for the health care services that were determined
by the appropriate disciplining authority to be furnished as a result
of a referral prohibited by section 2 of this act.
(3) Every contract between a health carrier and its enrollees or a
group of enrollees for the provision of health care services shall
include a provision excluding payment of any claim, bill, or other
demand or request for payment for health care services determined to be
furnished as a result of a referral prohibited by section 2 of this
act.
(4) A health carrier subject to the provisions of this section
shall report to the appropriate disciplining authority any pattern of
claims, bills, or other demands or requests for payment submitted for
a health care service provided as a result of a referral prohibited by
section 2 of this act within thirty days after that health carrier has
knowledge of that pattern.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a health
carrier reimbursing for health care services is not required to audit
or investigate any claim, bill, or other demand or request for payment
for the purpose of determining whether those services were the result
of a prohibited referral.
(b) Any audit or investigation of any claim, bill, or other demand
or request for payment for the purpose of determining whether those
services were the result of the prohibited referral are not grounds to
delay payment or waive any requirements for the prompt payment of
claims.
(6) For any claim, bill, or request for payment that is paid and is
subsequently determined to be the result of a prohibited referral, a
health carrier may seek a refund of that payment in accordance with the
provisions of section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Each health plan that provides medical insurance offered under this
chapter, including plans created by insuring entities, plans not
subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW, and plans created under RCW
41.05.140, is subject to the provisions of section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
Each health plan that provides medical insurance offered under this
chapter, including plans created by insuring entities, plans not
subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW, and plans created under RCW
41.05.140, is subject to the provisions of section 7 of this act.

Sec. 10 RCW 74.09.240 and 1995 c 319 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person, including any corporation, that solicits or
receives any remuneration (including any kickback, bribe, or rebate)
directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind: (a)
In return for referring an individual to a person for the furnishing or
arranging for the furnishing of any item or service for which payment
may be made in whole or in part under this chapter((,)); or (b) in
return for purchasing, leasing, ordering, or arranging for or
recommending purchasing, leasing, or ordering any goods, facility,
service, or item for which payment may be made in whole or in part
under this chapter, shall be guilty of a class C felony((;)). However,
the fine, if imposed, shall not be in an amount more than twenty-five
thousand dollars, except as authorized by RCW 9A.20.030.
(2) Any person, including any corporation, that offers or pays any
remuneration (including any kickback, bribe, or rebate) directly or
indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in kind to any person to
induce such person: (a) To refer an individual to a person for the
furnishing or arranging for the furnishing of any item or service for
which payment may be made, in whole or in part, under this
chapter((,)); or (b) to purchase, lease, order, or arrange for or
recommend purchasing, leasing, or ordering any goods, facility,
service, or item for which payment may be made in whole or in part
under this chapter, shall be guilty of a class C felony((;)). However,
the fine, if imposed, shall not be in an amount more than twenty-five
thousand dollars, except as authorized by RCW 9A.20.030.
(3)(((a) Except as provided in 42 U.S.C. 1395 nn, physicians are
prohibited from self-referring any client eligible under this chapter
for the following designated health services to a facility in which the
physician or an immediate family member has a financial relationship:
(i) Clinical laboratory services;
(ii) Physical therapy services;
(iii) Occupational therapy services;
(iv) Radiology including magnetic resonance imaging, computerized
axial tomography, and ultrasound services;
(v) Durable medical equipment and supplies;
(vi) Parenteral and enteral nutrients equipment and supplies;
(vii) Prosthetics, orthotics, and prosthetic devices;
(viii) Home health services;
(ix) Outpatient prescription drugs;
(x) Inpatient and outpatient hospital services;
(xi) Radiation therapy services and supplies.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "financial relationship" means
the relationship between a physician and an entity that includes
either:
(i) An ownership or investment interest; or
(ii) A compensation arrangement.
For purposes of this subsection, "compensation arrangement" means
an arrangement involving remuneration between a physician, or an
immediate family member of a physician, and an entity.
(c) The department is authorized to adopt by rule amendments to 42
U.S.C. 1395 nn enacted after July 23, 1995.
(d) This section shall not apply in any case covered by a general
exception specified in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 nn.
(4))) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not apply to:
(a) A discount or other reduction in price obtained by a provider
of services or other entity under this chapter if the reduction in
price is properly disclosed and appropriately reflected in the costs
claimed or charges made by the provider or entity under this
chapter((,)); and
(b) Any amount paid by an employer to an employee (who has a bona
fide employment relationship with such employer) for employment in the
provision of covered items or services.
(((5))) (4) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section, if applicable
to the conduct involved, shall supersede the criminal provisions of
chapter 19.68 RCW, but shall not preclude administrative proceedings
authorized by chapter 19.68 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "disciplining authority,"
"health care practitioner," "health care entity," and "health care
service" have the same meanings as provided in section 1 of this act.
(2) The secretary shall seek repayment from a health care
practitioner of any moneys paid for any claim, bill, or other demand or
request for payment for the health care services that were determined
by the appropriate disciplining authority to be furnished as a result
of a referral prohibited by section 2 of this act.
(3) The secretary shall report to the appropriate disciplining
authority any pattern of claims, bills, or other demands or requests
for payment submitted for a health care service provided as a result of
a referral prohibited by section 2 of this act within thirty days after
the secretary has knowledge of that pattern.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the
secretary is not required to audit or investigate any claim, bill, or
other demand or request for payment for the purpose of determining
whether those services were the result of a prohibited referral.
(b) Any audit or investigation of any claim, bill, or other demand
or request for payment for the purpose of determining whether those
services were the result of the prohibited referral are not grounds to
delay payment or waive any requirements for the prompt payment of
claims.
(5) For any claim, bill, or request for payment that is paid and is
subsequently determined to be the result of a prohibited referral, the
secretary shall seek a refund of that payment in accordance with the
provisions of section 5 of this act.

Sec. 12 RCW 74.09.522 and 1997 c 59 s 15 and 1997 c 34 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "managed health care system"
means any health care organization, including health care providers,
insurers, health care service contractors, health maintenance
organizations, health insuring organizations, or any combination
thereof, that provides directly or by contract health care services
covered under RCW 74.09.520 and rendered by licensed providers, on a
prepaid capitated basis and that meets the requirements of section
1903(m)(1)(A) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or
federal demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI
of the federal social security act.
(2) The department of social and health services shall enter into
agreements with managed health care systems to provide health care
services to recipients of temporary assistance for needy families under
the following conditions:
(a) Agreements shall be made for at least thirty thousand
recipients statewide;
(b) Agreements in at least one county shall include enrollment of
all recipients of temporary assistance for needy families;
(c) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section
1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal
demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the
federal social security act, recipients shall have a choice of systems
in which to enroll and shall have the right to terminate their
enrollment in a system: PROVIDED, That the department may limit
recipient termination of enrollment without cause to the first month of
a period of enrollment, which period shall not exceed twelve months:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department shall not restrict a
recipient's right to terminate enrollment in a system for good cause as
established by the department by rule;
(d) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section
1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act, participating
managed health care systems shall not enroll a disproportionate number
of medical assistance recipients within the total numbers of persons
served by the managed health care systems, except as authorized by the
department under federal demonstration waivers granted under section
1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;
(e) In negotiating with managed health care systems the department
shall adopt a uniform procedure to negotiate and enter into contractual
arrangements, including standards regarding the quality of services to
be provided; and financial integrity of the responding system;
(f) The department shall seek waivers from federal requirements as
necessary to implement this chapter;
(g) The department shall, wherever possible, enter into prepaid
capitation contracts that include inpatient care. However, if this is
not possible or feasible, the department may enter into prepaid
capitation contracts that do not include inpatient care;
(h) The department shall define those circumstances under which a
managed health care system is responsible for out-of-plan services and
assure that recipients shall not be charged for such services; and
(i) Nothing in this section prevents the department from entering
into similar agreements for other groups of people eligible to receive
services under this chapter.
(3) The department shall ensure that publicly supported community
health centers and providers in rural areas, who show serious intent
and apparent capability to participate as managed health care systems
are seriously considered as contractors. The department shall
coordinate its managed care activities with activities under chapter
70.47 RCW.
(4) The department shall work jointly with the state of Oregon and
other states in this geographical region in order to develop
recommendations to be presented to the appropriate federal agencies and
the United States congress for improving health care of the poor, while
controlling related costs.
(5) The legislature finds that competition in the managed health
care marketplace is enhanced, in the long term, by the existence of a
large number of managed health care system options for medicaid
clients. In a managed care delivery system, whose goal is to focus on
prevention, primary care, and improved enrollee health status,
continuity in care relationships is of substantial importance, and
disruption to clients and health care providers should be minimized.
To help ensure these goals are met, the following principles shall
guide the department in its healthy options managed health care
purchasing efforts:
(a) All managed health care systems should have an opportunity to
contract with the department to the extent that minimum contracting
requirements defined by the department are met, at payment rates that
enable the department to operate as far below appropriated spending
levels as possible, consistent with the principles established in this
section.
(b) Managed health care systems should compete for the award of
contracts and assignment of medicaid beneficiaries who do not
voluntarily select a contracting system, based upon:
(i) Demonstrated commitment to or experience in serving low-income
populations;
(ii) Quality of services provided to enrollees;
(iii) Accessibility, including appropriate utilization, of services
offered to enrollees;
(iv) Demonstrated capability to perform contracted services,
including ability to supply an adequate provider network;
(v) Payment rates; and
(vi) The ability to meet other specifically defined contract
requirements established by the department, including consideration of
past and current performance and participation in other state or
federal health programs as a contractor.
(c) Consideration should be given to using multiple year
contracting periods.
(d) Quality, accessibility, and demonstrated commitment to serving
low-income populations shall be given significant weight in the
contracting, evaluation, and assignment process.
(e) All contractors that are regulated health carriers must meet
state minimum net worth requirements as defined in applicable state
laws. The department shall adopt rules establishing the minimum net
worth requirements for contractors that are not regulated health
carriers. This subsection does not limit the authority of the
department to take action under a contract upon finding that a
contractor's financial status seriously jeopardizes the contractor's
ability to meet its contract obligations.
(f) Procedures for resolution of disputes between the department
and contract bidders or the department and contracting carriers related
to the award of, or failure to award, a managed care contract must be
clearly set out in the procurement document. In designing such
procedures, the department shall give strong consideration to the
negotiation and dispute resolution processes used by the Washington
state health care authority in its managed health care contracting
activities.
(6) The department may apply the principles set forth in subsection
(5) of this section to its managed health care purchasing efforts on
behalf of clients receiving supplemental security income benefits to
the extent appropriate.
(7) Each managed health care system that provides health care
services under this chapter is subject to the provisions of section 7
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---