BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the current
statute governing the nursing facility payment system is overly complex
in contrast to Washington state's reimbursement systems for hospitals,
doctors, adult family homes, and other vendors. The legislature finds
that a simplified framework for the nursing home payment system is
needed to improve accountability and make the system more transparent
and easier to understand.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By September 30, 2008, the department of
social and health services shall develop a draft proposal for a
simplified nursing facility payment system and shall consider
stakeholder input in the process of developing the proposal. The
proposal must include:
(a) A direct care rate component consisting of direct care, therapy
care, and support services closely related to care provided directly to
nursing facility residents. The new direct care rate component shall
continue to utilize the settlement process and shall include a case mix
methodology similar to the payment system that was in effect during
fiscal year 2008;
(b) An indirect care rate component for costs associated with
operations and support services that are not related to direct care;
(c) The appropriate allocation of costs between the direct care and
indirect care rate components;
(d) The establishment of fair and reasonable limitations on costs;
(e) The potential impact on the operating budget of implementing
the new system;
(f) The potential impact of the new system on the level and quality
of services received by nursing facility residents whose care is paid
for by the medical program;
(g) Adjustments to minimum occupancy requirements, considering the
new direct care and indirect care rates and reducing the likelihood
that the state would be responsible for the cost of empty beds;
(h) Continued cost rebasing;
(i) Recommendations for performance measures and options for
linking nursing facility payments to outcomes. National benchmarks for
value-based purchasing shall be included as optional performance
measures where reasonable. The department shall begin data collection
on performance outcomes by July 1, 2009; and
(j) Recommendations for programs that could be funded as a
supplemental add-on to the base rate. For purposes of this section,
"supplemental add-on" means a temporary payment that is paid in
addition to the base rate for a specific purpose. Recommended
programs:
(i) Must not have a cost in excess of the dollar amount
appropriated in fiscal year 2009 for the variable return rate
component;
(ii) Must not include funding for items that create on-going costs,
such as cost-of-living adjustments; and
(iii) May include, but are not limited to, pay-for-performance
mechanisms or programs that provide additional supports to facilities
willing to care for residents with substantial mental health or
behavioral care needs.
(2) On September 30, 2008, the department must provide its draft
proposal to the joint legislative task force on long-term care
residential facility payment systems.
(3) On December 31, 2008, the department must provide a final
proposal to the joint legislative task force on long-term care
residential facility payment systems. The final proposal must
consider:
(a) Recommendations of the joint legislative task force on long-term care residential facility payment systems; and
(b) Recommendations of the department regarding rules necessary to
implement the proposed payment system.
(4) As part of development on the final proposal, the department
shall review current annual cost-reporting requirements and schedules
with stakeholders. Where possible, schedules that are no longer
necessary should be identified for potential elimination.
Recommendations for revisions to the cost reporting must be cost
neutral.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
If the legislature neither enacts the proposal made by the
department under section 2 of this act, nor enacts another nursing
facility medicaid payment system prior to the sine die adjournment of
the 2009 regular legislative session, the department shall, in rule,
adopt the nursing facility medicaid payment system as proposed in
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 By July 1, 2009, the department of social
and health services must report its findings, based upon its review of
the costs and benefits of a fair rental system to reimburse capital
expenditures, to the joint legislative task force on long-term care
residential facility payment systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A joint legislative task force on long-term care residential facility payment systems is established to review
recommendations of the department of social and health services on
long-term care residential facility payment systems for the care of
medicaid-eligible residents of nursing homes, boarding homes, and adult
family homes in Washington state.
(2) Membership of the task force shall consist of eight
legislators. The president of the senate shall appoint two members
from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate. The speaker of
the house of representatives shall appoint two members of each of the
two largest caucuses of the house of representatives. Each body shall
select representatives from committees with jurisdiction over health
and long-term care and fiscal matters. The task force expires January
1, 2010.
(a) The task force will review and provide comments on department
recommendations for a new payment system and report to the legislature
by January 1, 2009.
(b) The task force will provide recommendations on capital rate
components to the legislature by December 30, 2009.
(c) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(d) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(e) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 74.46.421 (Purpose of part E -- Nursing facility medicaid
payment rates) and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 4, 1999 c 353 s 3, & 1998 c 322
s 18;
(2) RCW 74.46.431 (Nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations -- Components -- Minimum wage -- Rules) and 2007 c 508 s 2, 2006
c 258 s 2, 2005 c 518 s 944, 2004 c 276 s 913, 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 5,
1999 c 353 s 4, & 1998 c 322 s 19;
(3) RCW 74.46.433 (Variable return component rate allocation) and
2006 c 258 s 3, 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 6, & 1999 c 353 s 9;
(4) RCW 74.46.441 (Public disclosure of rate-setting information)
and 1998 c 322 s 20;
(5) RCW 74.46.445 (Contractors -- Rate adjustments) and 1999 c 353 s
15;
(6) RCW 74.46.475 (Submitted cost report -- Analysis and adjustment
by department) and 1998 c 322 s 21, 1985 c 361 s 13, & 1983 1st ex.s.
c 67 s 23;
(7) RCW 74.46.485 (Case mix classification methodology) and 1998 c
322 s 22;
(8) RCW 74.46.496 (Case mix weights -- Determination -- Revisions) and
2006 c 258 s 4 & 1998 c 322 s 23;
(9) RCW 74.46.501 (Average case mix indexes determined quarterly--Facility average case mix index -- Medicaid average case mix index) and
2006 c 258 s 5, 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 9, & 1998 c 322 s 24;
(10) RCW 74.46.506 (Direct care component rate allocations--Determination -- Quarterly updates -- Fines) and 2007 c 508 s 3, 2006 c 258
s 6, & 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 10;
(11) RCW 74.46.508 (Direct care component rate allocation--Increases -- Rules) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 6 s 1 & 1999 c 181 s 2;
(12) RCW 74.46.511 (Therapy care component rate allocation--Determination) and 2007 c 508 s 4 & 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 11;
(13) RCW 74.46.521 (Operations component rate allocation--Determination) and 2007 c 508 s 5, 2006 c 258 s 7, 2001 1st sp.s. c 8
s 13, 1999 c 353 s 8, & 1998 c 322 s 28;
(14) RCW 74.46.531 (Department may adjust component rates--Contractor may request -- Errors or omissions) and 1998 c 322 s 31; and
(15) RCW 74.46.533 (Combined and estimated rebased rates--Determination -- Hold harmless provision) and 2007 c 508 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 74.46.435 (Property component rate allocation) and 2001 1st
sp.s. c 8 s 7, 1999 c 353 s 10, & 1998 c 322 s 29;
(2) RCW 74.46.437 (Financing allowance component rate allocation)
and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 8 & 1999 c 353 s 11; and
(3) RCW 74.46.439 (Facilities leased in arm's-length agreements--Recomputation of financing allowance -- Reimbursement for annualized
lease payments -- Rate adjustment) and 1999 c 353 s 12.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 4 of this act, referencing section 4 of this act by bill or
chapter number and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2008, in
the omnibus appropriations act, section 4 of this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 6 of this act takes effect July 1,
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 7 of this act takes effect July 1,
2010.

--- END ---