BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Lead is harmful to individuals of all ages and that young
children and babies are the most vulnerable to lead poisoning.
(2) In addition to the potential for exposure to lead from paint
chips, contaminated soil and water, traditional remedies, and other
pathways, a number of consumer products, including toys and candy, also
have the potential to expose children and adults to lead. For many of
these products, the presence of lead is not easily identified.
(3) Long-term exposure to even low levels of lead may cause
irreversible learning difficulties, mental retardation, and delayed
neurological and physical development. Most children and adults who
have lead poisoning appear to be healthy with no obvious or distinctive
symptoms.
(4) Screening for lead in children will help identify children that
have been exposed and precipitate action to limit further exposure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of health shall, as part of
its ongoing childhood lead poisoning prevention efforts, facilitate the
screening and identification of children under six years old that have
elevated levels of lead in their bloodstream. This must include:
(1) Identifying factors that are effective at predicting
asymptomatic populations of children that are at risk for elevated
blood lead levels; and
(2) Refining, on an ongoing basis, the factors identified to
increase their effectiveness in finding children at risk for elevated
blood lead levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By January 1, 2009, the department of health
shall develop and begin implementation of a two-year pilot program for
screening children at risk for elevated blood lead levels. The
department of health shall:
(1) Purchase state-of-the-art testing equipment for screening
children at risk. The equipment must be evaluated for purchase taking
into account cost-effectiveness, efficiency of use, dependability,
service life, ease of training in its use, and portability. The
testing equipment must satisfy the following criteria:
(a) Use of the testing equipment must qualify for reimbursement by
federal medicaid as a blood lead level test under the American medical
association current procedural terminology code 83655;
(b) Requirements under the federal clinical laboratory improvement
amendments of 1988 must have been waived for use of the testing
equipment;
(c) The testing equipment must be able to provide accurate blood
lead level results at the time of testing; and
(d) The testing equipment must be able to provide blood lead level
results without requiring a venous blood draw;
(2) Distribute purchased testing equipment on loan to public health
clinics, community health centers, school districts, federal women,
infants, and children program clinics, and early childhood education
programs that have access to a health care professional that is able to
conduct testing. Distribution of the testing equipment must be
targeted to areas of the state that have higher cumulative risk factors
for elevated blood lead levels in children; and
(3) Train personnel on location in the use of the testing
equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 All testing data collected under the pilot
program created in this act must be included within the department of
health's blood lead registry and reported to the United States centers
for disease control and prevention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department of health shall attempt to
recover costs for lead screening under this pilot program through
federal medicaid, federal grants, and nongovernmental sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Any blood lead level testing must be on a
strictly voluntary basis for the individual tested. For children under
six years old, the decision to be voluntarily tested must be made by
the child's parent or legal guardian.

--- END ---