BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Lead is harmful to individuals of all ages and that young
children and babies are the most vulnerable to lead poisoning.
(2) In addition to the potential for exposure to lead from paint
chips, contaminated soil and water, traditional remedies, and other
pathways, a number of consumer products, including toys and candy, also
have the potential to expose children and adults to lead. For many of
these products, the presence of lead is not easily identified.
(3) Long-term exposure to even low levels of lead may cause
irreversible learning difficulties, mental retardation, and delayed
neurological and physical development. Most children and adults who
have lead poisoning appear to be healthy with no obvious or distinctive
symptoms.
(4) Testing for lead in children will help identify children that
have been exposed and precipitate action to limit further exposure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By September 1, 2008, the department of
health shall begin operation of a mobile lead testing unit to test
children under six years old for elevated levels of lead in their
bloodstream and to educate parents and children in lead poisoning
prevention at mobile unit testing events.
(2) The mobile lead testing unit must employ state-of-the-art
testing equipment to test children at risk for elevated blood lead
levels. The equipment must be evaluated for purchase by the department
of health by taking into account cost-effectiveness, efficiency of use,
dependability, service life, ease of training in its use, and
portability. The testing equipment must satisfy the following
criteria:
(a) Use of the testing equipment must qualify for reimbursement by
federal medicaid as a blood lead level test under the American medical
association current procedural terminology code 83655;
(b) Requirements under the federal clinical laboratory improvement
amendments of 1988 must have been waived for use of the equipment;
(c) The testing equipment must be able to provide accurate blood
lead level results at the time of testing; and
(d) The testing equipment must be able to provide accurate blood
lead level results without requiring a venous blood draw.
(3) The department of health shall conduct a mobile unit lead
testing event in each county of the state annually.
(4) The schedule of dates and locations for mobile unit lead
testing events must be coordinated with local public health officials,
community health centers, public health clinics, school districts,
federal women, infants, and children programs, and early childhood
education and outreach programs located in the area planned for the
event.
(5) Notification of mobile unit lead testing events must be made at
least two weeks in advance to area doctor's offices, pediatricians,
community health centers, public health clinics, hospitals, federal
women, infant, and children program facilities, early childhood
education and outreach program facilities, day care centers, and local
schools. Notification must be publicized in the mass media in advance
of testing in any given area to encourage the maximum participation of
children.
(6) The department of health may, if resources are available, and
at its discretion, provide a lead screening test for any person in the
general public.
(7) All testing data collected must be included within the
department's blood lead registry and reported to the United States
centers for disease control and prevention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of health shall attempt to
recover costs for lead screening through federal medicaid, federal
grants, and nongovernmental sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---