BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the critical
importance of prevention in obtaining the goal of zero oil spills to
waters of the state. The legislature also recognizes that the
regulation of oil and fuel transfers on or near waters of the state
vary depending on many factors including the type of facility or
equipment that is used, the type of products being transferred, where
the transfer takes place, the type of vessels involved in the transfer,
and the historical risk associated with the facility involved in the
transfer. Finally, the legislature recognizes that rules adopted
regarding oil and fuel transfers must allow practical implementation to
achieve environmental protection. The legislature therefore directs
the department of ecology to revise current rules for oil and fuel
transfers on marine waters to ensure that these rules provide
effective, pragmatic regulations to protect the waters of the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 88.46.160 and 2004 c 226 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person or facility conducting ship refueling and bunkering
operations, or the lightering of petroleum products, and any person or
facility transferring oil between an onshore or offshore facility and
a tank vessel shall have containment and recovery equipment readily
available for deployment in the event of the discharge of oil into the
waters of the state and shall deploy the containment and recovery
equipment in accordance with standards adopted by the department. All
persons conducting refueling, bunkering, or lightering operations, or
oil transfer operations shall be trained in the use and deployment of
oil spill containment and recovery equipment. It is the responsibility
of the person providing bunkering, refueling, or lightering services to
provide any containment or recovery equipment required under this
section.
(2) The department shall adopt initial rules ((as necessary)) to
carry out ((the provisions of)) this section by June 30, 2006. The
department shall adopt subsequent rules as deemed necessary by the
department.
(a) The rules shall include standards for the circumstances under
which containment equipment should be deployed including standards
requiring deployment of containment equipment prior to the transfer of
oil when determined to be safe and effective by the department. The
department may require a person or facility to employ alternative
measures including but not limited to automatic shutoff devices and
alarms, extra personnel to monitor the transfer, or containment
equipment that is deployed quickly and effectively. The rules must
include provisions requiring an onshore or offshore facility's
contingency plan to include the procedures used to contain and recover
discharges.
(b) The standards adopted by rule must be suitable to the specific
environmental and operational conditions and characteristics of the
facilities that are subject to the standards((, and the department must
consult with the United States coast guard with the objective of
developing state standards that are compatible with federal
requirements applicable to the activities covered by this section. An
onshore or offshore facility shall include the procedures used to
contain and recover discharges in the facility's contingency plan. It
is the responsibility of the person providing bunkering, refueling, or
lightering services to provide any containment or recovery equipment
required under this section)). The standards must include performance-based methods to conduct refueling, bunkering, or lightering
operations, or oil transfer operations while protecting the waters of
the state. The standards must also include provisions to consider the
historical risks associated with individual facilities or groups of
facilities.
(3) The department must consult with the United States coast guard
in developing state standards that are compatible with applicable
federal requirements.
(4) This section does not apply to a person operating a ship for
personal pleasure or for recreational purposes.

--- END ---