BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.12.410 and 1997 c 58 s 601 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of application or reassessment under this chapter,
the department shall offer or contract for family planning information
and assistance, including alternatives to abortion, and any other
available locally based teen pregnancy prevention programs, to
prospective and current recipients of ((aid to families with dependent
children)) temporary assistance for needy families.
(2) The department shall work in cooperation with the
superintendent of public instruction to reduce the teen pregnancy rate
((of illegitimate births and abortions)), which should result in a
reduction in abortion rates in Washington state.
(3) The department of health ((shall)) may maximize federal funding
by timely application for federal funds available under P.L. 104-193
and Title V of the federal social security act, 42 U.S.C. 701 et seq.,
as amended, for the establishment of qualifying abstinence education
and motivation programs. To the extent such funds are received, the
department of health shall contract, by competitive bid, with entities
qualified to provide abstinence education and motivation programs in
the state.
(4) To the extent federal funding is received under subsection (3)
of this section, the department of health shall seek and accept local
matching funds to the maximum extent allowable from qualified
abstinence education and motivation programs.
(5)(a) For purposes of this section, "qualifying abstinence
education and motivation programs" are those bidders with experience in
the conduct of the types of abstinence education and motivation
programs set forth in Title V of the federal social security act, 42
U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq., as amended.
(b) The application for federal funds, contracting for abstinence
education and motivation programs, and performance of contracts under
this section are subject to review and oversight by a joint committee
of the legislature, composed of four legislative members, appointed by
each of the two caucuses in each house.

--- END ---