BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(2) "Gas" means natural gas and casinghead gas, or other gaseous
hydrocarbons from any lands or waters of this state, regardless of
whether it is produced from a gas well or from a well producing oil or
other liquid hydrocarbons.
(3) "Oil" means crude oil, condensate, distillate, or other oil, or
other liquid hydrocarbons extracted from any lands or waters of this
state, regardless of gravity.
(4) "Operating producer" means a producer who shares in the
production expenses of the severed product, and who conducts,
personally or by lease or contract, the daily operations of the
business of producing the product, including, but not limited to, the
sale of the product, receipt of proceeds of the sale, and the payment
of expenses.
(5) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(6) "Point of production" means:
(a) For oil, the point where it is severed and is first metered or
measured in a manner approved by the department;
(b) For gas recovered from, or in association with, oil, where it
is severed and is first metered or measured in a manner approved by the
department after separation from the oil; and
(c) For gas not recovered from, or in association with, oil, where
it is severed and is first metered or measured in a manner approved by
the department.
(7) "Producer" means any person having an economic interest in the
severed product, whether engaged in the business of producing or
extracting oil or gas or not, who has, as a result of the ownership of
such interests, a right to receive a part or all of the oil and gas
produced or has a right to receive all or a part of the proceeds of the
oil or gas severed. Such persons include, but are not limited to,
persons owning a royalty interest, an overriding royalty interest, a
working or operating interest, a net profit interest, or any
combination thereof, but does not include laborers or employees working
on or at the production site.
(8) "Severance" means the taking from the lands or waters of this
state of any oil and gas in any manner, except that the withdrawal of
gas from underground storage, as underground storage is defined under
RCW 80.40.010, may not constitute severance.
(9) "Value" means the fair market value of the oil or gas when
first metered and at the point of production.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) In addition to any other tax, an excise
tax is imposed upon the severance of oil and gas from any lands or
waters of this state, less the value of any part of the oil or gas, the
ownership or right to which is exempt from taxation under section 4 of
this act.
(2) The rate of the tax imposed is six percent.
(3) The measure of the tax is the value of the oil and gas at the
time and point of production.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The taxes imposed by this chapter on the
severance of oil and gas is the liability of the producer or producers.
The operating producer must file the return with the department, must
pay the tax due, and must deduct and withhold the rateable share of the
tax from payments made to other producers in proportion to their
interest.
(2) If oil or gas on which the severance and conservation taxes are
due is not sold at the time of production but is retained by the
producer, the operating producer must pay to the department the taxes
due with respect to the oil and gas severed but not sold and must
deduct or withhold the rateable share of the tax from payments made to
other producers in proportion to their interest.
(3) The department may require taxes to be paid upon the basis of
the prevailing price being paid when first metered and point of
production of other oil or gas of like kind, character, quality, or
comparable source when the value reported to the department does not
represent the market value of oil or gas sold or retained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following are exempt from the taxes
imposed under this chapter:
(1) The value of any oil or gas reinjected for storage, provided
that any subsequent removal of oil or gas produced in this state from
storage for sale, use, or other retention constitutes a severance
within the meaning of this chapter;
(2) The value of any oil or gas owned by a producer or producers
exempt from tax by reason of federal law or a compact negotiated by the
state with a tribal government; and
(3) The value of liquid hydrocarbons that are a byproduct of carbon
sequestration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 All of chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax
imposed by this chapter. The department must provide for the effective
administration of this chapter by rules which must include, but are not
limited to, the value at the time and point of production and a
determination of metering methods, and measuring the severance of oil
and gas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department shall deposit eighty
percent of the amount collected by it under section 2 of this act in
the energy freedom account under RCW 43.325.040. Moneys from this
account may be appropriated by the legislature to recover the cost of
oil and gas regulation as contained in the budget of the department of
natural resources. The legislature shall compensate the department of
natural resources for regulating oil and gas production.
(2) The local government severance taxation account is established
in the state treasury into which twenty percent of the taxes collected
under section 2 of this act shall be deposited. Moneys in the account
may be spent after appropriation. Moneys from this account shall be
used solely for making distributions to those local governments in
which impacts from oil and gas production activities occur, after
appropriation by statute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following real or personal property is exempt from property
taxation: Oil or gas reserves and leases on the rights to develop and
operate upon or within any lands and waters of this state for oil or
gas and the property rights attached to or inherent therein.
(2) This section does not in any way exempt the land, improvements,
or other real or personal property from property taxation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---