BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds and declares that
meeting the state's future energy needs through conservation efforts,
both large and small, is a priority. Small changes on the part of
Washington consumers, such as switching from conventional, incandescent
light bulbs to more efficient compact fluorescent bulbs, has the
potential to save thousands of kilowatts of electricity each year. The
legislature further finds that compact fluorescent bulbs are more
efficient, last longer, emit less heat, and draw less current than
conventional incandescent bulbs, which make them a safer and more
cost-effective option for use in the home. The legislature finds that
compact fluorescent bulbs and other types of general purpose lights
contain quantities of hazardous substances that may pose a threat to
the health of citizens and to the environment if not handled and
recycled properly.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to encourage citizens to
use energy efficient bulbs such as compact fluorescent bulbs and
properly dispose of these bulbs at the end of their useful life. The
legislature intends to establish a work group to make recommendations
on how to recycle end-of-life general purpose lights generated in the
state and educate consumers about proper management of general purpose
lights.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.260.020 and 2006 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Automatic commercial ice cube machine" means a factory-made
assembly, not necessarily shipped in one package, consisting of a
condensing unit and ice-making section operating as an integrated unit
with means for making and harvesting ice cubes. It may also include
integrated components for storing or dispensing ice, or both.
(2) "Ballast" means a device used with an electric discharge lamp
to obtain necessary circuit conditions, such as voltage, current, and
waveform, for starting and operating the lamp.
(3) "Commercial clothes washer" means a soft mount horizontal or
vertical-axis clothes washer that: (a) Has a clothes container
compartment no greater than 3.5 cubic feet in the case of a horizontal-axis product or no greater than 4.0 cubic feet in the case of a
vertical-axis product; and (b) is designed for use by more than one
household, such as in multifamily housing, apartments, or coin
laundries.
(4) "Commercial prerinse spray valve" means a handheld device
designed and marketed for use with commercial dishwashing and
warewashing equipment and that sprays water on dishes, flatware, and
other food service items for the purpose of removing food residue prior
to their cleaning.
(5)(a) "Commercial refrigerators and freezers" means refrigerators,
freezers, or refrigerator-freezers designed for use by commercial or
institutional facilities for the purpose of storing or merchandising
food products, beverages, or ice at specified temperatures that: (i)
Incorporate most components involved in the vapor-compression cycle and
the refrigerated compartment in a single cabinet; and (ii) may be
configured with either solid or transparent doors as a reach-in
cabinet, pass-through cabinet, roll-in cabinet, or roll-through
cabinet.
(b) "Commercial refrigerators and freezers" does not include: (i)
Products with ((85)) eighty-five cubic feet or more of internal volume;
(ii) walk-in refrigerators or freezers; (iii) consumer products that
are federally regulated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6291 et seq.; (iv)
products without doors; or (v) freezers specifically designed for ice
cream.
(6) "Compensation" means money or any other valuable thing,
regardless of form, received or to be received by a person for services
rendered.
(7) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(8) "General purpose lights" means lamps, bulbs, tubes, or other
electric devices that provide functional illumination for indoor
residential, indoor commercial, and outdoor use. "General purpose
lights" do not include any of the following specialty lighting:
Appliance, black light, bug, colored, infrared, left-hand thread,
marine, marine signal service, mine service, plant light, reflector,
rough service, shatter resistant, sign service, silver bowl, showcase,
three-way, traffic signal, and vibration service or vibration
resistant. "General purpose lights" also do not include lights needed
to provide special needs lighting for individuals with exceptional
needs.
(9) "High-intensity discharge lamp" means a lamp in which light is
produced by the passage of an electric current through a vapor or gas,
and in which the light-producing arc is stabilized by bulb wall
temperature and the arc tube has a bulb wall loading in excess of three
watts per square centimeter.
(((9))) (10) "Metal halide lamp" means a high-intensity discharge
lamp in which the major portion of the light is produced by radiation
of metal halides and their products of dissociation, possibly in
combination with metallic vapors.
(((10))) (11) "Metal halide lamp fixture" means a light fixture
designed to be operated with a metal halide lamp and a ballast for a
metal halide lamp.
(((11))) (12) "Pass-through cabinet" means a commercial
refrigerator or freezer with hinged or sliding doors on both the front
and rear of the unit.
(((12))) (13) "Probe-start metal halide ballast" means a ballast
used to operate metal halide lamps which does not contain an igniter
and which instead starts lamps by using a third starting electrode
"probe" in the arc tube.
(((13))) (14) "Reach-in cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or
freezer with hinged or sliding doors or lids, but does not include
roll-in or roll-through cabinets or pass-through cabinets.
(((14)))(15)(a) "Roll-in cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator
or freezer with hinged or sliding doors that allow wheeled racks of
product to be rolled into the unit.
(b) "Roll-through cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or
freezer with hinged or sliding doors on two sides of the cabinet that
allow wheeled racks of product to be rolled through the unit.
(((15))) (16)(a) "Single-voltage external AC to DC power supply"
means a device that: (i) Is designed to convert line voltage
alternating current input into lower voltage direct current output;
(ii) is able to convert to only one DC output voltage at a time; (iii)
is sold with, or intended to be used with, a separate end-use product
that constitutes the primary power load; (iv) is contained within a
separate physical enclosure from the end-use product; (v) is connected
to the end-use product via a removable or hard-wired male/female
electrical connection, cable, cord, or other wiring; and (vi) has a
nameplate output power less than or equal to 250 watts.
(b) "Single-voltage external AC to DC power supply" does not
include: (i) Products with batteries or battery packs that physically
attach directly to the power supply unit; (ii) products with a battery
chemistry or type selector switch and indicator light; or (iii)
products with a battery chemistry or type selector switch and a state
of charge meter.
(((16))) (17) "State-regulated incandescent reflector lamp" means
a lamp that is not colored or designed for rough or vibration service
applications, that has an inner reflective coating on the outer bulb to
direct the light, an E26 medium screw base, and a rated voltage or
voltage range that lies at least partially within 115 to 130 volts, and
that falls into one of the following categories:
(a) A bulged reflector or elliptical reflector bulb shape and which
has a diameter which equals or exceeds 2.25 inches;
(b) A reflector, parabolic aluminized reflector, or similar bulb
shape and which has a diameter of 2.25 to 2.75 inches.
(((17))) (18) "Transformer" means a device consisting of two or
more coils of insulated wire and that is designed to transfer
alternating current by electromagnetic induction from one coil to
another to change the original voltage or current value.
(((18))) (19)(a) "Unit heater" means a self-contained, vented fan-type commercial space heater that uses natural gas or propane, and that
is designed to be installed without ducts within a heated space.
(b) "Unit heater" does not include any products covered by federal
standards established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6291 et seq. or any
product that is a direct vent, forced flue heater with a sealed
combustion burner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department of ecology, in
consultation with the solid waste advisory committee created under RCW
70.95.040, shall convene a work group with representatives of the
lighting industry, environmental organizations, fluorescent lamp
retailers, waste haulers, lamp recyclers, and local governments to
consider and make recommendations on the following issues:
(a) The most effective, cost-efficient, and convenient method for
the consumer to provide for the proper collection and recycling of any
end-of-life general purpose lights generated in this state;
(b) Methods to educate consumers about the proper management of and
collection opportunities for end-of-life general purpose lights; and
(c) Designation on the general purpose light and light packaging
regarding the proper recycling of the light.
(2) The department of ecology shall report its findings and
recommendations for implementing and financing a recycling program for
fluorescent lamps to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2008.
(3) This section expires September 1, 2009.

--- END ---