BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may, when deemed appropriate by the director based
on local circumstances and departmental resources, partner with
volunteer organizations and real estate professionals to educate
potential real estate sellers and buyers of the location and
traditional uses of any land in proximity to a potential transaction
where public hunting has been, is, or may be permitted.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.06.022 and 2006 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A seller of real property shall make available to the buyer the
following ((statement)) two statements regarding possible preexisting
nearby land uses:
(1) "This notice is to inform you that the real property you are
considering for purchase may lie in close proximity to a farm. The
operation of a farm involves usual and customary agricultural
practices, which are protected under RCW 7.48.305, the Washington right
to farm act"; and
(2) "This notice is to inform you that the real property you are
considering for purchase may lie in close proximity to land that has
been traditionally open for public hunting, an activity which may
include the use of firearms. Hunting is a lawful and accepted activity
when conducted at a time and place, and in a manner, consistent with
regulations adopted by the fish and wildlife commission pursuant to
Title 77 RCW."

--- END ---