BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The airline practices and consumer
rights work group is established to evaluate legal and policy issues
related to allowing consumers to participate in the secondary market,
with twelve members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iii) The attorney general shall appoint six members, two of whom
represent the airline industry and two of whom represent consumers.
(iv) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives shall jointly appoint two members representing
consumers.
(b) The work group shall choose two cochairs from among its
membership, one cochair shall be a legislator and the other an
appointee of the attorney general. The attorney general, or his or her
designee, shall convene the initial meeting of the work group by April
18, 2008. The work group shall meet a minimum of four times, and at
least two of the meetings shall include public testimony.
(2) In order to evaluate issues related to allowing consumers to
participate in the secondary market, the work group shall review,
study, evaluate, and make recommendations on at least the following
issues:
(a) The history and current state of frequent flier programs, from
the original customer loyalty programs to the creation and evolution of
the secondary market, which is the sale, barter, or exchange of points,
miles, or other similar credits that occurs between an airline and
someone other than a frequent flier program member or between a
frequent flier program member and someone other than the airline
sponsoring the frequent flier program;
(b) The amount of miles, points, or similar credits that have been
awarded to and redeemed by consumers;
(c) The current inventory of miles, points, or similar credits and
how the airlines plan to address this inventory;
(d) Consumer complaints and concerns related to the current state
of these programs;
(e) Legal and policy implications of state action to address these
issues including, but not limited to, contract law obligations of the
airlines, federal preemption, and the applicability of the consumer
protection act; and
(f) Whether state action is warranted, and if it is what state
action would be appropriate.
(3) Staff support for the work group shall be provided by the
office of the attorney general.
(4) Legislative members of the work group must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(5) By November 15, 2008, the airline practices and consumer rights
work group shall report its findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives and
to the attorney general.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2009.

--- END ---