BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) In recent years, frequent flier programs have become a popular
marketing tool used not only to attract airline customers and generate
customer loyalty, but also to generate significant revenue for
airlines;
(2) As frequent flier programs have grown in popularity, a
secondary market for points, miles, or other similar credits earned by
participating in frequent flier programs has also grown;
(3) This secondary market for points, miles, or other similar
credits is independent from the original frequent flier loyalty
programs and is not related to airline rates, routes, and services;
(4) Airlines have contributed to the growth of this secondary
market by creating a business out of selling points, miles, or other
similar credits to outside companies, such as credit card companies,
that in turn use the points, miles, or other similar credits to attract
their own customers;
(5) As the secondary market for points, miles, or other similar
credits has grown, however, airlines have increasingly attempted to
unreasonably restrict, restrain, limit, or control the secondary market
by prohibiting frequent flier program members from also participating
in the secondary market;
(6) When unreasonable restrictions, restraints, limitations, or
controls are placed on the secondary market for points, miles, or other
similar credits, consumers in the state of Washington who participate
in frequent flier programs are harmed; and
(7) Regulation of the secondary market for points, miles, or other
similar credits earned through participation in frequent flier programs
is necessary to ensure that consumers in the state of Washington can
freely participate in the secondary market.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Frequent flier program" means a program in which a consumer
receives points, miles, or other similar credits in exchange for travel
on a certain airline.
(2) "Secondary market" means the market in which the sale, barter,
or exchange of points, miles, or other similar credits occurs between
an airline and someone other than a frequent flier member or between a
frequent flier member and someone other than the airline sponsoring the
frequent flier program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) If an airline chooses to claim to own
points, miles, or other similar credits sold, bartered, or exchanged on
the secondary market, the airline shall comply with the requirements of
subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) The airline shall include a warning in the first twenty-five
percent of the first page of any communication from the airline,
including the airline's web site or newsletters, stating that the
points, miles, or other similar credits that are sold, bartered, or
exchanged on the secondary market are the property of the airline and
that the airline may terminate a frequent flier program at any time and
reserves the right to seize the points, miles, or other similar credits
without notice or compensation. The warning shall be in red font of
not less than eighteen point and displayed on a background of
distinctly contrasting color.
(3)(a) If the airline terminates its frequent flier program, the
airline shall compensate holders two and one-half cents for each point,
mile, or other similar credit of the airline's frequent flier program
sold, bartered, or exchanged on the secondary market.
(b) The airline shall establish and maintain a separate reserve
fund adequate to compensate holders of points, miles, or other similar
credits of the airline's frequent flier program that were sold,
bartered, or exchanged on the secondary market if the airline
terminates its frequent flier program.
(c) The amount of the separate reserve fund shall be not less than
two and one-half cents per point, mile, or other similar credit of the
airline's frequent flier program that was sold, bartered, or exchanged
on the secondary market.
(d) If the airline terminates the frequent flier program, the
general assets of the airline shall be liable to consumers who bought,
bartered, or exchanged the airline's points, miles, or other similar
credits on the secondary market to the extent that the separate reserve
fund is inadequate to compensate consumers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If an airline violates section 3 of this
act, an individual may bring a civil action for damages as a result of
the violation. If the individual prevails, the individual shall be
allowed reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---