BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.335
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the benefits of school district
procurement of locally grown foods include environmental protection,
local economic development, improved child nutrition, and food
security. Purchasing locally grown foods:
(a) Reduces the distance and changes the manner in which food
travels from producer to consumer, which conserves energy, decreases
greenhouse gas emissions, and decreases reliance on oil;
(b) Expands market opportunities for local farmers, which preserves
and strengthens food production and increases the already significant
contribution that agriculture makes to local and state economies;
(c) Contributes to the health and development of school children,
which bolsters their ability to achieve educational goals; and
(d) Reduces reliance on nonlocally grown foods, which increases
food access and safety.
(2) With this act, the legislature provides school districts the
authority to consider the distance food travels from the point of
production to the point of consumption when making food procurement
decisions.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.335.190 and 2005 c 346 s 2 and 2005 c 286 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When, in the opinion of the board of directors of any school
district, the cost of any furniture, supplies, equipment, building,
improvements, or repairs, or other work or purchases, except books,
will equal or exceed the sum of fifty thousand dollars, complete plans
and specifications for such work or purchases shall be prepared and
notice by publication given in at least one newspaper of general
circulation within the district, once each week for two consecutive
weeks, of the intention to receive bids and that specifications and
other information may be examined at the office of the board or any
other officially designated location: PROVIDED, That the board without
giving such notice may make improvements or repairs to the property of
the district through the shop and repair department of such district
when the total of such improvements or repair does not exceed the sum
of forty thousand dollars. The cost of any public work, improvement or
repair for the purposes of this section shall be the aggregate of all
amounts to be paid for labor, material, and equipment on one continuous
or interrelated project where work is to be performed simultaneously or
in close sequence. The bids shall be in writing and shall be opened
and read in public on the date and in the place named in the notice and
after being opened shall be filed for public inspection.
(2) Every purchase of furniture, equipment or supplies, except
books, the cost of which is estimated to be in excess of forty thousand
dollars, shall be on a competitive basis. The board of directors shall
establish a procedure for securing telephone and/or written quotations
for such purchases. Whenever the estimated cost is from forty thousand
dollars up to seventy-five thousand dollars, the procedure shall
require quotations from at least three different sources to be obtained
in writing or by telephone, and recorded for public perusal. Whenever
the estimated cost is in excess of seventy-five thousand dollars, the
public bidding process provided in subsection (1) of this section shall
be followed.
(3) Any school district may purchase goods produced or provided in
whole or in part from class II inmate work programs operated by the
department of corrections pursuant to RCW 72.09.100, including but not
limited to furniture, equipment, or supplies. School districts are
encouraged to set as a target to contract, beginning after June 30,
2006, to purchase up to one percent of the total goods required by the
school districts each year, goods produced or provided in whole or in
part from class II inmate work programs operated by the department of
corrections.
(4) Every building, improvement, repair or other public works
project, the cost of which is estimated to be in excess of forty
thousand dollars, shall be on a competitive bid process. Whenever the
estimated cost of a public works project is one hundred thousand
dollars or more, the public bidding process provided in subsection (1)
of this section shall be followed unless the contract is let using the
small works roster process in RCW 39.04.155 or under any other
procedure authorized for school districts. One or more school
districts may authorize an educational service district to establish
and operate a small works roster for the school district under the
provisions of RCW 39.04.155.
(5) The contract for the work or purchase shall be awarded to the
lowest responsible bidder as defined in RCW 43.19.1911 but the board
may by resolution reject any and all bids and make further calls for
bids in the same manner as the original call. On any work or purchase
the board shall provide bidding information to any qualified bidder or
the bidder's agent, requesting it in person.
(6) In the event of any emergency when the public interest or
property of the district would suffer material injury or damage by
delay, upon resolution of the board declaring the existence of such an
emergency and reciting the facts constituting the same, the board may
waive the requirements of this section with reference to any purchase
or contract: PROVIDED, That an "emergency", for the purposes of this
section, means a condition likely to result in immediate physical
injury to persons or to property of the school district in the absence
of prompt remedial action.
(7) This section does not apply to the direct purchase of school
buses by school districts and educational services in accordance with
RCW 28A.160.195.
(8) This section does not apply to the purchase of Washington grown
food.
(9) At the discretion of the board, a school district may develop
and implement policies and procedures to facilitate and maximize to the
extent practicable, purchases of Washington grown food; such policies
and procedures may include, but are not limited to, local preferences.
(10) As used in this section, "Washington grown" means grown and
packed or processed in Washington.
(11) This section does not apply to procurement of food by a school
if it is determined that compliance with this section would:
(a) Cause denial of federal moneys; or
(b) Be inconsistent with the requirements of federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---