BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2006 c 139 s 5, 2006 c 124 s 1, 2006 c
122 s 7, 2006 c 73 s 5, and 2005 c 436 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Body armor" means any clothing or equipment designed, in whole
or in part, to minimize the risk of injury or death from a deadly
weapon.
(3) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(((3))) (4) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines
commission.
(((4))) (5) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of
the department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(((5))) (6) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670,
9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or 9.94A.545, served in the
community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and
activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department
shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and
modify conditions of community custody, in addition to those imposed by
the court, based upon the risk to community safety.
(((6))) (7) "Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum
period of community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW
9.94A.715, as established by the commission or the legislature under
RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.
(((7))) (8) "Community placement" means that period during which
the offender is subject to the conditions of community custody and/or
postrelease supervision, which begins either upon completion of the
term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release.
Community placement may consist of entirely community custody, entirely
postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.
(((8))) (9) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight
hundred eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or
private school.
(((9))) (10) "Community restitution" means compulsory service,
without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(((10))) (11) "Community supervision" means a period of time during
which a convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and
other sentence conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter
or RCW 16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the court finds that any
offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her
offense, the conditions of supervision may, subject to available
resources, include treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact
for out-of-state supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW
9.95.270, community supervision is the functional equivalent of
probation and should be considered the same as probation by other
states.
(((11))) (12) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(((12))) (13) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant
to Titles 10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of
guilty, and acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(((13))) (14) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(((14))) (15) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's
prior convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(((15))) (16) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing
court that equals the difference between the offender's net daily
income and the reasonable obligations that the offender has for the
support of the offender and any dependents.
(((16))) (17) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced
supervision designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and
compliance with sentence conditions, and in which the offender is
required to report daily to a specific location designated by the
department or the sentencing court.
(((17))) (18) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(((18))) (19) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states
with exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community supervision, the
number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or
dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of
confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a
determinate sentence.
(((19))) (20) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings
of an offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(((20))) (21) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a
sentencing option available to persons convicted of a felony offense
other than a violent offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for
the option under RCW 9.94A.660.
(((21))) (22) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(((22))) (23) "Earned release" means earned release from
confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(((23))) (24) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(((24))) (25) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((25))) (26) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specific period of time.
(((26))) (27) "First-time offender" means any person who has no
prior convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time
offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(((27))) (28) "Home detention" means a program of partial
confinement available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in
a private residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(((28))) (29) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money
that is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for
legal financial obligations which may include restitution to the
victim, statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as
assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal
drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the
offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for
vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a),
legal financial obligations may also include payment to a public agency
of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting in
the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(((29))) (30) "Most serious offense" means any of the following
felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.
(((30))) (31) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a
violent offense.
(((31))) (32) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(((32))) (33) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more
than one year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home
detention or work crew has been ordered by the court, in an approved
residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the balance of
the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and
home detention.
(((33))) (34) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (((33))) (34)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(((34))) (35) "Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an
offender's community placement that is not community custody.
(((35))) (36) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime
was a stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the
perpetrator established or promoted a relationship with the victim
prior to the offense and the victimization of the victim was a
significant reason the perpetrator established or promoted the
relationship; or (c) the perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any public or private school
and the victim was a student of the school under his or her authority
or supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "school" does not
include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a
coach, trainer, volunteer, or other person in authority in any
recreational activity and the victim was a participant in the activity
under his or her authority or supervision; or (iii) a pastor, elder,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any church or religious
organization, and the victim was a member or participant of the
organization under his or her authority.
(((36))) (37) "Private school" means a school regulated under
chapter 28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.
(((37))) (38) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW
28A.150.010.
(((38))) (39) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered
by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(((39))) (40) "Risk assessment" means the application of an
objective instrument supported by research and adopted by the
department for the purpose of assessing an offender's risk of
reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of the harm done by the
offender, place and circumstances of the offender related to risk, the
offender's relationship to any victim, and any information provided to
the department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not
be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(((40))) (41) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an
attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((41))) (42) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent
offense and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((42))) (43) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(((11))) (12);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.080; or
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((43))) (44) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes
for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his
or her sexual gratification.
(((44))) (45) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing
court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(((45))) (46) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length
of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime
as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining
the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(((46))) (47) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the
offender twenty-four hours before the offense.
(((47))) (48) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the
physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized
under contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(((48))) (49) "Transition training" means written and verbal
instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender
during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of
the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include
instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the
offender's period of community custody.
(((49))) (50) "Victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or
property as a direct result of the crime charged.
(((50))) (51) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(((51))) (52) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement
consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community
that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(((52))) (53) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration
program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and
lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(((53))) (54) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.535 and 2007 c 377 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The court may impose a sentence outside the standard sentence range
for an offense if it finds, considering the purpose of this chapter,
that there are substantial and compelling reasons justifying an
exceptional sentence. Facts supporting aggravated sentences, other
than the fact of a prior conviction, shall be determined pursuant to
the provisions of RCW 9.94A.537.
Whenever a sentence outside the standard sentence range is imposed,
the court shall set forth the reasons for its decision in written
findings of fact and conclusions of law. A sentence outside the
standard sentence range shall be a determinate sentence.
If the sentencing court finds that an exceptional sentence outside
the standard sentence range should be imposed, the sentence is subject
to review only as provided for in RCW 9.94A.585(4).
A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.589 (1) and (2)
governing whether sentences are to be served consecutively or
concurrently is an exceptional sentence subject to the limitations in
this section, and may be appealed by the offender or the state as set
forth in RCW 9.94A.585 (2) through (6).
(1) Mitigating Circumstances - Court to Consider
The court may impose an exceptional sentence below the standard
range if it finds that mitigating circumstances are established by a
preponderance of the evidence. The following are illustrative only and
are not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional sentences.
(a) To a significant degree, the victim was an initiator, willing
participant, aggressor, or provoker of the incident.
(b) Before detection, the defendant compensated, or made a good
faith effort to compensate, the victim of the criminal conduct for any
damage or injury sustained.
(c) The defendant committed the crime under duress, coercion,
threat, or compulsion insufficient to constitute a complete defense but
which significantly affected his or her conduct.
(d) The defendant, with no apparent predisposition to do so, was
induced by others to participate in the crime.
(e) The defendant's capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his
or her conduct, or to conform his or her conduct to the requirements of
the law, was significantly impaired. Voluntary use of drugs or alcohol
is excluded.
(f) The offense was principally accomplished by another person and
the defendant manifested extreme caution or sincere concern for the
safety or well-being of the victim.
(g) The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.589
results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly excessive in light of
the purpose of this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(h) The defendant or the defendant's children suffered a continuing
pattern of physical or sexual abuse by the victim of the offense and
the offense is a response to that abuse.
(2) Aggravating Circumstances - Considered and Imposed by the Court
The trial court may impose an aggravated exceptional sentence
without a finding of fact by a jury under the following circumstances:
(a) The defendant and the state both stipulate that justice is best
served by the imposition of an exceptional sentence outside the
standard range, and the court finds the exceptional sentence to be
consistent with and in furtherance of the interests of justice and the
purposes of the sentencing reform act.
(b) The defendant's prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored
foreign criminal history results in a presumptive sentence that is
clearly too lenient in light of the purpose of this chapter, as
expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(c) The defendant has committed multiple current offenses and the
defendant's high offender score results in some of the current offenses
going unpunished.
(d) The failure to consider the defendant's prior criminal history
which was omitted from the offender score calculation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.525 results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too
lenient.
(3) Aggravating Circumstances - Considered by a Jury -Imposed by
the Court
Except for circumstances listed in subsection (2) of this section,
the following circumstances are an exclusive list of factors that can
support a sentence above the standard range. Such facts should be
determined by procedures specified in RCW 9.94A.537.
(a) The defendant's conduct during the commission of the current
offense manifested deliberate cruelty to the victim.
(b) The defendant knew or should have known that the victim of the
current offense was particularly vulnerable or incapable of resistance.
(c) The current offense was a violent offense, and the defendant
knew that the victim of the current offense was pregnant.
(d) The current offense was a major economic offense or series of
offenses, so identified by a consideration of any of the following
factors:
(i) The current offense involved multiple victims or multiple
incidents per victim;
(ii) The current offense involved attempted or actual monetary loss
substantially greater than typical for the offense;
(iii) The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication
or planning or occurred over a lengthy period of time; or
(iv) The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence,
or fiduciary responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current
offense.
(e) The current offense was a major violation of the Uniform
Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW (VUCSA), related to
trafficking in controlled substances, which was more onerous than the
typical offense of its statutory definition: The presence of ANY of
the following may identify a current offense as a major VUCSA:
(i) The current offense involved at least three separate
transactions in which controlled substances were sold, transferred, or
possessed with intent to do so;
(ii) The current offense involved an attempted or actual sale or
transfer of controlled substances in quantities substantially larger
than for personal use;
(iii) The current offense involved the manufacture of controlled
substances for use by other parties;
(iv) The circumstances of the current offense reveal the offender
to have occupied a high position in the drug distribution hierarchy;
(v) The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or
planning, occurred over a lengthy period of time, or involved a broad
geographic area of disbursement; or
(vi) The offender used his or her position or status to facilitate
the commission of the current offense, including positions of trust,
confidence or fiduciary responsibility (e.g., pharmacist, physician, or
other medical professional).
(f) The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.835.
(g) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of sexual abuse of
the same victim under the age of eighteen years manifested by multiple
incidents over a prolonged period of time.
(h) The current offense involved domestic violence, as defined in
RCW 10.99.020, and one or more of the following was present:
(i) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of psychological,
physical, or sexual abuse of the victim manifested by multiple
incidents over a prolonged period of time;
(ii) The offense occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or
the offender's minor children under the age of eighteen years; or
(iii) The offender's conduct during the commission of the current
offense manifested deliberate cruelty or intimidation of the victim.
(i) The offense resulted in the pregnancy of a child victim of
rape.
(j) The defendant knew that the victim of the current offense was
a youth who was not residing with a legal custodian and the defendant
established or promoted the relationship for the primary purpose of
victimization.
(k) The offense was committed with the intent to obstruct or impair
human or animal health care or agricultural or forestry research or
commercial production.
(l) The current offense is trafficking in the first degree or
trafficking in the second degree and any victim was a minor at the time
of the offense.
(m) The offense involved a high degree of sophistication or
planning.
(n) The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence, or
fiduciary responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current
offense.
(o) The defendant committed a current sex offense, has a history of
sex offenses, and is not amenable to treatment.
(p) The offense involved an invasion of the victim's privacy.
(q) The defendant demonstrated or displayed an egregious lack of
remorse.
(r) The offense involved a destructive and foreseeable impact on
persons other than the victim.
(s) The defendant committed the offense to obtain or maintain his
or her membership or to advance his or her position in the hierarchy of
an organization, association, or identifiable group.
(t) The defendant committed the current offense shortly after being
released from incarceration.
(u) The current offense is a burglary and the victim of the
burglary was present in the building or residence when the crime was
committed.
(v) The offense was committed against a law enforcement officer who
was performing his or her official duties at the time of the offense,
the offender knew that the victim was a law enforcement officer, and
the victim's status as a law enforcement officer is not an element of
the offense.
(w) The defendant committed the offense against a victim who was
acting as a good samaritan.
(x) The defendant committed the offense against a public official
or officer of the court in retaliation of the public official's
performance of his or her duty to the criminal justice system.
(y) The victim's injuries substantially exceed the level of bodily
harm necessary to satisfy the elements of the offense. This aggravator
is not an exception to RCW 9.94A.530(2).
(z)(i)(A) The current offense is theft in the first degree, theft
in the second degree, possession of stolen property in the first
degree, or possession of stolen property in the second degree; (B) the
stolen property involved is metal property; and (C) the property damage
to the victim caused in the course of the theft of metal property is
more than three times the value of the stolen metal property, or the
theft of the metal property creates a public hazard.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection, "metal property" means
commercial metal property or nonferrous metal property, as defined in
RCW 19.290.010.
(aa) The current offense is a violent offense and the defendant was
wearing body armor at the time of the offense.

--- END ---