BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Body armor" means any clothing or equipment designed, in whole
or in part, to minimize the risk of injury or death from a deadly
weapon.
(2) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.101.010.
(3) "Violent offense" has the same meaning as in RCW 9.94A.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A person is guilty of unlawful
possession of body armor if he or she:
(a) Has been convicted of a violent offense; and
(b) Is knowingly in possession of body armor.
(2) Unlawful possession of body armor is a class C felony.
(3) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of this section,
which a defendant has the burden to prove by a preponderance of the
evidence, that:
(a) A peace officer, acting in the officer's official capacity,
provided the body armor to the person for his or her protection while
the person was being transported or accompanied by the officer;
(b) A protective or restraining order has been entered for the
benefit of the person and the alleged possession of body armor did not
occur while the person was committing or attempting to commit any
crime; or
(c) The violent offense was committed at least fifteen years prior
to the alleged violation of this section and the person has not been
convicted of any felonies during the fifteen years. The affirmative
defense provided in this subsection (3)(c) is not available if the
violent offense was murder in the first degree, murder in the second
degree, homicide by abuse, manslaughter in the first degree, or
manslaughter in the second degree.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 9A RCW.

--- END ---