BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
FIVE PILOT PROJECTS FOR FISCAL YEARS 2009-2011
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature finds that the people
of Washington state face a crisis brought upon by increased gang crime
and violence, which is threatening public safety in communities across
the state. Those who live in communities where gang membership is on
the rise find themselves living with the daily threat of intimidation
and harassment. Ordinary citizens are increasingly vulnerable to gang-related crimes such as drug dealing, damage to real property, and theft
of personal property and automobiles, or even assault, rape, and
murder. Law enforcement officers, prosecutors, and local communities
require assistance to combat this clear and present danger to the law-abiding residents of Washington. The work group on gang-related crime,
established under Substitute Senate Bill No. 5987 in 2007, met
regularly to study and make recommendations on the problems of gang-related crime in Washington.
(2) The legislature recognizes the efforts of the work group in
trying to prevent, intervene, and suppress gang-related violence in the
state. It is the consensus of the work group, and it is recognized by
the legislature, that the sum of ten million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, should be appropriated to the governor's
juvenile justice advisory committee to help provide local community
programs with the tools they need to reduce gang violence and protect
the citizens of Washington from being victimized by violent street
gangs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to available funds, the governor's juvenile justice
advisory committee shall issue a request for proposal to implement five
pilot projects throughout the state that focus on combating criminal
street gangs and violence.
(a) The projects shall be designed to have a three-prong approach
to preventing, intervening, and suppressing gang-related violence.
(b) Consideration for grant awards shall primarily be given to, but
is not limited to, those applicants that show that gang violence is an
increasing problem in their respective community and that addressing
the impact of street gangs is a high priority within their local
community. Eligible applicants shall be nongovernmental sponsors,
either as the sole sponsor or as a cosponsor with a government agency.
(c) Grant applications shall include project processes and
protocols for defining objectives and measurable results.
(d) The costs of administration shall not exceed four percent of
appropriated funding.
(e) Grants awarded under this section shall be used to supplement,
not supplant, other moneys that are available for combating criminal
street gangs and violence.
(2) The governor's juvenile justice advisory committee shall
convene a state gang work group.
(a) The committee, in collaboration with the work group, shall meet
semiannually to determine how grants are to be distributed and to
provide oversight of the selected pilot projects established in
subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The department of social and health services shall provide
staff support and the use of the department's facilities as may be
required of the committee and work group.
(c) The work group shall include a total of twenty members that
consist of the following:
(i) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(ii) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(iii) The attorney general or the attorney general's designee;
(iv) A prosecutor appointed by the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys;
(v) A defender appointed by the Washington defender association or
the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers;
(vi) The state superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee;
(vii) The secretary of the department of corrections or the
secretary's designee;
(viii) The secretary of the department of social and health
services or the secretary's designee;
(ix) The chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's
designee;
(x) A city representative working through the association of
Washington cities, a nonprofit organization;
(xi) A representative of the Washington state association of
counties; and
(xii) Representatives, appointed by the governor, that shall
include, but are not limited to:
(A) City law enforcement;
(B) County law enforcement;
(C) Court administrators including but not limited to juvenile
court administrators; and
(D) Experts in gang or delinquency prevention.
(3)(a) The department of social and health services shall be
responsible for any costs incurred due to the convening of the work
group and the oversight and administration of the grant program.
(b) Nonlegislative members shall be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.250 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in
carrying out the duties of the work group in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060, within available resources.

PART II
NEAR-TERM RELIEF FOR 2008Two Million Dollar Washington Association Of Sheriffs And Police
Chiefs Grant Program To Communities
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 36.28A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) When funded, the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs shall establish a grant program to assist local law enforcement
agencies in the support of special enforcement emphasis targeting gang
crime. Grant applications shall be reviewed and awarded through peer
review panels. Grant applicants are encouraged to utilize
multijurisdictional efforts.
(2) Each grant applicant shall:
(a) Show a significant gang problem in the jurisdiction or
jurisdictions receiving the grant;
(b) Verify that grant awards are sufficient to cover increased
investigation, prosecution, and jail costs;
(c) Design an enforcement program that best suits the specific gang
problem in the jurisdiction or jurisdictions receiving the grant; and
(d) Demonstrate community coordination focusing on prevention,
intervention, and suppression.
(3) The cost of administering the grants shall not exceed four
percent of appropriated funding.

One Million Dollar Graffiti/Tagging Abatement Grant
NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 36.28A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) When funded, the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs shall establish a grant program to assist local law enforcement
agencies in the support of graffiti and tagging abatement programs
located in local communities. Grant applicants are encouraged to
utilize multijurisdictional efforts.
(2) Each graffiti or tagging abatement grant applicant shall:
(a) Demonstrate that a significant gang problem exists in the
jurisdiction or jurisdictions receiving the grant;
(b) Show how the funds will be used to dispose or eliminate any
current or ongoing tagging or graffiti within a specified time period;
(c) Specify how the funds will be used to reduce gang-related
graffiti or tagging within its community; and
(d) Show how the local citizens and business owners of the
community will benefit from the proposed graffiti or tagging abatement
process being presented in the grant application.
(3) The cost of administering the grants shall not exceed four
percent of funding.

PART III
STATEWIDE GANG INFORMATION DATABASE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 43.43
RCW to read as follows:
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall work
with the Washington state patrol to coordinate, designate, and
recommend the use of a statewide database accessible by law enforcement
agencies that utilizes existing resources, networks, or structures for
assessing and addressing the problems associated with criminal street
gangs.
(1) The gang database shall comply with federal regulations for
state law enforcement databases shared with other law enforcement
agencies, including auditing and access to data.
(2) The Washington state patrol, in consultation with the
Washington state association of sheriffs and police chiefs, shall adopt
uniform state criteria for entering gangs, gang members, and gang
associates into the database. Data on individuals may be entered only
based on reasonable suspicion of criminal activity or actual criminal
activity and must be supported by documentation, where documentation is
available.
(3) Information in the database shall be available to all local,
state, and federal general authority law enforcement agencies, the
Washington department of corrections, and the juvenile rehabilitation
administration of the Washington department of social and health
services solely for gang enforcement and for tracking gangs, gang
members, and gang incidents. Information in the database shall not be
available for public use.
(4) The database shall provide an internet-based multiagency,
multilocation, information-sharing application that operates in a
network fashion.
(5) The database shall be used solely as a law enforcement
intelligence tool and shall not be used as evidence in any criminal,
civil, or administrative proceeding. Law enforcement may use the
information within the database to obtain information external to the
database to formulate the probable cause necessary to make a stop or
arrest. The mere existence of information relating to an individual
within the database does not by itself justify a stop or arrest.
(6) Access to the database shall be determined by the chief
executive officer of each participating agency. Information about
specific individuals in the database shall be automatically expunged
if: (a) No new or updated information has been entered into the
database within the previous five years; (b) there are no pending
criminal charges against such person in any court in this state or
another state or in any federal court; (c) the person has not been
convicted of a new crime in this state, another state, or federal court
within the last five years; and (d) it has been five years since the
person completed his or her term of total confinement.
(7) Each law enforcement and criminal justice agency using the
database is required to:
(a) Identify a system administrator that is responsible for
annually auditing the use of the system within his or her respective
agency to ensure agency compliance with policies established for the
use of the database;
(b) Ensure that all users of the database receive training on the
use of the database before granting the users access to the database;
(c) Ensure that any information entered into the database relates
to a criminal street gang associate or gang member who is twelve years
old or older;
(d) Annually produce a gang threat assessment report including
available data sources, uniform crime reports, record management
systems, and entries into the statewide gang database. Local public
schools shall also be encouraged to provide data to the local gang
threat assessment report.
(8) The database and all contents in the database are confidential
and exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(9) Any public employee or public agency as defined in RCW
4.24.470, or units of local government and its employees, as provided
in RCW 36.28A.010, and the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs and its employees are immune from civil liability for
damages arising from incidents involving a person who has been included
in the database, unless it is shown that an employee acted with gross
negligence or bad faith.

Sec. 302 RCW 42.56.240 and 2005 c 274 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following investigative, law enforcement, and crime victim
information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this
chapter:
(1) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy;
(2) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the commission, if
disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or
property. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim,
or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such
desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with the commission
about any elected official or candidate for public office must be made
in writing and signed by the complainant under oath;
(3) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b);
(4) License applications under RCW 9.41.070; copies of license
applications or information on the applications may be released to law
enforcement or corrections agencies; ((and))
(5) Information revealing the identity of child victims of sexual
assault who are under age eighteen. Identifying information means the
child victim's name, address, location, photograph, and in cases in
which the child victim is a relative or stepchild of the alleged
perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and
the alleged perpetrator; and
(6) The statewide gang database referenced in section 301 of this
act.

PART IV
CIVIL INJUNCTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 The legislature recognizes that counsel is
not constitutionally required in civil actions (In re Marriage of King,
No. 79978-4 (Wash. Dec. 6, 2007)), but believes that it should be
required as a matter of public policy in actions brought against a
respondent criminal street gang member under section 403 of this act
who might risk the loss of procedural rights, in that the resulting
injunction may be enforced by summary order holding the respondent in
contempt of court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Gang" means "criminal street gang" as defined in RCW
9.94A.030.
(2) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity" has the same meaning
as that term is defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 (1) Equitable relief is authorized to
enjoin, abate, and prevent criminal street gang activity, whether it is
a private or public nuisance. Relief is authorized to enjoin criminal
street gang-related offenses defined in RCW 9.94A.030(17) and
associated noncriminal acts or acts which are known precursors to gang-related criminal acts as specified in subsection (2) of this section,
upon a showing of the following elements by a preponderance of the
evidence:
(a) A gang is named as a defendant and contains at least five
members, at least two of whom possess active leadership roles at the
time of application, and that any person sought to be enjoined is an
active or current member of the gang;
(b) The gang is a cohesive organization with a historical
relationship to the described geographical area for the past five years
or more immediately prior to the filing, and with known leadership,
membership, and criminal practices;
(c) The defendants and other gang members have committed, during
the five years immediately prior to the filing of the petition, a
pattern of criminal street gang activity within the described
geographical area. It is necessary to demonstrate a nexus between
criminal gang activity and crime in the area;
(d) As a result of the criminal activity of the gang or members, a
significant number of nongang members residing within the described
geographical area are in reasonable fear of their physical security or
that of their family members, or of significant damage to their
property to such an extent that they are intimidated or terrorized, and
are effectively prevented from living normal lives; and
(e) The plaintiffs have engaged in prevention and intervention
planning to serve a reasonable number of the gang's total membership
with prevention and intervention services to divert them from gang
activity.
(2) The complaint for equitable relief shall contain a statement of
specific relief requested and activities sought to be enjoined, which
may include:
(a) Associating with other gang members;
(b) Confronting, intimidating, annoying, harassing, threatening,
challenging, provoking, or assaulting any person;
(c) Confronting, intimidating, annoying, harassing, threatening,
challenging, provoking, or assaulting any person known to be a victim
or witness to gang activity;
(d) Possessing or knowingly remaining in the presence of anyone who
is in possession of any firearm, ammunition, or deadly weapon in a
public place;
(e) Possessing or knowingly remaining in the presence of anyone who
is in possession of any controlled substance or drug paraphernalia;
(f) Consuming alcohol in public;
(g) Being present on any private property without the written
consent of the owner;
(h) Defacing any public or private property or possessing graffiti
or tagging tools; or
(i) Violating any court defined curfew.
(3) The attorney general, the prosecuting attorney, or city
attorney or city prosecutor may maintain an action of an equitable
nature in the name of the state under this act. If a city applies for
equitable relief under this act, the city shall seek and obtain
approval of the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the city is
located to maintain the action.
(4) Service of the summons and complaint on the defendant gang may
be made by representative service of at least five active and current
members of the gang, at least two of whom possess active leadership
roles at the time of application. A person served in a representative
capacity and who appears may request, if indigent, that an attorney be
appointed to represent him or her at public expense. If the court
appoints counsel, the plaintiff shall pay the cost of representation.
Notice of this shall be provided in the summons. A person served in a
representative capacity of the gang need not testify, but may testify
and cross-examine witnesses and present testimony and other evidence on
his or her own behalf.
(5) A court of competent jurisdiction shall conduct an evidentiary
hearing on the complaint for equitable relief filed under this act
whether or not any person served in a representative capacity of the
gang appears to contest the issuance of the injunction. The plaintiff
must prove by a preponderance of the evidence all of the elements set
forth in subsection (1) of this section that the persons served in a
representative capacity are current and active members of the gang, and
that the specific remedies requested are reasonable and necessary.
(6) If after trial the court grants the request for relief, it
shall issue an appropriate order of injunction against the gang and any
members of the gang within the delineated geographical area as
authorized by this section.
(7) An injunction issued under this section is not effective as to
any person unless the plaintiff makes a showing to the court, which may
be made ex parte, that the person is an active or current member or
associate of the gang, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, and after
authorization by the court the person is served with personal notice of
the injunction. The notice must state that the person may request an
evidentiary hearing at which the plaintiffs must present evidence and
show by preponderance of evidence that the defendant is a member of the
gang. The individual need not testify, but may testify and may cross-examine witnesses for the plaintiffs and may present testimony and
other evidence on his or her own behalf. The plaintiff may seek to add
any person to an existing gang injunction at any time using the
procedures in this subsection, regardless of whether the person was a
gang member or associate at the time that the request for relief was
requested or granted.
(8) The final order of injunction shall contain an opt out
provision, by which an alleged member previously included in the order
may petition at any time for removal from the injunction after a period
of three years in which no act by the alleged member has resulted in
either a contempt finding or a conviction of crime, and further that
there is no criminal charge pending at the time of the hearing. In the
petition, the alleged member may request a court hearing on the matter.
(9) All actions to punish any violation of the injunction shall be
by prosecution of the crime of contempt of court. It is an affirmative
defense that the person charged was a gang member but that he or she
was no longer an active or current member of the gang at the time of
the alleged violation.
(10) No nonprofit or charitable organization which is conducting
its affairs with ordinary care and skill, no labor organization, and no
governmental entity, shall be enjoined or abated under this chapter.

PART V
ADDITIONAL MEASURES TO COMBAT GANG-RELATED CRIMEIncrease In Sentences For Adults Who Recruit Juveniles
Sec. 501 RCW 9.94A.533 and 2007 c 368 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence
ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.
(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the
standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid
sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the
seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by
seventy-five percent.
(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is
subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is
being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to
commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to
the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class
C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both,
and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements
under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has
previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July
23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection
(4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the
enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all
felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed
felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to
the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which
underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section
based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c)
of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender
has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after
July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or
subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly
weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of
the enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to
all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense
while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender
is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If
the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in
this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility,
and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under
chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(a) or (b) or 69.50.410;
(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(c), (d), or (e);
(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.
For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a
state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part
of that facility or county jail.
(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter
69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or
9.94A.605. All enhancements under this subsection shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, for all offenses
sentenced under this chapter.
(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence
range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each
prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.
(8)(a) The following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range for felony crimes committed on or after July 1,
2006, if the offense was committed with sexual motivation, as that term
is defined in RCW 9.94A.030. If the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense, the sexual motivation enhancement must be added
to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless
of which underlying offense is subject to a sexual motivation
enhancement. If the offender committed the offense with sexual
motivation and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the following additional times shall
be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2)
of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified
under RCW 9A.28.020:
(i) Two years for any felony defined under the law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both;
(ii) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a
class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or
both;
(iii) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both;
(iv) If the offender is being sentenced for any sexual motivation
enhancements under (i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection and the
offender has previously been sentenced for any sexual motivation
enhancements on or after July 1, 2006, under (i), (ii), and/or (iii) of
this subsection, all sexual motivation enhancements under this
subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all sexual
motivation enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be
served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other
sentencing provisions, including other sexual motivation enhancements,
for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not
a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(c) The sexual motivation enhancements in this subsection apply to
all felony crimes;
(d) If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds
the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a sexual motivation
enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the
statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence
representing the enhancement may not be reduced;
(e) The portion of the total confinement sentence which the
offender must serve under this subsection shall be calculated before
any earned early release time is credited to the offender;
(f) Nothing in this subsection prevents a sentencing court from
imposing a sentence outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW
9.94A.535.
(9) An additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the
standard sentence range for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073,
9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089 committed on
or after July 22, 2007, if the offender engaged, agreed, or offered to
engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the one-year
enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for
all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to the
enhancement. If the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079,
9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089, and the offender attempted,
solicited another, or conspired to engage, agree, or offer to engage
the victim in (([the])) the sexual conduct in return for a fee, an
additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence
range determined under subsection (2) of this section. For purposes of
this subsection, "sexual conduct" means sexual intercourse or sexual
contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.
(10)(a) For a person age eighteen or older convicted of any
criminal street gang-related felony offense for which the person
compensated, threatened, or solicited a minor in order to involve the
minor in the commission of the felony offense, the standard sentence
range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range
defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of
the completed crime, and multiplying the range by one hundred twenty-five percent. If the standard sentence range under this subsection
exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory
maximum sentence is the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender.
(b) This subsection does not apply to any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which involving a minor in the commission of
the felony offense is an element of the offense.
(c) The increased penalty specified in (a) of this subsection is
unavailable in the event that the prosecution gives notice that it will
seek an exceptional sentence based on an aggravating factor under RCW
9.94A.535.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In a prosecution of a criminal street gang-related felony
offense, the prosecution may file a special allegation that the felony
offense involved the compensation, threatening, or solicitation of a
minor in order to involve that minor in the commission of the felony
offense, as described under RCW 9.94A.533(10)(a).
(2) The state has the burden of proving a special allegation made
under this section beyond a reasonable doubt. If a jury is had, the
jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also find a special
verdict as to whether the criminal street gang-related felony offense
involved the compensation, threatening, or solicitation of a minor in
order to involve that minor in the commission of the felony offense.
If no jury is had, the court shall make a finding of fact as to whether
the criminal street gang-related felony offense involved the
compensation, threatening, or solicitation of a minor in order to
involve that minor in the commission of the felony offense.

Expansion Of The List Of Aggravating Factors
Sec. 503 RCW 9.94A.535 and 2007 c 377 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The court may impose a sentence outside the standard sentence range
for an offense if it finds, considering the purpose of this chapter,
that there are substantial and compelling reasons justifying an
exceptional sentence. Facts supporting aggravated sentences, other
than the fact of a prior conviction, shall be determined pursuant to
the provisions of RCW 9.94A.537.
Whenever a sentence outside the standard sentence range is imposed,
the court shall set forth the reasons for its decision in written
findings of fact and conclusions of law. A sentence outside the
standard sentence range shall be a determinate sentence.
If the sentencing court finds that an exceptional sentence outside
the standard sentence range should be imposed, the sentence is subject
to review only as provided for in RCW 9.94A.585(4).
A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.589 (1) and (2)
governing whether sentences are to be served consecutively or
concurrently is an exceptional sentence subject to the limitations in
this section, and may be appealed by the offender or the state as set
forth in RCW 9.94A.585 (2) through (6).
(1) Mitigating Circumstances - Court to Consider
The court may impose an exceptional sentence below the standard
range if it finds that mitigating circumstances are established by a
preponderance of the evidence. The following are illustrative only and
are not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional sentences.
(a) To a significant degree, the victim was an initiator, willing
participant, aggressor, or provoker of the incident.
(b) Before detection, the defendant compensated, or made a good
faith effort to compensate, the victim of the criminal conduct for any
damage or injury sustained.
(c) The defendant committed the crime under duress, coercion,
threat, or compulsion insufficient to constitute a complete defense but
which significantly affected his or her conduct.
(d) The defendant, with no apparent predisposition to do so, was
induced by others to participate in the crime.
(e) The defendant's capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his
or her conduct, or to conform his or her conduct to the requirements of
the law, was significantly impaired. Voluntary use of drugs or alcohol
is excluded.
(f) The offense was principally accomplished by another person and
the defendant manifested extreme caution or sincere concern for the
safety or well-being of the victim.
(g) The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.589
results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly excessive in light of
the purpose of this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(h) The defendant or the defendant's children suffered a continuing
pattern of physical or sexual abuse by the victim of the offense and
the offense is a response to that abuse.
(2) Aggravating Circumstances - Considered and Imposed by the Court
The trial court may impose an aggravated exceptional sentence
without a finding of fact by a jury under the following circumstances:
(a) The defendant and the state both stipulate that justice is best
served by the imposition of an exceptional sentence outside the
standard range, and the court finds the exceptional sentence to be
consistent with and in furtherance of the interests of justice and the
purposes of the sentencing reform act.
(b) The defendant's prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored
foreign criminal history results in a presumptive sentence that is
clearly too lenient in light of the purpose of this chapter, as
expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(c) The defendant has committed multiple current offenses and the
defendant's high offender score results in some of the current offenses
going unpunished.
(d) The failure to consider the defendant's prior criminal history
which was omitted from the offender score calculation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.525 results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too
lenient.
(3) Aggravating Circumstances - Considered by a Jury -Imposed by
the Court
Except for circumstances listed in subsection (2) of this section,
the following circumstances are an exclusive list of factors that can
support a sentence above the standard range. Such facts should be
determined by procedures specified in RCW 9.94A.537.
(a) The defendant's conduct during the commission of the current
offense manifested deliberate cruelty to the victim.
(b) The defendant knew or should have known that the victim of the
current offense was particularly vulnerable or incapable of resistance.
(c) The current offense was a violent offense, and the defendant
knew that the victim of the current offense was pregnant.
(d) The current offense was a major economic offense or series of
offenses, so identified by a consideration of any of the following
factors:
(i) The current offense involved multiple victims or multiple
incidents per victim;
(ii) The current offense involved attempted or actual monetary loss
substantially greater than typical for the offense;
(iii) The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication
or planning or occurred over a lengthy period of time; or
(iv) The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence,
or fiduciary responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current
offense.
(e) The current offense was a major violation of the Uniform
Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW (VUCSA), related to
trafficking in controlled substances, which was more onerous than the
typical offense of its statutory definition: The presence of ANY of
the following may identify a current offense as a major VUCSA:
(i) The current offense involved at least three separate
transactions in which controlled substances were sold, transferred, or
possessed with intent to do so;
(ii) The current offense involved an attempted or actual sale or
transfer of controlled substances in quantities substantially larger
than for personal use;
(iii) The current offense involved the manufacture of controlled
substances for use by other parties;
(iv) The circumstances of the current offense reveal the offender
to have occupied a high position in the drug distribution hierarchy;
(v) The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or
planning, occurred over a lengthy period of time, or involved a broad
geographic area of disbursement; or
(vi) The offender used his or her position or status to facilitate
the commission of the current offense, including positions of trust,
confidence or fiduciary responsibility (e.g., pharmacist, physician, or
other medical professional).
(f) The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.835.
(g) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of sexual abuse of
the same victim under the age of eighteen years manifested by multiple
incidents over a prolonged period of time.
(h) The current offense involved domestic violence, as defined in
RCW 10.99.020, and one or more of the following was present:
(i) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of psychological,
physical, or sexual abuse of the victim manifested by multiple
incidents over a prolonged period of time;
(ii) The offense occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or
the offender's minor children under the age of eighteen years; or
(iii) The offender's conduct during the commission of the current
offense manifested deliberate cruelty or intimidation of the victim.
(i) The offense resulted in the pregnancy of a child victim of
rape.
(j) The defendant knew that the victim of the current offense was
a youth who was not residing with a legal custodian and the defendant
established or promoted the relationship for the primary purpose of
victimization.
(k) The offense was committed with the intent to obstruct or impair
human or animal health care or agricultural or forestry research or
commercial production.
(l) The current offense is trafficking in the first degree or
trafficking in the second degree and any victim was a minor at the time
of the offense.
(m) The offense involved a high degree of sophistication or
planning.
(n) The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence, or
fiduciary responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current
offense.
(o) The defendant committed a current sex offense, has a history of
sex offenses, and is not amenable to treatment.
(p) The offense involved an invasion of the victim's privacy.
(q) The defendant demonstrated or displayed an egregious lack of
remorse.
(r) The offense involved a destructive and foreseeable impact on
persons other than the victim.
(s) The defendant committed the offense to obtain or maintain his
or her membership or to advance his or her position in the hierarchy of
an organization, association, or identifiable group.
(t) The defendant committed the current offense shortly after being
released from incarceration.
(u) The current offense is a burglary and the victim of the
burglary was present in the building or residence when the crime was
committed.
(v) The offense was committed against a law enforcement officer who
was performing his or her official duties at the time of the offense,
the offender knew that the victim was a law enforcement officer, and
the victim's status as a law enforcement officer is not an element of
the offense.
(w) The defendant committed the offense against a victim who was
acting as a good samaritan.
(x) The defendant committed the offense against a public official
or officer of the court in retaliation of the public official's
performance of his or her duty to the criminal justice system.
(y) The victim's injuries substantially exceed the level of bodily
harm necessary to satisfy the elements of the offense. This aggravator
is not an exception to RCW 9.94A.530(2).
(z)(i)(A) The current offense is theft in the first degree, theft
in the second degree, possession of stolen property in the first
degree, or possession of stolen property in the second degree; (B) the
stolen property involved is metal property; and (C) the property damage
to the victim caused in the course of the theft of metal property is
more than three times the value of the stolen metal property, or the
theft of the metal property creates a public hazard.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection, "metal property" means
commercial metal property or nonferrous metal property, as defined in
RCW 19.290.010.
(aa) The defendant committed the offense with the intent to
directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement, gain, profit,
or other advantage to or for a criminal street gang as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, its reputation, influence, or membership.

Requiring Community Custody For Unlawful Possession Of A Firearm
Sec. 504 RCW 9.94A.545 and 2006 c 128 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.650 and in subsection (2) of
this section, on all sentences of confinement for one year or less, in
which the offender is convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, a
crime against a person under RCW 9.94A.411, or felony violation of
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation
to commit such a crime, the court may impose up to one year of
community custody, subject to conditions and sanctions as authorized in
RCW 9.94A.715 and 9.94A.720. An offender shall be on community custody
as of the date of sentencing. However, during the time for which the
offender is in total or partial confinement pursuant to the sentence or
a violation of the sentence, the period of community custody shall
toll.
(2)(a) If the offender is guilty of failure to register under RCW
9A.44.130(((10))) (11)(a), the court shall impose a term of community
custody under RCW 9.94A.715.
(b) If the offender is a criminal street gang associate or member
and is found guilty of unlawful possession of a firearm under RCW
9.41.040, the court shall impose a term of community custody under RCW
9.94A.715.
(c) In a criminal case in which there has been a special
allegation, the state shall prove by a preponderance of the evidence
that the accused is a criminal street gang member or associate as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030 and has committed the crime of unlawful
possession of a firearm. The court shall make a finding of fact of
whether or not the accused was a criminal street gang member or
associate at the time of the commission of the crime, or if a jury
trial is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also
find a special verdict as to whether or not the accused was a criminal
street gang member or associate during the commission of the crime.

Sec. 505 RCW 9.94A.715 and 2006 c 130 s 2 and 2006 c 128 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department for a sex offense not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, a
violent offense, any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), an
offense involving the unlawful possession of a firearm under RCW
9.41.040, where the offender is a criminal street gang member or
associate, or a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW,
committed on or after July 1, 2000, or when a court sentences a person
to a term of confinement of one year or less for a violation of RCW
9A.44.130(((10))) (11)(a) committed on or after June 7, 2006, the court
shall in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence the
offender to community custody for the community custody range
established under RCW 9.94A.850 or up to the period of earned release
awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2), whichever is longer.
The community custody shall begin: (a) Upon completion of the term of
confinement; (b) at such time as the offender is transferred to
community custody in lieu of earned release in accordance with RCW
9.94A.728 (1) and (2); or (c) with regard to offenders sentenced under
RCW 9.94A.660, upon failure to complete or administrative termination
from the special drug offender sentencing alternative program. Except
as provided in RCW 9.94A.501, the department shall supervise any
sentence of community custody imposed under this section.
(2)(a) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions of
community custody shall include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4).
The conditions may also include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5).
The court may also order the offender to participate in rehabilitative
programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct reasonably related to
the circumstances of the offense, the offender's risk of reoffending,
or the safety of the community, and the department shall enforce such
conditions pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(b) As part of any sentence that includes a term of community
custody imposed under this subsection, the court shall also require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department under
RCW 9.94A.720. The department shall assess the offender's risk of
reoffense and may establish and modify additional conditions of the
offender's community custody based upon the risk to community safety.
In addition, the department may require the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and
to obey all laws. The department may impose electronic monitoring as
a condition of community custody for an offender sentenced to a term of
community custody under this section pursuant to a conviction for a sex
offense. Within the resources made available by the department for
this purpose, the department shall carry out any electronic monitoring
imposed under this section using the most appropriate technology given
the individual circumstances of the offender. As used in this section,
"electronic monitoring" means the monitoring of an offender using an
electronic offender tracking system including, but not limited to, a
system using radio frequency or active or passive global positioning
system technology.
(c) The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to
those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court
imposed conditions. The department shall notify the offender in
writing of any such conditions or modifications. In setting,
modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the
department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.
(3) If an offender violates conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to this section during community custody, the
department may transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement
status and impose other available sanctions as provided in RCW
9.94A.737 and 9.94A.740.
(4) Except for terms of community custody under RCW 9.94A.670, the
department shall discharge the offender from community custody on a
date determined by the department, which the department may modify,
based on risk and performance of the offender, within the range or at
the end of the period of earned release, whichever is later.
(5) At any time prior to the completion or termination of a sex
offender's term of community custody, if the court finds that public
safety would be enhanced, the court may impose and enforce an order
extending any or all of the conditions imposed pursuant to this section
for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for the crime as it
is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a condition
extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of
the sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.631 and may be punishable as
contempt of court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040. If the court
extends a condition beyond the expiration of the term of community
custody, the department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender's compliance with the condition.
(6) Within the funds available for community custody, the
department shall determine conditions and duration of community custody
on the basis of risk to community safety, and shall supervise offenders
during community custody on the basis of risk to community safety and
conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this subsection.
(7) By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of
a condition imposed or modified by the department, an offender may
request an administrative review under rules adopted by the department.
The condition shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds
that it is not reasonably related to any of the following: (a) The
crime of conviction; (b) the offender's risk of reoffending; or (c) the
safety of the community.

Making Subsequent Convictions Of Malicious Mischief 3 A Gross
Misdemeanor Offense
NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 A new section is added to chapter 9A.48
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal street gang tagging and graffiti
if he or she commits malicious mischief in the third degree under RCW
9A.48.090(1)(b) and he or she:
(a) Has multiple current convictions for malicious mischief in the
third degree offenses under RCW 9A.48.090(1)(b); or
(b) Has previously been convicted for a malicious mischief in the
third degree offense under RCW 9A.48.090(1)(b) or a comparable offense
under a municipal code provision of any city or town; and
(c) The current offense or one of the current offenses is a
"criminal street gang-related offense" as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.
(2) Criminal street gang tagging and graffiti is a gross
misdemeanor offense.

Civil Cause Of Action For Graffiti And Tagging
NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An adult or emancipated minor who commits criminal street gang
tagging and graffiti under section 506 of this act by causing physical
damage to the property of another is liable in addition to actual
damages, for a penalty to the owner in the amount of the value of the
damaged property not to exceed one thousand dollars, plus an additional
penalty of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than two hundred
dollars, plus all reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs expended
by the owner.
(2) A conviction for violation of section 506 of this act is not a
condition precedent to maintenance of a civil action authorized by this
section.
(3) An owner demanding payment of a penalty under subsection (1) of
this section shall give written notice to the person or persons from
whom the penalty is sought.

Sec. 508 RCW 10.22.010 and 1999 c 143 s 45 are each amended to
read as follows:
When a defendant is prosecuted in a criminal action for a
misdemeanor, other than a violation of section 506 of this act, for
which the person injured by the act constituting the offense has a
remedy by a civil action, the offense may be compromised as provided in
RCW 10.22.020, except when it was committed:
(1) By or upon an officer while in the execution of the duties of
his office((.));
(2) Riotously;
(3) With an intent to commit a felony; or
(4) By one family or household member against another as defined in
RCW 10.99.020 and was a crime of domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020.

Criminal Street Gang Definition
Sec. 509 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2006 c 139 s 5, 2006 c 124 s 1, 2006
c 122 s 7, 2006 c 73 s 5, and 2005 c 436 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670,
9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or 9.94A.545, served in the
community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and
activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department
shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and
modify conditions of community custody, in addition to those imposed by
the court, based upon the risk to community safety.
(6) "Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period
of community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW
9.94A.715, as established by the commission or the legislature under
RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.
(7) "Community placement" means that period during which the
offender is subject to the conditions of community custody and/or
postrelease supervision, which begins either upon completion of the
term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release.
Community placement may consist of entirely community custody, entirely
postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.
(8) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight hundred
eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private
school.
(9) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(10) "Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other
sentence conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW
16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the court finds that any offender has
a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense, the
conditions of supervision may, subject to available resources, include
treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state
supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be
considered the same as probation by other states.
(11) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(12) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(13) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(14) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(15) "Criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization,
association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or
informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol,
having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal
acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively
engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang
activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in
concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the
activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their
members or agents.
(16) "Criminal street gang associate or member" means any person
who actively participates in any criminal street gang and who
intentionally promotes, furthers, or assists in any criminal act by the
criminal street gang.
(17) "Criminal street gang-related offense" means any felony or
misdemeanor offense, whether in this state or elsewhere, that is
committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association
with any criminal street gang, or is committed with the intent to
promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by the gang, or is
committed for one or more of the following reasons:
(a) To gain admission, prestige, or promotion within the gang;
(b) To increase or maintain the gang's size, membership, prestige,
dominance, or control in any geographical area;
(c) To exact revenge or retribution for the gang or any member of
the gang;
(d) To obstruct justice, or intimidate or eliminate any witness
against the gang or any member of the gang;
(e) To directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement,
gain, profit, or other advantage for the gang, its reputation,
influence, or membership; or
(f) To provide the gang with any advantage in, or any control or
dominance over any criminal market sector, including, but not limited
to, manufacturing, delivering, or selling any controlled substance
(chapter 69.50 RCW); arson (chapter 9A.48 RCW); trafficking in stolen
property (chapter 9A.82 RCW); promoting prostitution (chapter 9A.88
RCW); human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100); or promoting pornography
(chapter 9.68 RCW).
(18) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(((16))) (19) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced
supervision designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and
compliance with sentence conditions, and in which the offender is
required to report daily to a specific location designated by the
department or the sentencing court.
(((17))) (20) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(((18))) (21) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states
with exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community supervision, the
number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or
dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of
confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a
determinate sentence.
(((19))) (22) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings
of an offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(((20))) (23) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a
sentencing option available to persons convicted of a felony offense
other than a violent offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for
the option under RCW 9.94A.660.
(((21))) (24) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(((22))) (25) "Earned release" means earned release from
confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(((23))) (26) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(((24))) (27) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((25))) (28) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specific period of time.
(((26))) (29) "First-time offender" means any person who has no
prior convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time
offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(((27))) (30) "Home detention" means a program of partial
confinement available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in
a private residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(((28))) (31) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money
that is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for
legal financial obligations which may include restitution to the
victim, statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as
assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal
drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the
offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for
vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a),
legal financial obligations may also include payment to a public agency
of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting in
the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(((29))) (32) "Most serious offense" means any of the following
felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.
(((30))) (33) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a
violent offense.
(((31))) (34) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(((32))) (35) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more
than one year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home
detention or work crew has been ordered by the court, in an approved
residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the balance of
the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and
home detention.
(((33))) (36) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity" means:
(a) The commission, attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation of, or any
prior juvenile adjudication of or adult conviction of, two or more of
the following criminal street gang-related offenses:
(i) Any "serious violent" felony offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, excluding Homicide by Abuse (RCW 9A.32.055) and Assault of
a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120);
(ii) Any "violent" offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030, excluding
Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130);
(iii) Deliver or Possession with Intent to Deliver a Controlled
Substance (chapter 69.50 RCW);
(iv) Any violation of the firearms and dangerous weapon act
(chapter 9.41 RCW);
(v) Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300);
(vi) Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310);
(vii) Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080);
(viii) Harassment where a subsequent violation or deadly threat is
made (RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b));
(ix) Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120);
(x) Any felony conviction by a person eighteen years of age or
older with a special finding of involving a juvenile in a felony
offense under section 502 of this act;
(xi) Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);
(xii) Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030);
(xiii) Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070);
(xiv) Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080);
(xv) Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065);
(xvi) Possession of a Stolen Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068);
(xvii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070);
(xviii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW
9A.56.075);
(xix) Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120);
(xx) Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130);
(xxi) Intimidating a Witness (RCW 9A.72.110);
(xxii) Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120);
(xxiii) Reckless Endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);
(xxiv) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);
(xxv) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020); or
(xxvi) Malicious Mischief 3 (RCW 9A.48.090);
(b) That at least one of the offenses listed in (a) of this
subsection shall have occurred after July 1, 2008;
(c) That the most recent committed offense listed in (a) of this
subsection occurred within three years of a prior offense listed in (a)
of this subsection; and
(d) Of the offenses that were committed in (a) of this subsection,
the offenses occurred on separate occasions or were committed by two or
more persons.
(37) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (((33))) (37)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(((34))) (38) "Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an
offender's community placement that is not community custody.
(((35))) (39) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime
was a stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the
perpetrator established or promoted a relationship with the victim
prior to the offense and the victimization of the victim was a
significant reason the perpetrator established or promoted the
relationship; or (c) the perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any public or private school
and the victim was a student of the school under his or her authority
or supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "school" does not
include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a
coach, trainer, volunteer, or other person in authority in any
recreational activity and the victim was a participant in the activity
under his or her authority or supervision; or (iii) a pastor, elder,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any church or religious
organization, and the victim was a member or participant of the
organization under his or her authority.
(((36))) (40) "Private school" means a school regulated under
chapter 28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.
(((37))) (41) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW
28A.150.010.
(((38))) (42) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered
by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(((39))) (43) "Risk assessment" means the application of an
objective instrument supported by research and adopted by the
department for the purpose of assessing an offender's risk of
reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of the harm done by the
offender, place and circumstances of the offender related to risk, the
offender's relationship to any victim, and any information provided to
the department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not
be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(((40))) (44) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an
attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((41))) (45) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent
offense and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((42))) (46) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(((11))) (12);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.080; or
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((43))) (47) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes
for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his
or her sexual gratification.
(((44))) (48) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing
court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(((45))) (49) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length
of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime
as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining
the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(((46))) (50) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the
offender twenty-four hours before the offense.
(((47))) (51) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the
physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized
under contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(((48))) (52) "Transition training" means written and verbal
instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender
during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of
the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include
instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the
offender's period of community custody.
(((49))) (53) "Victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or
property as a direct result of the crime charged.
(((50))) (54) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(((51))) (55) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement
consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community
that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(((52))) (56) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration
program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and
lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(((53))) (57) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Gangs In Schools
NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The task force on gangs in schools shall study and make
recommendations for the creation of a brochure to help teachers and
parents learn about criminal street gangs and criminal street gang
activity. In preparing the brochure, the task force, at a minimum,
shall include provisions on:
(a) The types of indicators that parents or others should be made
aware as an early warning signal of possible criminal street gang
involvement. Such indicators include changes in a child's behavior,
changes in friends or acquaintances, changes in dress apparel, graffiti
and tagging markings located around the home or immediate property, and
any other potential indicators as suggested by the task force;
(b) Possible places that a parent or teacher may go to seek help in
trying to prevent a child from joining the membership of a criminal
street gang or committing a criminal street gang offense; and
(c) Possible options that a person may have in order to provide
assistance to a criminal street gang member seeking to opt out of his
or her criminal street gang membership.
(2) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature and the superintendent of public instruction by
December 31, 2008.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall make the
brochures available for parents, teachers, students, and others
interested in trying to understand criminal street gang activity.
(4) The brochure shall be available in bilingual or multilingual
languages in those school districts where a significant segment of
students speak a language other than English and have a limited
proficiency in English.

PART VI
STATE PREEMPTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 (1) The state of Washington hereby fully
occupies and preempts the entire field of definitions used for purposes
of substantive criminal law relating to criminal street gangs, criminal
street gang-related offenses, criminal street gang associates and
members, and pattern of criminal street gang activity. These
definitions of "criminal street gang," "criminal street gang associate
or member," "criminal street gang-related offense," and "pattern of
criminal street gang activity" contained in RCW 9.94A.030 expressly
preempt any conflicting city or county codes or ordinances. Cities,
towns, counties, or other municipalities may enact laws and ordinances
relating to criminal street gangs that contain definitions that are
consistent with definitions pursuant to RCW 9.94A.030. Local laws and
ordinances that are inconsistent with the definitions shall not be
enacted and are preempted and repealed, regardless of the nature of the
code, charter, or home rule status of such city, town, county, or
municipality.
(2) The preemption provided in this chapter does not apply to
"gang" as defined in RCW 28A.600.455 under the common school provisions
act or "gang" as defined in RCW 59.18.030 under the landlord-tenant
act.
(3) The preemption provided for in this chapter does not restrict
the adoption or use of a uniform state definition of "gang," "gang
member," or "gang associate," for purposes of the creation and
maintenance of the statewide gang database for law enforcement
intelligence purposes under section 301 of this act.

PART VII
TEMPORARY WITNESS RELOCATION PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 A new section is added to chapter 43.31
RCW to read as follows:
The legislature recognizes that witnesses are often fearful of
testifying against criminal gang members. Witnesses may be subject to
harassment, intimidation, and threats. While the state does not ensure
protection of witnesses, the state intends to provide resources to
assist local prosecutors in combating gang-related crimes and to help
citizens perform their civic duty to testify in these cases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 A new section is added to chapter 43.31
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to available funds, the department of community, trade,
and economic development shall establish a temporary witness assistance
grant program for witnesses of felony criminal street gang-related
offenses. The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall develop a formula for distributing temporary witness assistance
grants and consideration shall primarily be given to those county
prosecutors that show that there is a significant gang problem in their
jurisdiction.
(2) As part of the temporary witness assistance grant program, the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall work in
collaboration with each local prosecuting attorney to determine how and
how much grant funding shall be distributed in order to reimburse
county prosecutors in assisting witnesses of felony gang-related
offenses with temporary assistance, relocation, and shelter.
(3) Each temporary witness assistance grant awarded shall be
limited to a maximum of five thousand dollars per witness of a felony
criminal street gang-related offense or for a period of no more than
three months.
(4) Based upon the prior approval of the department of community,
trade, and economic development, approved county prosecutor costs
incurred for providing temporary witness assistance shall be reimbursed
to the respective county prosecutor's office on a quarterly basis.
(5) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or
public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470 is immune from civil liability
for damages resulting from the temporary witness assistance program,
unless it is shown that the official, employee, or agency acted with
gross negligence or in bad faith.
(6) The cost for the department of community, trade, and economic
development to administer the grants shall not exceed three percent of
the total amount of funding appropriated to the temporary witness
assistance grant program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 If specific funding for purposes of
section 702 of this act, referencing section 702 of this act by bill or
chapter and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2008, in the
omnibus operating appropriations act, section 702 of this act is null
and void.

PART VIII
STUDY ON BEST PRACTICES TO REDUCE GANG INVOLVEMENT WHILE
INCARCERATED
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 A new section is added to chapter 72.09
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall study and establish best practices to
reduce gang involvement and recruitment among incarcerated offenders.
The department shall study and make recommendations regarding the
establishment of:
(a) Intervention programs within the institutions of the department
for offenders who are seeking to opt out of gangs. The intervention
programs shall include, but are not limited to, tattoo removal, anger
management, GED, and other interventions; and
(b) An intervention program to assist gang members with successful
reentry into the community.
(2) The department shall report to the legislature on its findings
and recommendations by January 1, 2009.

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 Part headings and subheadings used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 Sections 402 and 403 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 Section 601 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 9 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---