BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a prosecution for a sex offense, the prosecuting attorney
may file a special allegation that the offense was committed in a
school protection zone whenever sufficient admissible evidence exists,
which, when considered with the most plausible, reasonably foreseeable
defense that could be raised under the evidence, would justify a
finding by a reasonable fact-finder that the offense was committed in
a school protection zone.
(2) Once a special allegation has been made under this section, the
state has the burden to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the
offense was committed in a school protection zone. If a jury is had,
the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also find a special
verdict as to whether the offense was committed in a school protection
zone. If no jury is had, the court shall make a finding of fact as to
whether the offense was committed in a school protection zone.
(3) The prosecuting attorney may not withdraw a special allegation
under this section without approval of the court through an order of
dismissal of the special allegation. The court may not dismiss the
special allegation unless it finds that the order is necessary to
correct an error in the original charging decision or unless there are
evidentiary problems that make proving the special allegation doubtful.
(4) If there has been a special verdict or finding that a sex
offense was committed in a school protection zone under this section:
(a) The court may impose a fine up to twice the fine authorized by
law; and
(b) The statutory maximum sentence for the offense shall be twice
the statutory maximum sentence designated in RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.533 and 2007 c 368 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence
ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.
(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the
standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid
sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the
seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by
seventy-five percent.
(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is
subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is
being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to
commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to
the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class
C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both,
and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements
under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has
previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July
23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection
(4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the
enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all
felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed
felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to
the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which
underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section
based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c)
of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender
has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after
July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or
subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly
weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of
the enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to
all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense
while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender
is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If
the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in
this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility,
and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under
chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(a) or (b) or 69.50.410;
(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(c), (d), or (e);
(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.
For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a
state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part
of that facility or county jail.
(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter
69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or
9.94A.605. All enhancements under this subsection shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, for all offenses
sentenced under this chapter.
(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence
range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each
prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.
(8)(a) The following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range for felony crimes committed on or after July 1,
2006, if the offense was committed with sexual motivation, as that term
is defined in RCW 9.94A.030. If the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense, the sexual motivation enhancement must be added
to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless
of which underlying offense is subject to a sexual motivation
enhancement. If the offender committed the offense with sexual
motivation and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the following additional times shall
be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2)
of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified
under RCW 9A.28.020:
(i) Two years for any felony defined under the law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both;
(ii) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a
class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or
both;
(iii) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both;
(iv) If the offender is being sentenced for any sexual motivation
enhancements under (i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection and the
offender has previously been sentenced for any sexual motivation
enhancements on or after July 1, 2006, under (i), (ii), and/or (iii) of
this subsection, all sexual motivation enhancements under this
subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all sexual
motivation enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be
served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other
sentencing provisions, including other sexual motivation enhancements,
for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not
a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(c) The sexual motivation enhancements in this subsection apply to
all felony crimes;
(d) If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds
the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a sexual motivation
enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the
statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence
representing the enhancement may not be reduced;
(e) The portion of the total confinement sentence which the
offender must serve under this subsection shall be calculated before
any earned early release time is credited to the offender;
(f) Nothing in this subsection prevents a sentencing court from
imposing a sentence outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW
9.94A.535.
(9) An additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the
standard sentence range for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073,
9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089 committed on
or after July 22, 2007, if the offender engaged, agreed, or offered to
engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the one-year
enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for
all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to the
enhancement. If the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079,
9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089, and the offender attempted,
solicited another, or conspired to engage, agree, or offer to engage
the victim in (([the])) the sexual conduct in return for a fee, an
additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence
range determined under subsection (2) of this section. For purposes of
this subsection, "sexual conduct" means sexual intercourse or sexual
contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.
(10) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the
standard range for any sex offense with a special verdict or finding
that the offense was committed in a school protection zone under
section 1 of this act. An enhancement imposed under this subsection is
mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including any other
enhancements imposed under this section. If the standard sentence
range under this subsection exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for
the offense: (a) The statutory maximum sentence shall be the
presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender; and
(b) the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be
reduced.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2006 c 139 s 5, 2006 c 124 s 1, 2006 c
122 s 7, 2006 c 73 s 5, and 2005 c 436 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670,
9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or 9.94A.545, served in the
community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and
activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department
shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and
modify conditions of community custody, in addition to those imposed by
the court, based upon the risk to community safety.
(6) "Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period
of community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW
9.94A.715, as established by the commission or the legislature under
RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.
(7) "Community placement" means that period during which the
offender is subject to the conditions of community custody and/or
postrelease supervision, which begins either upon completion of the
term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release.
Community placement may consist of entirely community custody, entirely
postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.
(8) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight hundred
eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private
school.
(9) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(10) "Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other
sentence conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW
16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the court finds that any offender has
a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense, the
conditions of supervision may, subject to available resources, include
treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state
supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be
considered the same as probation by other states.
(11) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(12) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(13) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(14) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(15) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(16) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision
designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with
sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report
daily to a specific location designated by the department or the
sentencing court.
(17) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(18) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with
exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community supervision, the
number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or
dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of
confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a
determinate sentence.
(19) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(20) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent
offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW
9.94A.660.
(21) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(22) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as
provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(23) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(24) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(25) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of
time.
(26) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior
convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender
waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(27) "Home detention" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private
residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(28) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is
ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal
financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim,
statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed
pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds,
court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any
other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result
of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense
of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction,
subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(29) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or
a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.
(30) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent
offense.
(31) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(32) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one
year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract
by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention or
work crew has been ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for
a substantial portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in
the community. Partial confinement includes work release, home
detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.
(33) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (33)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(34) "Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's
community placement that is not community custody.
(35) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime was a
stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the perpetrator
established or promoted a relationship with the victim prior to the
offense and the victimization of the victim was a significant reason
the perpetrator established or promoted the relationship; or (c) the
perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person
in authority in any public or private school and the victim was a
student of the school under his or her authority or supervision. For
purposes of this subsection, "school" does not include home-based
instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a coach, trainer,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any recreational activity
and the victim was a participant in the activity under his or her
authority or supervision; or (iii) a pastor, elder, volunteer, or other
person in authority in any church or religious organization, and the
victim was a member or participant of the organization under his or her
authority.
(36) "Private school" means a school regulated under chapter
28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.
(37) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.
(38) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(39) "Risk assessment" means the application of an objective
instrument supported by research and adopted by the department for the
purpose of assessing an offender's risk of reoffense, taking into
consideration the nature of the harm done by the offender, place and
circumstances of the offender related to risk, the offender's
relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be
based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(40) "School protection zone" means the area inside a public or
private school, inside a school bus as defined in RCW 69.50.435,
within one thousand feet of a school bus route stop designated by a
school district, or within one thousand feet of the grounds of a public
or private school.
(41) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an
attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((41))) (42) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent
offense and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((42))) (43) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(((11)))(12);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.080; or
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((43))) (44) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes
for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his
or her sexual gratification.
(((44))) (45) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing
court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(((45))) (46) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length
of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime
as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining
the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(((46))) (47) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the
offender twenty-four hours before the offense.
(((47))) (48) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the
physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized
under contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(((48))) (49) "Transition training" means written and verbal
instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender
during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of
the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include
instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the
offender's period of community custody.
(((49))) (50) "Victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or
property as a direct result of the crime charged.
(((50))) (51) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(((51))) (52) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement
consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community
that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(((52))) (53) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration
program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and
lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(((53))) (54) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2007 c 483 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, the term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned release
time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by
the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency
shall not credit the offender with earned release credits in advance of
the offender actually earning the credits. Any program established
pursuant to this section shall allow an offender to earn early release
credits for presentence incarceration. If an offender is transferred
from a county jail to the department, the administrator of a county
jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time spent
in custody at the facility and the amount of earned release time. An
offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23,
1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good time credits
or earned release time for that portion of his or her sentence that
results from any deadly weapon enhancements. An offender convicted of
a sex offense that involves any applicable school protection zone
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533(10) may not receive any earned release
time for the portion of his or her sentence that results from the
enhancement.
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In the
case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex
offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 2003,
the aggregate earned release time may not exceed ten percent of the
sentence.
(b)(i) In the case of an offender who qualifies under (b)(ii) of
this subsection, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed fifty
percent of the sentence.
(ii) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time under this subsection (1)(b) if he or
she:
(A) Is classified in one of the two lowest risk categories under
(b)(iii) of this subsection;
(B) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(C) Has no prior conviction for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(D) Participates in programming or activities as directed by the
offender's individual reentry plan as provided under RCW 72.09.270 to
the extent that such programming or activities are made available by
the department; and
(E) Has not committed a new felony after July 22, 2007, while under
community supervision, community placement, or community custody.
(iii) For purposes of determining an offender's eligibility under
this subsection (1)(b), the department shall perform a risk assessment
of every offender committed to a correctional facility operated by the
department who has no current or prior conviction for a sex offense, a
violent offense, a crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411,
a felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020, a
violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary), a violation of, or
an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.401 by
manufacture or delivery or possession with intent to deliver
methamphetamine, or a violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled
substance to a minor). The department must classify each assessed
offender in one of four risk categories between highest and lowest
risk.
(iv) The department shall recalculate the earned release time and
reschedule the expected release dates for each qualified offender under
this subsection (1)(b).
(v) This subsection (1)(b) applies retroactively to eligible
offenders serving terms of total confinement in a state correctional
facility as of July 1, 2003.
(vi) This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to offenders convicted
after July 1, 2010.
(c) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence;
(2)(a) A person convicted of a sex offense or an offense
categorized as a serious violent offense, assault in the second degree,
vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, assault of a child in the second
degree, any crime against persons where it is determined in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed before July 1, 2000, may become
eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the department, for
transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned release time
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(b) A person convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, any
crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or a felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or after July 1, 2000, may
become eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the
department, for transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned
release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(c) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community placement or community
custody terms eligible for release to community custody status in lieu
of earned release shall provide an approved residence and living
arrangement prior to release to the community;
(d) The department may deny transfer to community custody status in
lieu of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
if the department determines an offender's release plan, including
proposed residence location and living arrangements, may violate the
conditions of the sentence or conditions of supervision, place the
offender at risk to violate the conditions of the sentence, place the
offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk to victim safety or
community safety. The department's authority under this section is
independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence or statutory
provision regarding conditions for community custody or community
placement;
(e) If the department denies transfer to community custody status
in lieu of earned early release pursuant to (d) of this subsection, the
department may transfer an offender to partial confinement in lieu of
earned early release up to three months. The three months in partial
confinement is in addition to that portion of the offender's term of
confinement that may be served in partial confinement as provided in
this section;
(f) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(4)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section;
(3) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(4)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious enough to
require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is physically incapacitated due to age or the medical condition;
and
(iii) Granting the extraordinary medical placement will result in
a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the
monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time;
(5) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(6) No more than the final six months of the offender's term of
confinement may be served in partial confinement designed to aid the
offender in finding work and reestablishing himself or herself in the
community. This is in addition to that period of earned early release
time that may be exchanged for partial confinement pursuant to
subsection (2)(e) of this section;
(7) The governor may pardon any offender;
(8) The department may release an offender from confinement any
time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section; and
(9) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an offender
sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a
mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not be released
from total confinement before the completion of the listed mandatory
minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless allowed
under RCW 9.94A.540, however persistent offenders are not eligible for
extraordinary medical placement.

--- END ---