BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.73 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of rules of appellate procedure
2.2(b)(2) and the rules for appeal of decisions of courts of limited
jurisdiction 2.2(b)(2), in a criminal case, the state of Washington
may, before jeopardy has attached, appeal as a matter of right a
decision or order suppressing or excluding evidence, if the prosecution
certifies to the trial court that the appeal is not taken for purpose
of delay and that the evidence is a substantial proof of a fact
material in the proceeding.
(2) Failure to seek review as provided in subsection (1) of this
section shall not preclude the state of Washington from exercising any
other right of appeal or review established by the Constitution,
statute, the rules of appellate procedure, or the rules for appeal of
decisions of courts of limited jurisdiction.

--- END ---