BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.46.130 and 1998 c 239 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no employer shall
employ any of his or her employees for a work week longer than forty
hours unless such employee receives compensation for his or her
employment in excess of the hours above specified at a rate not less
than one and one-half times the regular rate at which he or she is
employed.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) Any person exempted pursuant to RCW 49.46.010(5). The payment
of compensation or provision of compensatory time off in addition to a
salary shall not be a factor in determining whether a person is
exempted under RCW 49.46.010(5)(c);
(b) Employees who request compensating time off in lieu of overtime
pay;
(c) Any individual employed as a seaman whether or not the seaman
is employed on a vessel other than an American vessel;
(d) Seasonal employees who are employed at concessions and
recreational establishments at agricultural fairs, including those
seasonal employees employed by agricultural fairs, within the state
provided that the period of employment for any seasonal employee at any
or all agricultural fairs does not exceed fourteen working days a year;
(e) Any individual employed as a motion picture projectionist if
that employee is covered by a contract or collective bargaining
agreement which regulates hours of work and overtime pay;
(f) An individual employed as a truck or bus driver who is subject
to the provisions of the Federal Motor Carrier Act (49 U.S.C. Sec. 3101
et seq. and 49 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), if the compensation system
under which the truck or bus driver is paid includes overtime pay,
reasonably equivalent to that required by this subsection, for working
longer than forty hours per week;
(g) Any individual employed (i) on a farm, in the employ of any
person, in connection with the cultivation of the soil, in connection
with dairying, or in connection with raising or harvesting any
agricultural or horticultural commodity, including raising, shearing,
feeding, caring for, training, and management of livestock, bees,
poultry, and furbearing animals and wildlife, or in the employ of the
owner or tenant or other operator of a farm in connection with the
operation, management, conservation, improvement, or maintenance of
such farm and its tools and equipment; ((or)) (ii) ((in)) by the owner
or operator of a farm in any practices as an incident to or in
conjunction with farming operations, including packing, packaging,
grading, storing or delivering to storage, or to market or to a carrier
for transportation to market, any agricultural or horticultural
commodity produced by the owner or operator; ((or)) (iii) in
transporting or preparing for transportation (A) fruit or vegetables in
their raw or natural state from the farm to the place of first
processing or marketing or (B) individuals employed in the harvesting
of fruits and vegetables between the farm and any point within the
state; (iv) by the owner or operator of a farm in connection with
livestock auction operations as an adjunct to the raising of livestock
if the individual is (A) primarily employed during the work week by the
owner or operator of the farm who raises the livestock and (B) paid for
his or her employment in connection with such livestock auction
operations at a wage rate not less than that prescribed by RCW
49.46.020; (v) by the owner or operator of a farm in commercial
canning, commercial freezing, or any other commercial processing((, or
with respect to services performed in connection with the cultivation,
raising, harvesting, and processing of oysters)) of any agricultural or
horticultural commodity produced by the owner or operator; or (vi) in
connection with any agricultural or horticultural commodity after its
delivery to a terminal market for distribution for consumption;
(h) Any individual employed in the catching, taking, propagating,
harvesting, or farming of any kind of fish, shellfish, crustacea,
sponges, seaweeds, or other aquatic forms of animal and vegetable life,
or in the first processing, canning, or packing such marine products at
sea as an incident to, or in conjunction with, such fishing operations,
including the going to and returning from work and loading and
unloading when performed by that individual;
(i) Any individual employed in planting or tending trees,
surveying, or felling timber, or in preparing or transporting logs or
other forestry products to the mill, processing plant, railroad, or
other transportation terminal, if the number of employees in such
forestry or lumbering operations does not exceed eight;
(j) Any industry in which federal law provides for an overtime
payment based on a work week other than forty hours. However, the
provisions of the federal law regarding overtime payment based on a
work week other than forty hours shall nevertheless apply to employees
covered by this section without regard to the existence of actual
federal jurisdiction over the industrial activity of the particular
employer within this state. For the purposes of this subsection,
"industry" means a trade, business, industry, or other activity, or
branch, or group thereof, in which individuals are gainfully employed
(section 3(h) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended
(Public Law 93-259));
(((i))) (k) Any hours worked by an employee of a carrier by air
subject to the provisions of subchapter II of the Railway Labor Act (45
U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq.), when such hours are voluntarily worked by the
employee pursuant to a shift-trading practice under which the employee
has the opportunity in the same or in other work weeks to reduce hours
worked by voluntarily offering a shift for trade or reassignment.
(3) No employer shall be deemed to have violated subsection (1) of
this section by employing any employee of a retail or service
establishment for a work week in excess of the applicable work week
specified in subsection (1) of this section if:
(a) The regular rate of pay of the employee is in excess of one and
one-half times the minimum hourly rate required under RCW 49.46.020;
and
(b) More than half of the employee's compensation for a
representative period, of not less than one month, represents
commissions on goods or services.
In determining the proportion of compensation representing
commissions, all earnings resulting from the application of a bona fide
commission rate is to be deemed commissions on goods or services
without regard to whether the computed commissions exceed the draw or
guarantee.
(4) No employer of commissioned salespeople primarily engaged in
the business of selling automobiles, trucks, recreational vessels,
recreational vessel trailers, recreational vehicle trailers,
recreational campers, manufactured housing, or farm implements to
ultimate purchasers shall violate subsection (1) of this section with
respect to such commissioned salespeople if the commissioned
salespeople are paid the greater of:
(a) Compensation at the hourly rate, which may not be less than the
rate required under RCW 49.46.020, for each hour worked up to forty
hours per week, and compensation of one and one-half times that hourly
rate for all hours worked over forty hours in one week; or
(b) A straight commission, a salary plus commission, or a salary
plus bonus applied to gross salary.
(5) No public agency shall be deemed to have violated subsection
(1) of this section with respect to the employment of any employee in
fire protection activities or any employee in law enforcement
activities (including security personnel in correctional institutions)
if: (a) In a work period of twenty-eight consecutive days the employee
receives for tours of duty which in the aggregate exceed two hundred
forty hours; or (b) in the case of such an employee to whom a work
period of at least seven but less than twenty-eight days applies, in
his or her work period the employee receives for tours of duty which in
the aggregate exceed a number of hours which bears the same ratio to
the number of consecutive days in his or her work period as two hundred
forty hours bears to twenty-eight days; compensation at a rate not less
than one and one-half times the regular rate at which he or she is
employed.

--- END ---