BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.210 and 2001 c 216 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The attorney general's office may provide information,
technical assistance, and training on the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The attorney general's office shall publish, and update when
appropriate, a pamphlet explaining this chapter written in plain
language.
(3) The attorney general, by February 1, 2009, shall adopt by rule
an advisory model rule for public agencies, as defined in RCW
42.30.020, addressing the following subjects:
(a) Agencies subject to the open public meetings act;
(b) Meetings and actions required to be conducted openly;
(c) Notice requirements for meetings;
(d) Matters that may be conducted in closed session; and
(e) Any other issues pertaining to open public meetings as
determined by the attorney general.
(4) The attorney general, in his or her discretion, may from time
to time revise the model rule.

--- END ---