BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that of all the
challenges confronting the African-American community, perhaps none is
more critical to the future than the education of African-American
children. The data regarding inequities, disproportionality, and gaps
in achievement is alarming no matter which indicators are used:
(a) The gap in reading test scores between African-American and
white students on the tenth grade Washington assessment of student
learning is twenty percentage points, with only two-thirds of African-American students able to meet the upcoming graduation standard in
reading on the first attempt compared to eighty-five percent of white
students. African-American students are lagging behind other student
groups in reading improvement.
(b) African-American students continue to score lowest among
student groups in high school mathematics, with only twenty-three
percent able to meet state standard on the first attempt, a thirty-three percentage point lag behind white students who have a fifty-six
percent met-standard rate.
(c) One-fourth of African-American students who enter ninth grade
will have dropped out of school by the time their peers graduate in
twelfth grade. This measure does not account for the children who,
facing significant educational challenges and barriers, have already
grown disparaged before the end of middle or junior high school.
(2) The legislature further finds that although there are multiple
initiatives broadly intended to improve student achievement, including
a small number of initiatives to address the achievement gap for
disadvantaged students generally, there are only a select few efforts
targeted to the challenges of African-American students or designed
specifically to engage parents and leaders in the African-American
community. The efficacy of general supplemental programs in helping
African-American students is unknown. A thoughtful, comprehensive, and
inclusive strategy for African-American students has not been created.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to commission and then
implement a clear, concise, and intentional plan of action, with
specific strategies and performance benchmarks, to ensure that African-American students meet or exceed all academic standards and are
prepared for a quality life and responsible citizenship in the twenty-first century.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The center for the improvement of
student learning in the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall convene an advisory committee to craft a strategic
plan to address the achievement gap for African-American students.
(a) The advisory committee shall be comprised of fifteen members
including educators, parents, representatives of community-based
organizations, a representative from the Washington state commission on
African-American affairs, and a representative from the office of the
education ombudsman. Five members shall be appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives; five members shall be appointed by the
secretary of the senate; and the remaining members shall be appointed
by the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) Members of the advisory committee shall serve without
compensation, but are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(2) The advisory committee shall conduct a detailed analysis of the
achievement gap for African-American students; examine the extent to
which current initiatives address the needs of African-American
students; craft a strategic plan with school and community-based
strategies to improve educational outcomes for African-American
students; and develop performance improvement measures and benchmarks
to monitor progress. The committee shall:
(a) Examine detailed data on achievement indicators based on grade
level, school, gender, migrant status, and income status for African-American students to identify any trends or variances. The Washington
state institute for public policy shall assist the committee in
providing data analysis under this subsection (2)(a);
(b) Examine current federal, state, school, and community-based
initiatives intended to improve student achievement and identify best
practices and promising programs specifically for African-American
students, including initiatives in other states as necessary;
(c) Develop a comprehensive plan complete with a specific set of
strategies, programs, and interventions to improve the educational
attainment of African-American students, along with the funding
necessary for implementation. The plan would include, but not be
limited to:
(i) Outreach and involvement of community-based organizations,
especially organizations focused on family engagement and empowerment;
(ii) Implementation of proven strategies from other states and
local jurisdictions with an emphasis on meeting or exceeding academic
standards in mathematics and sciences;
(iii) Strategies to encourage the engagement and commitment of
leaders in the affected communities; and
(iv) Implementation of suggestions from the black education
strategy roundtable regarding family engagement and empowerment
activities and capacity and community-based supplemental education; and
(d) Develop educational performance measures and improvement
benchmarks to be monitored over time to gauge the progress and success
of the strategic plan.
(3) The center for the improvement of student learning and the
advisory committee shall make a final report to the superintendent of
public instruction, the state board of education, the governor, the
P-20 council, and the education committees of the legislature by
December 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning in January 2010, the center for the improvement of
student learning shall report annually to the superintendent of public
instruction, the state board of education, the governor, the P-20
council, and the education committees of the legislature on the
implementation status of strategies to address the achievement gap for
Africa-American students and on the progress in improvement of
education performance measures for African-American students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---