BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, despite
improvements in student achievement as measured by the Washington
assessment of student learning, there remain significant numbers of
secondary students unable to meet state standards in reading. For the
class of 2008, more than nine thousand students still have not met the
reading standard. In the class of 2009, nearly seventeen thousand did
not meet the standard. Reading remains one of the most fundamental
academic skills for students to be successful in further schooling, in
the workplace, and as a citizen. But at the secondary level, English
teachers are more likely to be trained in such topics as literary
analysis, essay and term paper writing, and world literature. There is
a need for targeted interventions at the secondary level that provide
struggling students with core skills in reading comprehension.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate funds for
schools meeting the criteria of subsection (2) of this section to
implement secondary reading intervention programs as described under
subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Schools are eligible to receive allocations under this section
if more than ten students in the school scored well below standard
(level one) in reading on the previous administration of the tenth
grade Washington assessment of student learning.
(3) Schools receiving allocations under this section shall
implement secondary reading intervention programs that:
(a) Include staff development and training, materials and
curricula, and intensive assistance for students;
(b) Focus on providing students with core reading skills, including
comprehension and fluency;
(c) Demonstrate evidence of prior success in dramatically improving
the reading levels of secondary school or adult students.
(4) The amount of the allocations under this section shall be as
established in the omnibus appropriations act.

--- END ---