BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.103 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a fire or public safety incident involving a commercial
vessel occurs on navigable waters of the state, within or outside of
the territorial limits of any fire protection district as established
by chapter 52.20 RCW, city or town as defined by RCW 35.103.020, or
regional fire service authority as established by chapter 52.26 RCW,
and marine rescue and firefighting services are provided, with or
without a contract to do so, the responding fire protection agency may
recover from the person or vessel receiving the marine rescue and
firefighting services the following:
(a) The contract or reasonable value of the use, including repairs
and depreciation, of the apparatus and equipment used;
(b) The cost of fire protection personnel engaged to provide marine
rescue and firefighting services as a result of the fire or public
safety incident; and
(c) All other costs reasonably incurred in providing the marine
rescue and firefighting services as a result of the fire or public
safety incident.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Navigable waters of the state" shall be within the meaning of
RCW 88.46.010(11); and
(b) "Commercial vessel" shall mean a "covered vessel" as defined by
RCW 88.46.010(5).
(3) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to preempt or limit the
cost recovery rights and remedies available to a fire protection agency
by other state or federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 52.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a fire or public safety incident involving a commercial
vessel occurs on navigable waters of the state, within or outside of
the territorial limits of any fire protection district as established
by chapter 52.20 RCW, city or town as defined by RCW 35.103.020, or
regional fire service authority as established by chapter 52.26 RCW,
and marine rescue and firefighting services are provided, with or
without a contract to do so, the responding fire protection agency may
recover from the person or vessel receiving the marine rescue and
firefighting services the following:
(a) The contract or reasonable value of the use, including repairs
and depreciation, of the apparatus and equipment used;
(b) The cost of fire protection personnel engaged to provide marine
rescue and firefighting services as a result of the fire or public
safety incident; and
(c) All other costs reasonably incurred in providing the marine
rescue and firefighting services as a result of the fire or public
safety incident.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Navigable waters of the state" shall be within the meaning of
RCW 88.46.010(11); and
(b) "Commercial vessel" shall mean a "covered vessel" as defined by
RCW 88.46.010(5).
(3) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to preempt or limit the
cost recovery rights and remedies available to a fire protection agency
by other state or federal law.

--- END ---