BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 63.60.010 and 1998 c 274 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every individual or personality((, as the case may be,)) has a
property right in the use of his or her name, voice, signature,
photograph, or likeness((, and)). Such right exists in the name,
voice, signature, photograph, or likeness of individuals or
personalities deceased before, on, or after June 11, 1998. This right
shall be freely transferable, assignable, and licensable, in whole or
in part, by any otherwise permissible form of inter vivos or
testamentary transfer, including without limitation a will or other
testamentary instrument, trust, contract, community property agreement,
or cotenancy with survivorship provisions or payable-on-death
provisions, whether the will or other testamentary instrument, trust,
contract, community property agreement, or cotenancy document is
entered into or executed before, on, or after June 11, 1998, by the
deceased individual or personality or by any subsequent owner of the
deceased individual's or personality's rights as recognized by this
chapter; or, if none is applicable, then the owner of the rights shall
be determined under the laws of intestate succession applicable to
interests in intangible personal property. The property right does not
expire upon the death of the individual or personality, ((as the case
may be)) regardless of whether the law of the domicile, residence, or
citizenship of the individual or personality at the time of death or
otherwise recognizes a similar or identical property right. The right
exists whether or not it was commercially exploited by the individual
or the personality during the individual's or the personality's
lifetime. The rights recognized under this chapter shall be deemed to
have existed before June 11, 1998, and at the time of death of any
deceased individual or personality or subsequent successor of their
rights for the purpose of determining the person or persons entitled to
these property rights as provided in RCW 63.60.030. This chapter is
intended to apply to all individuals and personalities, living and
deceased, regardless of place of domicile or place of domicile at time
of death.

Sec. 2 RCW 63.60.020 and 2004 c 71 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Deceased individual" means any individual, regardless of the
individual's place of domicile, residence, or citizenship at the time
of death or otherwise, who has died within ten years before January 1,
1998, or thereafter.
(2) "Deceased personality" means any individual, regardless of the
personality's place of domicile, residence, or citizenship at the time
of death or otherwise, whose name, voice, signature, photograph, or
likeness had commercial value at the time of his or her death, whether
or not during the lifetime of that individual he or she used his or her
name, voice, signature, photograph, or likeness on or in products,
merchandise or goods, or for purposes of advertising or selling, or
soliciting the purchase or sale of, products, merchandise, goods, or
services. A "deceased personality" includes, without limitation, any
such individual who has died within fifty years before January 1, 1998,
or thereafter.
(((2))) (3) "Fund-raising" means an organized activity to solicit
donations of money or other goods or services from persons or entities
by an organization, company, or public entity. A fund-raising activity
does not include a live, public performance by an individual or group
of individuals for which money is received in solicited or unsolicited
gratuities.
(((3))) (4) "Individual" means a natural person, living or dead.
(((4))) (5) "Likeness" means an image, painting, sketching, model,
diagram, or other clear representation, other than a photograph, of an
individual's face, body, or parts thereof, or the distinctive
appearance, gestures, or mannerisms of an individual.
(((5))) (6) "Name" means the actual or assumed name, or nickname,
of a living or deceased individual that is intended to identify that
individual.
(((6))) (7) "Person" means any natural person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, joint stock company, syndicate, receiver,
common law trust, conservator, statutory trust, or any other concern by
whatever name known or however organized, formed, or created, and
includes not-for-profit corporations, associations, educational and
religious institutions, political parties, and community, civic, or
other organizations.
(((7))) (8) "Personality" means any individual whose name, voice,
signature, photograph, or likeness has commercial value, whether or not
that individual uses his or her name, voice, signature, photograph, or
likeness on or in products, merchandise, or goods, or for purposes of
advertising or selling, or solicitation of purchase of, products,
merchandise, goods, or services.
(((8))) (9) "Photograph" means any photograph or photographic
reproduction, still or moving, or any videotape, online or live
television transmission, of any individual, so that the individual is
readily identifiable.
(((9))) (10) "Signature" means the one handwritten or otherwise
legally binding form of an individual's name, written or authorized by
that individual, that distinguishes the individual from all others.

Sec. 3 RCW 63.60.030 and 1998 c 274 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every individual or personality((, as the case may be,)) has a
property right in the use of his or her name, voice, signature,
photograph, or likeness((, and)). Such right shall be freely
transferable, assignable, and licensable, in whole or in part, by
contract or inter vivos transfer((, and)). This right shall not expire
upon the death of the individual or personality, ((as the case may be,
so protected)) but shall ((pass)) be owned and enforceable by the
following successors, heirs, or other transferees of living or deceased
individuals or personalities:
(a) Except where such rights were transferred or assigned before
such deceased personality's death by means of any contract or trust
instrument, the right shall be owned by the person entitled to such
rights under the deceased individual's or personality's((, as the case
may be,)) last will and testament or, if none, then by the
beneficiaries or heirs under the laws of intestate succession
applicable to interests in intangible personal property generally of
the individual's or personality's((, as the case may be,)) domicile,
regardless of whether the law of the domicile of the deceased
individual or personality, at the time of death, or thereafter,
recognizes a similar or identical property right; or
(b) If the deceased individual or personality((, as the case may
be,)) transferred or assigned any interest in the personality rights
during his or her life by means of any contract or trust instrument,
then the transferred or assigned interest shall ((pass)) be held as
follows:
(i) If the transferred or assigned interest was held in trust, in
accordance with the terms of the trust;
(ii) If the interest is subject to a cotenancy with any
survivorship provisions or payable-on-death provisions, in accordance
with those provisions;
(iii) If the interest is subject to any contract, including without
limitation an exclusive license, assignment, or a community property
agreement, in accordance with the terms of the applicable contract or
contracts;
(iv) If the interest has been transferred or assigned to a third
person in a form that is not addressed ((earlier)) in this section, by
the individual or personality, or the successor, heir, or other
transferee of the living or deceased individual or personality, then
the interest may be transferred, assigned, or licensed by such third
person, in whole or in part, by any otherwise permissible form of inter
vivos or testamentary transfer or, if none is applicable, under the
laws of intestate succession applicable to interests in intangible
personal property of the third person's domicile, regardless of whether
the law of the domicile of the deceased third party, at the time of
death, or thereafter, recognizes a similar or identical property right.
(2) A property right exists whether or not such rights were
commercially exploited by or under the authority of the individual or
the personality or the individual's or personality's successors or
transferees during the individual's or the personality's((, as the case
may be,)) lifetime.
(3) The rights recognized under this chapter shall be deemed to
have existed before June 11, 1998, and at the time of death of any
deceased individual or personality or subsequent successor of their
rights for the purpose of determining the person or persons entitled to
these property rights as provided in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to all causes of action
commenced on or after June 11, 1998, regardless of when the cause of
action arose. To this extent, this act applies retroactively, but in
all other respects it applies prospectively.

--- END ---