BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington state recognizes the importance of protecting the
confidentiality and privacy of an individual's personal information
contained in drivers' licenses and identicards.
(2) Machine-readable features found on drivers' licenses and
identicards are intended to facilitate verification of age or identity,
not to facilitate collection of personal information about individuals,
nor to facilitate the creation of private databases of transactional
information associated with those individuals.
(3) Easy access to the information found on drivers' licenses and
identicards facilitates the crime of identity theft, a crime that is a
major concern in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.192 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Electronically" means relating to technology having
electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or
similar capabilities.
(b) "Personal information" includes any of the following: An
individual's name, address, date of birth, photograph, fingerprint or
other biometric image of the individual, driver's license or identicard
number, or any other unique personal identifier or number.
(2)(a) A nongovernmental entity may only electronically read an
individual's driver's license or identicard to verify the authenticity
of the document, verify the individual's age or identity, or to comply
with federal or state laws or regulations requiring identification
verification.
(b) When a nongovernmental entity electronically reads a driver's
license or identicard for one of the purposes permitted in (a) of this
subsection, and except as otherwise permitted in subsection (3) of this
section, the entity may not store, sell, or share personal information
collected from the driver's license or identicard without written
consent of the individual.
(3) A business may only verify a consumer's age when providing an
age-restricted good or service or for which there is a discount based
on the consumer's age. A business may only verify a consumer's
identity and the accuracy of personal information submitted by a
consumer when the consumer pays with a method other than cash or
returns an item. A business may only store or share the personal
information collected from a consumer's driver's license or identicard
for the purposes of preventing fraud. Any personal information
collected from a driver's license or identicard must be destroyed
within sixty days. A business may not deny a consumer or prospective
consumer a good or service when the consumer or prospective consumer
exercises the right under this section not to allow his or her driver's
license or identicard to be read electronically for other purposes or
exercises the right not to allow storage, sale, or sharing of personal
information, except as permitted by this subsection or as required by
federal or state laws or regulations requiring identification
verification.
(4) A governmental entity may only electronically read an
individual's driver's license or identicard when the individual
knowingly makes the driver's license or identicard available to the
governmental entity or the governmental entity lawfully seizes the
driver's license or identicard.
(5) A nongovernmental entity or governmental entity may
electronically read an individual's driver's license or identicard to
provide emergency assistance when the individual is unconscious or
otherwise unable to make the driver's license or identicard available.
(6) Any waiver of a provision of this section is contrary to public
policy and is void and unenforceable.
(7) In addition to any other remedy provided by law, an individual
whose personal information is read, stored, shared, sold, or otherwise
used in violation of this section may bring an action to recover actual
damages or one thousand dollars, whichever is greater, and equitable
relief, if available. A court shall award a prevailing individual
reasonable costs and attorneys' fees. If a court finds that a
violation of this section was willful or knowing, the court may
increase the amount of the award to no more than three times the amount
otherwise available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.192 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the practices covered by section 2 of
this act are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of section 2 of
this act is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or
commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying chapter 19.86 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.192.020 and 2003 c 89 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any provision of a contract between a merchant or retailer and
a credit or debit card issuer, financial institution, or other person
that prohibits the merchant or retailer from verifying the identity of
a customer who offers to pay for goods or services with a credit or
debit card by requiring or requesting that the customer present
additional identification is void for violation of public policy.
(2) Nothing in this ((section)) chapter shall be interpreted as((:
(a))) compelling merchants or retailers to verify identification((; or
(b) interfering with the ability of the owner or manager of a retail
store or chain to make and enforce its own policies regarding
verification of identification)).

Sec. 5 RCW 42.56.230 and 2005 c 274 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(3) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would (a) be prohibited to such persons by
RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340 or (b) violate the
taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer; ((and))
(4) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law; and
(5) Documents and related materials and scanned images of documents
and related materials used to prove identity, age, residential address,
social security number, or other personal information required to apply
for a driver's license or identicard.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.56.330 and 2007 c 197 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to public utilities and
transportation is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095;
(2) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order;
(3) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service; however, these records may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides;
(4) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons;
(5) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes and other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose this information to a person, employer,
educational institution, or other entity that is responsible, in whole
or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when reporting
on public transportation or public safety. This information may also
be disclosed at the agency's discretion to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety;
(6) Any information obtained by governmental agencies that is
collected by the use of a motor carrier intelligent transportation
system or any comparable information equipment attached to a truck,
tractor, or trailer; however, the information may be given to other
governmental agencies or the owners of the truck, tractor, or trailer
from which the information is obtained. As used in this subsection,
"motor carrier" has the same definition as provided in RCW 81.80.010;
((and))
(7) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transponders or other technology to facilitate payment of
tolls. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form as long as
the data does not contain any personally identifying information. For
these purposes aggregate data may include the census tract of the
account holder as long as any individual personally identifying
information is not released. Personally identifying information may be
released to law enforcement agencies only for toll enforcement
purposes. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies for other purposes only if the request is
accompanied by a court order; and
(8) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use a driver's license or identicard that includes a radio
frequency identification chip or similar technology to facilitate
border crossing. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form
as long as the data does not contain any personally identifying
information. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies only for United States customs and border
protection enforcement purposes. Personally identifying information
may be released to law enforcement agencies for other purposes only if
the request is accompanied by a court order.

--- END ---