BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.01.350 and 2007 c 223 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of transportation shall establish a ferry grant
program subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose. The purpose of the grant program is to provide
operating or capital grants for ferry systems as provided in chapters
36.54 ((and)), 36.57A, and 53.08 RCW to operate passenger-only ferry
service.
(2) In providing grants under this section, the department may
enter into multiple year contracts with the stipulation that future
year allocations are subject to the availability of funding as provided
by legislative appropriation.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.60.645 and 2006 c 332 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby established in the transportation fund the
passenger ferry account. Money in the account shall be used for
operating or capital grants for ferry systems as provided in chapters
36.54 ((and)), 36.57A, and 53.08 RCW. Moneys in the account shall be
expended with legislative appropriation.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.60.662 and 2007 c 223 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state ferry system shall collaborate with new and
potential passenger-only ferry service providers, as described in
chapters 36.54 ((and)), 36.57A, and 53.08 RCW, for terminal operations
at its existing terminal facilities.

Sec. 4 RCW 53.08.295 and 1980 c 110 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A port district may acquire, lease, construct, purchase, maintain,
and operate passenger carrying vessels on Puget Sound, interstate
navigable rivers of the state, and intrastate waters of adjoining
states. Service provided shall be under terms, conditions, and rates
to be fixed and approved by the port commission. Operation of such
vessels shall be subject to applicable state and federal laws
pertaining to such service.

--- END ---