BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.110 and 2005 c 396 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following rules shall govern the overtaking and passing of
vehicles proceeding in the same direction, subject to those
limitations, exceptions and special rules hereinafter stated:
(1) The driver of a vehicle overtaking other traffic proceeding in
the same direction shall pass to the left thereof at a safe distance
and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway until safely
clear of the overtaken traffic.
(2) The driver of a vehicle approaching a pedestrian or bicycle
that is on the roadway or on the right-hand shoulder or bicycle lane of
the roadway shall pass to the left at a safe distance, of no less than
three feet, to clearly avoid coming into contact with the pedestrian or
bicyclist, and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway
until safely clear of the overtaken pedestrian or bicyclist.
(3) Except when overtaking and passing on the right is permitted,
overtaken traffic shall give way to the right in favor of an overtaking
vehicle on audible signal and shall not increase speed until completely
passed by the overtaking vehicle.

--- END ---