BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A substantial development permit is not required for
development within a restoration area if the proposed project is to be
located on:
(i) Shorelines designated as a high-intensity shoreline environment
under the applicable master plan; or
(ii) Shorelines consistent with a high-intensity shoreline
environment designation under the applicable master plan.
(b) For purposes of this section, a "restoration area" is an area
that:
(i) Was created by a landward shift in the ordinary high water mark
that resulted from a voluntary habitat restoration project; and
(ii) Was not subject to regulation under this chapter prior to the
restoration project.
(2)(a) Requests for development approvals within restoration areas
may be granted in the form of restoration project variances.
Restoration project variances may be issued to authorize relief from
bulk, dimension, or other master program development standards,
including use regulations, if:
(i) The shift in shoreline jurisdiction resulting from the
voluntary habitat restoration project causes hardship in the area
within and adjacent to the restoration area. "Hardship" under this
subsection means that a reasonable use of the property is precluded or
significantly diminished in the area within and adjacent to the
restoration area due to requirements of the applicable master program;
and
(ii) The variance includes measures to ensure that allowable uses
of the property under this section result in no net loss of shoreline
ecological functions within the restoration area.
(b) Variances issued under this subsection (2):
(i) Must be limited to only the minimum approvals necessary to
afford relief;
(ii) May not cause the public interest to suffer substantial
detriment; and
(iii) Must be processed according to the same procedures used for
other shoreline variances.
(3) Master programs may include provisions, including conditions of
approval, areas of applicability, and other requirements, to ensure
that restoration project variance processes achieve the objectives of
this section.

--- END ---