BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Except for agents or brokers subject to RCW 50.44.010, 50.44.020,
50.44.030, and 50.50.010, the term "employment" shall not include
services performed by a language translator or interpreter that are
provided for others through an agent or broker.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.12.020 and 1999 c 68 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following are the only employments which shall not be included
within the mandatory coverage of this title:
(1) Any person employed as a domestic servant in a private home by
an employer who has less than two employees regularly employed forty or
more hours a week in such employment.
(2) Any person employed to do gardening, maintenance, or repair, in
or about the private home of the employer. For the purposes of this
subsection, "maintenance" means the work of keeping in proper
condition, "repair" means to restore to sound condition after damage,
and "private home" means a person's place of residence.
(3) A person whose employment is not in the course of the trade,
business, or profession of his or her employer and is not in or about
the private home of the employer.
(4) Any person performing services in return for aid or sustenance
only, received from any religious or charitable organization.
(5) Sole proprietors or partners.
(6) Any child under eighteen years of age employed by his or her
parent or parents in agricultural activities on the family farm.
(7) Jockeys while participating in or preparing horses for race
meets licensed by the Washington horse racing commission pursuant to
chapter 67.16 RCW.
(8)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, any
bona fide officer of a corporation voluntarily elected or voluntarily
appointed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws of
the corporation, who at all times during the period involved is also a
bona fide director, and who is also a shareholder of the corporation.
Only such officers who exercise substantial control in the daily
management of the corporation and whose primary responsibilities do not
include the performance of manual labor are included within this
subsection.
(b) Alternatively, a corporation that is not a "public company" as
defined in RCW 23B.01.400(((21))) may exempt eight or fewer bona fide
officers, who are voluntarily elected or voluntarily appointed in
accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the
corporation and who exercise substantial control in the daily
management of the corporation, from coverage under this title without
regard to the officers' performance of manual labor if the exempted
officer is a shareholder of the corporation, or may exempt any number
of officers if all the exempted officers are related by blood within
the third degree or marriage. If a corporation that is not a "public
company" elects to be covered under subsection (8)(a) of this section,
the corporation's election must be made on a form prescribed by the
department and under such reasonable rules as the department may adopt.
(c) Determinations respecting the status of persons performing
services for a corporation shall be made, in part, by reference to
Title 23B RCW and to compliance by the corporation with its own
articles of incorporation and bylaws. For the purpose of determining
coverage under this title, substance shall control over form, and
mandatory coverage under this title shall extend to all workers of this
state, regardless of honorary titles conferred upon those actually
serving as workers.
(d) A corporation may elect to cover officers who are exempted by
this subsection in the manner provided by RCW 51.12.110.
(9) Services rendered by a musician or entertainer under a contract
with a purchaser of the services, for a specific engagement or
engagements when such musician or entertainer performs no other duties
for the purchaser and is not regularly and continuously employed by the
purchaser. A purchaser does not include the leader of a group or
recognized entity who employs other than on a casual basis musicians or
entertainers.
(10) Services performed by a newspaper carrier selling or
distributing newspapers on the street or from house to house.
(11) Services performed by an insurance agent, insurance broker, or
insurance solicitor, as defined in RCW 48.17.010, 48.17.020, and
48.17.030, respectively.
(12) Services performed by a booth renter ((as defined in RCW
18.16.020)). However, a person exempted under this subsection may
elect coverage under RCW 51.32.030.
(13) Members of a limited liability company, if either:
(a) Management of the company is vested in its members, and the
members for whom exemption is sought would qualify for exemption under
subsection (5) of this section were the company a sole proprietorship
or partnership; or
(b) Management of the company is vested in one or more managers,
and the members for whom the exemption is sought are managers who would
qualify for exemption under subsection (8) of this section were the
company a corporation.
(14) A person performing language translator or interpreter
services that are provided for others through an agent or broker.

--- END ---