BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.20.010 and 1943 c 247 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is unlawful for any corporation, copartnership, firm, trust,
association, or individual to engage in or transact any of the
businesses of a cemetery within this state except by means of a
corporation or a limited liability company duly organized for that
purpose.

Sec. 2 RCW 68.20.020 and 1983 c 3 s 167 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any private corporation authorized by its articles or limited
liability company authorized by its certificate of formation so to
do((,)) may establish, maintain, manage, improve, or operate a
cemetery, and conduct any or all of the businesses of a cemetery,
either for or without profit to its members or stockholders. A
nonprofit cemetery corporation may be organized in the manner provided
in chapter 24.03 RCW. A profit corporation may be organized in the
manner provided in the general corporation laws of the state of
Washington or in the manner provided in chapter 25.15 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 68.20.050 and 1943 c 247 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless otherwise limited by the law under which created(([,])),
cemetery authorities shall in the conduct of their business have the
same powers granted by law to corporations and limited liability
companies in general, including the right to contract such pecuniary
obligations within the limitation of general law as may be required,
and may secure them by mortgage, deed of trust, or otherwise upon their
property.

--- END ---