BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.12.245 and 1955 c 348 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The port commission shall organize by the election of its own
members of a president and secretary((, shall by resolution adopt rules
governing the transaction of its business)) and shall adopt an official
seal. All proceedings of the port commission shall be by motion or
resolution recorded in a book or books kept for such purpose((, which))
and shall also be recorded electronically, and all such recordings
shall be public records.
(2) In addition to the requirements set forth in the open public
meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, port commission proceedings must meet
the following notice requirements:
(a) The public must be provided with ample advance notice of the
date, time, place, and subject matter of regular meetings, work
sessions, and special public meetings. Such notice must be reasonably
calculated to provide meaningful notice to the public of any port
commission proceeding;
(b) Notice of special public meetings must be delivered to each
local newspaper of general circulation, to each local radio station,
and to each local television station; and
(c) A port district must maintain an internet web site that
conspicuously posts the meeting notice information required under this
section.
(3) The port commission shall by resolution adopt rules governing
the transaction of its business consistent with the requirements of
this section and chapter 42.30 RCW.

--- END ---