BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.08.010 and 1983 c 24 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
a port district may acquire by purchase, for cash or on deferred
payments for a period not exceeding twenty years, or by condemnation,
or both, all lands, property, property rights, leases, or easements
necessary for its purposes and may exercise the right of eminent domain
in the acquirement or damaging of all such lands, property, and
property rights, and may levy and collect assessments upon property for
the payment of all damages and compensation in carrying out its
purposes, and such right shall be exercised in the same manner and by
the same procedure as provided for cities of the first class insofar as
consistent with this title, and in connection therewith the county
treasurer shall perform the duties of the treasurers of such cities.
(2) A port district located in a county with a population exceeding
one million seven hundred thousand residents is prohibited from
exercising the power of eminent domain for the acquisition of real
property or any other purpose otherwise permitted under this title.

--- END ---