BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.06.030 and 1989 c 425 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The port district commissions in this state are empowered to
designate the Washington public ports association as a coordinating
agency through which the duties imposed by RCW 53.06.020 may be
performed, harmonized or correlated. The purposes of the Washington
public ports association shall be:
(((1))) (a) To initiate and carry on the necessary studies,
investigations and surveys required for the proper development and
improvement of the commerce and business generally common to all port
districts, and to assemble and analyze the data thus obtained and to
cooperate with the state of Washington, port districts both within and
without the state of Washington, and other operators of terminal and
transportation facilities for this purpose, and to make such
expenditures as are necessary for these purposes, including the proper
promotion and advertising of all such properties, utilities and
facilities;
(((2))) (b) To establish coordinating and joint marketing bodies
comprised of association members, including but not limited to
establishment of a federation of Washington ports as described in RCW
53.06.070, as may be necessary to provide effective and efficient
marketing of the state's trade, tourism, and travel resources;
(((3))) (c) To exchange information relative to port construction,
maintenance, operation, administration and management;
(((4))) (d) To promote and encourage port development along sound
economic lines;
(((5))) (e) To promote and encourage the development of
transportation, commerce and industry;
(((6))) (f) To operate as a clearing house for information, public
relations and liaison for the port districts of the state and to serve
as a channel for cooperation among the various port districts and for
the assembly and presentation of information relating to the needs and
requirements of port districts to the public.
(2) A Washington public ports association is prohibited from
directly or indirectly engaging in lobbying, as defined in RCW
42.17.020(31), and may not expend funds for this purpose.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.190 and 1995 c 397 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The house of representatives and the senate shall report
annually: The total budget; the portion of the total attributed to
staff; and the number of full-time and part-time staff positions by
assignment, with dollar figures as well as number of positions.
(2) Unless authorized by subsection (3) of this section or
otherwise expressly authorized by law, no public funds may be used
directly or indirectly for lobbying: PROVIDED, This does not prevent
officers or employees of an agency from communicating with a member of
the legislature on the request of that member; or communicating to the
legislature, through the proper official channels, requests for
legislative action or appropriations which are deemed necessary for the
efficient conduct of the public business or actually made in the proper
performance of their official duties: PROVIDED FURTHER, That this
subsection does not apply to the legislative branch.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, any
agency, not otherwise expressly authorized by law, may expend public
funds for lobbying, but such lobbying activity shall be limited to (a)
providing information or communicating on matters pertaining to
official agency business to any elected official or officer or employee
of any agency or (b) advocating the official position or interests of
the agency to any elected official or officer or employee of any
agency: PROVIDED, That public funds may not be expended as a direct or
indirect gift or campaign contribution to any elected official or
officer or employee of any agency. For the purposes of this
subsection, the term "gift" means a voluntary transfer of any thing of
value without consideration of equal or greater value, but does not
include informational material transferred for the sole purpose of
informing the recipient about matters pertaining to official agency
business. This section does not permit the printing of a state
publication which has been otherwise prohibited by law.
(4) A Washington public ports association authorized under chapter
53.06 RCW is prohibited from directly or indirectly engaging in
lobbying and may not expend funds for this purpose.
(5) No elective official or any employee of his or her office or
any person appointed to or employed by any public office or agency may
use or authorize the use of any of the facilities of a public office or
agency, directly or indirectly, in any effort to support or oppose an
initiative to the legislature. "Facilities of a public office or
agency" has the same meaning as in RCW 42.17.130 and 42.52.180. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the following
activities:
(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose an initiative to the legislature so long as (i) any required
notice of the meeting includes the title and number of the initiative
to the legislature, and (ii) members of the legislative body or members
of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the
expression of an opposing view;
(b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any initiative to the legislature at an open press
conference or in response to a specific inquiry;
(c) Activities which are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency;
(d) Activities conducted regarding an initiative to the legislature
that would be permitted under RCW 42.17.130 and 42.52.180 if conducted
regarding other ballot measures.
(((5))) (6) Each state agency, county, city, town, municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district
which expends public funds for lobbying shall file with the commission,
except as exempted by (d) of this subsection, quarterly statements
providing the following information for the quarter just completed:
(a) The name of the agency filing the statement;
(b) The name, title, and job description and salary of each elected
official, officer, or employee who lobbied, a general description of
the nature of the lobbying, and the proportionate amount of time spent
on the lobbying;
(c) A listing of expenditures incurred by the agency for lobbying
including but not limited to travel, consultant or other special
contractual services, and brochures and other publications, the
principal purpose of which is to influence legislation;
(d) For purposes of this subsection the term "lobbying" does not
include:
(i) Requests for appropriations by a state agency to the office of
financial management pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW nor requests by the
office of financial management to the legislature for appropriations
other than its own agency budget requests;
(ii) Recommendations or reports to the legislature in response to
a legislative request expressly requesting or directing a specific
study, recommendation, or report by an agency on a particular subject;
(iii) Official reports including recommendations submitted to the
legislature on an annual or biennial basis by a state agency as
required by law;
(iv) Requests, recommendations, or other communication between or
within state agencies or between or within local agencies;
(v) Any other lobbying to the extent that it includes:
(A) Telephone conversations or preparation of written
correspondence;
(B) In-person lobbying on behalf of an agency of no more than four
days or parts thereof during any three-month period by officers or
employees of that agency and in-person lobbying by any elected official
of such agency on behalf of such agency or in connection with the
powers, duties, or compensation of such official: PROVIDED, That the
total expenditures of nonpublic funds made in connection with such
lobbying for or on behalf of any one or more members of the legislature
or state elected officials or public officers or employees of the state
of Washington do not exceed fifteen dollars for any three-month period:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the exemption under this subsection is in
addition to the exemption provided in (d)(v)(A) of this subsection;
(C) Preparation or adoption of policy positions.
The statements shall be in the form and the manner prescribed by
the commission and shall be filed within one month after the end of the
quarter covered by the report.
(((6))) (7) In lieu of reporting under subsection (((5))) (6) of
this section any county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi
municipal corporation, or special purpose district may determine and so
notify the public disclosure commission, that elected officials,
officers, or employees who on behalf of any such local agency engage in
lobbying reportable under subsection (((5))) (6) of this section shall
register and report such reportable lobbying in the same manner as a
lobbyist who is required to register and report under RCW 42.17.150 and
42.17.170. Each such local agency shall report as a lobbyist employer
pursuant to RCW 42.17.180.
(((7))) (8) The provisions of this section do not relieve any
elected official or officer or employee of an agency from complying
with other provisions of this chapter, if such elected official,
officer, or employee is not otherwise exempted.
(((8))) (9) The purpose of this section is to require each state
agency and certain local agencies to report the identities of those
persons who lobby on behalf of the agency for compensation, together
with certain separately identifiable and measurable expenditures of an
agency's funds for that purpose. This section shall be reasonably
construed to accomplish that purpose and not to require any agency to
report any of its general overhead cost or any other costs which relate
only indirectly or incidentally to lobbying or which are equally
attributable to or inseparable from nonlobbying activities of the
agency.
The public disclosure commission may adopt rules clarifying and
implementing this legislative interpretation and policy.

--- END ---