BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.06.030 and 1989 c 425 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The port district commissions in this state are empowered to
designate the Washington public ports association as a coordinating
agency through which the duties imposed by RCW 53.06.020 may be
performed, harmonized or correlated. The purposes of the Washington
public ports association shall be:
(((1))) (a) To initiate and carry on the necessary studies,
investigations and surveys required for the proper development and
improvement of the commerce and business generally common to all port
districts, and to assemble and analyze the data thus obtained and to
cooperate with the state of Washington, port districts both within and
without the state of Washington, and other operators of terminal and
transportation facilities for this purpose, and to make such
expenditures as are necessary for these purposes, including the proper
promotion and advertising of all such properties, utilities and
facilities;
(((2))) (b) To establish coordinating and joint marketing bodies
comprised of association members, including but not limited to
establishment of a federation of Washington ports as described in RCW
53.06.070, as may be necessary to provide effective and efficient
marketing of the state's trade, tourism, and travel resources;
(((3))) (c) To exchange information relative to port construction,
maintenance, operation, administration and management;
(((4))) (d) To promote and encourage port development along sound
economic lines;
(((5))) (e) To promote and encourage the development of
transportation, commerce and industry;
(((6))) (f) To operate as a clearing house for information, public
relations and liaison for the port districts of the state and to serve
as a channel for cooperation among the various port districts and for
the assembly and presentation of information relating to the needs and
requirements of port districts to the public.
(2) Port districts participating in a Washington public ports
association shall have an equal voice in the governance and
decision-making processes of the association. Each participating port
district shall have an equal vote with respect to all decisions and
resolutions of any public ports association.

Sec. 2 RCW 53.06.040 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 55 are each
amended to read as follows:
Each port district which designates the Washington public ports
association as the agency through which the duties imposed by RCW
53.06.020 may be executed is authorized to pay either dues ((and/or))
or assessments, or both, to said association from port district funds
in any calendar year ((in an amount not exceeding a sum equal to the
amount which would be raised by a levy of one cent per thousand dollars
of assessed value against the taxable property within the port
district)). The amount of any such dues and assessments shall be
determined by the governing body of an association and must be assessed
in an equal dollar amount for each port district participating in the
association.

--- END ---