BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.30.010 and 1984 c 258 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:
"City" means an incorporated city or town.
"Department" means an administrative unit of a district court
established for the orderly and efficient administration of business
and may include, without being limited in scope thereby, a unit or
units for determining traffic cases, violations of city ordinances,
violations of state law, criminal cases, civil cases, or jury cases.
(("Population" means the latest population of the judicial district
of each county as estimated and certified by the office of financial
management. The office of financial management, on or before May 1,
1970 and on or before May 1st each four years thereafter, shall
estimate and certify to the county legislative authority the population
of each judicial district of each county.))

--- END ---