BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.32.0351 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 204 are each amended
to read as follows:
The Washington state dental quality assurance commission is
established, consisting of ((fourteen)) eighteen members each appointed
by the governor to a four-year term. No member may serve more than two
consecutive full terms. In appointing the initial members of the
commission, it is the intent of the legislature that, to the extent
possible, members of the previous boards and committees regulating
these professions be appointed to the commission. Members of the
commission hold office until their successors are appointed. The
governor may appoint members of the initial commission to staggered
terms of from one to four years. Thereafter, all members shall be
appointed to full four-year terms. ((Twelve)) Fifteen members of the
commission must be dentists and ((two)) three members must be public
members.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.32.0351 and 2007 c 269 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington state dental quality assurance commission is
established, consisting of ((sixteen)) twenty members each appointed by
the governor to a four-year term. No member may serve more than two
consecutive full terms. In appointing the initial members of the
commission, it is the intent of the legislature that, to the extent
possible, members of the previous boards and committees regulating
these professions be appointed to the commission. Members of the
commission hold office until their successors are appointed. The
governor may appoint members of the initial commission to staggered
terms of from one to four years. Thereafter, all members shall be
appointed to full four-year terms. ((Twelve)) Fifteen members of the
commission must be dentists, two members must be expanded function
dental auxiliaries licensed under chapter 18.260 RCW, and ((two)) three
members must be public members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2009.

--- END ---