BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.330 and 2001 c 118 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) This chapter shall not apply to any farmer ((that)) who:
(i) Sells any agricultural product at wholesale; or ((to any farmer
who))
(ii) Grows, raises, or produces agricultural products owned by
others, such as custom feed operations.
(b) This chapter shall not apply to amounts derived from the
wholesale sale of honey bee products by a person who owns or keeps bee
colonies and who does not qualify for an exemption under (a) of this
subsection in respect to such sales.
(c) The exemptions provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection shall
not apply to any person selling such products at retail or to any
person selling manufactured substances or articles.
(2) This chapter shall also not apply to any persons who
participate in the federal conservation reserve program or its
successor administered by the United States department of agriculture
with respect to land enrolled in that program.
(3) The definitions in RCW 82.08.865 apply to this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.865 and 2007 c 443 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales ((of
diesel fuel, biodiesel fuel, or aircraft fuel,)) of the following fuels
to a farm fuel user for ((nonhighway use. This exemption applies to a
fuel blend if all of the component fuels of the blend would otherwise
be exempt under this subsection if the component fuels were sold as
separate products. This exemption is available only if the buyer
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. Fuel used for space or water heating for
human habitation is not exempt under this section.
(2))) agricultural purposes:
(a) Diesel fuel;
(b) Biodiesel fuel;
(c) Aircraft fuel; or
(d) Fuel blends, provided that all of the component fuels of the
blend would otherwise be exempt under this subsection if the component
fuels were sold as separate products.
(2) This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department.
(3) The definitions in RCW 82.04.213 and this subsection apply to
this section.
(a)(i) "Agricultural purposes" means the performance of activities
directly related to the growing, raising, or producing of agricultural
products.
(ii) "Agricultural purposes" does not include:
(A) Heating space for human habitation or water for human
consumption; or
(B) Transporting individuals, agricultural products, farm machinery
or equipment, or other tangible personal property on public roads
except as permitted under RCW 82.38.080(1)(g).
(b) "Aircraft fuel" is defined as provided in RCW 82.42.010.
(((b))) (c) "Bee colony" means a natural group of honey bees
containing seven thousand or more workers and one or more queens,
housed in a man-made hive with movable frames, and operated as a
beekeeping unit.
(d) "Biodiesel fuel" is defined as provided in RCW 19.112.010.
(((c))) (e) "Diesel fuel" is defined as provided in 26 U.S.C. 4083,
as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2006.
(((d))) (f) "Eligible apiarist" means a person who owns or keeps
one or more bee colonies and who grows, raises, or produces honey bee
products for sale at wholesale.
(g) "Farm fuel user" means:
(i) A farmer; ((or))
(ii) An eligible apiarist; or
(iii) A person who provides horticultural services for farmers,
such as soil preparation services, crop cultivation services, and crop
harvesting services.
(h) "Honey bee products" means queen honey bees, packaged honey
bees, honey, pollen, bees wax, propolis, or other substances obtained
from honey bees. "Honey bee products" does not include manufactured
substances or articles.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.865 and 2007 c 443 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
((nonhighway use of diesel fuel, biodiesel fuel, or aircraft fuel, by
a farm fuel user. This exemption applies to a fuel blend if all of the
component fuels of the blend would otherwise be exempt under this
subsection if the component fuels were acquired as separate products.
Fuel used for space or water heating for human habitation is not exempt
under this section)) use of the following fuels by a farm fuel user for
agricultural purposes:
(a) Diesel fuel;
(b) Biodiesel fuel;
(c) Aircraft fuel; or
(d) Fuel blends, provided that all of the component fuels of the
blend would otherwise be exempt under this subsection if the component
fuels were sold as separate products.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.865 apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by any person
for providing bee pollination services to a farmer using a bee colony
owned or kept by the person providing the pollination services.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.213 and 82.08.865 apply to this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of honey
bees to an eligible apiarist, as defined in RCW 82.08.865. This
exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of honey bees by an eligible apiarist, as defined in RCW 82.08.865.
This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with
an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---