BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.68.380 and 1995 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The aviation division of the department is responsible for the
conduct and management of all aerial search and rescue within the
state. This includes search and rescue efforts involving aircraft and
airships. The division is also responsible for search and rescue
activities involving electronic emergency signaling devices such as
emergency locater transmitters (ELT's) and emergency position
indicating radio beacons (EPIRB's).
(2) An act or omission by any person registered with the aviation
division of the department for the purpose of engaging in aerial search
and rescue activities, while engaged in such activities, shall not
impose any liability for civil damages resulting from the act or
omission. However, the immunity provided under this subsection shall
not apply to an act or omission that constitutes gross negligence or
willful or wanton misconduct. For the purpose of this subsection,
"aerial search and rescue activities" includes, but is not limited to,
training and training-related activities, but does not include
appropriate search and rescue activities conducted under the authority
of RCW 38.52.400.

--- END ---