BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that there is a large, unmet need for
affordable housing in the state of Washington. The legislature also
finds that providing targeted incentives to nonprofit housing
developers will encourage the production and sale of homes affordable
to low-income households. The legislature intends to provide such
incentives through excise tax relief on sales of homes to low-income
first-time homebuyers.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.45.010 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 26 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" shall have its
ordinary meaning and shall include any conveyance, grant, assignment,
quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property,
including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a
valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant,
assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to
purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or
interest therein or other contract under which possession of the
property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the
purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the
vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term
also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of
improvements constructed upon leased land.
(2) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition
within any twelve-month period of a controlling interest in any entity
with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable
consideration. For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of
persons acting in concert shall be aggregated for purposes of
determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest
has taken place. The department of revenue shall adopt standards by
rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a
rule for this purpose, the department shall consider the following:
(a) Persons shall be treated as acting in concert when they have a
relationship with each other such that one person influences or
controls the actions of another through common ownership; and
(b) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they shall
be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the
purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of
ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single
entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each
purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other
purchasers, then the acquisitions shall be considered separate
acquisitions.
(3) The term "sale" shall not include:
(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.
(b) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type
mentioned above.
(c) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a
contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract
contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a
mortgage.
(d) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or
as the result of a court decree.
(e) The assignment of property or interest in property from one
spouse to the other in accordance with the terms of a decree of divorce
or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.
(f) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a
contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a
conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.
(g) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation
proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political
subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.
(h) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property
merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.
(i) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or
an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien
foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu
of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.
(j) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans
administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract
of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or
veterans administration.
(k) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or
contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or
where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax
was first imposed.
(l) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.
(m) A sale by the United States, this state or any political
subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.
(n) A sale by a nonprofit housing developer of a residential
housing unit that is new construction to a low-income first-time
homebuyer household. For the purpose of this subsection (3)(n):
(i) "Nonprofit housing developer" means any nonprofit organization
that has among its purposes, activities related to the provision of
decent housing that is affordable to low-income households;
(ii) "Low-income first-time homebuyer household" means a single
person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted
income is at or below eighty percent of the median family income
adjusted for family size, for the county where the project is located,
as reported by the United States department of housing and urban
development, when one of the legal homebuyers has not owned and
occupied a primary residence at any time in the three years preceding
the closing of the mortgage loan.
(o) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation
under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW
81.112.300.
(((o))) (p) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it
consists of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity
where there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include
transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the
transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or children: PROVIDED, That
if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily
transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse, or children
voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in
the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than
(((1))) (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or children,
(((2))) (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's
spouse or children as the only beneficiaries at the time of the
transfer to the trust, or (((3))) (iii) a corporation or partnership
wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the transferor's spouse
or children, within three years of the original transfer to which this
exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been
paid within sixty days of becoming due, excise taxes shall become due
and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.
(((p))) (q)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does
not involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation,
liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not
limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of
section 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended.
(ii) However, the transfer described in (((p))) (q)(i) of this
subsection cannot be preceded or followed within a twelve-month period
by another transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with
the otherwise exempt transfer or transfers described in (((p))) (q)(i)
of this subsection, results in the transfer of a controlling interest
in the entity for valuable consideration, and in which one or more
persons previously holding a controlling interest in the entity receive
cash or property in exchange for any interest the person or persons
acting in concert hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(((p)))
(q)(ii) does not apply to that part of the transfer involving property
received that is the real property interest that the person or persons
originally contributed to the entity or when one or more persons who
did not contribute real property or belong to the entity at a time when
real property was purchased receive cash or personal property in
exchange for that person or persons' interest in the entity. The real
estate excise tax under this subsection (3)(((p))) (q)(ii) is imposed
upon the person or persons who previously held a controlling interest
in the entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The amount of revenue exempted statewide from taxation under
RCW 82.45.010(3)(n) on sales by a nonprofit housing developer must not
exceed one million dollars per calendar year.
(2) The department must maintain a running total of all tax revenue
that would otherwise be imposed and collected under this chapter on
sales by nonprofit housing developers of residential housing units that
are new construction to low-income first-time homebuyer households, but
for the provisions in RCW 82.45.010(3)(n) that exempt such sales from
taxation under this chapter.
(3) The department must deny any claim, or portion thereof, for tax
exemption under RCW 82.45.010(3)(n), if the exemption would exceed the
statewide limitation in subsection (1) of this section. All nonprofit
housing developers that claim an exemption under RCW 82.45.010(3)(n),
which would result in the statewide limitation under subsection (1) of
this section being exceeded, must be notified by the department that
the statewide limitation for exemptions under RCW 82.45.010(3)(n) has
been met for the calendar year and that the portion of the submitted
claim in excess of the statewide limitation is denied.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Nonprofit housing developer" has the same meaning as provided
in RCW 82.45.010.
(b) "Department" means the department of revenue.

--- END ---