BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that the
special commitment center increases public safety by providing
treatment in a secure environment to civilly committed sexually violent
predators. The legislature further finds that the residents of the
special commitment center may make harassing telephone calls to persons
in the community with no record of the call being made, which runs
counter to the center's goals of public safety and treatment. It is
therefore the intent of the legislature to increase public safety and
improve treatment in the special commitment center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall maintain a log of phone calls made by
residents of the special commitment center. The log shall indicate the
date and time when each phone call was made, the length of the call,
the name of the resident who made the call, and the number called. The
department may contract with a private organization to maintain the
log.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Logs of telephone calls made by residents of the special commitment
center maintained under section 2 of this act are exempt from public
inspection and copying under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---