BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.08.020 and 1963 c 147 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A port district may construct, condemn, purchase, acquire, add
to, maintain, conduct, and operate sea walls, jetties, piers, wharves,
docks, boat landings, and other harbor improvements, warehouses,
storehouses, elevators, grain-bins, cold storage plants, terminal icing
plants, bunkers, oil tanks, ferries, canals, locks, tidal basins,
bridges, subways, tramways, cableways, conveyors, administration
buildings, fishing terminals, together with modern appliances and
buildings for the economical handling, packaging, storing, and
transporting of freight and handling of passenger traffic, rail and
motor vehicle transfer and terminal facilities, water transfer and
terminal facilities, air transfer and terminal facilities, and any
combination of such transfer and terminal facilities, commercial
transportation, transfer, handling, storage and terminal facilities,
and improvements relating to industrial and manufacturing activities
within the district, and in connection with the operation of the
facilities and improvements of the district, it may perform all
customary services including the handling, weighing, measuring and
reconditioning of all commodities received. A port district may also
construct, condemn, purchase, acquire, add to and maintain facilities
for the freezing or processing of goods, agricultural products, meats
or perishable commodities. A port district may also construct,
purchase and operate belt line railways, but shall not acquire the same
by condemnation.
(2) A port district is prohibited from directly or indirectly
participating in activity relating to residential real estate
development.

Sec. 2 RCW 53.08.080 and 1989 c 298 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
district may lease all lands, wharves, docks and real and personal
property owned and controlled by it, for such purposes and upon such
terms as the port commission deems proper: PROVIDED, That no lease
shall be for a period longer than fifty years with option for
extensions for up to an additional thirty years, except where the
property involved is or is to be devoted to airport purposes the port
commission may lease said property for such period as may equal the
estimated useful life of such work or facilities, but not to exceed
seventy-five years: PROVIDED FURTHER, That where the property is held
by the district under lease from the United States government or the
state of Washington, or any agency or department thereof, the port
commission may sublease said property, with option for extensions, up
to the total term and extensions thereof permitted by such lease, but
in any event not to exceed ninety years.
(2) A port district is prohibited from participating in leasing
activity relating to residential real estate development.

Sec. 3 RCW 53.08.245 and 1985 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be in the public purpose for all port districts to
engage in economic development programs. In addition, port districts
may contract with nonprofit corporations in furtherance of this and
other acts relating to economic development.
(2) The contracts authorized under this section do not include
those relating to residential real estate development.

Sec. 4 RCW 53.08.400 and 2002 c 218 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A port district may enter into a contract with any city, town,
or county for the purpose of exercising any powers of a community
renewal agency under chapter 35.81 RCW.
(2) The contracts authorized under this section do not include
those relating to residential real estate development.

--- END ---