BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.260.030 and 2006 c 194 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter applies to the following types of new products
sold, offered for sale, or installed in the state: (a) Automatic
commercial ice cube machines; (b) commercial clothes washers; (c)
((commercial prerinse spray valves; (d))) commercial refrigerators and
freezers; (((e) metal halide lamp fixtures; (f))) (d) single-voltage
external AC to DC power supplies; (((g))) (e) state-regulated
incandescent reflector lamps; ((and (h))) (f) unit heaters; (g) wine
chillers for use by an individual; (h) illumination of remote reach-in
cabinets, cabinets without doors, and wine chillers that are not
consumer products; (i) hot water dispensers and minitank electric water
heaters; (j) bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water
dispensers; (k) pool heaters, residential pool pumps, and portable
electric spas; (l) tub spout diverters; and (m) commercial hot food
holding cabinets. This chapter applies equally to products whether
they are sold, offered for sale, or installed as a stand-alone product
or as a component of another product.
(2) This chapter does not apply to (a) new products manufactured in
the state and sold outside the state, (b) new products manufactured
outside the state and sold at wholesale inside the state for final
retail sale and installation outside the state, (c) products installed
in mobile manufactured homes at the time of construction, or (d)
products designed expressly for installation and use in recreational
vehicles.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.260.040 and 2006 c 194 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature establishes the following minimum efficiency
standards for the types of new products set forth in RCW 19.260.030.
(1)(a) Automatic commercial ice cube machines must have daily
energy use and daily water use no greater than the applicable values in
the following table:

Equipment type Type of cooling Harvest rate
(lbs. ice/24 hrs.) Maximum
energy use
(kWh/100 lbs.) Maximum condenser
water use
(gallons/100 lbs. ice)

Ice-making head water <500 7.80 - .0055H 200 - .022H

>500<1436 5.58 - .0011H 200 - .022H

>1436 4.0 200 - .022H

Ice-making head air 450 10.26 - .0086H Not applicable

>450 6.89 - .0011H Not applicable

Remote condensing but
not remote compressor air <1000 8.85 - .0038 Not applicable

>1000 5.10 Not applicable

Remote condensing and
remote compressor air <934 8.85 - .0038H Not applicable

>934 5.3 Not applicable

Self-contained models water <200 11.40 - .0190H 191 - .0315H

>200 7.60 191 - .0315H

Self-contained models air <175 18.0 - .0469H Not applicable

>175 9.80 Not applicable

Where H harvest rate in pounds per twenty-four hours which must be reported within 5% of the tested value.
"Maximum water use" applies only to water used for the condenser.

(b) For purposes of this section, automatic commercial ice cube
machines shall be tested in accordance with ARI 810-2003 test method as
published by the air-conditioning and refrigeration institute. Ice-making heads include all automatic commercial ice cube machines that
are not split system ice makers or self-contained models as defined in
ARI 810-2003.
(2) Commercial clothes washers must have a minimum modified energy
factor of 1.26. For the purposes of this section, capacity and
modified energy factor are defined and measured in accordance with the
current federal test method for clothes washers as found at 10 C.F.R.
Sec. 430.23.
(3) ((Commercial prerinse spray valves must have a flow rate equal
to or less than 1.6 gallons per minute when measured in accordance with
the American society for testing and materials' "Standard Test Method
for Prerinse Spray Valves," ASTM F2324-03.
(4)))(a) Commercial refrigerators and freezers must meet the
applicable requirements listed in the following table:

Equipment Type Doors Maximum Daily Energy Consumption (kWh)

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
refrigerators Solid 0.10V+ 2.04

Transparent 0.12V+ 3.34

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
"pulldown" refrigerators Transparent .126V+ 3.51

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
freezers Solid 0.40V+ 1.38

Transparent 0.75V+ 4.10

Reach-in cabinets that are refrigerator-freezers
with an AV of 5.19 or higher
Solid
0.27AV - 0.71

kWh kilowatt hours
V total volume (ft3)
AV adjusted volume [1.63 x freezer volume (ft3)]+ refrigerator volume (ft3)

(b) For purposes of this section, "pulldown" designates products
designed to take a fully stocked refrigerator with beverages at 90
degrees F and cool those beverages to a stable temperature of 38
degrees F within 12 hours or less. Daily energy consumption shall be
measured in accordance with the American national standards
institute/American society of heating, refrigerating and air-conditioning engineers test method 117-2002, except that the back-loading doors of pass-through and roll-through refrigerators and
freezers must remain closed throughout the test, and except that the
controls of all appliances must be adjusted to obtain the following
product temperatures.

Product or compartment type Integrated average product temperature in degrees Fahrenheit

Refrigerator 38+ 2

Freezer 0+ 2

(((5) Metal halide lamp fixtures designed to be operated with lamps
rated greater than or equal to 150 watts but less than or equal to 500
watts shall not contain a probe-start metal halide lamp ballast.
(6))) (4)(a) Single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies shall
meet the requirements in the following table:

Nameplate output Minimum Efficiency in Active Mode

< 1 Watt 0.49 * Nameplate Output

> or 1 Watt and < or 49 Watts 0.09 * Ln (Nameplate Output)+ 0.49

> 49 Watts 0.84

Maximum Energy Consumption in No-Load Mode

< 10 Watts 0.5 Watts

> or 10 Watts and < or 250 Watts
0.75 Watts

Where Ln (Nameplate Output) - Natural Logarithm of the nameplate output expressed in Watts

(b) For the purposes of this section, efficiency of single-voltage
external AC to DC power supplies shall be measured in accordance with
the United States environmental protection agency's "Test Method for
Calculating the Energy Efficiency of Single-Voltage External AC to DC
and AC to AC Power Supplies," by Ecos Consulting and Power Electronics
Application Center, dated August 11, 2004.
(((7))) (5)(a) The lamp electrical power input of state-regulated
incandescent reflector lamps shall meet the minimum average lamp
efficacy requirements for federally regulated incandescent reflector
lamps contained in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6295(i)(l)(A)-(B).
(b) The following types of incandescent lamps are exempt from these
requirements:
(i) Lamps rated at fifty watts or less of the following types: BR
30, ER 30, BR 40, and ER 40;
(ii) Lamps rated at sixty-five watts of the following types: BR
30, BR 40, and ER 40; and
(iii) R 20 lamps of forty-five watts or less.
(((8))) (6) Unit heaters must be equipped with intermittent
ignition devices and must have either power venting or an automatic
flue damper.
(7) Wine chillers designed and sold for use by an individual must
not exceed the applicable requirements listed in the following table:

Equipment Type Maximum Annual Appliance Energy
Consumption (kWh)

Wine chillers with manual defrost 13.7V + 267

Wine chillers with automatic defrost 17.4V + 344

V = volume in ft3.

(8) The internal illumination of the following appliances,
manufactured on or after January 1, 2009, shall be only by (a) T-8
fluorescent lamps with electronic ballasts, or (b) a lighting system
that has no fewer lumens per watt than a system using only T-8
fluorescent lamps with electronic ballasts:
(i) Remote reach-in cabinets with transparent doors, remote
pass-through cabinets with transparent doors, and remote roll-in or
roll-through cabinets with transparent doors;
(ii) Cabinets without doors; and
(iii) Wine chillers that are not consumer products.
(9) The standby energy consumption of bottle-type water dispensers,
and point-of-use water dispensers, dispensing both hot and cold water,
manufactured on or after January 1, 2009, shall not exceed 1.2 kWh/day.
(10)(a) The standby loss of hot water dispensers and minitank
electric water heaters manufactured on or after January 1, 2009, shall
be not greater than 35 watts.
(b) This subsection does not apply to any water heater:
(i) That is within the scope of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6292(a)(4) or
6311(1)(F);
(ii) That has a rated storage volume of less than 20 gallons; and
(iii) For which there is no federal test method applicable to that
type of water heater.
(11) The following standards are established for pool heaters,
residential pool pumps, and portable electric spas:
(a) Natural gas pool heaters shall not be equipped with constant
burning pilots.
(b) Pool pump motors shall meet the following standards:
(i) Pool pump motors manufactured on or after January 1, 2009, may
not be split-phase or capacitor start -- induction run type.
(ii) Pool pump motors with a capacity of 1 HP or more which are
manufactured on or after January 1, 2009, shall have the capability of
operating at two or more speeds with a low speed having a rotation rate
that is no more than one-half of the motor's maximum rotation rate.
(iii) Pool pump motor controls manufactured on or after January 1,
2009, shall have the capability of operating the pool pump at at least
two speeds. The default circulation speed shall be the lowest speed,
with a high speed override capability being for a temporary period not
to exceed one normal cycle.
(c) The standby power of portable electric spas manufactured on or
after January 1, 2009, shall be not greater than 5(V2/3) watts where V
= the total volume, in gallons.
(12)(a) The leakage rate of tub spout diverters shall be no greater
than the applicable requirements shown in the following table:

Maximum Leakage Rate

Appliance Testing Conditions Effective January 1, 2009

When new 0.01 gpm

Tub spout diverters After 15,000 cycles of diverting 0.05 gpm

(b) Showerhead-tub spout diverter combinations shall meet both the
standard for showerheads and the standard for tub spout diverters.
(13) The idle energy rate of commercial hot food holding cabinets
manufactured on or after January 1, 2009, shall be no greater than 40
watts per cubic foot of measured interior volume.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.260.050 and 2006 c 194 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No new ((commercial prerinse spray valve,)) commercial clothes
washer, commercial refrigerator or freezer, state-regulated
incandescent reflector lamp, or unit heater manufactured on or after
January 1, 2007, may be sold or offered for sale in the state unless
the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency
standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040. No new automatic commercial ice
cube machine((,)) or single-voltage external AC to DC power supply,
((or metal halide lamp fixtures)) manufactured on or after January 1,
2008, may be sold or offered for sale in the state unless the
efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards
set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(2) On or after January 1, 2008, no new ((commercial prerinse spray
valve,)) commercial clothes washer, commercial refrigerator or freezer,
single-voltage external AC to DC power supply, state-regulated
incandescent reflector lamp, or unit heater manufactured on or after
January 1, 2007, may be installed for compensation in the state unless
the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency
standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040. On or after January 1, 2009, no
new automatic commercial ice cube machine ((or metal halide lamp
fixtures)) manufactured on or after January 1, 2008, may be installed
for compensation in the state unless the efficiency of the new product
meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.
(3) Standards for ((metal halide lamp fixtures and)) state-regulated incandescent reflector lamps are effective on the dates in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) The following products, if manufactured on or after January 1,
2009, may not be sold or offered in the state unless the efficiency of
the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in
RCW 19.260.040:
(a) Wine chillers for use by an individual;
(b) Illumination of remote reach-in cabinets, cabinets without
doors, and wine chillers that are not consumer products;
(c) Hot water dispensers and minitank electric water heaters;
(d) Bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water dispensers;
(e) Pool heaters, residential pool pumps, and portable electric
spas;
(f) Tub spout diverters; and
(g) Commercial hot food holding cabinets.
(5) The following products, if manufactured on or after January 1,
2009, may not be installed for compensation in the state on or after
January 1, 2010, unless the efficiency of the new product meets or
exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040:
(a) Wine chillers for use by an individual;
(b) Illumination of remote reach-in cabinets, cabinets without
doors, and wine chillers that are not consumer products;
(c) Hot water dispensers and minitank electric water heaters;
(d) Bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water dispensers;
(e) Pool heaters, residential pool pumps, and portable electric
spas;
(f) Tub spout diverters; and
(g) Commercial hot food holding cabinets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.260 RCW
to read as follows:
By July 1, 2009, the energy policy division of the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall adopt by rule minimum
energy efficiency standards for new consumer audio and video equipment
that are consistent with standards adopted by states on the west coast
with similar minimum energy efficiency standards.

--- END ---