BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.660 and 2006 c 339 s 302 and 2006 c 73 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) An offender is eligible for the special drug offender
sentencing alternative if:
(a) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent
offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4);
(b) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a felony
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
under RCW 46.61.502(6) or felony physical control of a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW
46.61.504(6);
(c) The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex
offense at any time or violent offense within ten years before
conviction of the current offense, in this state, another state, or the
United States;
(d) For a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under
chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of
the particular controlled substance as determined by the judge upon
consideration of such factors as the weight, purity, packaging, sale
price, and street value of the controlled substance;
(e) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not
become subject to a deportation order during the period of the
sentence;
(f) The standard sentence range for the current offense is greater
than one year; and
(g) The offender has not received a drug offender sentencing
alternative more than once in the prior ten years before the current
offense.
(2) A motion for a sentence under this section may be made by the
court, the offender, or the state. If the sentencing court determines
that the offender is eligible for this alternative, the court may order
an examination of the offender. The examination shall, at a minimum,
address the following issues:
(a) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;
(b) Whether the addiction is such that there is a probability that
criminal behavior will occur in the future;
(c) Whether effective treatment for the offender's addiction is
available from a provider that has been licensed or certified by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services; and
(d) Whether the offender and the community will benefit from the
use of the alternative.
(3) The examination report must contain:
(a) Information on the issues required to be addressed in
subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) A proposed treatment plan that must, at a minimum, contain:
(i) A proposed treatment provider that has been licensed or
certified by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the
department of social and health services;
(ii) The recommended frequency and length of treatment, including
both residential chemical dependency treatment and treatment in the
community;
(iii) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements
regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by
family members and others; and
(iv) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative
conditions.
(4) After receipt of the examination report, if the court
determines that a sentence under this section is appropriate, the court
shall waive imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range
and impose a sentence consisting of either a prison-based alternative
under subsection (5) of this section or a residential chemical
dependency treatment-based alternative under subsection (6) of this
section. The residential chemical dependency treatment-based
alternative is only available if the midpoint of the standard range is
twenty-four months or less.
(5) The prison-based alternative shall include:
(a) A period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half
of the midpoint of the standard sentence range or twelve months,
whichever is greater. During incarceration in the state facility,
offenders sentenced under this subsection shall undergo a comprehensive
substance abuse assessment and receive, within available resources,
treatment services appropriate for the offender. The treatment
services shall be designed by the division of alcohol and substance
abuse of the department of social and health services, in cooperation
with the department of corrections;
(b) ((The remainder)) One-half of the midpoint of the standard
range as a term of community custody which must include appropriate
substance abuse treatment in a program that has been approved by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services. If the department finds that conditions have been
willfully violated, the offender may be reclassified to serve the
remaining balance of the original sentence. An offender who fails to
complete the program or who is administratively terminated from the
program shall be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her
sentence as ordered by the sentencing court;
(c) Crime-related prohibitions including a condition not to use
illegal controlled substances;
(d) A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to
monitor that status; and
(e) A term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.715 to be
imposed upon failure to complete or administrative termination from the
special drug offender sentencing alternative program.
(6) The residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative
shall include:
(a) A term of community custody equal to one-half of the midpoint
of the standard sentence range or two years, whichever is greater,
conditioned on the offender entering and remaining in residential
chemical dependency treatment certified under chapter 70.96A RCW for a
period set by the court between three and six months. If the court
imposes a term of community custody, the department shall, within
available resources, make chemical dependency assessment and treatment
services available to the offender during the term of community
custody. The court shall impose, as conditions of community custody,
treatment and other conditions as proposed in the plan under subsection
(3)(b) of this section. The department may impose conditions and
sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.715 (2), (3), (6), and (7),
9.94A.737, and 9.94A.740. The court shall schedule a progress hearing
during the period of residential chemical dependency treatment, and
schedule a treatment termination hearing for three months before the
expiration of the term of community custody;
(b) Before the progress hearing and treatment termination hearing,
the treatment provider and the department shall submit written reports
to the court and parties regarding the offender's compliance with
treatment and monitoring requirements, and recommendations regarding
termination from treatment. At the hearing, the court may:
(i) Authorize the department to terminate the offender's community
custody status on the expiration date determined under (a) of this
subsection; or
(ii) Continue the hearing to a date before the expiration date of
community custody, with or without modifying the conditions of
community custody; or
(iii) Impose a term of total confinement equal to one-half the
midpoint of the standard sentence range, followed by a term of
community custody under RCW 9.94A.715;
(c) If the court imposes a term of total confinement under (b)(iii)
of this subsection, the department shall, within available resources,
make chemical dependency assessment and treatment services available to
the offender during the terms of total confinement and community
custody.
(7) If the court imposes a sentence under this section, the court
may prohibit the offender from using alcohol or controlled substances
and may require that the monitoring for controlled substances be
conducted by the department or by a treatment alternatives to street
crime program or a comparable court or agency-referred program. The
offender may be required to pay thirty dollars per month while on
community custody to offset the cost of monitoring. In addition, the
court may impose any of the following conditions:
(a) Devote time to a specific employment or training;
(b) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the
court or the community corrections officer before any change in the
offender's address or employment;
(c) Report as directed to a community corrections officer;
(d) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations;
(e) Perform community restitution work;
(f) Stay out of areas designated by the sentencing court;
(g) Such other conditions as the court may require such as
affirmative conditions.
(8)(a) The court may bring any offender sentenced under this
section back into court at any time on its own initiative to evaluate
the offender's progress in treatment or to determine if any violations
of the conditions of the sentence have occurred.
(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify
the terms of the community custody or impose sanctions under (c) of
this subsection.
(c) The court may order the offender to serve a term of total
confinement within the standard range of the offender's current offense
at any time during the period of community custody if the offender
violates the conditions of the sentence or if the offender is failing
to make satisfactory progress in treatment.
(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement under
(c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time previously
served under this section.
(9) If an offender sentenced to the prison-based alternative under
subsection (5) of this section is found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation order, a hearing shall be held
by the department unless waived by the offender, and, if the department
finds that the offender is subject to a valid deportation order, the
department may administratively terminate the offender from the program
and reclassify the offender to serve the remaining balance of the
original sentence.
(10) An offender sentenced under this section shall be subject to
all rules relating to earned release time with respect to any period
served in total confinement.
(11) Costs of examinations and preparing treatment plans under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section may be paid, at the option of
the county, from funds provided to the county from the criminal justice
treatment account under RCW 70.96A.350.

--- END ---