BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A supplemental capital budget is hereby
adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the
several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as
shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2009, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE
K-12 Inventory Pilot Project (08-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding is provided solely for the joint legislative audit and
review committee to define and develop a pilot facility condition and
inventory system for K-12 public school facilities. In developing and
conducting the pilot, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall seek input from the superintendent of public instruction,
participating school districts, the construction services group within
educational service district 112, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the office of financial management, the department
of information services, and other entities as determined by the joint
legislative audit and review committee. It is the intent of the
legislature to build on the experience of the community and technical
college capital facility assessment and inventory process, which
includes an independent condition assessment of facilities, to
establish a baseline of basic public school facility building data and
information.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall select
up to ten public school districts to participate in the pilot. The
school districts must represent a cross-section of large and small
districts, urban and rural districts, districts with facilities of
varying age and condition, districts with varying fiscal capacity, and
at least one district that serves as the host for a skills center.
(3) The facility condition and inventory system must include
facility and site information necessary for facility assessment and
maintenance. The facility condition and inventory system must also
inform statewide policy options related to: (a) Class size; (b) all-day kindergarten; (c) specialized educational spaces, including math
and science classrooms and labs, as well as other specialized spaces;
(d) environmental health and safety improvements; (e) joint use of
school facilities beyond the traditional school day; (f) high
performance buildings; (g) use of portables; and (h) other policy
options as identified by the joint legislative audit and review
committee.
(4) Data elements in the facility condition and inventory system
may include, but are not limited to, facility location, facility
condition including health and safety considerations, type, size,
current use, enrollment and space by grade level, information on
specialized educational spaces, functionality of space, energy
efficiency information, date and cost of original construction, date
and cost of any major remodeling or renovation, operations and
maintenance information and expenditures, and other data elements as
determined by the joint legislative audit and review committee.
(5) By January 1, 2009, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall provide a report to the appropriate legislative fiscal
committees on the following: (a) A proposed scope of work for the
facility condition and inventory system pilot project; (b)
identification of current sources of school district facility
information and where the data resides; (c) recommended criteria for
evaluating school facilities; (d) potential school district
participants; (e) an implementation plan for the pilot group of school
districts; and (f) a review of other states' scope and use of public
school facility condition and inventory information.
(6) By January 1, 2010, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall submit findings and recommendations on the pilot
program to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. At a
minimum, the final report must include the following: (a) A summary of
data collected and analyzed for each participating school district; (b)
an analysis of study and survey data for several participating school
districts compared to an independent facility assessment; (c) a
cost/benefit analysis of expanding the pilot to school districts
statewide, including potential timelines; (d) possible methods and
frequency for collecting, inventorying, updating, and sharing facility
information; (e) possible interaction of a facility condition and
inventory system with the statewide first responder building mapping
system and other data collection efforts that are ongoing; (f) methods
that allow for the efficient transfer of information between school
districts and the facility condition and inventory system; and (g)
other recommendations as determined by the joint legislative audit and
review committee.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $230,000

Sec. 1002 2007 c 520 s 1020 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(06-4-851)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $7,800,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for the backlog, as defined by the
department, of projects determined by the department to be eligible
under chapter 43.185 or 43.185A RCW.
(2) $4,500,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for weatherization administered
through the energy matchmakers program.
(3) $850,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely to promote development of safe and
affordable housing units for persons eligible for services from the
division of developmental disabilities within the department of social
and health services.
(4) $500,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for shelters, transitional housing, or
other housing facilities for victims of domestic violence.
(5) $3,000,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for farm worker housing projects and
programs to meet the full spectrum of housing needs of Washington's
farm workers and their families. The department shall work with
stakeholders representing a diversity of farm worker housing interests
to develop a strategic plan in implementing this provision.
(6) $200,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for the implementation and management
of a manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant ombudsman conflict
resolution program by the office of mobile home affairs as generally
described in section 3, chapter 429, Laws of 2005. The office of
mobile home affairs shall also determine the number of complaints made
to the department since May of 2005 that, in the best estimate of the
department, do in fact present violations of chapter 59.20 RCW and
shall produce a summary of the number and types of complaints. The
office of mobile home affairs shall also continue to maintain and
update a database with information about all mobile home parks and
manufactured housing communities. The office of mobile home affairs
shall provide a report regarding the activities and results of the
program to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives
and the senate by December 31, 2007.
(7) $150,000 of the appropriation from the Washington housing trust
account is provided solely for a program to assist individuals and
communities in the home-buying process, including, but not limited to:
Homebuyer education classes, credit and budget counseling, financial
literacy training, and down payment assistance programs. The department
shall contract with a nonprofit organization as defined under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or similar successor provision
that has experience and expertise in addressing language access
barriers in the home-buying process to implement this program.
(8) The reappropriation in this section must be included in the
calculation of annual funds available for determining the
administrative costs of the department, which shall not exceed five
percent of the annual funds available for the housing assistance
program and the affordable housing program as authorized under RCW
43.185.050 and 43.185A.030.

Reappropriation:
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,502,000
((Homeless Families Services Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,502,000))
$16,502,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $499,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,001,000))
$17,001,000

Sec. 1003 2007 c 520 s 1030 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (07-4-004)

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,200,000))
$10,800,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,100,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,300,000))
$31,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($183,700,000))
$187,300,000

Sec. 1004 2007 c 520 s 1034 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (07-4-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $10,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
public works board, in consultation with the house of representatives
capital budget committee, the senate ways and means committee, and the
office of financial management, to implement an infrastructure interest
rate buy-down pilot program. The purpose of the program is to
demonstrate options for the most efficient use of the state's
investment in local infrastructure by funding more projects at an
accelerated rate.
(2) The pilot program must provide grants to local governments to
offset the difference in interest rates between one-half of one
percent, as offered by the public works board, and the interest rate
the local government may receive on issuance of their own debt, as
estimated by the office of the state treasurer.
(3) The pilot program must include the following projects:
(a) Those with high scores from the list of projects that were not
funded, as identified in the public works board 2008 legislative
report;
(b) Projects located in economically distressed areas or that may
be significantly impacted by a possible upcoming recession; and
(c) Projects located in jurisdictions that have unused debt
capacity and are willing and able to acquire additional debt to finance
the proposed infrastructure project.

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,727,000,000

Sec. 1005 2007 c 520 s 1031 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(07-4-009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $9,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
weatherization administered through the energy matchmakers program.
(2) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to promote
development of safe and affordable housing units for persons eligible
for services from the division of developmental disabilities within the
department of social and health services.
(3) $2,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to nonprofit organizations and public housing authorities for revolving
loan, self-help housing programs for low and moderate income families.
(4) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
shelters, transitional housing, or other housing facilities for victims
of domestic violence.
(5) $14,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary
farmworkers. The operation of the facilities built under this section
shall be in compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1342. The department shall
work with the farmworker housing advisory committee to prioritize
funding of projects to the areas of highest need. Funding may also be
provided, to the extent qualified projects are submitted, for health
and safety projects. Any of this appropriation that is not obligated
by June 30, 2009, shall be added to the amount appropriated for the
general pool of projects.
(6) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
development of emergency shelters and transitional housing
opportunities for homeless families with children.
(7) $4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
development of farm infrastructure improvements. Any of this
appropriation that is not obligated by June 30, 2009, shall be added to
the amount appropriated for the general pool of projects.
(8) $1,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
development of housing for low-income or homeless Native Americans.
The department shall work with Native American tribes, not-for–profit
organizations with experience in serving Native American populations,
and Native American housing development organizations to prioritize
projects located in the areas of highest identified need.
(9) $4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for loans
and grants to eligible organizations to purchase manufactured/mobile
home communities with the intent of preserving the communities for
affordable housing.
(10) Up to $10,000,000 of the appropriation is for the creation and
development of low-income housing within areas declared disasters by
the governor after November 2007.
(11) $2,000,000 of the appropriation from the state taxable
building construction account is provided solely for the development or
preservation of farmworker housing for migrant and seasonal farmworkers
located on private farms. This appropriation is subject to appropriate
agreements to protect the public investment. Any of this appropriation
that is not obligated by June 30, 2009, shall be added to the amount
appropriated for the general pool of projects.
(12) The appropriations in this section from the state building
construction account and the Washington housing trust account shall be
distributed as grants.
(13) $500,000 of the appropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is for the development and implementation of a three year
pilot program to provide rental housing vouchers to low-income teachers
in Yakima and Burien schools.
(a) Low-income teachers means those teachers whose incomes are at
or below eighty percent of area median income for the county in which
the school district exists.
(b) Eligible teachers may receive housing vouchers on a first-come,
first-served basis and may receive vouchers as long as they remain
income qualified and continue to work for the school district for a
period of time determined by the department in consultation with the
school districts. The housing vouchers must be used for housing
located within the school district in which the teacher is employed.
(c) Any of the $500,000 that is unspent as of June 30, 2011, must
be added to the amount appropriated for the general pool of projects.
(14) The appropriation in this section shall not be used for the
administrative costs of the department. The amount of the
appropriation shall be included in the calculation of annual funds
available for determining the administrative costs authorized under RCW
43.185.050.
(((11))) (15) Within available funding provided in this section,
the department shall prepare an inventory of housing assistance
programs. The inventory shall include all state funded programs, the
housing finance commission programs, all programs funded by local
governments and housing authorities, including a description of
expenditures from fees and taxes specifically authorized by state law
for housing assistance and homeless programs, all property tax and
sales tax provisions that are intended to support housing assistance
programs, and all federally funded housing assistance programs provided
in the state. The inventory shall include a description of the
program, biennial appropriation and expenditure levels since the 1999-2001 biennium through the 2007-2009 biennium, a description of
eligibility criteria and the amount of benefit provided per unit or per
family, and the number of units or families assisted. The department
shall coordinate with the joint legislative audit and review committee
to reduce duplicative efforts that may be required by legislation.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,500,000
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($690,000,000))
$740,000,000

Sec. 1006 2007 c 520 s 1035 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (07-4-008)

Appropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,127,000))
$2,027,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,508,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,635,000))
$18,535,000

Sec. 1007 2007 c 520 s 1036 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (07-4-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.135.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects Location Recommendation

YMCA of the inland northwest Spokane $800,000

Boys and girls clubs of south Puget Sound Lakewood $300,000

YMCA of Snohomish county Mukilteo $385,000

YMCA of Snohomish county Everett $800,000

Boys and girls club of south Puget Sound Gig Harbor $600,000

Toutle river ranch Longview $525,000

Boys and girls club of Bellevue Bellevue $800,000

YMCA of Tacoma-Pierce county Gig Harbor $800,000

Wenatchee valley YMCA Wenatchee $213,000

YMCA of greater Seattle Seattle $250,000

Maple Valley community center Maple Valley $100,000

Boys and girls clubs of King county Seattle $618,000

Filipino community of Seattle Seattle $146,000

Boys and girls clubs of King county Seattle $800,000

Ferndale boys and girls club Ferndale $863,000

((Tacoma community center)) Boys and girls club of
south Puget Sound
Tacoma
$800,000

Mukilteo boys and girls club Mukilteo $250,000

Total $9,050,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,050,000

Sec. 1008 2007 c 520 s 1041 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local and Community Projects (08-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement shall
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation provided in this section for the bridge for
kids project shall not be released until the department obtains a
report from the project sponsor updating the cost of the project and
the current fund raising plan.
(8) ((Funding for preconstruction activities for the Camas and
Washougal community and recreation center is contingent on voter
approval of a metropolitan park district.
(9))) The appropriation provided in this section for the Fox
theater shall be provided only under an agreement that the theater
shall retain its current name as the Fox theater.
(((10))) (9) The appropriation in this section for the life support
and emergency medical services infrastructure build-out project is
provided solely for emergency medical services and medical care
infrastructure consistent with the adopted mission, goals, and capital
plan of the 501(c)(3) life support.
(((11) The port of Grays Harbor project is a loan that is subject
to the provisions of chapter 171, Laws of 2006.
(12))) (10) The appropriation is provided solely for the following
list of projects:

Project Name Amount

800 MhZ interoperability public safety communication $1,000,000
Aberdeen union gospel mission $562,000
Arts west playhouse and gallery $150,000
Ashford cultural center and mountaineering museum $800,000
Asian counseling/referral services $2,000,000
((Aviation high school $275,000))
Ballard corners park $125,000
Beaver mitigation of Little Spokane river $75,000
Benton City food bank (($200,000))
$350,000
Bethel community center $1,000,000
Blueberry park improvements $5,000
Bothell crossroads/state route 522 realignment - land
acquisition and preconstruction activities $7,000,000
Bowen field $500,000
Bremerton downtown economic revitalization projects $5,000,000
Bridge for kids $500,000
Burbank water improvement $1,621,000
Burien town square $1,600,000
Camp kilworth land acquisition - Federal Way $1,100,000
Cannon house $750,000
Chambers creek pedestrian bridge (($1,000,000))
$2,400,000
Chehalis middle school track improvement $350,000
Chehalis veterans wall of honor security enclosure $25,000
Chelan county public utility district monitor
domestic water system $800,000
Children's hospital $2,500,000
Cities of Camas and Washougal community/recreation
center preconstruction activities $500,000
City of Everett - senior center expansion and upgrade $400,000
City of Everett minor league baseball - aquasox $433,000
City of Kent event center $3,000,000
City of Mount Vernon downtown and waterfront
flood control $1,000,000
City of Puyallup riverwalk trail project $600,000
City of Tacoma minor league baseball - rainiers $2,500,000
City of Yakima minor league baseball $594,000
Civil war cemetery near volunteer park $5,000
Columbia Springs environmental learning center
preconstruction or construction activities $200,000
Confluence project (($500,000))
$1,000,000
Counter balance park $100,000
Coupeville covered play area $113,000
Covered bridge park land acquisition (Grays river) $90,000
Cowlitz drug treatment center $580,000
Darrington water system improvements $100,000
Dawson place child advocacy center land
acquisition and renovation $650,000
Daybreak star in Discovery park $300,000
Dining car historic preservation $50,000
Discovery park - Fort Lawton $700,000
Duwamish education center $2,000,000
Duwamish longhouse $275,000
Eatonville family park $200,000
Evergreen school district health and biosciences academy $1,000,000
Federal Way little league field lighting $50,000
Ferndale boys and girls club - urgent needs
and preconstruction activities $200,000
Fish lake trail $1,000,000
Fort Dent sewer $450,000
Foss waterway $1,000,000
Fox theater $2,000,000
Friends of hidden river preconstruction activities $675,000
Goodwill of Tacoma $1,500,000
Granite Falls museum $30,000
High Point neighborhood center in West Seattle $1,000,000
Highline school district noise mitigation (($3,500,000))
$5,000,000
Hill ward building removal $550,000
Innovative services northwest $1,900,000
Institute for community leadership $700,000
Jewish federation of greater Seattle $900,000
Kent alliance center $500,000
Kirkland public safety campus land acquisition
and preconstruction activities $750,000
Kitsap SEED $1,100,000
Klickitat law enforcement firing range $20,000
Kruckeberg botanical garden $150,000
Lake Stevens civic center $800,000
Lake Stevens senior center (($200,000))
$300,000
Lake Waughop/department of ecology aquatic weeds $50,000
Library connection at greenbridge $200,000
Life support and emergency medical services
infrastructure build-out $2,700,000
Lions club renovation $160,000
Long lake nutrient reduction $300,000
Loon lake wood waste removal pilot study $350,000
Lucy Lopez center land acquisition $750,000
Maple Valley lake wilderness lodge and conference center $1,500,000
Maple Valley legacy site planning and
infrastructure development $3,000,000
McCaw hall $2,000,000
McDonald park $150,000
Mercer slough environmental center $1,500,000
Mill creek senior center $150,000
Mirabeau Point children's universal park $800,000
Mobius (($800,000))
$1,900,000
Monroe rotary field $700,000
Morning star cultural center $300,000
Mountains to sound - SR18/I90 interchange $500,000
Nisei veterans committee $250,000
NORCOM public safety communication $750,000
Nordic heritage museum preconstruction activities $1,500,000
Northwest African American museum $650,000
Northwest harvest $3,000,000
Northwest stream center $300,000
Oak Harbor dredging preconstruction activities $59,000
Oak Harbor veterans memorial $50,000
Okanogan Valley equestrian and cultural heritage center $4,000,000
Palouse street safety improvements $210,000
Performing arts center eastside preconstruction
activities (($2,000,000))
$3,000,000
Perry technical institute hanger $250,000
Pike Place market $1,070,000
Port of Benton transloader (railex) $1,000,000
((Port of Grays Harbor $2,500,000))
Port of Walla Walla wine incubator $500,000
Poulsbo marine science center floating classroom $100,000
Prime time repairs (terminally ill children) $300,000
Puyallup town square $200,000
Rainier lifelong learning center $200,000
Richland Babe Ruth field complex $1,000,000
Seatac World War I memorial plaza $200,000
Seattle art museum $1,250,000
Seattle children's play garden $332,000
Seattle Chinese garden $500,000
Shoreline YMCA $800,000
Simon youth foundation resource center $150,000
Skagit recreation and event center $1,000,000
Snoqualmie railway history preconstruction activities $600,000
Somerset village - Snohomish Y $200,000
South Tacoma community center (($700,000))
$1,200,000
Spokane county minor league baseball - Indians $2,000,000
Spokane Valley community center and foodbank $260,000
Spokane YWCA/YMCA joint project (($2,500,000))
$3,500,000
Springwood youth center $500,000
SR 395/court street pedestrian overpass $400,000
Suquamish inviting house construction $1,000,000
Tacoma narrows bridge lights $1,500,000
Tonasket viewing platform $100,000
Tanbara clinic - East Tacoma community $850,000
The Northwest maritime center $2,250,000
The Tri Cities minor league baseball $666,000
Thurston county small business incubator $750,000
Tokeland/North Cove water tank for fire $10,000
Town square grid - drexler drive $750,000
Tukwila southcenter parkway infrastructure $4,000,000
Turning point domestic violence shelter $700,000
University Place town square $1,000,000
VaHalla hall $750,000
Vancouver national historic reserve $750,000
Vernetta Smith Chehalis timberland library $500,000
Waitsburg flood control feasibility report $29,000
Walla Walla county health center annex $100,000
White Center heights park $500,000
White Salmon water improvement $1,500,000
Willapa harbor community center $300,000
Wing-It productions historic theater $20,000
Washington State University/Shoreline Community
College zero energy house $200,000
Yakima domestic violence shelter $200,000
Yakima downtown futures initiative phase 3 $1,000,000
((YMCA of Snohomish county: Ebey Island project $2,200,000))
Total (($132,619,000))
$134,894,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($132,619,000))
$134,894,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($132,619,000))
$134,894,000

Sec. 1009 2007 c 520 s 1039 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Innovation Partnership Zones (08-2-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state will designate unique areas of
the state as innovation partnership zones, where globally competitive
companies, research institutions, and advanced training are creating
special competitive advantages for the state. From among the
innovation partnership zones, using a competitive process based on
need, estimated economic impact, geographic diversity, and local
matches, ((five)) six zones or projects will be selected to receive
funding. The appropriation in this section is provided solely for
shared telecommunications within the zone, shared infrastructure and
facilities, long-term capital purchases, and up to 10 percent for zone
administration through the locally-designated innovation partnership
zone administrator. It is the intent of the legislature that
innovation partnership zone grants should consider the
commercialization of inventions and innovations.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Snohomish County Biodiesel (08-4-859)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for a grant for
the Snohomish county biodiesel crusher project.

Appropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Quillayute Valley Wood-Fire Boiler (08-4-858)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for a grant for
the Quillayute Valley wood-fire boiler demonstration project.

Appropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Sec. 1012 2007 c 520 s 1042 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Development Fund (08-4-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects listed in this section must comply with RCW
43.63A.125(2)(c).
(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(3) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(4) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(5) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and
may not be advanced under any circumstances.
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Name Amount
CASA Latina $1,000,000
Divine alternatives for dads services (DADS) center $10,000
El Centro de la Raza center $821,000
Hilltop renaissance community - Centro Latino $1,950,000
Hilltop renaissance community - MLK development
association preconstruction activities $4,000,000
HomeSight center $250,000
Ilwaco community building $2,700,000
Japanese cultural center of Washington $1,000,000
KCR Bremerton community services center $900,000
KDNA community center (Granger community center) $500,000
Korean women's association center $1,500,000
North helpline lake city court $350,000
Salishan housing community $2,900,000
Sea Mar family housing community $1,500,000
Spokane east central community center $150,000
Spokane emmanuel center $500,000
Spokane Northeast community center $1,000,000
Wapato Filipino American center $135,000
Total $21,166,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,166,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,166,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Longview Regional Water Treatment Plant Dredging (08-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the emergency dredging of the Cowlitz river to
prevent sandbars from obstructing the intake facility necessary for the
city of Longview to obtain water.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Quincy Water Treatment System Phase I (08-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely to increase the capacity of the water treatment
facility in the city of Quincy.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Schools (08-4-856)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $475,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for administration costs associated with the implementation of
chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 3291 (community schools
program)), Laws of 2008. The department must submit a prioritized list
of recommended projects to the governor and the legislature in the
department's 2009-2011 capital budget request. The total ranked
project list for the annual competitive round shall not exceed
$10,000,000. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the
appropriation in this subsection shall lapse.
(2)(a) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for the acquisition, rehabilitation, expansion, or improvement
of surplus school buildings to be converted into community facilities
for the delivery of nonresidential coordinated services for children
and families.
(b) Eligible applicants include local governments, nonprofit
organizations, nonprofit early learning providers, and tribal
governments. Only the following surplus schools may be eligible for
grant funding under this subsection (2): (i) Allen school; (ii) Crown
Hill school; (iii) Fauntleroy school; (iv) University Heights school;
(v) Martin Luther King elementary school; and (vi) Lincoln high school
north wing.
(c) As part of the grant process, applicants must submit a
comprehensive plan for the use of the surplus school that includes
information on the following:
(i) A list of partner entities that will assist the lead eligible
applicant to provide or coordinate services for children and families;
(ii) A memorandum of understanding between the lead eligible
applicant and each partner; and
(iii) An examination of capital and operating funding sources that
applicants intend to apply to the project and coordinated services at
each school to be served, whether such funding is derived from grants
under this section or from other federal, state, local, or private
sources.
(d) Project applicants must demonstrate that the proposed project
is ready to proceed, will make timely use of the funds, and requires
state funding to accomplish a discrete, usable phase of the project
that may include acquisition.
(e) If grant funds under this subsection are used for the
acquisition of surplus school facilities, the sale proceeds must be
used by the local school board disposing of such property for
renovation, replacement, or new construction of school facilities in
the district.
(f) In contracts for grants authorized under this subsection, the
department shall include provisions that require that capital
improvements must be held by the grantee for a specified period of time
appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities must be used
for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be
out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall
repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus
interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington
general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects (08-4-860)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and
may not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

16th Street esplanade and public pier $300,000
180th/240th park development $750,000
Armed forces and aerospace museum $100,000
Brightwater environmental education center
and energy test bed $270,000
Bullerville utility district water system replacement $350,000
Burley Mountain lodge $350,000
Cliff Bailey center-north end roof $342,000
Comfort house senior citizen center $15,000
Dialysis capacity and backup power $534,000
Eatonville community pool access addition $350,000
Examination room at children's justice center $100,000
Garfield county agricultural history museum $75,000
Greenacres neighborhood park development $300,000
Handicap and public safety renovations $115,000
Hazel Heights p-patch and community garden $70,000
Jim Kennett track renovation $12,000
Kitsap mental health services residential facility $1,000,000
Mason transit community center $235,000
Mobile command center $300,000
Mt. Spokane ski and snowboard parks preconstruction
activities $300,000
Naches depot and trail phase II $350,000
New hope farms $85,000
Northeast redevelopment area project
preconstruction activities $500,000
Public facility emergency readiness $500,000
Puget Sound industrial excellence center $1,000,000
Rainier Valley boys and girls club $470,000
Redman Slough channel restoration $45,000
Relocation of Highline West Seattle mental health facility $1,500,000
Share house expansion $1,500,000
Sunnyside school district $150,000
Underwood water reservoir and water system improvements $350,000
Vader public restrooms $110,000
Wallingford boys and girls club $167,000
Wenatchee applesox renovation $400,000
West Richland diking district $120,000
William Factory small business incubator $500,000
Yakima Valley museum feasibility study - downtown
arts center $25,000
Youth housing and drop-in center $300,000
YWCA somerset village apartments and community
center acquisition $200,000
Total $14,140,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,140,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rapid Response Program (08-2-857)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding is provided solely for the department to assist
eligible organizations described under RCW 43.185A.040 to purchase land
or real property for affordable housing and community facilities
preservation or development in rapidly gentrifying neighborhoods or
communities with a significant low-income population that is threatened
with displacement by such gentrification.
(2) Loans or grants may be made for the purchase of land or real
property for the preservation or development of affordable housing or
community facilities, including reasonable costs and fees.
(3) The department may adopt guidelines and requirements that are
necessary to administer the loans and grants.
(4) The department's review and evaluation of projects for loans
and grants must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a)
Mobile home parks in Cowlitz, Douglas, Grays Harbor, King, Kitsap,
Mason, Pierce, Snohomish, Spokane, Thurston, and Whatcom counties when
there is a threat of closure or conversion to nonmobile home use; (b)
University District ecumenical campus coalition properties; and (c)
Spokane county properties that are currently, or soon to become
available, for affordable housing development.
(5) A loan recipient must preserve affordable rental housing
acquired or developed under this section as affordable housing for a
minimum of thirty years.
(6) Interest rates on loans made under this section may be as low
as zero percent but may not exceed three percent. All loan repayment
moneys received must be deposited into Washington housing trust account
and accounted for separately from other funds in the account.

Appropriation:
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Equity Program (08-2-858)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department to contract with the Washington
state housing finance commission to administer the facilitation of
nonprofit entity use of tax-exempt multifamily bonds issued by the
Washington state housing finance commission.

Appropriation:
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Statewide Childcare Facilities Needs Assessment (08-4-857)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
department, in consultation with the department of early learning, to
provide an assessment of childcare capacity statewide for the following
children: (a) Children served by programs under chapter 72.40 RCW; (b)
sick children; (c) children whose care is subsidized by the department
of social and health services; (d) children that participate in the
early childhood education and assistance program; and (e) children that
participate in the head start program.
(2) The department shall review current or potential funding
sources for the acquisition, construction, renovation, or expansion of
early learning and other childcare program facilities, and make
recommendations to the legislature regarding the need to revise current
state competitive childcare facility programs or develop new state
programs.
(3)(a) The department shall convene a work group to consider and
make recommendations regarding potential criteria for a competitive
childcare facility program including, but not limited to the following:
(i) Potential eligible applicants; (ii) the appropriateness of grants
or loans for eligible applicants; (iii) the type of facilities that are
eligible for grants or loans; (iv) objective selection criteria; (v)
the need for technical assistance for applicants; and (vi) potential
modifications, if any, to the school construction assistance program
administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
with regard to early learning and other childcare programs.
(b) The work group shall consist of stakeholders in the early
learning and childcare communities and their recommendations must be
delivered to the legislative fiscal committees by November 15, 2008.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building Communities Fund Program (08-4-855)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for administrative costs associated with the
implementation of chapter . . . (House Bill No. 3125 (building
communities fund program)), Laws of 2008. If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2008, the appropriation in this section shall lapse. The
department shall submit a prioritized list of ranked projects to the
governor and the legislature for the 2009-2011 biennium. The total
ranked project list shall not exceed $13,000,000.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Infrastructure Investment System (08-2-859)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature intends to begin a process
of reevaluating the policy goals and priorities for the allocation of
the infrastructure assistance program funds through the use of
information that is available and reviewed each biennium by the
infrastructure programs.
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
office of financial management, in cooperation with the department of
community, trade, and economic development, the department of ecology,
the department of health, the transportation improvement board, and the
office of the state treasurer to develop an implementation plan. The
implementation plan will also be developed in consultation with
existing and potential state infrastructure program grant and loan
recipients, other stakeholders, and the legislature. The
implementation plan will identify options for the organization and
coordination of appropriate state infrastructure assistance programs
into an improved infrastructure investment system. The implementation
plan must identify opportunities for the improved infrastructure
investment system to achieve the following:
(a) Ease of access to program information and applications;
(b) Access to technical assistance;
(c) Coordination of program investment to ensure that all budget
and tax support from all state sources is disclosed and considered as
a total package of assistance. This includes the identification of
taxes paid by taxing districts and regions and the benefits received
from those same districts and regions;
(d) The promotion of strategic investments of state resources that
are aligned with state policy goals, which includes laws,
administrative rules, and program policies;
(e) The reduction of the cost of private market borrowing for
jurisdictions with higher costs;
(f) The identification of additional revenue for local
infrastructure; and
(g) Effective and efficient program administration.
(2) The development of an implementation plan must build upon prior
studies and inventories of infrastructure programs and a further
analysis of the major local infrastructure assistance programs. The
implementation plan must be based on analysis, including the following:
(a) The utilization of state grants, loans, and interest rate
subsidies to rate payers and local tax payers;
(b) A comparison of state policy goals, which are primary
considerations in determining project funding decisions, with the
actual funding decisions, the criteria used to rank proposals, and the
performance measures used to monitor the success of the programs;
(c) The compilation of the total amount of assistance received by
jurisdictions over the past five biennia;
(d) A comparison of the terms of a sample of low-interest loans
provided to public infrastructure projects with the terms of private
market borrowing that the jurisdictions would have been able to obtain.
The sample of loans must include different types and sizes of projects
and jurisdictions; and
(e) An identification of funds leveraged with state infrastructure
resources.
(3) The legislature also intends to use information from the
multiple infrastructure assistance programs to provide direction for
future funding priorities. The legislature will base those priorities
on information from infrastructure assistance programs, including the
programs' recommendations for the following:
(a) Needed investment for the different types of infrastructure
projects over the next six years;
(b) Funding allocation of the projected existing state
infrastructure assistance resources to those types of projects;
(c) Reallocation of existing state resources for infrastructure
projects; and
(d) New and existing local and state revenue sources to address
unfunded local infrastructure needs. In estimating the needed
investment for different types of infrastructure projects,
infrastructure assistance programs may include in their recommendations
new types of projects that are not authorized in statute.
(4) The implementation plan and analysis must be completed by
December 1, 2008.

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000

Sec. 1022 2007 c 520 s 1050 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Oversight of State Facilities (08-2-855)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the office of financial management to strengthen
its oversight role in state facility analysis and decision making as
generally described in chapter 506, Laws of 2007.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,015,000))
$1,419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,015,000))
$1,419,000

Sec. 1023 2007 c 520 s 1049 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Higher Education Cost Escalation (08-2-854)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the office of financial management to assist public
baccalaureate higher education institutions in managing unanticipated
cost escalation for projects bid during the 2007-2009 biennium. Not
more than $750,000 shall be made available to any single project and
amounts used must be matched equally from other resources. The office
of financial management shall manage the distribution of funds to
ensure that the requesting institution has managed its project within
the current appropriation through preparation of bid documents and that
the scope of the project is no greater than originally specified in the
design. Prior to approving use of a minor works appropriation as a
match, and its transfer to the project with unanticipated cost
escalation, the office of financial management shall require the
institution to describe what it has done to identify and develop
alternative resources for a match, and the specific minor works
projects that would be deferred as a result of the transfer. The
office of financial management shall report to the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature on the use of these funds.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,237,000))
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,237,000))
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Higher Education Project Scoring and Financing Study (08-2-861)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the office of financial management to complete an
objective analysis and scoring of all capital budget projects proposed
by the public four-year institutions, beginning in 2008, and a higher
education financing study as generally described in chapter . . .
(Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 3329), Laws of 2008. If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the appropriation shall lapse.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Sec. 1025 2007 c 520 s 1065 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Improvements (08-1-011)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $25,000 of the capitol building
construction account appropriation is provided solely to establish a
legislative gift center created in chapter . . . (Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1896), Laws of 2007. If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the appropriation shall lapse.))

Appropriation:
((Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $701,000))
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $676,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($550,000))
$575,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,251,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,836,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,087,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Child Care Facility: Purchase and Improvements (08-2-854)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $700,000 of the appropriation in this
section is for the acquisition of the "Perry street" daycare site.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Sec. 1027 2007 c 520 s 1066 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-015)

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,715,000))
$1,619,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,456,000))
$1,766,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,634,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,386,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,191,000))
$8,405,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,365,000))
$20,065,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,556,000))
$28,470,000

Sec. 1028 2007 c 520 s 1067 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$2,896,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,899,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,721,000))
$5,617,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,006,000))
$6,006,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,727,000))
$11,623,000

Sec. 1029 2007 c 520 s 1073 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Oversight of State Facilities (08-2-853)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations ((is)) in this section
((is)) are provided solely for the department of general administration
to assist the office of financial management with the development ((of
six-year facility plans as generally described in chapter . . .
(Substitute House Bill No. 2366), Laws of 2007)) and implementation of
RCW 43.82.035 and 43.82.055.

Appropriation:
General Administration Services Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($345,000))
$609,000

Sec. 1030 2007 c 520 s 1068 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Program (08-2-012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($370,000))
$360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,720,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,090,000))
$3,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Infrastructure Relocation (08-2-028)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Campus Monuments Repair and Restoration (09-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Olympia: Pro Arts Site Acquisition (08-2-856)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,985,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,985,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
Thurston County Childcare Needs Assessment - Predesign (08-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the department of personnel and the department of general
administration to develop a predesign to determine: (1) Childcare
needs of Washington state employees in Thurston county; (2) existing
licensed childcare capacity near the capitol campus, in Lacey and in
Tumwater, located near state agency offices; (3) preferred and
alternate locations based on that need and capacity, on or near the
capitol campus, in Lacey and in Tumwater; (4) optimum size of childcare
space; and (5) project costs for these locations. The departments
shall submit the predesign by September 15, 2008, to the office of
financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees.

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Sec. 1035 2007 c 520 s 1075 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES
Wheeler Block Development--Department of Information Services,
State Patrol, and General Office (08-2-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Planning funds are provided solely to
lease/develop state office buildings and facilities for the department
of information services on the "Wheeler block" of the east capitol
campus. The office buildings shall be constructed and financed so that
agencies' occupancy costs per gross square foot or per employee will
not exceed 110 percent of comparable private market rental rates per
gross square foot or per employee. The comparable general office space
rate shall be calculated based on recent Thurston county leases of new
space of at least 100,000 rentable square feet adjusted for known
escalation clauses, expected inflation, and differences in the level of
service provided by the comparable leases as determined by the
department in consultation with the department of general
administration. In addition to the department of information services,
state agency tenants shall include the state patrol and general office
facilities for small agencies and offices. The department shall design
and operate the general office facilities for small agencies and
offices as a demonstration of the efficiencies gained from the
integration of office space and telecommunications and computer
technology. The demonstration project shall provide office space,
furniture, and telecommunications and computer technology as a single
package. The facility shall be designed so that small agencies and
offices can move in and out of the facility without the typical moving
expenses that result from individual agency ownership of furniture and
technology. The facility for small agencies and offices shall also
provide for staffing and space efficiencies resulting from central
reception, and support services and spaces. The department of general
administration shall coordinate with state agency tenants of the
existing general administration building that will not be relocated to
the new facilities of the "Wheeler block" for occupancy of state-owned
or existing leased facilities ((vacated by the state patrol or the
department of information services)) within Thurston county prior to
relocation to new or not currently state-owned or leased facilities.
The department shall consider alternatives for backfilling vacated
state patrol or department of information services leased facilities
when possible.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Sec. 1036 2007 c 520 s 1090 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE
Pritchard Building Rehabilitation (((08-2-017))) (08-2-850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,100,000))
$800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,100,000))
$800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Flood Warning Systems (08-2-851)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the emergency management division in consultation
with the department of ecology, the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the Washington association of counties, the
United States army corps of engineers, the national oceanic and
atmospheric association, and the national weather service to develop
the following:
(1) An inventory and description of flood warning systems currently
in place in flood hazard areas of the state, including manual systems
and electronic systems;
(2) A needs assessment indicating what specific areas of the state
could be better served by flood warning systems based on flooding areas
mapped under the federal emergency management act. The needs
assessment must include recommendations regarding how to make timely
notification of flood warnings and how to gather and share data about
potential flood areas;
(3) An information bank of flood warning systems, with descriptions
of available and emerging technologies, and estimates of the costs of
purchasing, installing, and maintaining these systems;
(4) Sources of potential federal assistance for local flood warning
systems; and
(5) Recommendations to assist local governments in the financing of
capital costs of flood warning systems, including the potential to
modify existing state programs.
The recommendations must be reported to the office of financial
management and legislature by December 15, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 2001 2007 c 520 s 2007 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Fircrest School - Health and Safety Improvements (06-1-852)

Reappropriation:
((Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000))
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $372,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($750,000))
$722,000

Sec. 2002 2007 c 520 s 2021 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Capital Project Management (08-1-110)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,555,000))
$2,305,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,870,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,425,000))
$14,175,000

Sec. 2003 2007 c 520 s 2037 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Fircrest Campus Master Plan (08-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall resume and complete a master plan of the
portion of the Fircrest campus that is not utilized by the Fircrest
school or the department of health.
(2) In drafting the master plan, the department shall consult with
the following:
(a) The city of Shoreline;
(b) The department of natural resources;
(c) The department of health regarding their master planning
effort;
(d) Representatives of institutions of higher education with whom
the department has a partnership; and
(e) Representatives of the Shoreline community and neighboring
communities.
(3) The master plan must include a plan for the future of the
property, including recommendations for alternative uses such as
affordable housing and smart growth options. The hybrid option as
described in the Fircrest excess property report - "Land Use Options
and Recommendations," January 14, 2008, will be used for the purposes
of the master plan.
(4) The department must report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and the office of financial management by ((January 1,
2008)) December 1, 2010.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($175,000))
$445,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($175,000))
$445,000

Sec. 2004 2007 c 520 s 2029 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Special Commitment Center Medium Management Housing Addition
(08-2-505)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is for the evaluation of design
alternatives to meet programmatic needs and to add residential space to
existing facilities by remodeling existing residential space and
converting existing program space to residential space for additional
beds.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$1,275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$1,275,000

Sec. 2005 2007 c 520 s 2032 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Western State Hospital Laundry Upgrades (08-1-325)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($885,000))
$2,858,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($885,000))
$2,858,000

Sec. 2006 2007 c 520 s 2042 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory Addition (08-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,184,000))
$2,012,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,984,000))
$8,156,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,168,000

Sec. 2007 2007 c 520 s 2045 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (06-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,588,000
Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,300,000))
$66,474,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,086,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,360,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($179,334,000))
$191,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Review of Drinking Water Systems (08-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
department of health to conduct a statewide review of small public
drinking water systems that have or may in the future require
significant state resources to resolve urgent threats to public health
and safety. A small water system is less than one thousand connections
(a group A or group B water system). The department shall evaluate
case studies, the two regulatory frameworks in place for small systems,
and provide a report to the appropriate legislative committees and the
office of financial management with recommendations on early
interventions or changes to the regulatory structure that could prevent
such problems in the future.
(2) The department shall identify the communities that would
benefit from consolidation, regionalization, or other measures that
will lead to improved small system regulatory compliance, long-term
public health protection, and sustained economic vitality in
communities served by small systems. The department shall submit a
progress report to the fiscal committees of the legislature and the
office of financial management by December 1, 2008, and a final report
by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Walla Walla Nursing Facility (08-2-008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,850,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,975,000

Sec. 2010 2007 c 520 s 2061 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Complex: Improve C and D Units Security Features
(06-1-046)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($280,000))
$308,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,618,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,898,000))
$2,926,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections Center: 100-Bed Management and Segregation Unit
(00-2-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $995,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,443,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,438,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Convert BAR Units from Medium to
Close Custody (04-2-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,699,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,809,000

Sec. 2013 2007 c 520 s 2054 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Coyote Ridge Corrections Center: Design and Construct Medium
Security Facility (98-2-011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,459,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,700,000))
$1,280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,449,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($244,608,000))
$232,188,000

Sec. 2014 2007 c 520 s 2056 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: North Close Security Compound
(04-2-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,482,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,007,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $763,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,276,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($140,758,000))
$154,528,000

Sec. 2015 2007 c 520 s 2058 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Replace Support Building Roof
(06-1-044)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,930,000))
$3,580,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $822,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,752,000))
$4,402,000

Sec. 2016 2007 c 520 s 2075 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Correctional Industry Roof
(06-1-023)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,619,000))
$856,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,338,000))
$1,101,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,957,000))
$1,957,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $494,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,451,000))
$2,451,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 3001 2007 c 520 s 3001 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (74-2-006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $300,000 of funds redirected from
completed or cancelled projects is provided solely for capital expenses
associated with a groundwater study of the upper Kittitas.
Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,756,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,543,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,299,000

Sec. 3002 2007 c 520 s 3019 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
State Drought Preparedness (05-4-009)

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,464,000))
$1,287,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,865,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,329,000))
$7,152,000

Sec. 3003 2007 c 520 s 3036 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (08-4-010)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $10,000,000 of the state building construction account--state appropriation is for the extended grant payment to Spokane for
the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.
(2) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for water quality grants for hardship
communities with a population of less than 5,000. The department shall
give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a
regulatory order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with
water quality rules; (b) projects for which design work has been
completed; and (c) projects with a local match from reasonable water
quality rates and charges.
(3) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Adams and Lincoln counties
ground water mapping project. The project shall submit a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature describing the dynamic
relationship between groundwater and surface water in the region. The
report shall be submitted by January 1, 2009.
(4) $2,100,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely for wastewater and clean water improvement projects at
Illahee state park, Fort Flagler state park, and Larrabee state park.
(5)(a) $4,400,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Tenino waste water treatment
facility and collection system to replace the city of Tenino's septic
systems.
(b) (($18,505,000)) $21,669,000 of the state building construction
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the following
projects:

Project Amount
City of Carnation waste water treatment system $3,000,000
Mansfield waste water treatment upgrade $960,000
Rock Island waste water treatment system $870,000
Enumclaw waste water treatment system $750,000
Snohomish waste water treatment system $4,925,000
Freeland sewer district $1,000,000
Clark county regional sewer cooperative $4,000,000
Town of Warden waste water $3,000,000
Gig Harbor waste water system improvements $1,000,000
Ritzville waste water treatment system $2,164,000

(((b))) (c) The appropriation for entities that are listed in
(((a))) (b) of this subsection shall not affect the entities'
eligibility for centennial fund hardship assistance and shall be
excluded from any financial hardship calculation that would have the
effect of reducing other moneys for which the entity is currently
contracted and eligible under WAC 173-95A-030(8), as it existed on the
effective date of this section.
(((c))) (d) The appropriation to the city of Carnation is for
payment to King county for the county connection charge and other
eligible costs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,225,000))
$45,185,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,550,000))
$5,417,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,100,000))
$15,837,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,875,000))
$66,439,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($237,275,000))
$244,839,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Wastewater Regionalization (08-2-851)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department to conduct a review of statewide
community wastewater infrastructure needs and identify communities that
would benefit from regional wastewater infrastructure and identify any
barriers to regionalization these communities may face. The department
must submit an interim report to the appropriate legislative committees
and the office of financial management by November 30, 2008, with a
final report due by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Wastewater Systems Case Studies (08-2-852)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department and department of community, trade,
and economic development to develop a set of case studies of wastewater
systems, based on the small communities initiative's action list, that
require significant state financial and technical resources to resolve
urgent threats to public health, safety, and environmental quality.
The department shall provide recommendations for early interventions to
prevent similar problems with small communities in the future. The
recommendations must be provided to the appropriate legislative
committees and the office of financial management by November 30, 2008.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Sec. 3006 2007 c 520 s 3037 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Cleanup Toxic Sites in Puget Sound (08-4-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the clean
up of contaminated sites that lie adjacent to and are within one-half
mile of Puget Sound. Clean ups shall include orphan and abandoned
sites that pose a threat to Puget Sound with the highest priority sites
being cleaned up first. The department shall provide the Puget Sound
partnership, as created by chapter 341, Laws of 2007, the opportunity
to review and provide comment on proposed projects and activities
recommended for funding. This review shall be consistent with the
funding schedule for the program.

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$6,767,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,820,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,820,000))
$25,587,000

Sec. 3007 2007 c 520 s 3045 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reduce Health Risks from Toxic Diesel Pollution (08-4-024)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($4,840,000)) $5,380,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely for school bus diesel retrofits for local school districts.
(2) (($2,330,000)) $4,830,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely for emission reduction projects for local governments to
retrofit public sector diesel engines to allow public sector fleets to
reduce their emissions.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,170,000))
$10,210,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,170,000))
$10,210,000

Sec. 3008 2007 c 520 s 3046 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grants (08-4-008)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,475,000))
$92,875,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($264,475,000))
$272,875,000

Sec. 3009 2007 c 520 s 3048 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Grants (08-4-009)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,000,000))
$8,500,000

Sec. 3010 2007 c 520 s 3050 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Skykomish Cleanup (08-4-020)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $3,000,000 of the cleanup settlement
account appropriation is provided solely for implementation of chapter
. . . . (House Bill No. 2916 (cleanup settlement account)), Laws of
2008. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided
in this section shall lapse.

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Clean Up Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($0))
$2,050,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,000,000))
$12,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Mason County Consortium (08-4-851)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Flood Protection Study (08-2-855)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The legislature finds that levees across the state provide
protection to hundreds of communities from flooding. Many of these
levee systems are old, built with substandard materials, and were not
designed to provide the level of protection that the communities behind
them need. Recent decertification of levees in King and Pierce
counties by the United States army corps of engineers indicates a
growing problem with levee maintenance. As more levees are
decertified, land behind those levees is considered to be located in
the regulated floodplain. Because of this, many homeowners and
businesses must obtain flood insurance, and new construction projects
must meet strict new building codes.
Therefore, the appropriation in this section is provided solely for
the department to conduct a study to determine the number of
decertified levees in the state and to identify strategies for
recertifying the levees so that they provide optimum protection for the
communities protected by the levees. The department must prioritize
areas to include in the study based on population and the economic
impact of potential flood damage.
The study shall include the following components:
(1) A working group of levee managers to advise and inform the
study;
(2) A technical review of the structural integrity of levee
systems;
(3) An inventory, map, and rate the effectiveness of existing levee
systems; and
(4) The development of strategies and actions needed to improve the
existing levee system and to ensure certification by the United States
army corps of engineers for one-hundred year flood protection.
The study must be completed and a report provided to the
appropriate legislative committees by July 1, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Sec. 3013 2007 c 520 s 3049 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reduce Public Health Risks from Wood Stove Pollution (08-4-019)

Appropriation:
Wood Stove Education Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,500,000))
$4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Breazeale Interpretive Center (08-2-856)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000

Sec. 3015 2007 c 520 s 3060 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Facility Preservation - Facilities (06-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,000,000))
$4,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,419,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,419,000))
$9,119,000

Sec. 3016 2007 c 520 s 3072 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Puget Sound Wastewater (06-1-851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,100,000))
$5,814,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,095,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,195,000))
$6,909,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Saint Edward State Park Seminary Building: Preservation (08-1-010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the following activities necessary to stop water intrusion into the
building:
(1) Design and construction to stop ground water intrusion;
(2) Design to stop above ground water intrusion; and
(3) Design to stop internal leakage from the rain leader system.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,310,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,510,000

Sec. 3018 2007 c 520 s 3087 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,000,000))
$8,800,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,000,000

Sec. 3019 2007 c 520 s 3084 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Historic Preservation (08-1-002)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
design, permits, and drawings for the seminary building at St. Edward
State Park.
(2) $500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
improvements to prevent further degradation of the seminary building.))

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,101,000))
$6,191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,601,000))
$20,691,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Ocean City Comfort Station--Fire Damage Repair (08-1-043)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $181,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $181,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Fort Flagler: Parkwide Sewage Treatment System (08-1-044)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,773,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,773,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Bigelow House (08-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
capital improvements to the Bigelow house. The commission shall accept
the donation of the Bigelow house museum, the grounds, and the contents
of the Bigelow house museum from the Bigelow house preservation
association if the Bigelow house preservation association agrees to
continue to provide staff and programming for the museum.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Sec. 3023 2007 c 520 s 3102 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ((INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR)) RECREATION AND
CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (00-2-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $166,000
Salmon Recovery Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,175,000))
$575,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,341,000))
$741,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,284,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($101,625,000))
$101,025,000

Sec. 3024 2007 c 520 s 3146 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ((INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR)) RECREATION AND
CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (08-4-011)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations are provided solely for the approved list of
projects in LEAP capital document No. 2007-3 as developed on March 17,
2007, and LEAP capital document No. 2008-1 as developed on February 13,
2008.
(2) If additional funds are available after funding the farmlands
preservation account projects approved in subsection (1) of this
section, the committee may:
(a) Provide one-time grants of up to $25,000 each to counties
requesting assistance in developing farmlands preservation strategies
for the purpose of seeking grants from the farmlands preservation
account in future grant cycles.
(b) Conduct a second grant cycle in the 2007-2009 biennium for
farmlands preservation projects. A ranked list of farmlands
preservation projects may be submitted to the governor by November 1,
2007, for approval in the 2008 supplemental capital budget. The
governor may remove projects from the list recommended by the committee
and shall submit this amended list in the supplemental capital budget
request to the legislature.
(3) Funds appropriated for distribution according to the provisions
of RCW 79A.15.040(1)(c) shall be allocated forty percent to local
government projects and sixty percent to state agency projects. If the
cumulative total of local government projects is less than forty
percent of the total distribution to this category, the difference may
be allocated to state agency projects.
(4) $627,299 of the appropriation from the riparian protection
account is provided solely for the Chehalis river surge plain natural
area preserve. This amount shall not be expended for the project until
the department of natural resources has completed a management plan for
the preserve that maintains recreational access and that management
plan is presented to the house of representatives capital budget and
senate ways and means committees.

Appropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000,000
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Flood Assistance for Farm Communities (08-4-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to
restore agricultural infrastructure and equipment necessary to repair,
replace, or maintain infrastructure that provides public health and
safety, water quality, and fish and wildlife habitat protection,
including debris removal, fencing, replacing manure lagoons, and
properly functioning equipment and facilities.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Sec. 3026 2007 c 520 s 3155 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Practice Incentive Payment Loan Program (08-4-004)

Appropriation:
Conservation Assistance Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Nutrient Program (08-4-001)

Appropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Sec. 3028 2007 c 520 s 3175 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Puget Sound Initiative - Nearshore Salmon Restoration (06-2-001)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for
efforts to restore nearshore habitat and estuaries in Puget Sound. The
department shall focus on restoring natural nearshore processes,
including protection and restoration of beach sediments and removal of
existing bulkheads.
(2) The department shall provide the Puget Sound partnership, as
created by chapter 341, Laws of 2007 the opportunity to review and
provide comment on proposed projects and activities recommended for
funding. This review shall be consistent with the funding schedule for
the program.
(3) Funded projects require a nonstate match or in-kind
contributions. The department shall seek to maximize the amount of
nonstate match from local, state, tribal, and federal partners.
Individual projects require a minimum 33 percent cash or in-kind match.
(4) Eligible projects must be within Puget Sound and identified by
a salmon recovery lead entity or marine resource committee and
identified in a current salmon recovery, watershed, or nearshore
habitat restoration and protection plan.
(5) Project evaluation criteria shall be developed by the Puget
Sound nearshore steering committee. The criteria shall be consistent
with the technical guidance developed by the Puget Sound nearshore
science team and shall be coordinated with the salmon recovery funding
board to ensure that project funding and matching requirements are
maximized to the greatest extent possible.
(6) The department shall not utilize any amount of this
appropriation to support administration or overhead. Funding to
support the administration of the funds and the implementation of
selected projects shall be obtained from the department's operating
budget.
(7) In recognition of the urgent need to complete the Puget Sound
nearshore ecosystem restoration project general investigation, up to
$723,000 of this appropriation may be used to match federal funds
implementing the cost-share agreement between the department and the
United States army corps of engineers.
(8) (($3,746,875)) $2,398,735 of the appropriation is provided
solely for the following projects:

Project Amount
Carpenter creek estuary phase 1 (South Kingston road) $637,000
((Duwamish Garden estuary restoration $1,400,000))
Seahurst Park bulkhead phase II $1,100,000
Lower Dosewallips floodplain $609,875
Titlow Beach pocket estuary restoration $51,860

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,500,000

Sec. 3029 2007 c 520 s 3179 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Statewide Fencing Renovation and Replacement (08-1-009)

The appropriation is this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (($1,000,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for the replacement of elk fencing lost in the 2005
school fire in the Wooten wildlife area.))
(1) Up to $2,000,000 of the appropriation from the wildlife account
that is compensation from the settlement received by the state for
damages to the Wooten wildlife area caused by the school fire is for
the replacement of elk fencing in the Wooten wildlife area. The
department shall contract with another state agency to construct the
fence.
(2) $331,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
replacement of a barbed wire fence that was destroyed in the Rockpile
creek fire of July 2007.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,100,000))
$1,431,000
Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,431,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,100,000))
$3,431,000

Sec. 3030 2007 c 520 s 3187 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Combined State Agency Aviation Facility (08-1-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for predesign
and design of a single, consolidated aviation facility, including
consolidated operations, at the Olympia airport to house the fixed wing
operations of the Washington state patrol, the department of natural
resources, and the department of fish and wildlife, and the rotary
operations of the department of natural resources. The office of
financial management shall not allot design funds until the predesign
has undergone a budget evaluation study team review, and the results of
the budget evaluation study team review have been provided to the
legislative fiscal committees and submitted to the office of financial
management for review and approval.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,000))
$101,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,000))
$113,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,608,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,631,000))
$1,721,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Okanogan-Similkameen Land Acquisition (08-2-023)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the
acquisition of agricultural easements or land as specified for the
following properties:
(1) South end Palmer lake: Agricultural easement;
(2) Highway 97 near Riverside: Land acquisition;
(3) McLaughlin Canyon: Agricultural easement;
(4) Similkameen and Sinlahekin river intersect: Agricultural
easement; and
(5) Buzzard lake: Land acquisition.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Ebey Island Property (08-2-852)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $3,200,000 of the appropriation in
this section is for the acquisition of the Ebey island property from
the YMCA of Snohomish county. The office of financial management shall
not allot funds to the department until the appraisal is complete and
shall not allot more than the amount of the appraisal. The department
shall assess the cost of: (1) Extending the YMCA segment of the Ebey
island road one-quarter of a mile; and (2) constructing a parking lot
at the end of the road.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000

Sec. 3033 2007 c 520 s 3211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Combined State Agency Aviation Facility (08-1-952)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for predesign
and design of a single, consolidated aviation facility, including
consolidated operations, at the Olympia airport to house the fixed wing
operations of the Washington state patrol, the department of natural
resources, and the department of fish and wildlife, and the rotary
operations of the department of natural resources. The office of
financial management shall not allot design funds until the predesign
has undergone a budget evaluation study team review, and the results of
the budget evaluation study team review have been provided to the
legislative fiscal committees and submitted to the office of financial
management for review and approval.

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,000))
$555,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,000))
$586,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,783,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,837,000))
$4,369,000

Sec. 3034 2007 c 520 s 3204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Trust Land Transfer (08-2-005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The total appropriation is provided to the department solely to
transfer from trust status, or enter into fifty year leases for,
certain trust lands of statewide significance deemed appropriate for
state park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural
resources conservation area, open space, housing and essential
government services, or recreation purposes. The approved list of
projects is identified in the LEAP capital document 2007-5, developed
((March 20)) April 19, 2007.
(((3))) (2) Property subject to lease agreements under this section
shall be appraised at fair market value. Lease terms shall be fifty
years with options to renew for an additional fifty years. Lease
payments shall be lump sum payments for the entire term of the lease at
the beginning of the lease. The department shall calculate such lump
sum payments using professional appraisal standards. These lease
payments may not exceed the fee simple purchase price based on current
fair market value and shall be deposited by the department to the
common school construction account in the same manner as lease revenues
from other common school trust lands. No deduction shall be made for
the resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040.
(((4))) (3) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to
implement this section are authorized to be paid out of the
appropriations. Authorized costs include the actual cost of
appraisals, staff time, environmental reviews, surveys, and other
similar costs.
(((5))) (4) Intergrant exchanges between common school and other
trust lands of equal value may occur if the exchange is in the interest
of each trust, as determined by the board of natural resources.
(((6))) (5) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these
properties, the department, with full cooperation of the receiving
agencies, shall execute and record a real property instrument that
dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in
subsection (1) of this section. Transfer and lease agreements for
properties identified in subsection (1) of this section must include
terms that restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.
Transfer and lease agreements may include provisions for receiving
agencies to request alternative uses of the property, provided the
alternative uses are compatible with the original intended public
purpose and the department and legislature approves such uses.
(((7))) (6) The department and receiving agencies shall work in
good faith to carry out the intent of this section. However, the
department or receiving agencies may remove a property from the
transfer list based on new, substantive information, if it is
determined that transfer of the property is not in the statewide
interest of either the common school trust or the receiving agency.
(((8))) (7) The department shall execute trust land transfers that,
after the deduction of reasonable costs as provided in subsection
(((4))) (3) of this section, eighty percent of the total value of
transferred property is timber value and is deposited in the common
school construction account. To achieve the eighty percent
requirement, the department may choose to lease properties originally
intended as transfers.
(((9))) (8) On June 30, 2009, the state treasurer shall transfer
all remaining uncommitted funds from this appropriation to the common
school construction account and the appropriations in this section
shall be reduced by an equivalent amount.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,985,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $287,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $385,985,000

Sec. 3035 2007 c 520 s 3214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Conversion Land Acquisition (08-1-950)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
acquisition of working forest lands at risk of conversion to nonforest
uses. The legislature finds that the chronic loss of working forest
lands threatens the long-term prospects of the timber products
industry, which in turn threatens the long-term economic return for the
beneficiaries of state trust lands. Acquisition of these conversion
lands is intended to help stabilize the primary source of revenue to
trust land beneficiaries. The department shall submit a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by October 1, 2008,
indicating the lands purchased under this section, showing the
locations, acres, purchase price, and within that purchase price, the
value of the property attributed to the future value of timber harvests
given an expected rate of return for timber lands, and the value of the
property attributed to future development of the property. It is the
intention of the legislature to lease or otherwise acquire the
development rights of these conversion lands and retain them as long-term working forest lands under the sustainable harvest plan. Working
forest lands acquired under this section shall be managed at a level
equal to or greater than seventy-five percent of the expected harvest
under the sustainable harvest plan. The appropriation provided in this
section shall lapse unless chapter 504, Laws of 2007, or similar
provisions contained in other legislation, is enacted prior to June 30,
2007. No amounts appropriated in this section shall be expended on the
central cascade land exchange unless one of the two following
conditions are met: (1) The four Stemilt parcels in T21R20E are
excluded from the exchange; or (2) the four Stemilt parcels in T21R20E
are included in the exchange and the department and Chelan county, as
chair of the Stemilt partnership, agree on a plan for eventual
ownership, disposition, and management of the four Stemilt parcels.
The department shall manage cash balances in the natural resources real
property replacement account such that cash balances are sufficient for
the treasurer transfers required in section 6030 of this act. The
department may also transfer funds from the land bank subaccount of the
resource management cost account to the natural resources real property
replacement account to ensure sufficient cash balances.

Appropriation:
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Potential School Sites-State Trust Land Study (08-2-854)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The joint legislative committee on school construction funding
finds that high growth school districts are often unable to acquire
lands best suited for siting new schools. Current funding capacity is
devoted to current needs and land development in rapidly growing areas
of the state competes with the present and future need for undeveloped
sites to build new schools.
(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
superintendent of public instruction and the commissioner of public
lands to establish a work group to analyze the feasibility of and
develop options for using existing state lands in high growth areas of
the state for potential future school sites. The work group shall:
(a) Prepare an inventory of existing state trust lands suitable for use
as school sites; (b) prepare a projection of the needs for school sites
in high growth school districts; and (c) develop options for holding
and valuing the land for future school district use that are consistent
with legal requirements and management objectives for state trust lands
and any other state lands.
(3) The work group shall report to the legislature by December 1,
2008.

Appropriation:
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Cost) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000

Sec. 3037 2007 c 520 s 3219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Energy Freedom Program (E3SHB No. 2939) (06-2-850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: If legislation is enacted by June 30,
2009, that moves the energy freedom program to the department of
community, trade, and economic development, then the amounts in this
section are appropriated to the department of community, trade, and
economic development.

Reappropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,971,000))
$4,471,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,971,000))
$4,471,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 4001 2007 c 520 s 4004 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Combined State Agency Aviation Facility (08-2-951)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for predesign
and design of a single, consolidated aviation facility, including
consolidated operations, at the Olympia airport to house the fixed wing
operations of the Washington state patrol, the department of natural
resources, and the department of fish and wildlife, and the rotary
operations of the department of natural resources. The office of
financial management shall not allot design funds until the predesign
has undergone a budget evaluation study team review, and the results of
the budget evaluation study team review have been provided to the
legislative fiscal committees and submitted to the office of financial
management for review and approval.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,000))
$376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $813,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($825,000))
$1,189,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Higher Education Campus Security Plan (08-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for a needs analysis and fiscal impact study of higher
education campus security as generally described in chapter . . .
(Second Substitute House Bill No. 2507), Laws of 2008. If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the appropriation shall lapse.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4003 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Seattle Crime Lab Expansion (09-2-102)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $734,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,208,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,942,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4004 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Shelton-WSP Academy Land: Option to Purchase (09-2-103)

Appropriation:
State Patrol Highway Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
Sec. 5001 2007 c 520 s 5008 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
School Construction Assistance Grants (08-4-200)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For state assistance grants for purposes of calculating square
foot eligibility, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced
by fifty percent.
(2) The legislature has made a commitment to phase in all-day
kindergarten programs beginning with the 2007-08 school year. However,
the legislature finds that one potential barrier to successful
expansion of all-day kindergarten programs may be a lack of facilities
that meet the requirements of an all-day kindergarten program. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation
with the school facilities citizen advisory panel, shall examine
alternatives for addressing school facilities needs for all-day
kindergarten programs, including adapting existing unused space,
creating innovative public-private partnerships and partnerships with
early learning providers, shifting the location of current programs
within a district or a school, and temporary, limited use of portables.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit a
report to the capital budget committee of the house of representatives
and the ways and means committee of the senate by September 1, 2007,
with recommendations on preferred alternatives and an analysis of the
feasibility and cost of implementing the alternatives.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall review and evaluate the
cost and other implications of changing the current annual release
cycle for the school construction assistance program. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall prepare a report
resulting from their review and evaluation by December 1, 2008. This
report must include a specific plan for implementing the change in the
2009-2011 biennium.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($109,521,000))
$22,394,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($770,658,000))
$753,276,000
Common School Reimbursable Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($880,359,000))
$775,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,500,725,000))
$3,495,689,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,381,084,000))
$4,271,539,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Aviation High School (08-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the design costs for a new facility at Aviation
high school, to include space that would be colocated at the museum of
flight on east marginal way. The office of financial management shall
not allot funds for the project until the Highline school district has
secured an operating agreement for a high school program at the museum
of flight site.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Greenbridge Early Learning Center (08-1-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the Puget Sound education district for building the
center for the thrive-by-five program.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
East Yakima Early Learning Center (08-4-860)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
North Central Technical Skills Center (08-4-861)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to
purchase the option on property owned by the port of Chelan for the
north central technical skills center.

Appropriation:
Skill Centers Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Seattle Skills Center Feasibility Study (08-4-858)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
completion of a comprehensive study for the development of skills
center programs in the Seattle school district.

Appropriation:
Skill Centers Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Satellite/Branch Campus Feasibility Studies (08-4-859)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
comprehensive feasibility studies regarding potential skill center
satellite or branch campuses in underserved areas of Washington.

Appropriation:
Skill Centers Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
K-12 Formula Methods Study (08-2-856)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the office of the superintendent of public instruction to convene a
work group to develop methods and options for making the current school
construction assistance grant program more transparent in terms of the
formula components, assumptions, and expected funding sources for
projects funded from the grant program. Within this amount, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall also develop a pilot
template for providing information related to funding sources,
including the amount of either bond or other local sources, or both,
estimated for each project released in fiscal year 2009. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall update and consult with
the joint legislative task force on school construction funding as work
progresses on this effort and must provide a final report to the task
force by October 1, 2008.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Regional School Construction Assistance Program (08-2-857)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop and
implement a regional school construction technical assistance program
for school districts primarily delivered through educational service
districts. The program will be prioritized towards school districts
with the greatest need in terms of school construction management and
school construction capabilities. In developing and implementing this
program, to the maximum extent possible and appropriate, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall receive assistance from
the architectural and engineering services division of the department
of general administration and the construction services group based out
of educational service district 112. As part of the work, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall review model
contracts for school construction.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Sec. 5010 2007 c 520 s 5010 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Vocational Skills Centers (08-4-300)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $9,362,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for minor
capital projects at all of the state's skills centers ranked with a
"severity score" of 40 points or more.
(2) $24,400,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Skagit Valley vocational skills center.
(3) (($16,366,000)) $15,366,000 from this appropriation is provided
solely for the design and construction of the Yakima Valley technical
skills center.
(4) $23,161,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Sno-Isle skills center.
(5) $1,118,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Clark county skills center.
(6) $300,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
completion of the new market skills center project and to address storm
water issues.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,707,000))
$73,707,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,984,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($158,691,000))
$157,691,000

Sec. 5011 2007 c 520 s 5014 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
K-12 Inventory Pilot Project (08-2-851)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the office
of the superintendent of public instruction to define and develop a
pilot information management system for public school facilities,
building on the experience of the community and technical college
facilities information management system. Participating school
districts must represent a cross-section of large and small districts,
urban and rural districts, and districts with facilities of varying age
and condition. The system must allow for the efficient transfer of
information between the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and participating school districts. The inventory system
must include, but not be limited to, facility and site information
necessary for appropriate facility stewardship. Data elements may
include facility location, condition, type, current use, size, date and
cost of original construction, the cost of any major remodeling or
renovation, and energy information. By December 1, 2007, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall provide a report to the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees on the inventory system's
scope, potential school district participants, and an implementation
plan for the pilot group of school districts.))

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($900,000))
$50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($900,000))
$50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Grant County Skills Center (08-4-854)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of the Grant county/Moses Lake school district
skills center.

Appropriation:
Skill Centers Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $927,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $927,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Northeast King County Skills Center (08-4-855)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of the northeast King county school district
skills center.

Appropriation:
Skill Centers Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Pierce County Skills Center (08-4-856)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of the Pierce county skills center.

Appropriation:
Skill Centers Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,070,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Potential School Sites - State Trust Lands Study (08-2-860)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The joint legislative committee on school construction funding
finds that high growth school districts are often unable to acquire
lands best suited for siting new schools. Current funding capacity is
devoted to current needs and land development in rapidly growing areas
of the state competes with the present and future need for undeveloped
sites to build new schools.
(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
superintendent of public instruction and the commissioner of public
lands to establish a work group to analyze the feasibility of and
develop options for using existing state lands in high growth areas of
the state for potential future school sites. The work group shall:
(a) Prepare an inventory of existing state trust lands suitable for use
as school sites; (b) prepare a projection of the needs for school sites
in high growth school districts; and (c) develop options for holding
and valuing the land for future school district use that are consistent
with legal requirements and management objectives for state trust lands
and any other state lands.
(3) The work group shall report to the legislature by December 1,
2008.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Enrollment Projections Evaluation Study (08-2-859)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to contract with a research organization to conduct an
evaluation of the accuracy and reliability of the current method used
for forecasting school district enrollment for determining eligibility
for the school assistance program. This evaluation must also include
a review of different methodologies used by school districts in
projecting their enrollment for capital planning and budgeting
purposes. A final report resulting from this evaluation must be
submitted by January 1, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Sec. 5017 2007 c 520 s 5016 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($770,000))
$470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,270,000))
$2,970,000

Sec. 5018 2007 c 520 s 5017 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
New Physical Education Center (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,000,000))
$9,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,000,000))
$9,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma - Land Acquisition (09-2-003)

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma - Soils Remediation (08-2-852)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Burke Museum Renovation (08-2-850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Veterinary Medical Research Building (08-2-850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Sec. 5023 2007 c 520 s 5086 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Dean Hall Renovation (06-1-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,300,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for furnishings and equipment.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $924,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,200,000))
$24,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,276,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,400,000))
$26,700,000

Sec. 5024 2007 c 520 s 5100 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Daniel J. Evans Building - Modernization (04-2-006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,983,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely to finish renovation of the library building by
addressing issues of the aging infrastructure while incorporating
programmatic needs of the institution.

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,250,000
Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,465,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $518,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,983,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,750,000))
$46,733,000

Sec. 5025 2007 c 520 s 5128 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Pacific - Lewis and Clark Station Camp Park Project (02-S-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,935,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,885,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,551,000))
$4,486,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Olympia - State Capitol Museum: Building Preservation (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000

Sec. 5027 2007 c 520 s 5145 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Museum System Repair and Upgrades/Preservation (08-1-013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
preservation projects ((and to)), system repair, and ((upgrade)) museum
((systems)) upgrades to enhance delivery of exhibits and K-12 education
and American Indian programs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: L Building Emergency Repairs (08-1-850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,663,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,663,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College - Skills Center (08-2-852)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Skill Centers Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

(End of part)

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS AND SUPPLEMENTAL PROVISIONS
Sec. 6001 2007 c 520 s 6013 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL
CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into financial contracts,
paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for
the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section,
agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial
contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an
agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the
authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation
therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial
contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent
provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance
committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $1,360,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to replace the dormitory facility at the
Washington state patrol fire training academy in North Bend,
Washington.
(2) Department of general administration: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $685,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the preservation of the
transportation building.
(3) Department of corrections: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $17,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to provide additional work release beds.
(4) Parks and recreation commission: Enter into a financing
contract in an amount not to exceed $2,000,000 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop Cama
Beach state park.
(5) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase Kent
Station phase 2.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Tacoma Community
College for up to $3,600,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an early childhood
education and learning center.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to 40
acres of land.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin
College for up to $300,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop an academic support
and achievement center.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley
College for up to $3,347,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a 72 bed student
housing facility.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Seattle Central
Community College for up to $3,100,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase property
adjacent the main campus.
(6) Evergreen State College: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $16,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the college activities building
renovation.
(7) Washington state convention and trade center: Enter into a
financing contract for up to $58,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase and
renovate the museum condominium unit located adjacent to the state
convention center. The purchase price shall not exceed fair market
value. A purchase agreement with the owner of the unit on the
effective date of this section shall include the following
requirements: (a) Upon completion of the purchase of the property, the
seller shall retain $5,750,000 of the sale proceeds in a restricted
investment account, reserving such funds for capital costs associated
with development of its principal heritage center to be located within
the city of Seattle. Principal and accrued earnings in such an account
shall be available for expenditure by the seller when the seller or the
city of Seattle has executed a construction contract for either a new
facility or improvements to an existing structure to serve as the
principal heritage center to be operated by the seller within the city;
and (b) in the event that the conditions of (a) of this subsection are
not met by June 30, 2017, the entire amount in the restricted account
shall be transferred to the state general fund and shall represent a
recovery of the state's contribution towards the development of the
museum. In the event of such a transfer, the rightful ownership of the
property by the Washington state convention and trade center shall not
be impaired.
(8) Department of information services: Enter into a financing
contract for an amount approved by the office of financial management
for costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to lease develop or lease purchase a state general
office building and facilities for the department of information
services on the state-owned property called "the Wheeler block" in
Olympia. The office buildings shall be constructed and financed so
that agencies occupancy costs per gross square foot or per employee
will not exceed 110 percent of comparable private market rental rates
per gross square foot or per employee. The comparable general office
space rate shall be calculated based on recent Thurston county leases
of new space of at least 100,000 rentable square feet adjusted for
known escalation clauses, expected inflation, and differences in the
level of service provided by the comparable leases as determined by the
department in consultation with the department of general
administration. In addition to the department of information services,
state agency tenants shall include the consolidation of state patrol
offices and general office facilities for small agencies and offices.
The department of information services shall design and operate the
general office facilities for small agencies and offices as a
demonstration of the efficiencies gained from the integration of office
space and telecommunications and computer technology. The
demonstration project shall provide office space, furniture,
telecommunications, and computer technology as a single package. The
facility shall be designed so that small agencies and offices can move
in and out of the facility without the typical moving expenses that
result from individual agency ownership of furniture and technology.
The facility for small agencies and offices shall also provide for
staffing and space efficiencies resulting from central reception,
support services, and spaces. The office of financial management shall
certify to the state treasurer: (a) The project description and dollar
amount; and (b) that all requirements of this subsection (8) have been
met. Should the department of information services choose to use a
financing contract that does not provide for the issuance of
certificates of participation, the financing contract shall be subject
to approval by the state finance committee as required by RCW
39.94.010. In approving a financing contract not providing for the use
of certificates of participation, the state finance committee should be
reasonably certain that the contract is excluded from the computation
of indebtedness, particularly that the contract is not backed by the
full faith and credit of the state and the legislature is expressly not
obligated to appropriate funds to make payments. For purposes of this
section, "financing contract" includes but is not limited to a
certificate of participation and tax exempt financing similar to that
authorized in RCW 47.79.140.
(9) Office of the secretary of state: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $112,942,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct the heritage
center. The heritage center is one part of a combined facility of the
heritage center and executive office building, authorized in subsection
(10) of this section. The authorization for financing under this
subsection (9) shall lapse unless chapter ... (Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5882, providing funding for the heritage building project), Laws of
2007 is enacted by June 30, 2007.
(10) Department of general administration: (a) Enter into a
financing contract for up to $75,863,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct the
executive office building. The executive office building is one part
of a combined facility of the executive office building and the
heritage center authorized in subsection (9) of this section. The
authorization for financing under this subsection (10) shall lapse
unless chapter ... (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5882, providing funding
for the heritage building project), Laws of 2007 is enacted by June 30,
2007.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $10,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the rehabilitation of the John L. O'Brien building, subject to
approval of the project scope by the speaker of the house of
representatives and the chief clerk of the house of representatives.
(11) Department of ecology: Enter into a financing contract for up
to $11,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to rebuild the east wall of the department of
ecology's headquarters building in Lacey, Washington.

Sec. 6002 RCW 43.155.050 and 2007 c 520 s 6036 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account may be used
for grants for projects identified in section 138, chapter 488, Laws of
2005, for the infrastructure investment system implementation plan
identified in section 1021 of this act, and for the interest rate buy-down pilot program identified in section 1004 of this act.
(2) The job development fund is hereby established in the state
treasury. Up to fifty million dollars each biennium from the public
works assistance account may be transferred into the job development
fund. Money in the job development fund may be used solely for job
development fund program grants, administrative expenses related to the
administration of the job development fund program created in RCW
43.160.230, and for the report prepared by the joint legislative audit
and review committee pursuant to RCW 44.28.801(2). Moneys in the job
development fund may be spent only after appropriation. The board
shall prepare a prioritized list of proposed projects of up to fifty
million dollars as part of the department's 2007-09 biennial budget
request. The board may provide an additional alternate job development
fund project list of up to ten million dollars. The legislature may
remove projects from the list recommended by the board. The
legislature may not change the prioritization of projects recommended
for funding by the board, but may add projects from the alternate list
in order of priority, as long as the total funding does not exceed
fifty million dollars.

Sec. 6003 RCW 79.64.020 and 2004 c 199 s 226 are each amended to
read as follows:
A resource management cost account in the state treasury is created
to be used solely for the purpose of defraying the costs and expenses
necessarily incurred by the department in managing and administering
state lands and aquatic lands and the making and administering of
leases, sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights-of-way as authorized under the provisions of this title. Appropriations
from the resource management cost account to the department shall be
expended for no other purposes. Funds in the resource management cost
account may be appropriated or transferred by the legislature for the
benefit of all of the trusts from which the funds were derived. For
the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account may be used for the
purposes identified in section 3036 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6004 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct an
evaluation of the accuracy of capital project cost estimates prepared
by state agencies for their budget requests. The evaluation shall
include a review of the methods used to prepare estimates at agencies
with large capital programs, a review of the process used by the office
of financial management to approve estimates included in the governor's
proposed budget, and an analysis of the accuracy of project cost
estimates compared to actual project costs over time for a subset of
projects. The evaluation will also recommend other areas of capital
project risk for assessment in future evaluations. The joint
legislative audit and review committee shall submit a report to the
relevant fiscal committees of the legislature by August 2009.

Sec. 6005 2007 c 520 s 6032 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
Education Construction Account: For transfer to
the Common School Construction, an amount
not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . (($138,200,000))
$133,930,000

Education Savings Account: For transfer to the
Common School Construction Account, an
amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,400,000))
$103,063,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6006 A new section is added to 2007 c 520
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
State Convention and Trade Center Account: For transfer to
the Washington housing trust fund, an amount
not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000,000

Sec. 6007 RCW 67.40.040 and 2007 c 228 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW
67.40.030, proceeds of the taxes imposed under RCW 67.40.090 and
67.40.130, and all other moneys received by the state convention and
trade center from any public or private source which are intended to
fund the acquisition, design, construction, expansion, exterior cleanup
and repair of the Eagles building, conversion of various retail and
other space to meeting rooms, purchase of the land and building known
as the McKay Parcel, development of low-income housing, or renovation
of the center, and those expenditures authorized under RCW 67.40.170
shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center account
hereby created in the state treasury and in such subaccounts as are
deemed appropriate by the directors of the corporation.
(2) Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under
RCW 43.79.270, shall be used exclusively for the following purposes in
the following priority:
(a) For reimbursement of the state general fund under RCW
67.40.060;
(b) After appropriation by statute:
(i) For payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030;
(ii) For expenditures authorized in RCW 67.40.170, and during the
2007-2009 biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state
convention and trade center account to the Washington housing trust
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account;
(iii) For acquisition, design, and construction of the state
convention and trade center;
(iv) For debt service for the acquisition, design, and construction
and retrofit of the museum of history and industry museum property or
other future expansions of the convention center as approved by the
legislature; and
(v) For reimbursement of any expenditures from the state general
fund in support of the state convention and trade center; and
(c) For transfer to the state convention and trade center
operations account.
(3) The corporation shall identify with specificity those
facilities of the state convention and trade center that are to be
financed with proceeds of general obligation bonds, the interest on
which is intended to be excluded from gross income for federal income
tax purposes. The corporation shall not permit the extent or manner of
private business use of those bond-financed facilities to be
inconsistent with treatment of such bonds as governmental bonds under
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) In order to ensure consistent treatment of bonds authorized
under RCW 67.40.030 with applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and notwithstanding RCW 43.84.092, investment
earnings on bond proceeds deposited in the state convention and trade
center account in the state treasury shall be retained in the account,
and shall be expended by the corporation for the purposes authorized
under chapter 386, Laws of 1995 and in a manner consistent with
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(5) Subject to the conditions in subsection (6) of this section,
starting in fiscal year 2008, the state treasurer shall transfer:
(a) The sum of four million dollars, or as much as may be available
pursuant to conditions set forth in this section, from the state
convention and trade center account to the tourism enterprise account,
with the maximum transfer being four million dollars per fiscal year;
and
(b) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much as may be
available pursuant to conditions set forth in this section, from the
state convention and trade center account to the tourism development
and promotion account, with the maximum transfer being five hundred
thousand dollars per fiscal year.
(6)(a) Funds required for debt service payments and reserves for
bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030; for debt service authorized under RCW
67.40.170; and for the issuance and sale of financial instruments
associated with the acquisition, design, construction, and retrofit of
the museum of history and industry museum property or for other future
expansions of the center, as approved by the legislature, shall be
maintained within the state convention and trade center account.
(b) No less than six million one hundred fifty thousand dollars per
year shall be retained in the state convention and trade center account
for funding capital maintenance as required by the center's long-term
capital plan, facility enhancements, unanticipated replacements, and
operating reserves for the convention center operation. This amount
shall be escalated annually as follows:
(i) Four percent for annual inflation for capital maintenance,
repairs, and replacement;
(ii) An additional two percent for enhancement to the facility; and
(iii) An additional three percent for growth in expenditure due to
aging of the facility and the need to maintain an operating reserve.
(c) Sufficient funds shall be reserved within the state convention
and trade center account to fund operating appropriations for the
annual operation of the convention center.

Sec. 6008 2007 c 520 s 6016 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) A joint legislative task force on school construction funding
is established to review the following:
(a) The statutory provisions regarding the funding of school
construction projects;
(b) Eligibility requirements and distribution formulas for the
state's school construction assistance grant program;
(c) Flexibility needed in the system to address diverse district
and geographic needs including, but not limited to, the construction
needs unique to high growth areas, as well as the needs of school
districts that have experienced consecutive school levy failures; and
(d) Potential revenue sources and alternative funding mechanisms
for school construction including, but not limited to, funding
mechanisms that may: (i) Phase out and replace revenue collected under
RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.100 for school facilities; and (ii)
encourage cooperative partnerships with early learning providers, skill
centers, community and technical colleges, or public baccalaureate
institutions through the use of a supermatch concept.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide progress updates to the task force on the development of the
pilot inventory of school district facility information and the design
of a process for developing a ten-year projection of the facility needs
of school districts as provided for in section 5014 of this act for
review and comment by the task force.
(3)(a) The joint legislative task force on school construction
funding shall consist of eight members, two members each, one from each
major caucus, from the house of representatives committees on capital
budget and education, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, and two members each, one from each major caucus, from
the senate committees on ways and means and early learning and K-12
education, appointed by the president of the senate.
(b) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives jointly shall appoint two members representing school
districts.
(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
office of financial management shall cooperate with the task force and
maintain liaison representatives.
(d) The task force shall coordinate with the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature and may consult with other interested
parties, as may be appropriate, for technical advice and assistance.
(e) The task force shall select a chair from among its legislative
membership.
(4) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the house
of representatives office of program research and the senate committee
services.
(5) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(7) The task force must report ((its)) preliminary findings and
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2007, and a final report by January 1, 2009.

Sec. 6009 RCW 43.19.501 and 1994 c 219 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Thurston county capital facilities account is created in the
state treasury. The account is subject to the appropriation and
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Moneys in the account
may be expended for capital projects in facilities owned and managed by
the department of general administration in Thurston county. For the
2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account may be used for predesign
identified in section 1034 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6010 Section 6002 of this act expires June 30,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6011 2007 c 520 s 6006 (uncodified) is
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6012 Part headings in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6013 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6014 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of Part)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 85
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 87
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 66
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . 32, 36
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 28, 31
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 56
STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 94
STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 85
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 84
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 86
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 72
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 84
--- END ---