BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that the
benefits of a productive and prosperous agricultural economy are
numerous and are enjoyed throughout the state. Washington's
agricultural products are a vital part of the state's economic and
cultural fabric, and are consumed in countless local, regional, and
international markets. The legislature recognizes also that it plays
a meaningful role in promoting the health of the state's agricultural
economy.
(2) The legislature further recognizes that it has a duty to secure
the well-being of its citizens through the establishment and
enforcement of requirements for safe physical structures, and that
these requirements are implemented through locally issued building
permits.
(3) The legislature intends this legislation to promote the health
of the state's agricultural economy and to ensure the safety of its
citizens. The legislature intends for these two objectives to be met
by establishing a statewide permit cost for specialty agricultural
structures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The charge under this chapter for permits for specialty
agricultural structures constructed on a commercial agricultural
operation may not exceed one hundred fifty dollars. Specialty
agricultural structures are those that are designed and constructed to
house farm equipment, hay, grain, poultry, livestock, or other
horticultural products. Human habitation, public use, and employment
where agricultural products are processed, treated, or packaged are not
permitted uses of a specialty agricultural structure.
(2) No plan review is necessary for a preengineered specialty
agricultural structure on a commercial agricultural operation if the
design has been:
(a) Approved by a state licensed and registered engineer; and
(b) Certified to meet local conditions related to wind load, snow
load, and other natural forces.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "commercial agricultural
operation" means an operation that generates an average of at least ten
thousand dollars gross income per year from the sale of agricultural
products.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.27.100 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Except as provided in section 2 of this act, nothing in this
chapter shall prohibit a city, town, or county of the state from
imposing fees different from those set forth in the state building
code.

--- END ---