BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there has
been much focus and attention on the importance of teachers in
providing quality instruction to improve student achievement. However,
there has not been sufficient focus and attention on the equal
importance of instructional support services and the staff such as
counselors and librarians who provide them.
(2) Instructional support services enable students to maximize the
benefits of a high quality teacher:
(a) Most people now recognize that a K-12 education is a beginning,
not an end to a student's educational path. There has been increased
legislative attention in recent years to the importance of helping
students explore, plan, and prepare for their future. School
counselors play a critical support role in preparing students for the
transitions of high school and beyond and in helping students take full
advantage of K-12 learning opportunities and experiences.
(b) Today's teachers cannot rely simply on a book and a lesson plan
to provide quality instruction. Multiple sources of information,
including multimedia, video, and the internet, are brought into play.
Students, in turn, must use more sophisticated media research and
analysis skills than ever before to be successful in an information-rich society. The research, media, and information expertise of
teacher librarians is increasingly critical to support classroom
instruction.
(3) The legislature acknowledges that the basic education finance
joint task force will be developing recommendations regarding funding
and funding formulas for core instruction and critical instructional
support services. However, there is a sense of urgency in the need for
additional instructional support services that cannot wait for full
implementation of the task force recommendations. Therefore, the
legislature intends to implement a short-term remedy so that critical
instructional support services can be increased and improved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate funds to school
districts on the basis of each one thousand average annual full-time
equivalent enrollments for an additional forty-eight one-hundredths
certificated instructional staff units in grades six through twelve.
Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units provided in
this section shall be used to increase instructional support services
provided by certificated school counselors and librarians and shall not
be considered basic education funding.
(2) The legislature assumes that funds provided under this section
are sufficient for school districts to provide an additional one-half
full-time equivalent counselor or librarian for an average-sized high
school, prorated based on the size of the high school for smaller and
larger schools. An average-sized high school is assumed to be six
hundred students. However, school districts may allocate funds
provided under this section for instructional support services by
certificated school counselors and librarians in any school, at any
grade level, and in any staffing configuration.

--- END ---