BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.405.415 and 2007 c 398 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall receive a bonus each year in which they maintain the
certification. The bonus shall be calculated as follows: The annual
bonus shall be five thousand dollars in the 2007-08 school year.
Thereafter, the annual bonus shall increase by inflation.
(2) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall be eligible for bonuses in addition to that provided by
subsection (1) of this section if the individual is in an instructional
assignment in ((a)):
(a) An elementary school in which at least seventy percent of the
students qualify for the free and reduced-price lunch program;
(b) A middle school in which at least sixty percent of the students
qualify for the free and reduced-price lunch program; or
(c) A high school in which at least fifty percent of the students
qualify for the free and reduced-price lunch program.
(3) The amount of the additional bonus under subsection (2) of this
section for those meeting the qualifications of subsection (2) of this
section is five thousand dollars. For the purpose of implementing
subsection (2) of this section, the superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt a standard definition of elementary school,
middle school, and high school based on the grade levels of students
enrolled in the school.
(4) The bonuses provided under this section are in addition to
compensation received under a district's salary schedule adopted in
accordance with RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in
calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary
limitations under RCW 28A.400.200.
(5) The bonuses provided under this section shall be paid in a lump
sum amount and shall not be included in the definition of "earnable
compensation" under RCW 41.32.010(10).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act applies beginning with
the 2007-08 school year and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---