BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Many cities and towns located in the more
rural areas of the state are beginning to experience the opportunities
and challenges associated with unprecedented levels of growth and new
development. These communities typically lack the resources necessary
to adequately plan and prepare for essential infrastructure needed to
accommodate this new growth. Effective planning at the local level
promotes economic well-being and quality of life in all communities.
It is the intent of the legislature to assist eligible small towns and
cities in planning for the infrastructure necessary to support new
growth and development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall create and monitor a small communities infrastructure planning
grant program, in which the department shall select grant recipients
and make grant awards based on the eligibility criteria set forth in
subsection (2) of this section. The department shall use existing
staff and resources to administer this program.
(2)(a) Only those cities and towns having a population of less than
seven thousand five hundred and counties having a population of fifteen
thousand or less, as determined by the office of financial management,
and located in rural areas of the state are eligible to receive grant
awards under this program.
(b) Eligible activities for cities and towns to receive grant
awards include:
(i) Transportation, utility, and capital facilities planning;
(ii) Multijurisdictional infrastructure planning, including joint
planning between local jurisdictions and the private sector;
(iii) Updating comprehensive plans and development regulations
consistent with this grant program; and
(iv) Other planning and technical assistance activities consistent
with the purposes of this grant program.
(c) Priority must be given to those applicants seeking grant awards
to support activities meeting the criteria listed in (b)(i) or (ii) of
this subsection.
(3) A grant award under this program does not affect an applicant's
eligibility to access other state or federal financial or technical
assistance programs.
(4) Beginning in December 2009, the department shall submit an
annual report to the transportation, capital budget, and local
government committees of the legislature that identifies the number of
applications received, the communities selected to receive a grant
award, the activity or activities for which each grant award was made,
and the amount of each grant award. If practicable, the report should
also include a status update of progress made toward achieving the
purposes of the grant award.
(5) This section does not create an entitlement for a grant award.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
The small communities infrastructure planning account is created in
the state treasury. Receipts from the proceeds of bond sales, tax
revenues, budget transfers, federal appropriations, gifts, or any other
lawful source, specifically designated for purposes relating to this
act, must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be
used only for grants to eligible cities and towns under the small
communities infrastructure planning grant program created in section 2
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---