BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.230 and 2007 c 494 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board has the following powers and duties:
(1) Develop and recommend to the legislature policies to further
enhance the quality, efficiency, and accountability of capital
construction projects through the use of traditional and alternative
delivery methods in Washington, and make recommendations regarding
expansion, continuation, elimination, or modification of the
alternative public works contracting methods;
(2) Evaluate the use of existing contracting procedures and
potential future use of other alternative contracting procedures
including competitive negotiation contracts;
(3) Develop guidelines to be used by the committee for the review
and approval of design-build demonstration projects that procure
operations and maintenance services;
(4) Appoint members of the committee; and
(((4))) (5) Develop and administer questionnaires designed to
provide quantitative and qualitative data on alternative public works
contracting procedures on which evaluations are based.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.10.250 and 2007 c 494 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
The committee shall:
(1) Certify, or recertify, public bodies for a period of three
years to use the design-build or general contractor/construction
manager, or both, contracting procedures for projects with a total
project cost of ten million dollars or more;
(2) Review and approve the use of the design-build or general
contractor/construction manager contracting procedures on a project by
project basis for public bodies that are not certified under RCW
39.10.270; ((and))
(3) Review and approve the use of the general
contractor/construction manager contracting procedure by certified
public bodies for projects with a total project cost under ten million
dollars;
(4) Review and approve not more than ten projects using the design-build contracting procedure by certified and noncertified public bodies
for projects that have a total project cost between two million and ten
million dollars. Projects must meet the criteria in RCW 39.10.300(1).
Where possible, the committee shall approve projects among multiple
public bodies. In June 2010, the committee shall report to the board
regarding the committee's review procedure of these projects and its
recommendations for further use; and
(5) Review and approve not more than two design-build demonstration
projects that include procurement of operations and maintenance
services for a period longer than three years.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.10.270 and 2007 c 494 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A public body may apply for certification to use the design-build or general contractor/construction manager contracting procedure,
or both. Once certified, a public body may use the contracting
procedure for which it is certified on individual projects with a total
project cost over ten million dollars without seeking committee
approval. The certification period is three years. A public body
seeking certification must submit to the committee an application in a
format and manner as prescribed by the committee. The application must
include a description of the public body's qualifications, its capital
plan during the certification period, and its intended use of
alternative contracting procedures.
(2) A public body seeking certification for the design-build
procedure must demonstrate successful management of at least one
design-build project within the previous five years. A public body
seeking certification for the general contractor/construction manager
procedure must demonstrate successful management of at least one
general contractor/construction manager project within the previous
five years.
(3) To certify a public body, the committee shall determine that
the public body:
(a) Has the necessary experience and qualifications to determine
which projects are appropriate for using alternative contracting
procedures;
(b) Has the necessary experience and qualifications to carry out
the alternative contracting procedure including, but not limited to:
(i) Project delivery knowledge and experience; (ii) personnel with
appropriate construction experience; (iii) a management plan and
rationale for its alternative public works projects; (iv) demonstrated
success in managing public works projects; (v) ((demonstrated success
in managing at least one general contractor/construction manager or
design-build project within the previous five years; (vi))) the ability
to properly manage its capital facilities plan including, but not
limited to, appropriate project planning and budgeting experience; and
(((vii))) (vi) the ability to meet requirements of this chapter; and
(c) Has resolved any audit findings on previous public works
projects in a manner satisfactory to the committee.
(((3))) (4) The committee shall, if practicable, make its
determination at the public meeting during which an application for
certification is reviewed. Public comments must be considered before
a determination is made. Within ten business days of the public
meeting, the committee shall provide a written determination to the
public body, and make its determination available to the public on the
committee's web site.
(((4))) (5) The committee may revoke any public body's
certification upon a finding, after a public hearing, that its use of
design-build or general contractor/construction manager contracting
procedures no longer serves the public interest.
(((5))) (6) The committee may renew the certification of a public
body for one additional three-year period. The public body must submit
an application for recertification at least three months before the
initial certification expires. The application shall include updated
information on the public body's capital plan for the next three years,
its intended use of the procedures, and any other information requested
by the committee. The committee must review the application for
recertification at a meeting held before expiration of the applicant's
initial certification period. A public body must reapply for
certification under the process described in subsection (1) of this
section once the period of recertification expires.
(((6))) (7) Certified public bodies must submit project data
information as required in RCW 39.10.320 and 39.10.350.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.10.300 and 2007 c 494 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the process in RCW 39.10.270 or 39.10.280, public
bodies may utilize the design-build procedure for public works projects
in which the total project cost is over ten million dollars and where:
(a) The design and construction activities, technologies, or
schedule to be used are highly specialized and a design-build approach
is critical in developing the construction methodology or implementing
the proposed technology; or
(b) The project design is repetitive in nature and is an incidental
part of the installation or construction; or
(c) Regular interaction with and feedback from facilities users and
operators during design is not critical to an effective facility
design.
(2) Subject to the process in RCW 39.10.270 or 39.10.280, public
bodies may use the design-build procedure for parking garages,
regardless of cost.
(3) The design-build procedure ((also)) may be used for the
construction or erection of preengineered metal buildings or
prefabricated modular buildings, regardless of cost and is not subject
to approval by the committee.
(4) Except for utility projects and approved demonstration
projects, the design-build procedure may not be used to procure
operations and maintenance services for a period longer than three
years. State agency projects that propose to use the design-build-operate-maintain procedure shall submit cost estimates for the
construction portion of the project consistent with the office of
financial management's capital budget requirements. Operations and
maintenance costs must be shown separately and must not be included as
part of the capital budget request.
(5) Subject to the process in RCW 39.10.280, public bodies may use
the design-build procedure for public works projects in which the total
project cost is between two million and ten million dollars and that
meet one of the criteria in subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) of this
section.
(6) Subject to the process in RCW 39.10.280, a public body may seek
committee approval for a design-build demonstration project that
includes procurement of operations and maintenance services for a
period longer than three years.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.10.330 and 2007 c 494 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Contracts for design-build services shall be awarded through a
competitive process using public solicitation of proposals for design-build services. The public body shall publish at least once in a legal
newspaper of general circulation published in, or as near as possible
to, that part of the county in which the public work will be done, a
notice of its request for qualifications from proposers for design-build services, and the availability and location of the request for
proposal documents. The request for qualifications documents shall
include:
(a) A general description of the project that provides sufficient
information for proposers to submit qualifications;
(b) The reasons for using the design-build procedure;
(c) A description of the qualifications to be required of the
proposer including, but not limited to, submission of the proposer's
accident prevention program;
(d) A description of the process the public body will use to
evaluate qualifications and finalists' proposals, including evaluation
factors and the relative weight of factors and any specific forms to be
used by the proposers;
(i) Evaluation factors for request for qualifications shall
include, but not be limited to, technical qualifications, such as
specialized experience and technical competence; capability to perform;
past performance of the proposers' team, including the architect-engineer and construction members; and other appropriate factors. Cost
or price-related factors are not permitted in the request for
qualifications phase;
(ii) Evaluation factors for finalists' proposals shall include, but
not be limited to, the factors listed in (d)(i) of this subsection, as
well as technical approach design concept; proposal price; ability of
professional personnel; past performance on similar projects; ability
to meet time and budget requirements; ability to provide a performance
and payment bond for the project; recent, current, and projected
workloads of the firm; and location. Alternatively, if the public body
determines that all finalists will be capable of producing a design
that adequately meets project requirements, the public body may award
the contract to the firm that submits the responsive proposal with the
lowest price;
(e) The form of the contract to be awarded;
(f) The amount to be paid to finalists submitting responsive
proposals and who are not awarded a design-build contract;
(g) The schedule for the procurement process and the project; and
(h) Other information relevant to the project.
(2) The public body shall establish an evaluation committee to
evaluate the responses to the request for qualifications based on the
factors, weighting, and process identified in the request for
qualifications. Based on the evaluation committee's findings, the
public body shall select not more than five responsive and responsible
finalists to submit proposals. The public body may, in its sole
discretion, reject all proposals and shall provide its reasons for
rejection in writing to all proposers.
(3) Upon selection of the finalists, the public body shall issue a
request for proposals to the finalists, which shall provide the
following information:
(a) A detailed description of the project including programmatic,
performance, and technical requirements and specifications; functional
and operational elements; minimum and maximum net and gross areas of
any building; and, at the discretion of the public body, preliminary
engineering and architectural drawings; and
(b) The target budget for the design-build portion of the project.
(4) The public body shall establish an evaluation committee to
evaluate the proposals submitted by the finalists. Design-build
contracts shall be awarded using the procedures in (a) or (b) of this
subsection. The public body must identify in the request for
qualifications which procedure will be used.
(a) The finalists' proposals shall be evaluated and scored based on
the factors, weighting, and process identified in the initial request
for qualifications and in any addenda published by the public body.
Public bodies may request best and final proposals from finalists. The
public body shall initiate negotiations with the firm submitting the
highest scored proposal. If the public body is unable to execute a
contract with the firm submitting the highest scored proposal,
negotiations with that firm may be suspended or terminated and the
public body may proceed to negotiate with the next highest scored firm.
Public bodies shall continue in accordance with this procedure until a
contract agreement is reached or the selection process is terminated.
(b) If the public body determines that all finalists are capable of
producing a design that adequately meets project requirements, the
public body may award the contract to the firm that submits the
responsive proposal with the lowest price.
(5) The firm awarded the contract shall provide a performance and
payment bond for the contracted amount. The public body shall provide
appropriate honorarium payments to finalists submitting ((best and
final)) responsive proposals that are not awarded a design-build
contract. Honorarium payments shall be sufficient to generate
meaningful competition among potential proposers on design-build
projects. In determining the amount of the honorarium, the public body
shall consider the level of effort required to meet the selection
criteria.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 39.10.310 (Design-build procedure--Negotiated adjustments to lowest bid or proposal -- When allowed) and
2007 c 494 s 202 & 1994 c 132 s 8 are each repealed.

--- END ---