BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The study of the state's history and
government is vital to providing a well-rounded education to students.
It is important for students to have a firm understanding of where we
have come from as a state and the institutions that guide and serve
citizens of the state. It is equally important to provide students
with context for the information that enables them to apply it to the
present and future, with an understanding of Washington's place in our
country and the broader global community.
The legislature finds that the current high school graduation
requirements for coursework in Washington state history and government
should be enhanced to ensure students understand the complex issues of
today's world and Washington's place in the global community. It is
therefore the intent of the legislature to modernize high school
graduation requirements for coursework in Washington state history and
government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2009-10 school year, school districts shall
ensure that any course in Washington state history and government
offered to fulfill high school requirements includes, but is not
limited to, the following content:
(1) Commerce in Washington state and Washington's place in a global
economy;
(2) The Constitution of the state of Washington and Washington
state politics;
(3) Washington state geography; and
(4) Washington state history and culture.

--- END ---