BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that students are
accessing higher education differently than they have in previous
years. Rather than attending a single institution and attaining their
degree, many students now attend multiple institutions, sometimes
simultaneously.
The legislature also finds that learning occurs throughout a
person's lifetime. Whether citizens need different training to change
careers or need further education for career advancement, people exit
and reenter institutions of higher education multiple times and for
various reasons.
The legislature also finds that current policies and practices do
not provide clear, consistent, easily accessible information to ease
transition in and among the state's colleges and universities. Often,
courses taken at some career and technical schools as well as private
for-profit institutions are not accepted in transfer because these
schools are not accredited by a regional accrediting body. Students
often do not understand that these courses are not transferrable.
Students must retake courses once they have transferred into a
regionally accredited institution, costing the student additional time
and money.
Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to improve statewide
communication and coordination of transfer and articulation policies
and practices. Students should be provided clear, consistent
information regarding the courses required for their degrees and how
those courses will be treated when a student moves between colleges and
universities. This information should be communicated to students and
their families in one easily accessible place in a format that is
common among all colleges and universities in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board shall convene a work
group of representatives from the state board for community and
technical colleges, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the council of presidents, and two-year and four-year
institutions of higher education to develop a list of rights guaranteed
to students who have earned a transfer associate degree under the
direct transfer agreement. The work group may be an existing work
group that addresses policy issues related to transitions among public
and private institutions of higher education and may also include
representatives from the independent colleges of Washington.
(2) The list in subsection (1) of this section shall be known as
the transfer student bill of rights and shall include statements of
institutional policy regarding transfer and articulation to assist
students who have earned a transfer associate degree in their academic
planning. The list shall include but is not limited to:
(a) Admission to each public and private two-year and four-year
institution of higher education that participates in the direct
transfer agreement;
(b) The number of credits that will transfer;
(c) Academic requirements fulfilled by the degree at the receiving
institution;
(d) Acceptance of credit earned in dual enrollment and accelerated
programs such as advanced placement, running start, and international
baccalaureate;
(e) Acceptance of credits earned at nonregionally accredited
institutions; and
(f) Advance knowledge of selection criteria for limited access
programs.
(3) The work group shall determine which elements in this section
are guaranteed to students entering a four-year institution of higher
education and which elements differ based on admission requirements at
a specific institution or program. The work group must determine the
clearest manner in which to communicate this information to students
and their families as part of the transfer student bill of rights.
(4) The transfer student bill of rights shall be displayed
prominently in a user-friendly area of each institution's web site.
Admissions offices, transfer planning offices, recruiting offices and
other relevant offices at public and private institutions of higher
education shall also make the transfer student bill of rights available
to prospective and enrolled students. Public institutions of higher
education shall make the bill of rights available by September 2009.
The transfer student bill of rights may also be used by private
institutions of higher education participating in direct transfer
agreements.
(5) For purposes of this section, "nonregionally accredited
institutions" means only those institutions that are fully accredited
by a national accrediting agency recognized by the United States
department of education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Consistent with the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education and to the extent necessary following implementation of web-based academic planning tools developed under section 6 of this act,
the higher education coordinating board shall convene a work group
identified in section 2(1) of this act to develop a common set of
course numbers for lower division general education courses that are
generally accepted in transfer between two-year and four-year
institutions of higher education as well as between four-year
institutions of higher education. The independent colleges of
Washington may participate in this process. The work group shall
determine the best manner by which to identify equivalent courses using
the common number. The common number may be added to existing course
numbers and does not need to replace existing course numbers.
(2) The common course number shall include the same course
abbreviation and course number shared among four-year institutions of
higher education for equivalent courses. To the extent possible,
common course numbers within four-year institutions of higher education
should match common course numbers used in the community and technical
college system.
(3) Common course numbering at the four-year level does not require
standardized course content. The work group must take into account the
unique nature of the curriculum of The Evergreen State College in
developing the common course numbering system.
(4) The system of common course numbering must be implemented and
available for public use by September 2011.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, in collaboration with
the work group and four-year institutions of higher education, shall
provide a progress report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Consistent with the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education and to the extent necessary following implementation of
web-based academic planning tools developed under section 6 of this
act, the higher education coordinating board shall convene a work group
identified in section 2(1) of this act to develop a system of
identification that distinguishes the lower division general education
courses that are generally transferrable as lower division general
education, major or preparation for a major, or elective courses from
two-year institutions of higher education to four-year institutions of
higher education from courses that do not generally transfer outside an
academic transfer degree in order to enable students to identify
generally transferable courses at the time of registration.
(2) The system may include an intermediate identifier for courses
that may transfer to particular institutions of higher education or
programs. Whether and to what extent each lower division, general
education course published in an institutional catalog is transferrable
as lower division general education, major or preparation for a major,
or elective courses must be identified in a manner mutually agreed upon
by the two-year institutions of higher education and four-year
institutions of higher education.
(3) Institutions of higher education must publish this information
either in physical course catalogs or those published on the internet.
(4) The system of identification in this section shall be
implemented by September 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board must convene a work
group including representatives from the state board for community and
technical colleges, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, the council of presidents, two-year institutions of higher
education, and four-year institutions of higher education to develop a
plan to monitor the progress and success of transfer students. The
workgroup may be an existing work group that addresses policy issues
related to transitions across institutions of higher education.
(2) The plan shall contain data that measures student progress
through the higher education system that can be monitored over time.
This information shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) The number of students who indicate their intent to transfer at
the time of enrollment and the percentage of those students who
actually transfer or earn an associate degree within three years;
(b) Educational outcomes for students who declare their intent to
transfer, earn at least fifteen academic credits, and transfer within
three years;
(c) The percentage of students who earn their four-year degree
within three years of earning their associate degree;
(d) The average time and credits to completion of an academic
transfer degree including the direct transfer agreement, the associate
of science-transfer, and all major related programs; and
(e) The average grade point average for students who attain their
transfer associate degrees.
(3) The plan shall also include analysis regarding the barriers
that transfer students face in pursuit of their four-year degree and
recommendations to address those barriers.
(4) The higher education coordinating board, in collaboration with
the work group and the state board for community and technical
colleges, shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
by January 2009, and thereafter on a time schedule consistent with
reporting related to monitoring progress toward the higher education
coordinating board master plan goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Consistent with the schedule and work
plans for implementation of the strategic master plan for higher
education, the higher education coordinating board shall convene a work
group or assign an existing work group that includes broad
representation from the workforce training and education coordinating
board, the state board for community and technical colleges,
institutions of higher education, the independent colleges of
Washington, the center for information services, and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to create a detailed plan for
developing and implementing a statewide web- based academic planning
tool. The web-based academic planning tool would be used by current,
prospective, and returning students to plan their path from high school
through the attainment of their higher education goals.
(2) The plan shall contain information including, but not limited
to:
(a) Functions that will be included in the web site;
(b) Options for development including, but not limited to:
Purchasing the entire system from a vendor; purchasing parts of the
system from a private vendor; building parts of the system with
Washington informational technology resources; and building the entire
system with Washington information technology resources; and
(c) Costs associated with each of the options in this subsection.
(3) The higher education coordinating board shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2008. The
report shall include recommendations on the most robust yet cost-effective options for the web-based academic planning tool.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---