BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.96A.800 and 2005 c 504 s 220 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall select and contract with counties to
provide intensive case management for chemically dependent persons with
histories of high utilization of crisis services at two sites. In
selecting the two sites, the secretary shall endeavor to site one in an
urban county, and one in a rural county; and to site them in counties
other than those selected pursuant to RCW 70.96B.020, to the extent
necessary to facilitate evaluation of pilot project results.
(2) The contracted sites shall implement the pilot programs by
providing intensive case management to persons with a primary chemical
dependency diagnosis or dual primary chemical dependency and mental
health diagnoses, through the employment of chemical dependency case
managers. The chemical dependency case managers shall:
(a) Be trained in and use the integrated, comprehensive screening
and assessment process adopted under RCW 70.96C.010;
(b) Reduce the use of crisis medical, chemical dependency and
mental health services, including but not limited to, emergency room
admissions, hospitalizations, detoxification programs, inpatient
psychiatric admissions, involuntary treatment petitions, emergency
medical services, and ambulance services;
(c) Reduce the use of emergency first responder services including
police, fire, emergency medical, and ambulance services;
(d) Reduce the number of criminal justice interventions including
arrests, violations of conditions of supervision, bookings, jail days,
prison sanction day for violations, court appearances, and prosecutor
and defense costs;
(e) Where appropriate and available, work with therapeutic courts
including drug courts and mental health courts to maximize the outcomes
for the individual and reduce the likelihood of reoffense;
(f) Coordinate with local offices of the economic services
administration to assist the person in accessing and remaining enrolled
in those programs to which the person may be entitled;
(g) Where appropriate and available, coordinate with primary care
and other programs operated through the federal government including
federally qualified health centers, Indian health programs, and
veterans' health programs for which the person is eligible to reduce
duplication of services and conflicts in case approach;
(h) Where appropriate, advocate for the client's needs to assist
the person in achieving and maintaining stability and progress toward
recovery;
(i) Document the numbers of persons with co-occurring mental and
substance abuse disorders and the point of determination of the co-occurring disorder by quadrant of intensity of need; and
(j) Where a program participant is under supervision by the
department of corrections, collaborate with the department of
corrections to maximize treatment outcomes and reduce the likelihood of
reoffense.
(3) The pilot programs established by this section shall begin
providing services by March 1, 2006.
(4) This section expires June 30, ((2008)) 2009.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.96B.800 and 2005 c 504 s 217 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington state institute for public policy shall evaluate
the pilot programs and make ((a)) preliminary reports to appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007, and June 30, 2008,
and a final report by ((September 30, 2008)) June 30, 2010.
(2) The evaluation of the pilot programs shall include:
(a) Whether the designated crisis responder pilot program:
(i) Has increased efficiency of evaluation and treatment of persons
involuntarily detained for seventy-two hours;
(ii) Is cost-effective;
(iii) Results in better outcomes for persons involuntarily
detained;
(iv) Increased the effectiveness of the crisis response system in
the pilot catchment areas;
(b) The effectiveness of providing a single chapter in the Revised
Code of Washington to address initial detention of persons with mental
disorders or chemical dependency, in crisis response situations and the
likelihood of effectiveness of providing a single, comprehensive
involuntary treatment act.
(3) The reports shall consider the impact of the pilot programs on
the existing mental health system and on the persons served by the
system.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.96B.900 and 2005 c 504 s 219 are each amended to
read as follows:
Sections 202 through 216 of this act expire ((July 1, 2008)) June
30, 2009.

--- END ---