BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If any person or government agency fails to follow the
requirements of obtaining hydraulic project approval under this
chapter, or fails to carry out any of the requirements or conditions of
a hydraulic project approval issued under this chapter, the department
may issue an order to that person or government agency. The order may
require the person or government agency to stop work on any or all of
the activities subject to the hydraulic project approval, to correct or
to restore the nonconforming site, or to both stop work and to correct
or to restore the nonconforming site.
(2) Unless the department extends by rule the maximum time for
filing, a person receiving an order from the department under this
section may file a written petition with the department appealing the
order within twenty days of service of the order. The filed petition
must be treated as an application for an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW. In the event of an appeal, a person or government
agency may seek interim relief from an order under this section as
provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may adopt rules to designate that certain violations
of the terms or conditions of hydraulic project approvals or orders
issued under section 1 of this act are a civil infraction to be
punished as a natural resource infraction as provided by chapter 7.84
RCW. Any fines issued under this section shall be supplemental to any
remedies provided by section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.300 and 2000 c 107 s 239 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless the violation has been identified by rule under section
2 of this act as a civil infraction, a person is guilty of unlawfully
undertaking hydraulic project activities if the person constructs any
form of hydraulic project or performs other work on a hydraulic project
and:
(a) Fails to have a hydraulic project approval required under
chapter 77.55 RCW for such construction or work; ((or))
(b) Violates any requirements or conditions of the hydraulic
project approval for such construction or work; or
(c) Violates any stop work or correction order issued under section
1 of this act.
(2) Unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities is a gross
misdemeanor.

--- END ---