BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state needs
to make significant investments in radio communications systems that
are interoperable. The legislature further finds that local
governments, the most frequent users of radio communications systems,
need to be part of the statewide solution. Therefore, in an effort to
establish a more coordinated and cohesive effort between state and
local governments in achieving statewide radio communications
interoperability, the legislature finds that it is the purpose of this
chapter to create a new office within the office of the governor to be
called the Washington interoperability office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Washington interoperability office,
headed by the Washington interoperability coordinator, is established
in the executive office of the governor for the purpose of establishing
an interoperable, statewide radio communications system. The
interoperability coordinator shall report directly to the governor.
The office shall:
(1) Establish statewide policies for wireless radio communications
systems used by state, county, and local governments;
(2) Establish uniform technical requirements consistent, when
possible, with federal guidelines and standards to be used by state,
county, and local governments to ensure statewide interoperability
between the different bands on the designated mutual aid frequencies;
(3) Review the statewide communications interoperability plan and
adopt technical standards for wireless radio communications systems
used by state, county, and local governments;
(4) Evaluate all interoperability projects within the state and
make recommendations or decisions on federal and state funding, when
appropriate;
(5) Ensure that state and federal funding is being spent in
alignment with state technical standards for radio communications
systems;
(6) Coordinate interoperability communications investments in the
state;
(7) Coordinate and manage the licensing and use of state-designated
and state-licensed radio frequencies, including the spectrum used for
public safety and emergency communications, and serve as the point of
contact with the federal communications commission on matters related
to allocation, use, and licensing of radio spectrum for state agencies;
(8) Coordinate the purchasing of all state wireless radio
communications system equipment to ensure that:
(a) After the transition from a radio over internet protocol
network, any new trunked system is, at a minimum, project-25;
(b) Any new system that requires advanced digital features is, at
a minimum, project-25;
(c) Any new system or equipment purchases is, at a minimum,
project-25; and
(d) Any new system or equipment purchases contribute towards
attaining a statewide, level-5 interoperability system;
(9) Certify when a state or local government achieves level-5
interoperability and meets the technical requirements of the enhanced
technical implementation plan;
(10) Seek funding support for wireless radio communications
systems, including federal grants and other funding sources;
(11) Make grant funding, subject to appropriation, available to
eligible local governments;
(12) Make investments in state-owned and state-managed radio
communications systems, particularly in low-density population areas of
the state; and
(13) Submit an annual report by December 1st, beginning in 2008, to
the governor and legislature outlining the progress in implementing the
statewide communications interoperability plan.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.105.020 and 2003 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,
the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Department" means the department of information services;
(2) "Board" means the information services board;
(3) "Committee" means the state interoperability executive
committee;
(4) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi municipal
corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such
corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately;
(5) "Director" means the director of the department;
(6) "Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. This term
includes, but is not limited to, services acquired for equipment
maintenance and repair, operation of a physical plant, security,
computer hardware and software installation and maintenance,
telecommunications installation and maintenance, data entry, keypunch
services, programming services, and computer time-sharing;
(7) "Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of
the state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes
specially conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines,
multiplexors, switches associated with such communications lines, and
any equipment and software components necessary for management and
control of the backbone network;
(8) "Telecommunications" means the transmission of information by
wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means;
(9) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text,
voice, and video;
(10) "Information processing" means the electronic capture,
collection, storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and
presentation of information in the form of data, text, voice, or image
and includes telecommunications and office automation functions;
(11) "Information services" means data processing,
telecommunications, office automation, and computerized information
systems;
(12) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission
facilities used in information processing, such as computers, word
processors, terminals, telephones, wireless communications system
facilities, cables, and any physical facility necessary for the
operation of such equipment;
(13) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a
strategic management process documenting relationships between agency
missions and information technology and telecommunications investments;
(14) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and
management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology
resources and telecommunications;
(15) "Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or
license;
(16) "Video telecommunications" means the electronic
interconnection of two or more sites for the purpose of transmitting
and/or receiving visual and associated audio information. Video
telecommunications shall not include existing public television
broadcast stations as currently designated by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under chapter 43.330 RCW;
(17) "K-20 educational network board" or "K-20 board" means the K-20 educational network board created in RCW 43.105.800;
(18) "K-20 network technical steering committee" or "committee"
means the K-20 network technical steering committee created in RCW
43.105.810;
(19) "K-20 network" means the network established in RCW
43.105.820;
(20) "Educational sectors" means those institutions of higher
education, school districts, and educational service districts that use
the network for distance education, data transmission, and other uses
permitted by the K-20 board;
(21) "Office" means the Washington interoperability office.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.105.041 and 2003 c 18 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall have the following powers and duties related to
information services:
(a) To develop standards and procedures governing the acquisition
and disposition of equipment, proprietary software and purchased
services, ((licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of state
agencies,)) and confidentiality of computerized data;
(b) To purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire, dispose of, and
maintain equipment, proprietary software, and purchased services, or to
delegate to other agencies and institutions of state government, under
appropriate standards, the authority to purchase, lease, rent, or
otherwise acquire, dispose of, and maintain equipment, proprietary
software, and purchased services: PROVIDED, That, agencies and
institutions of state government are expressly prohibited from
acquiring or disposing of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services without such delegation of authority. The
acquisition and disposition of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services is exempt from RCW 43.19.1919 and, as provided in
RCW 43.19.1901, from the provisions of RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.200.
This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to the legislative branch;
(c) To develop statewide or interagency technical policies,
standards, and procedures;
(d) To review and approve standards and common specifications for
new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed by agencies,
public postsecondary education institutions, educational service
districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 information
technology services, and to assure the cost-effective development and
incremental implementation of a statewide video telecommunications
system to serve: Public schools; educational service districts;
vocational-technical institutes; community colleges; colleges and
universities; state and local government; and the general public
through public affairs programming;
(e) To provide direction concerning strategic planning goals and
objectives for the state. The board shall seek input from the
legislature and the judiciary;
(f) To develop and implement a process for the resolution of
appeals by:
(i) Vendors concerning the conduct of an acquisition process by an
agency or the department; or
(ii) A customer agency concerning the provision of services by the
department or by other state agency providers;
(g) To establish policies for the periodic review by the department
of agency performance which may include but are not limited to analysis
of:
(i) Planning, management, control, and use of information services;
(ii) Training and education; and
(iii) Project management;
(h) To set its meeting schedules and convene at scheduled times, or
meet at the request of a majority of its members, the chair, or the
director; and
(i) To review and approve that portion of the department's budget
requests that provides for support to the board.
(2) Statewide technical standards to promote and facilitate
electronic information sharing and access are an essential component of
acceptable and reliable public access service and complement content-related standards designed to meet those goals. The board shall:
(a) Establish technical standards to facilitate electronic access
to government information and interoperability of information
systems((, including wireless communications systems)). Local
governments are strongly encouraged to follow the standards established
by the board; and
(b) Require agencies to consider electronic public access needs
when planning new information systems or major upgrades of systems.
In developing these standards, the board is encouraged to include
the state library, state archives, and appropriate representatives of
state and local government.
(3)(a) The board, in consultation with the K-20 board, has the duty
to govern, operate, and oversee the technical design, implementation,
and operation of the K-20 network including, but not limited to, the
following duties: Establishment and implementation of K-20 network
technical policy, including technical standards and conditions of use;
review and approval of network design; procurement of shared network
services and equipment; and resolving user/provider disputes concerning
technical matters. The board shall delegate general operational and
technical oversight to the K-20 network technical steering committee as
appropriate.
(b) The board has the authority to adopt rules under chapter 34.05
RCW to implement the provisions regarding the technical operations and
conditions of use of the K-20 network.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.105.330 and 2006 c 76 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The board shall appoint)) A state interoperability executive
committee is established as an advisory committee to the Washington
interoperability office, the membership of which must include, but not
be limited to, representatives of the military department, the
Washington state patrol, the department of transportation, the
department of information services, the department of natural
resources, city and county governments, state and local fire chiefs,
police chiefs, and sheriffs, and state and local emergency management
directors. The chair and legislative members of the board will serve
as nonvoting ex officio members of the committee. Voting membership
may not exceed fifteen members.
(2) The ((chair of the board)) Washington interoperability
coordinator shall appoint the chair of the committee from among the
voting members of the committee.
(3) The state interoperability executive committee has the
following responsibilities:
(a) Develop policies and make recommendations to the ((board))
office for technical standards for state wireless radio communications
systems, including emergency communications systems. The standards
must address, among other things, the interoperability of systems,
taking into account both existing and future systems and technologies;
(b) Coordinate and manage on behalf of the ((board)) office the
licensing and use of state-designated and state-licensed radio
frequencies, including the spectrum used for public safety and
emergency communications, and serve as the point of contact with the
federal communications commission on matters relating to allocation,
use, and licensing of radio spectrum;
(c) ((Coordinate the purchasing of all state wireless radio
communications system equipment to ensure that:
(i) After the transition from a radio over internet protocol
network, any new trunked system shall be, at a minimum, project-25;
(ii) Any new system that requires advanced digital features shall
be, at a minimum, project-25; and
(iii) Any new system or equipment purchases shall be, at a minimum,
upgradeable to project-25;
(d) Seek support, including possible federal or other funding, for
state-sponsored wireless communications systems;
(e) Develop recommendations for legislation that may be required to
promote interoperability of state wireless communications systems;
(f) Foster cooperation and coordination among public safety and
emergency response organizations;
(g) Work with wireless communications groups and associations to
ensure interoperability among all public safety and emergency response
wireless communications systems; and
(h))) Advise the office in prioritizing grant applications
submitted by local governments; and
(d) Perform such other duties as may be assigned by the ((board))
office to promote interoperability of wireless communications systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The public safety interoperability account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The Washington
interoperability office shall deposit into the account moneys received
from legislative appropriations, gifts, grants, and endowments for
investments establishing, operating, or maintaining radio
communications systems that achieve high-level interoperability, or for
related training. Only the Washington interoperability coordinator, or
the coordinator's designee, may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Subject to the availability of funds
appropriated for this purpose, the Washington interoperability office
shall establish a public safety interoperability grant program. The
purpose of the grant program is to aid local governments in making
investments in shared, interoperable radio communications systems.
(2) The office may only approve a grant application if it satisfies
the following criteria:
(a) The applicant is a local government or a consortium of
contiguous local governments;
(b) The applicant has entered into an interagency agreement with
the participating local governments and the relevant state agencies
regarding cost sharing, governance, and management of the proposed
radio communications system;
(c) The applicant will manage and maintain the operations of the
radio communications system, but will allow the state to use and access
the system when necessary; and
(d) The proposed radio communications system is project-25
compliant or upgradeable to project-25 and is consistent with
applicable federal guidelines and standards for interoperability.
(3) The office may give preference to applications based on any of
the following criteria:
(a) The proposed radio communications system will contribute
towards the state achieving a statewide, level-5 interoperability
system;
(b) The estimated population of the applicant is more than one
hundred thousand; and
(c) The applicant has secured funding from other sources to support
the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1, 2, 6, and 7 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---