BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washingtonians
sixty-five years of age and older will nearly double in the next
twenty-five years, from eleven percent of our population to almost
twenty percent. Younger people living with disabilities will also
require supportive long-term care services. Nationally, younger people
living with a disability account for thirty-seven percent of the total
number of people who need long-term care.
The legislature further finds that adult day service programs
provide an important and valuable service that allows people to live as
independently as possible, while receiving services that are essential
to their health and well-being, and still residing in their own homes
or adult family homes.
The legislature further finds that adult day service programs
provide a valuable respite from caregiving responsibilities for family
members, supporting family caregivers and allowing them to continue to
care for their family member without needing more formal services or a
higher level residential care.
The legislature further finds that adult day service programs are
not available, at all, in twenty-six of Washington's thirty-nine
counties, and are only available to a limited degree in the thirteen
counties in which some services exist. It is important that a special
effort be established to assist unserved and underserved communities to
develop adult day services programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
Within funds appropriated for this purpose, the department shall
develop a challenge grant program to assist communities and
organizations in efforts to plan and establish additional adult day
service programs throughout the state. The challenge grant program
shall provide financial grants, not to exceed one hundred thousand
dollars for each grant, for the purpose of helping to meet the costs of
planning, development, and start-up of new adult day service programs
in underserved communities. Recipients of these grants must provide
matching resources, in funds or in-kind, of equal value to any grant
received. Any adult day services program developed after receiving a
challenge grant must agree to serve people whose care is paid for by
the state medical assistance program on a first-come, first-served
basis regardless of the source of payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---