BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the threat of
an incident caused by a chemical, biological, radioactive, nuclear, or
explosive agent occurring in the state poses a severe threat to the
health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of the state of Washington.
In order to mitigate any damage that may be caused by CBRNE incidents,
it is necessary that the state have a coordinated and comprehensive
plan to respond to these dangerous and deadly incidents.
(2) The legislature further finds that the current system of
relying almost exclusively on local jurisdictions to respond to CBRNE
incidents is inadequate because it stretches the capabilities of local
jurisdictions, it lacks uniformity in training, equipment, and response
standards, and it hinders the ability of jurisdictions to cooperate in
the event of a catastrophic incident. Major portions of the state lack
protection from CBRNE incidents because many local jurisdictions simply
do not have the capabilities to respond to these incidents.
(3) The purpose of this act is to establish a statewide CBRNE
response program that relies on a network of regional response teams
that operate with standardized training and equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "CBRNE agent" means a chemical, biological, radioactive,
nuclear, or explosive agent.
(2) "CBRNE incident" means an incident creating a danger or the
possibility of a danger to persons, property, or the environment as a
result of spillage, seepage, fire, explosion, or release of a CBRNE
agent.
(3) "Director" means the director of fire protection in the
Washington state patrol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The director shall establish and
maintain a statewide CBRNE response program. This program must
include, without limitation:
(a) The division of the state into CBRNE response regions;
(b) A network of regional teams to respond to CBRNE incidents
within their respective regions and to operate outside their respective
regions to assist other regional teams;
(c) Standards for training, equipment, and procedures for regional
teams and other responders concerning responses to CBRNE incidents;
(d) Procedures for reimbursing regional teams for costs incurred by
approved responses; and
(e) Procedures for recovering response costs from parties
responsible for causing a CBRNE incident.
(2) The director shall adopt any rules necessary to implement and
administer the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The director shall divide the state into
CBRNE response regions. In making this division, the director must
consider (1) the history of any CBRNE or hazardous materials incident
locations throughout the state and the factors that contribute to those
incidents; (2) the current geographical distribution of CBRNE or
hazardous materials responders; (3) any existing regional divisions in
the state; and (4) work in conjunction with the existing CBRNE response
program operated by the military department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The primary duty of a regional response
team is to stabilize a CBRNE incident. Regional response teams are
limited to emergency responses and the evaluation and documentation
functions arising from CBRNE incidents that threaten life, property, or
the environment. A regional response team must respond to the best of
its ability, subject to the limitations of available equipment and
personnel. Regional response teams must work with known local hazard
industries, first response agencies, and local emergency planning
agencies to ensure an appropriate integration of plans and operational
response.
(2) A regional response team may sample, test, analyze, treat,
remove, recover, package, monitor, or track the involvement of a CBRNE
agent only if it is incidentally necessary to identify a CBRNE agent,
prevent the release or threat of a release of a CBRNE agent, or
stabilize a CBRNE incident.
(3) The activities of a regional response team are limited to those
that can be accomplished safely to stabilize a CBRNE incident and,
except as may be incidentally necessary, do not include the transport,
storage, disposal, or remedial cleanup of CBRNE agents.
(4) A regional response team is not required to maintain general
security or safety perimeters, locate underground utilities, ensure
appropriate traffic control services, conduct hydrological
investigations and analysis, or provide testing, removal, or disposal
of underground storage tank contamination at or near the CBRNE incident
to which the team is dispatched.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.43.938 and 1995 c 369 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Wherever the term state fire marshal appears in the Revised
Code of Washington or the Washington Administrative Code it shall mean
the director of fire protection.
(2) The chief of the Washington state patrol shall appoint an
officer who shall be known as the director of fire protection. The
board, after consulting with the chief of the Washington state patrol,
shall prescribe qualifications for the position of director of fire
protection. The board shall submit to the chief of the Washington
state patrol a list containing the names of three persons whom the
board believes meet its qualifications. If requested by the chief of
the Washington state patrol, the board shall submit one additional list
of three persons whom the board believes meet its qualifications. The
appointment shall be from one of the lists of persons submitted by the
board.
(3) The director of fire protection may designate one or more
deputies and may delegate to those deputies his or her duties and
authorities as deemed appropriate.
(4) The director of fire protection, in accordance with the
policies, objectives, and priorities of the fire protection policy
board, shall prepare a biennial budget pertaining to fire protection
services. Such biennial budget shall be submitted as part of the
Washington state patrol's budget request.
(5) The director of fire protection, shall implement and
administer, within constraints established by budgeted resources, the
policies, objectives, and priorities of the board and all duties of the
chief of the Washington state patrol that are to be carried out through
the director of fire protection. Such administration shall include
negotiation of agreements with the state board for community and
technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, and the
state colleges and universities as provided in RCW ((43.63A.320))
43.43.934. Programs covered by such agreements shall include, but not
be limited to, planning curricula, developing and delivering
instructional programs and materials, and using existing instructional
personnel and facilities. Where appropriate, such contracts shall also
include planning and conducting instructional programs at the state
fire service training center.
(6) The director of fire protection shall establish and maintain
the statewide CBRNE response program required under this act.
(7) The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director
of fire protection, shall seek the advice of the board in carrying out
his or her duties under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---