BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.16.060 and 1991 c 270 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful:
(a) To conduct pool selling, bookmaking, or to circulate hand
books; or
(b) To bet or wager on any horse race other than by the parimutuel
method; or
(c) For any licensee to take more than the percentage provided in
RCW 67.16.170 and 67.16.175; or
(d) For any licensee to compute breaks in the parimutuel system
((otherwise than)) at more than ten cents.
(2) Any willful violation of the terms of this chapter, or of any
rule, regulation, or order of the commission shall constitute a gross
misdemeanor and when such violation is by a person holding a license
under this chapter, the commission may cancel the license held by the
offender, and such cancellation shall operate as a forfeiture of all
rights and privileges granted by the commission and of all sums of
money paid to the commission by the offender; and the action of the
commission in that respect shall be final.
(3) The commission shall have power to exclude from any and all
race courses of the state of Washington any person whom the commission
deems detrimental to the best interests of racing or any person who
willfully violates any of the provisions of this chapter or of any
rule, regulation, or order issued by the commission.
(4) Every race meet held in this state contrary to the provisions
of this chapter is hereby declared to be a public nuisance.

--- END ---