BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.111 and 2004 c 271 s 128 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every ballot for a single combination of issues, offices, and
candidates shall be uniform within a precinct and shall identify the
type of primary or election, the county, and the date of the primary or
election, and the ballot or voting device shall contain instructions on
the proper method of recording a vote, including write-in votes. Each
position, together with the names of the candidates for that office,
shall be clearly separated from other offices or positions in the same
jurisdiction. The offices in each jurisdiction shall be clearly
separated from each other. ((No paper ballot or ballot card may be
marked in any way that would permit the identification of the person
who voted that ballot.))
(2) No paper ballot or ballot card may contain any encrypted or
unencrypted bar code or other unique identifying mark, except as
specifically authorized by this subsection. A ballot may contain a
randomly assigned unique identifying mark solely for auditing and vote
reconciliation purposes, or to determine if a particular ballot has
been previously counted. The unique identifying mark shall not be
associated at any time with an individual voter, a voter's address, or
a voter's registration number.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.60.040 and 2003 c 111 s 1504 are each amended to
read as follows:
A ballot is invalid and no votes on that ballot may be counted if
it is found folded together with another ballot ((or it is marked so as
to identify the voter)).
Those parts of a ballot are invalid and no votes may be counted for
those issues or offices where more votes are cast for the office or
issue than are permitted by law; write-in votes do not contain all of
the information required under RCW ((29A.60.020)) 29A.60.021; or that
issue or office is not marked with sufficient definiteness to determine
the voter's choice or intention. No write-in vote may be rejected due
to a variation in the form of the name if the election board or the
canvassing board can determine the issue for or against which or the
person and the office for which the voter intended to vote.

--- END ---