BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that the
profound implications of a changed climate will affect the peoples,
institutions, and economies of Washington. While no single local
government can substantially influence greenhouse gas emissions or
climate change trends, the legislature recognizes that the state,
including its local governments and residents, must do its part to
reduce greenhouse gas emissions.
(2) The legislature further recognizes that: (a) Patterns of land
use development significantly influence transportation-related
greenhouse gas emissions; (b) fossil fuel-based transportation is the
largest source of greenhouse gas emissions in Washington; and (c) the
state and its residents will not achieve emission reductions
established in RCW 80.80.020 without a significant decrease in
transportation emissions. To this end, the legislature finds that
local land use and state and local transportation plans should be
developed to: Minimize greenhouse gas emissions associated with new
development and transportation improvements; and reduce overall
greenhouse gas emissions in accordance with RCW 80.80.020.
(3) The legislature finds that comprehensive land use plans of
local governments can be a significant tool for meaningfully addressing
these difficult issues. The legislature recognizes that locally
adopted plans should: (a) Minimize land use patterns that increase
vehicle usage; (b) encourage compact communities, in-filling, denser
development, linkages with transit options, and other practices that
reduce the number of vehicle miles traveled; and (c) encourage green
jobs and the provision of affordable housing in areas near employment
and service centers.
(4) The legislature also finds that the effects of global warming
are becoming evident in Washington, adversely affecting its residents,
economy, and environment. It is critical that Washington and its
counties and cities plan to adapt to these adverse effects and take
steps to prevent problematic circumstances from becoming worse. The
legislature, however, does not intend for the delayed effective date
for the climate change goal established in RCW 36.70A.020 to impede
ongoing efforts by counties and cities to address climate change
issues.
(5) The legislature further finds that addressing land use-related
climate issues will simultaneously advance many other land use planning
goals and provide public dividends, including: (a) Realizing
reductions in the costs of providing public facilities and services
through more compact development; (b) increasing housing affordability
through lower public costs and more compact patterns of growth; (c)
lessening transportation costs through reductions in the number of
vehicle miles traveled; and (d) accomplishing goals for the protection
of the environmental resources of rural areas and resource lands by
reducing sprawl. The legislature also recognizes that alternative
fuels, and vehicles that use alternative fuels or have increased
efficiencies, will contribute to lessening greenhouse gas emissions and
will encourage investment in these fuels, energy sources, and
technologies.
(6) Without prompt, effective, and comprehensive responses to the
environmental and governance challenges of climate change, meaningful
solutions to these borderless issues will continue to elude the state
and its residents. The legislature recognizes that many Washington
counties and cities have begun to independently address climate change.
The legislature further finds that to achieve the state's emission
reduction goals, a collaborative effort is needed. This act is the
first step toward providing local governments with the tools that are
necessary to accomplish the state's emission reduction goals.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.020 and 2002 c 154 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following goals are adopted to guide the development and
adoption of comprehensive plans and development regulations of those
counties and cities that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040. The following goals are not listed in order of priority
and shall be used exclusively for the purpose of guiding the
development of comprehensive plans and development regulations:
(1) Urban growth. Encourage development in urban areas where
adequate public facilities and services exist or can be provided in an
efficient manner.
(2) Reduce sprawl. Reduce the inappropriate conversion of
undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density development.
(3) Transportation. Encourage efficient multimodal transportation
systems that are based on regional priorities and coordinated with
county and city comprehensive plans.
(4) Housing. Encourage the availability of affordable housing to
all economic segments of the population of this state, promote a
variety of residential densities and housing types, and encourage
preservation of existing housing stock.
(5) Economic development. Encourage economic development
throughout the state that is consistent with adopted comprehensive
plans, promote economic opportunity for all citizens of this state,
especially for unemployed and for disadvantaged persons, promote the
retention and expansion of existing businesses and recruitment of new
businesses, recognize regional differences impacting economic
development opportunities, and encourage growth in areas experiencing
insufficient economic growth, all within the capacities of the state's
natural resources, public services, and public facilities.
(6) Property rights. Private property shall not be taken for
public use without just compensation having been made. The property
rights of landowners shall be protected from arbitrary and
discriminatory actions.
(7) Permits. Applications for both state and local government
permits should be processed in a timely and fair manner to ensure
predictability.
(8) Natural resource industries. Maintain and enhance natural
resource-based industries, including productive timber, agricultural,
and fisheries industries. Encourage the conservation of productive
forest lands and productive agricultural lands, and discourage
incompatible uses.
(9) Open space and recreation. Retain open space, enhance
recreational opportunities, conserve fish and wildlife habitat,
increase access to natural resource lands and water, and develop parks
and recreation facilities.
(10) Environment. Protect the environment and enhance the state's
high quality of life, including air and water quality, and the
availability of water.
(11) Citizen participation and coordination. Encourage the
involvement of citizens in the planning process and ensure coordination
between communities and jurisdictions to reconcile conflicts.
(12) Public facilities and services. Ensure that those public
facilities and services necessary to support development shall be
adequate to serve the development at the time the development is
available for occupancy and use without decreasing current service
levels below locally established minimum standards.
(13) Historic preservation. Identify and encourage the
preservation of lands, sites, and structures, that have historical or
archaeological significance.
(14) Effective December 31, 2010, climate change. Reduce climate
change impacts by lessening emissions of greenhouse gases and adapt to
the effects of climate change through sustainable energy,
transportation planning, and land use management practices. This
subsection applies only to counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040 with
a population exceeding one hundred thousand and cities planning under
RCW 36.70A.040 with a population exceeding thirty thousand.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must develop and provide advisory climate change
response methodologies and estimates to counties and cities that
include a range of methodologies and estimates. The advisory
methodologies and estimates must reflect regional and local variations
and the diversity of counties and cities planning under this chapter,
and, at a minimum, also must:
(a) Identify the greenhouse gas emission reductions that various
land use and building measures are estimated to produce. The
methodologies developed under this subsection (1)(a) may be expressed
as a methodology or a quantification of probable reductions. The
methodologies must be capable of considering documented benefits of
accommodating growth within urban centers that provide for compact
development, appropriate mixes of uses, transit, nonmotorized travel
choices, and a balance of employment and housing; and
(b) Identify potential policies, regulatory programs, and other
measures counties and cities can implement to adapt to the likely
adverse effects of global warming and climate change.
(2) The department must complete and make available the advisory
climate change response methodologies and estimates required by this
section by December 1, 2009. These advisory climate change response
methodologies and estimates must also be updated two years before each
completion date established in RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a).
(3) The department must create or contract to update an existing
computer program for use by counties and cities to inventory, estimate,
and project greenhouse gas emissions and identify greenhouse gas
reductions. The computer program must include features for: (a)
Estimating 1990 greenhouse gas emissions by sector. If the data to
complete the estimates required by this subsection (3)(a) is not
available, the computer program must include features for completing
these estimates at the earliest date after 1990 for which the required
data is available; (b) inventorying and estimating current emissions by
sector; (c) projecting future emissions by sector; (d) estimating the
number of vehicle miles traveled; (e) estimating the greenhouse gas
emissions generated by motor vehicles; and (f) determining measures to
reduce greenhouse gas emissions by lessening vehicle travel.
(4) In preparing the methodologies and estimates, the department
must periodically consult with the advisory team required by section
5(3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A global warming mitigation and
adaptation program is established. The program must be administered by
the department of community, trade, and economic development. The
department must, through a competitive process, select at least three
counties and six cities for the program. At least one county and one
city selected for the program must have potential to be adversely
impacted by global warming through sea-level increases, storms,
flooding, or other adverse effects. At least one county and one city
must be located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains. At least
one county and one city must be located west of the crest of the
Cascade mountains and outside the central Puget Sound region. Counties
selected must reflect a range of opportunities to address climate
change in urbanizing, resource, or agricultural areas. Cities selected
must reflect a range of sizes, geographic locations, and variations
between those that are highly urbanized and those that are less so and
include more residential dwellings than employment positions.
(2) The program is established to assist counties and cities that
are addressing climate change through their land use and transportation
planning, and those that aspire to do so but lack necessary resources.
The department may fund proposals to inventory global warming
emissions, mitigate global warming emissions, or adapt to the adverse
impacts of global warming using criteria established by the department
to accomplish the objectives of this act.
(3) The department must provide grants and technical assistance to
aid the selected counties and cities in their efforts to anticipate,
mitigate, and adapt to global warming and its associated problems.
(4) The program must conclude by June 30, 2010.
(5) If specific funding for the purposes of this section,
referencing this act by bill or chapter number and section number is
not provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this
section is null and void.
(6) This section expires January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) With the use of funds provided by
specific appropriation, by December 1, 2008, the department of
community, trade, and economic development must provide to the governor
and appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the
senate, a report describing: (a) How counties and cities are
addressing climate change issues; and (b) a range of possible measures
that could be adopted as amendments to chapter 36.70A RCW or other
statutes that would enable counties and cities to effectively avoid,
mitigate, and adapt to global warming in the land use and
transportation planning process.
(2) The report must address, as appropriate and with information
that is readily available: (a) What counties and cities have
voluntarily done to identify the greenhouse gas emissions of their
communities, including those created by counties and cities through
governmental activities; (b) the range of strategies chosen by
jurisdictions to reduce emissions from their own activities and those
of the entire community; (c) a description of obstacles and
opportunities to achieve emission reductions in a variety of urban and
rural areas; (d) recommendations for statutory amendments, if any, that
are necessary to facilitate emission reductions and adaptation to
climate change impacts at the local level through any combination of
enhanced state and local planning and investment strategies; and (e)
recommendations for funding to assist counties and cities in fulfilling
the recommendations within the report.
(3) In preparing the report, the department must convene and
consult with an advisory team comprised of the following interests:
(a) One representative each from six or fewer counties and ten cities.
In selecting these representatives, the department must endeavor to
have statewide geographical representation; (b) one representative each
from two regional transportation planning organizations; and (c)
representatives from other interested public agencies and interest
groups. The number of representatives selected under this subsection
(3)(c) may not exceed the sum total of representatives selected under
(a) and (b) of this subsection.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is not intended to amend or affect
chapter 353, Laws of 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---