BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND INTENT. (1) The legislature
recognizes that the benefits of local food production include
stewardship of working agricultural lands; direct and indirect jobs in
agricultural production, food processing, tourism, and support
industries; energy conservation and greenhouse gas reductions; and
increased food security through access to locally grown foods.
(2) The legislature finds there is a direct correlation between
adequate nutrition and a child's development and school performance.
Children who are hungry or malnourished are at risk of lower
achievement in school.
(3) The legislature further finds that adequate nutrition is also
necessary for the physical health of adults, and that some communities
have limited access to healthy fruits and vegetables and quality meat
and dairy products, a lack of which may lead to high rates of diet-related diseases.
(4) The legislature believes that expanding market opportunities
for Washington farmers will preserve and strengthen local food
production and increase the already significant contribution that
agriculture makes to the state and local economies.
(5) The legislature finds that the state's existing procurement
requirements and practices may inhibit the purchase of locally produced
food.
(6) The legislature intends that the local farms-healthy kids act
strengthen the connections between the state's agricultural industry
and the state's food procurement procedures in order to expand local
agricultural markets, improve the nutrition of children and other at-risk consumers, and have a positive impact on the environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 15.64 RCW
to read as follows:
FARM-TO-SCHOOL PROGRAM. (1) A farm-to-school program is created
within the department to facilitate increased procurement of Washington
grown food by the common schools.
(2) The department, in consultation with the department of health,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department
of general administration, and Washington State University, shall, in
order of priority:
(a) Identify and develop policies and procedures to implement and
evaluate the farm-to-school program, including coordinating with school
procurement officials, buying cooperatives, and other appropriate
organizations to develop uniform procurement procedures and materials,
and practical recommendations to facilitate the purchase of Washington
grown food by the common schools. These policies, procedures, and
recommendations shall be made available to school districts to adopt at
their discretion;
(b) Assist food producers, distributors, and food brokers to market
Washington grown food to schools by informing them of food procurement
opportunities, bid procedures, school purchasing criteria, and other
requirements;
(c) Assist school districts to connect with local producers by
informing them of the sources and availability of Washington grown food
as well as the nutritional, environmental, and economic benefits of
purchasing Washington grown food;
(d) Identify and recommend mechanisms that will increase the
predictability of sales for producers and the adequacy of supply for
purchasers;
(e) Identify and make available existing curricula, programs and
publications that educate students on the nutritional, environmental,
and economic benefits of preparing and consuming locally grown food;
(f) Support efforts to advance other farm-to-school connections
such as farmers markets on school grounds, school gardens, and farm
visits; and
(g) As resources allow, seek additional funds to leverage state
expenditures.
(3) The department in cooperation with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall collect data on the
activities conducted pursuant to this act and communicate such data
biennially to the appropriate committees of the legislature beginning
November 15, 2009. Data collected may include the numbers of schools
and farms participating and any increases in the procurement of
Washington grown food by the common schools.
(4) As used in this section, RCW 43.19.1905, 43.19.1906,
28A.335.190, and section 3 of this act, "Washington grown" means grown
and packed or processed in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.235
RCW to read as follows:
WASHINGTON GROWN FRESH FRUIT AND VEGETABLE GRANTS. (1) The
Washington grown fresh fruit and vegetable grant program is created in
the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The purpose of
the program is to facilitate consumption of Washington grown nutritious
snacks in order to improve student health and expand the market for
locally grown fresh produce.
(2) For purposes of this section, "fresh fruit and vegetables"
includes perishable produce that is unprocessed, minimally processed,
frozen, dried, or otherwise prepared, stored, and handled to maintain
its fresh nature while providing convenience to the user. Producing
minimally processed food involves cleaning, washing, cutting, or
portioning.
(3) The program shall increase the number of school children with
access to Washington grown fresh fruits and vegetables and shall be
modeled after the United States department of agriculture fresh fruit
and vegetable program, as described in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1769(g). Schools
receiving funds under the federal program are not eligible for grants
under the Washington grown fresh fruit and vegetable grant program.
(4)(a) To the extent that state funds are appropriated specifically
for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall solicit applications, conduct a competitive process,
and make one or two-year grants to a mix of urban and rural schools to
enable eligible schools to provide free Washington grown fresh fruits
and vegetables throughout the school day.
(b) When evaluating applications and selecting grantees, the
superintendent of public instruction shall consider and prioritize the
following factors:
(i) The applicant's plan for ensuring the use of Washington grown
fruits and vegetables within the program;
(ii) The applicant's plan for incorporating nutrition, agricultural
stewardship education, and environmental education into the snack
program;
(iii) The applicant's plan for establishing partnerships with
state, local, and private entities to further the program's objectives,
such as helping the school acquire, handle, store, and distribute
Washington grown fresh fruits and vegetables.
(5)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
give funding priority to applicant schools with any of grades
kindergarten through eight that: Participate in the national school
lunch program and have fifty percent or more of their students eligible
for free or reduced price meals under the federal national school lunch
act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1751 et seq.
(b) If any funds remain after all eligible priority applicant
schools have been awarded grants, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction may award grants to applicant schools having less
than fifty percent of the students eligible for free or reduced price
meals.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
adopt rules to carry out the grant program.
(7) With assistance from the Washington department of agriculture,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop
and track specific, quantifiable outcome measures of the grant program
such as the number of students served by the program, the dollar value
of purchases of Washington grown fruits and vegetables resulting from
the program, and development of state, local, and private partnerships
that extend beyond the cafeteria.
(8) As used in this section, "Washington grown" has the definition
in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.19.1905 and 2002 c 299 s 5 and 2002 c 285 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The director of general administration shall establish overall
state policy for compliance by all state agencies, including
educational institutions, regarding the following purchasing and
material control functions:
(((1))) (a) Development of a state commodity coding system,
including common stock numbers for items maintained in stores for
reissue;
(((2))) (b) Determination where consolidations, closures, or
additions of stores operated by state agencies and educational
institutions should be initiated;
(((3))) (c) Institution of standard criteria for determination of
when and where an item in the state supply system should be stocked;
(((4))) (d) Establishment of stock levels to be maintained in state
stores, and formulation of standards for replenishment of stock;
(((5))) (e) Formulation of an overall distribution and
redistribution system for stock items which establishes sources of
supply support for all agencies, including interagency supply support;
(((6))) (f) Determination of what function data processing
equipment, including remote terminals, shall perform in statewide
purchasing and material control for improvement of service and
promotion of economy;
(((7))) (g) Standardization of records and forms used statewide for
supply system activities involving purchasing, receiving, inspecting,
storing, requisitioning, and issuing functions, including a standard
notification form for state agencies to report cost-effective direct
purchases, which shall at least identify the price of the goods as
available through the division of purchasing, the price of the goods as
available from the alternative source, the total savings, and the
signature of the notifying agency's director or the director's
designee;
(((8))) (h) Screening of supplies, material, and equipment excess
to the requirements of one agency for overall state need before sale as
surplus;
(((9))) (i) Establishment of warehouse operation and storage
standards to achieve uniform, effective, and economical stores
operations;
(((10))) (j) Establishment of time limit standards for the issuing
of material in store and for processing requisitions requiring
purchase;
(((11))) (k) Formulation of criteria for determining when
centralized rather than decentralized purchasing shall be used to
obtain maximum benefit of volume buying of identical or similar items,
including procurement from federal supply sources;
(((12))) (l) Development of criteria for use of leased, rather than
state owned, warehouse space based on relative cost and accessibility;
(((13))) (m) Institution of standard criteria for purchase and
placement of state furnished materials, carpeting, furniture, fixtures,
and nonfixed equipment, in newly constructed or renovated state
buildings;
(((14))) (n) Determination of how transportation costs incurred by
the state for materials, supplies, services, and equipment can be
reduced by improved freight and traffic coordination and control;
(((15))) (o) Establishment of a formal certification program for
state employees who are authorized to perform purchasing functions as
agents for the state under the provisions of chapter 43.19 RCW;
(((16))) (p) Development of performance measures for the reduction
of total overall expense for material, supplies, equipment, and
services used each biennium by the state;
(((17))) (q) Establishment of a standard system for all state
organizations to record and report dollar savings and cost avoidance
which are attributable to the establishment and implementation of
improved purchasing and material control procedures;
(((18))) (r) Development of procedures for mutual and voluntary
cooperation between state agencies, including educational institutions,
and political subdivisions for exchange of purchasing and material
control services;
(((19))) (s) Resolution of all other purchasing and material
matters which require the establishment of overall statewide policy for
effective and economical supply management;
(((20))) (t) Development of guidelines and criteria for the
purchase of vehicles, high gas mileage vehicles, alternate vehicle
fuels and systems, equipment, and materials that reduce overall energy-related costs and energy use by the state, including investigations
into all opportunities to aggregate the purchasing of clean
technologies by state and local governments, and including the
requirement that new passenger vehicles purchased by the state meet the
minimum standards for passenger automobile fuel economy established by
the United States secretary of transportation pursuant to the energy
policy and conservation act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2002);
(((21))) (u) Development of goals for state use of recycled or
environmentally preferable products through specifications for products
and services, processes for requests for proposals and requests for
qualifications, contractor selection, and contract negotiations;
(v) Development of food procurement procedures and materials that
encourage and facilitate the purchase of Washington grown food by state
agencies and institutions to the maximum extent practicable and
consistent with international trade agreement commitments; and
(w) Development of policies requiring all food contracts to include
a plan to maximize to the extent practicable and consistent with
international trade agreement commitments the availability of
Washington grown food purchased through the contract.
(2) As used in this section, "Washington grown" has the definition
in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.19.1906 and 2006 c 363 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Insofar as practicable, all purchases and sales shall be based on
competitive bids, and a formal sealed, electronic, or web-based bid
procedure, subject to RCW 43.19.1911, shall be used as standard
procedure for all purchases and contracts for purchases and sales
executed by the state purchasing and material control director and
under the powers granted by RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939. This
requirement also applies to purchases and contracts for purchases and
sales executed by agencies, including educational institutions, under
delegated authority granted in accordance with provisions of RCW
43.19.190 or under RCW 28B.10.029. However, formal sealed, electronic,
or web-based competitive bidding is not necessary for:
(1) Emergency purchases made pursuant to RCW 43.19.200 if the
sealed bidding procedure would prevent or hinder the emergency from
being met appropriately;
(2) Purchases not exceeding thirty-five thousand dollars, or
subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial management:
PROVIDED, That the state director of general administration shall
establish procedures to assure that purchases made by or on behalf of
the various state agencies shall not be made so as to avoid the thirty-five thousand dollar bid limitation, or subsequent bid limitations as
calculated by the office of financial management: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That the state purchasing and material control director is authorized
to reduce the formal sealed bid limits of thirty-five thousand dollars,
or subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial
management, to a lower dollar amount for purchases by individual state
agencies if considered necessary to maintain full disclosure of
competitive procurement or otherwise to achieve overall state
efficiency and economy in purchasing and material control. Quotations
from three thousand dollars to thirty-five thousand dollars, or
subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial management,
shall be secured from at least three vendors to assure establishment of
a competitive price and may be obtained by telephone or written
quotations, or both. The agency shall invite at least one quotation
each from a certified minority and a certified women-owned vendor who
shall otherwise qualify to perform such work. Immediately after the
award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded and open
to public inspection and shall be available by telephone inquiry. A
record of competition for all such purchases from three thousand
dollars to thirty-five thousand dollars, or subsequent limits as
calculated by the office of financial management, shall be documented
for audit purposes. Purchases up to three thousand dollars may be made
without competitive bids based on buyer experience and knowledge of the
market in achieving maximum quality at minimum cost;
(3) Purchases which are clearly and legitimately limited to a
single source of supply and purchases involving special facilities,
services, or market conditions, in which instances the purchase price
may be best established by direct negotiation;
(4) Purchases of insurance and bonds by the risk management
division under RCW 43.41.310;
(5) Purchases and contracts for vocational rehabilitation clients
of the department of social and health services: PROVIDED, That this
exemption is effective only when the state purchasing and material
control director, after consultation with the director of the division
of vocational rehabilitation and appropriate department of social and
health services procurement personnel, declares that such purchases may
be best executed through direct negotiation with one or more suppliers
in order to expeditiously meet the special needs of the state's
vocational rehabilitation clients;
(6) Purchases by universities for hospital operation or biomedical
teaching or research purposes and by the state purchasing and material
control director, as the agent for state hospitals as defined in RCW
72.23.010, and for health care programs provided in state correctional
institutions as defined in RCW 72.65.010(3) and veterans' institutions
as defined in RCW 72.36.010 and 72.36.070, made by participating in
contracts for materials, supplies, and equipment entered into by
nonprofit cooperative hospital group purchasing organizations;
(7) Purchases for resale by institutions of higher education to
other than public agencies when such purchases are for the express
purpose of supporting instructional programs and may best be executed
through direct negotiation with one or more suppliers in order to meet
the special needs of the institution;
(8) Purchases by institutions of higher education not exceeding
thirty-five thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That for purchases between
three thousand dollars and thirty-five thousand dollars quotations
shall be secured from at least three vendors to assure establishment of
a competitive price and may be obtained by telephone or written
quotations, or both. For purchases between three thousand dollars and
thirty-five thousand dollars, each institution of higher education
shall invite at least one quotation each from a certified minority and
a certified women-owned vendor who shall otherwise qualify to perform
such work. A record of competition for all such purchases made from
three thousand to thirty-five thousand dollars shall be documented for
audit purposes; ((and))
(9) Off-contract purchases of Washington grown food when such food
is not available from Washington sources through an existing contract.
However, Washington grown food purchased under this subsection must be
of an equivalent or better quality than similar food available through
the contract and be able to be paid from the agency's existing budget.
This requirement also applies to purchases and contracts for purchases
executed by state agencies, including institutions of higher education,
under delegated authority granted in accordance with RCW 43.19.190 or
under RCW 28B.10.029; and
(10) Negotiation of a contract by the department of transportation,
valid until June 30, 2001, with registered tow truck operators to
provide roving service patrols in one or more Washington state patrol
tow zones whereby those registered tow truck operators wishing to
participate would cooperatively, with the department of transportation,
develop a demonstration project upon terms and conditions negotiated by
the parties.
Beginning on July 1, 1995, and on July 1st of each succeeding odd-numbered year, the dollar limits specified in this section shall be
adjusted as follows: The office of financial management shall
calculate such limits by adjusting the previous biennium's limits by
the appropriate federal inflationary index reflecting the rate of
inflation for the previous biennium. Such amounts shall be rounded to
the nearest one hundred dollars. However, the three thousand dollar
figure in subsections (2) and (8) of this section may not be adjusted
to exceed five thousand dollars.
As used in this section, "Washington grown" has the definition in
section 2 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.335.190 and 2005 c 346 s 2 and 2005 c 286 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When, in the opinion of the board of directors of any school
district, the cost of any furniture, supplies, equipment, building,
improvements, or repairs, or other work or purchases, except books,
will equal or exceed the sum of fifty thousand dollars, complete plans
and specifications for such work or purchases shall be prepared and
notice by publication given in at least one newspaper of general
circulation within the district, once each week for two consecutive
weeks, of the intention to receive bids and that specifications and
other information may be examined at the office of the board or any
other officially designated location: PROVIDED, That the board without
giving such notice may make improvements or repairs to the property of
the district through the shop and repair department of such district
when the total of such improvements or repair does not exceed the sum
of forty thousand dollars. The cost of any public work, improvement or
repair for the purposes of this section shall be the aggregate of all
amounts to be paid for labor, material, and equipment on one continuous
or interrelated project where work is to be performed simultaneously or
in close sequence. The bids shall be in writing and shall be opened
and read in public on the date and in the place named in the notice and
after being opened shall be filed for public inspection.
(2) Every purchase of furniture, equipment or supplies, except
books, the cost of which is estimated to be in excess of forty thousand
dollars, shall be on a competitive basis. The board of directors shall
establish a procedure for securing telephone and/or written quotations
for such purchases. Whenever the estimated cost is from forty thousand
dollars up to seventy-five thousand dollars, the procedure shall
require quotations from at least three different sources to be obtained
in writing or by telephone, and recorded for public perusal. Whenever
the estimated cost is in excess of seventy-five thousand dollars, the
public bidding process provided in subsection (1) of this section shall
be followed.
(3) Any school district may purchase goods produced or provided in
whole or in part from class II inmate work programs operated by the
department of corrections pursuant to RCW 72.09.100, including but not
limited to furniture, equipment, or supplies. School districts are
encouraged to set as a target to contract, beginning after June 30,
2006, to purchase up to one percent of the total goods required by the
school districts each year, goods produced or provided in whole or in
part from class II inmate work programs operated by the department of
corrections.
(4) Every building, improvement, repair or other public works
project, the cost of which is estimated to be in excess of forty
thousand dollars, shall be on a competitive bid process. Whenever the
estimated cost of a public works project is one hundred thousand
dollars or more, the public bidding process provided in subsection (1)
of this section shall be followed unless the contract is let using the
small works roster process in RCW 39.04.155 or under any other
procedure authorized for school districts. One or more school
districts may authorize an educational service district to establish
and operate a small works roster for the school district under the
provisions of RCW 39.04.155.
(5) The contract for the work or purchase shall be awarded to the
lowest responsible bidder as defined in RCW 43.19.1911 but the board
may by resolution reject any and all bids and make further calls for
bids in the same manner as the original call. On any work or purchase
the board shall provide bidding information to any qualified bidder or
the bidder's agent, requesting it in person.
(6) In the event of any emergency when the public interest or
property of the district would suffer material injury or damage by
delay, upon resolution of the board declaring the existence of such an
emergency and reciting the facts constituting the same, the board may
waive the requirements of this section with reference to any purchase
or contract: PROVIDED, That an "emergency", for the purposes of this
section, means a condition likely to result in immediate physical
injury to persons or to property of the school district in the absence
of prompt remedial action.
(7) This section does not apply to the direct purchase of school
buses by school districts and educational services in accordance with
RCW 28A.160.195.
(8) This section does not apply to the purchase of Washington grown
food.
(9) At the discretion of the board, a school district may develop
and implement policies and procedures to facilitate and maximize to the
extent practicable, purchases of Washington grown food; such policies
and procedures may include, but are not limited to, local preferences.
(10) As used in this section, "Washington grown" has the definition
in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School districts may operate school gardens or farms as
appropriate for the purpose of growing fruits and vegetables to be used
for educational purposes and, where appropriate, to be offered to
students through the district nutrition services meal and snack
programs.
(2) If a school operates a school garden or farm, students within
the school's vocational agricultural program such as the future farmers
of America or other similar agricultural organizations shall be given
preference for the operation of a school garden or farm.
(3) Students participating in school gardens or farms shall be
afforded the opportunity of growing produce in methods suitable for
both organic and conventional growing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall adopt rules authorizing individual farms that
have farms stands to participate in the women, infant, and children
farmers market nutrition program to provide locally grown, nutritious,
unprepared fruits and vegetables to eligible program participants.
Such rules must meet the provisions of 7 C.F.R. part 3016, uniform
administrative requirements for grants and cooperative agreements to
state and local governments, as it existed on the effective date of
this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 FARMERS MARKET TECHNOLOGY IMPROVEMENT PILOT
PROGRAM. (1) If funds are provided for this specific purpose, the
Washington state farmers market technology improvement pilot program to
lend technological hardware to farmers markets is created in the
department of social and health services to assist farmers markets and
Washington farmers develop the capability to accept electronic payment
cards, including electronic benefits transfers. The purpose of this
program is to increase access to fresh fruits and vegetables and
quality meat and dairy for all Washington residents and to increase the
number of food stamp recipients using food stamp benefits through
electronic benefits transfer at farmers markets.
(2) The department shall work with farmers markets and appropriate
associations to ensure that the program serves a balance of rural and
urban farmers markets.
(3) The department shall collect data on the activities conducted
pursuant to this act and communicate biennially to the appropriate
committees of the legislature beginning on November 15, 2009. Data
collected may include information illustrating the demand for the
technology and numbers of people using the technology for electronic
benefits transfer.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 FARMERS TO FOOD BANKS PILOT PROGRAM. (1)
If funds are provided for this specific purpose, the farmers to food
banks pilot program is created. In implementing this program, the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall conduct
a request for proposals to select pilot site communities statewide.
Any nonprofit entity qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal
revenue code that is in the business of delivering social services may
submit a proposal. No more than five pilot communities shall be
selected based on the following:
(a) One pilot shall be designated in an urban area that has been
negatively impacted by a mass transit infrastructure program, is
ethnically diverse, and is located in a city with over five hundred
thousand residents;
(b) At least two pilots must be located east of the crest of the
Cascades; and
(c) At least one pilot must be in a rural county as defined in RCW
43.160.020.
(2) Funds shall be used in pilot communities for the food bank
system to contract with local farmers to provide fruits, vegetables,
dairy, and meat products for distribution to low-income people at local
designated food banks.
(3) The department shall collect data on the activities conducted
pursuant to this act and communicate biennially to the appropriate
committees of the legislature beginning November 15, 2009. Data
collected may include information illustrating the demand and numbers
of people served.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 43.19.706 (Purchase of Washington
agricultural products -- Report to the legislature) and 2002 c 166 s 2
are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act may be known and cited as the
local farms-healthy kids act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---