BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(1) Mercury is a persistent, bioaccumulative toxin that can damage
the central nervous and cardiovascular systems in humans;
(2) Mercury-added products, when broken or improperly disposed of,
can release mercury into the environment;
(3) Mercury-added lamps in particular have been identified as a
major source of mercury, which can be released during improper
disposal;
(4) While the harmful effects of mercury have been identified, the
state has not taken steps to prevent mercury-added products, including
mercury-added lamps, from being disposed of in landfills;
(5) Many Washington counties, however, have recognized the harmful
effects of disposal of mercury-added lamps in waste facilities and have
put lamp disposal bans in place;
(6) The rate of recycling of mercury-added lamps has been low in
recent years, only about twenty percent of all fluorescent lamps are
recycled each year in Washington state, while the remaining eighty
percent continue to be disposed of in solid waste facilities;
(7) Mounting concerns about climate change are compelling some
individuals and businesses to switch from traditional incandescent
lighting sources to more efficient lighting sources, such as compact
fluorescent lamps, which contain mercury; and
(8) As more individuals and businesses move towards using
fluorescent lamps, the need to develop comprehensive new policies to
prevent fluorescent lamps from being disposed of in solid waste
facilities and to instead encourage the recycling of such products
becomes more pressing.
Therefore, in order to continue to take steps to reduce the release
of mercury, and to encourage the safe disposal of fluorescent lamps in
the state, the legislature finds that the state should take action to
prevent mercury-added products from being disposed of in solid waste
facilities and to encourage widespread recycling of fluorescent lamps
statewide.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95M.010 and 2003 c 260 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) (("Automotive mercury switch" includes a convenience switch,
such as a switch for a trunk or hood light, and a mercury switch in
antilock brake systems)) "Bulk mercury" includes any elemental,
nonamalgamated mercury, regardless of volume quantity or weight.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(4) "Health care facility" includes a hospital, nursing home,
extended care facility, long-term care facility, clinical or medical
laboratory, state or private health or mental institution, clinic,
physician's office, or health maintenance organization.
(5) "Manufacturer" includes any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture that produces a mercury-added product or an importer or
domestic distributor of a mercury-added product produced in a foreign
country. In the case of a multicomponent product containing mercury,
the manufacturer is the last manufacturer to produce or assemble the
product. If the multicomponent product or mercury-added product is
produced in a foreign country, the manufacturer is the first importer
or domestic distributor.
(6) "Mercury-added button-cell battery" means a button-cell battery
to which the manufacturer intentionally introduces mercury for the
operation of the battery.
(7) "Mercury-added general purpose lights" means mercury-added
lamps, bulbs, tubes, or other devices that provide functional
illumination in homes, offices, and outdoors.
(8) "Mercury-added novelty" means a mercury-added product intended
mainly for personal or household enjoyment or adornment. Mercury-added
novelties include, but are not limited to, items intended for use as
practical jokes, figurines, adornments, toys, games, cards, ornaments,
yard statues and figures, candles, jewelry, holiday decorations, items
of apparel, and other similar products. Mercury-added novelty does not
include games, toys, or products that require a button-cell or lithium
battery, liquid crystal display screens, or a lamp that contains
mercury.
(((8))) (9) "Mercury-added product" means a product, commodity, or
chemical, or a product with a component that contains mercury or a
mercury compound intentionally added to the product, commodity, or
chemical in order to provide a specific characteristic, appearance, or
quality, or to perform a specific function, or for any other reason.
Mercury-added products include, but are not limited to, those products
listed in the interstate mercury education and reduction clearinghouse
mercury-added products database, mercury thermometers, mercury
thermostats, button-cell batteries, mercury barometers, and mercury
switches ((in motor vehicles)) or relays.
(((9))) (10) "Mercury manometer" means a mercury-added product that
is used for measuring blood pressure.
(((10))) (11) "Mercury thermometer" means a mercury-added product
that is used for measuring temperature.
(((11))) (12) "Retailer" means a retailer of a mercury-added
product.
(13) "Switch" means any device, which may be referred to as a
switch, sensor, valve, probe, control, transponder, or any other
apparatus, that directly regulates or controls the flow of electricity,
gas, or other compounds, such as relays or transponders. "Switch"
includes all components of the unit necessary to perform its flow
control function. The term "automotive mercury switch" includes a
convenience switch, such as a switch for a trunk or hood light, and a
mercury switch in antilock brake systems. The term "utility switch"
includes, but is not limited to, all devices that open or close an
electrical circuit or a liquid or gas valve. The term "utility relay"
includes, but is not limited to, all products or devices that open or
close electrical contacts to control the operation of other devices in
the same or another electrical circuit.
(14) "Wholesaler" means a wholesaler of a mercury-added product.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.95M.020 and 2003 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2004, a manufacturer, wholesaler, or
retailer may not knowingly sell at retail a fluorescent lamp if the
fluorescent lamp contains mercury and was manufactured after November
30, 2003, unless the fluorescent lamp is labeled in accordance with the
guidelines listed under subsection (2) of this section. Primary
responsibility for affixing labels required under this section is on
the manufacturer, and not on the wholesaler or retailer.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a lamp is
considered labeled pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if the
lamp has all of the following:
(a) A label affixed to the lamp that displays the internationally
recognized symbol for the element mercury; and
(b) A label on the lamp's packaging that: (i) Clearly informs the
purchaser that mercury is present in the item; (ii) explains that the
fluorescent lamp should be disposed of according to applicable federal,
state, and local laws; and (iii) provides a toll-free telephone number,
and a uniform resource locator internet address to a web site, that
contains information on applicable disposal laws.
(3) The manufacturer of a mercury-added lamp is in compliance with
the requirements of this section if the manufacturer is in compliance
with the labeling requirements of another state.
(4) ((The provisions of this section do not apply to products
containing mercury-added)) (a) Effective July 1, 2010, all state-funded
public agency facilities, including but not limited to educational
institutions, must recycle their fluorescent lamps. An exemption
process may be established by the department to accommodate small local
governments and educational institutions serving populations less than
five thousand people.
(b) Effective January 1, 2011, all commercial, industrial, and
retail facilities and office buildings must recycle their fluorescent
lamps.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.95M.050 and 2003 c 260 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2006, no person may sell, offer for sale,
or distribute for sale or use in this state a mercury-added novelty.
A manufacturer of mercury-added novelties must notify all retailers
that sell the product about the provisions of this section and how to
properly dispose of any remaining mercury-added novelty inventory.
(2)(a) Effective January 1, 2006, no person may sell, offer for
sale, or distribute for sale or use in this state a manometer used to
measure blood pressure or a thermometer that contains mercury. This
subsection (2)(a) does not apply to:
(i) An electronic thermometer with a button-cell battery containing
mercury;
(ii) A thermometer that contains mercury and that is used for food
research and development or food processing, including meat, dairy
products, and pet food processing;
(iii) A thermometer that contains mercury and that is a component
of an animal agriculture climate control system or industrial
measurement system or for veterinary medicine until such a time as the
system is replaced or a nonmercury component for the system or
application is available;
(iv) A thermometer or manometer that contains mercury that is used
for calibration of other thermometers, manometers, apparatus, or
equipment, unless a nonmercury calibration standard is approved for the
application by the national institute of standards and technology;
(v) A thermometer that is provided by prescription. A manufacturer
of a mercury thermometer shall supply clear instructions on the careful
handling of the thermometer to avoid breakage and proper cleanup should
a breakage occur; or
(vi) A manometer or thermometer sold or distributed to a hospital,
or a health care facility controlled by a hospital, if the hospital has
adopted a plan for mercury reduction consistent with the goals of the
mercury chemical action plan developed by the department under section
302, chapter 371, Laws of 2002.
(b) A manufacturer of thermometers that contain mercury must notify
all retailers that sell the product about the provisions of this
section and how to properly dispose of any remaining thermometer
inventory.
(3) Effective January 1, 2006, no person may sell, install, or
reinstall a commercial or residential thermostat that contains mercury
unless the manufacturer of the thermostat conducts or participates in
a thermostat recovery or recycling program designed to assist
contractors in the proper disposal of thermostats that contain mercury
in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901, et seq., the federal resource
conservation and recovery act.
(4) No person may sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale or
use in this state a motor vehicle manufactured after January 1, 2006,
if the motor vehicle contains an automotive mercury switch.
(5) Nothing in this section restricts the ability of a
manufacturer, importer, or domestic distributor from transporting
products through the state, or storing products in the state for later
distribution outside the state.
(6) Effective June 30, 2009, the sale or purchase and delivery of
bulk mercury is prohibited. However, the prohibition in this
subsection does not apply to sales to research facilities or industrial
facilities that provide products or services to entities exempted from
this chapter. The facilities described in this subsection must submit
an inventory of their purchase and use of bulk mercury to the
department on an annual basis, as well as any mercury waste generated
from such actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.95M RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2012, a person may not dispose of mercury-
added products in a manner other than by recycling or disposal as
dangerous waste or universal waste as determined appropriate by the
department by rule, or in accordance with recommendations made in
section 7(4) of this act, or with a memorandum of understanding
executed with the department. This section does not apply to entities
or individuals who are in the business of collecting, transporting, or
disposing of solid waste.
(2) Effective January 1, 2012, a person may not discharge mercury
into water, wastewater treatment, or wastewater disposal systems. This
subsection applies, but is not limited to, reagents, medications,
amalgam, and other mixtures that contain mercury. Dental offices that
are in compliance with the department of ecology's mercury action plan
regarding the discharge of wastewater from dental offices are exempt
from this section.
(3) Owners and operators of solid waste management facilities are
required to implement the following:
(a) Posting signs at the facility providing notice of the
prohibition of the disposal and incineration of mercury-added products;
and
(b) Written notification to or contractual agreements with the
facility's customers on a frequency, determined by the department,
providing notice of the prohibition on the disposal and incineration of
mercury-added products.
(4) If a formulated mercury-added product is a cosmetic or
pharmaceutical product subject to the regulatory requirements relating
to mercury of the federal food and drug administration, or a device
regulated by the federal food and drug administration, then the product
is exempt from the requirements of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.95M.080 and 2003 c 260 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In preparation for the full implementation of this chapter, the
department shall make every effort to educate all persons regarding the
requirements of this chapter, especially the necessity to reduce use of
mercury and properly recycle mercury products. A violation of this
chapter is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand
dollars for each violation in the case of a first violation. Repeat
violators are liable for a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand
dollars for each repeat violation. Penalties collected under this
section must be deposited in the state toxics control account created
in RCW 70.105D.070.
(2) Households are exempt from the penalties under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department of ecology, in
consultation with the solid waste advisory committee created under RCW
70.95.040, shall conduct research and develop recommendations for the
implementation and financing of a convenient and effective mercury-added general purpose lighting recycling program for residents, small
businesses, small government agencies, charities, and schools
throughout the state. The department and the solid waste advisory
committee shall consult with stakeholders including persons who
represent retailers of mercury-added general purpose lighting, waste
haulers, mercury-added general purpose lighting recyclers, mercury-added general purpose lighting manufacturers, cities, counties,
environmental organizations, public interest organizations, and other
interested parties that have a role or interest in the recycling of
mercury-added general purpose lighting.
(2) The department of ecology shall assess ways for a convenient
and effective statewide recycling program for mercury-added general
purpose lighting to be established and financed. Factors to be
considered include:
(a) Urban versus rural recycling challenges and issues;
(b) The involvement of mercury-added general purpose lighting
manufacturers;
(c) Different methods of financing the recycling programs for
mercury-added general purpose lighting;
(d) Methods to encourage the return of mercury-added general
purpose lighting for recycling;
(e) The impact of the approach on local governments, nonprofit
organizations, waste haulers, and other stakeholders;
(f) Information obtained from existing mercury-adding general
purpose lighting recycling programs, particularly those programs that
exist in counties that prohibit the disposal of mercury-adding general
purpose lighting in solid waste facilities, and information obtained
from existing infrastructure for recycling of mercury-added general
purpose lighting; and
(g) Environmentally sound options for managing the mercury.
(3) The department of ecology shall also develop a description of
what could be accomplished voluntarily and what would require
regulation or legislation if needed to implement the recommended
statewide recycling program for mercury-added general purpose lighting.
(4) The department of ecology shall report its findings and
recommendations for implementing and financing a recycling program for
mercury-added general purpose lighting to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(5) This section expires September 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 By July 1, 2009, the department of ecology,
in consultation with the United States environmental protection agency,
shall study the feasibility of the development of a national repository
for mercury. The department of ecology shall develop recommendations
and provide its findings to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2009.

--- END ---