BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.39.038 and 1977 ex.s. c 14 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((senate and house committees on energy and utilities))
committee shall ((make continuing studies of the state building code as
it relates to energy consumption, conservation and retention and shall
submit their recommendations concerning such to the legislature
periodically)) study the following issues related to the state energy
code:
(a) The estimated efficiency gains made as a result of the 2006
updates to the state energy code; and
(b) The feasibility of the state achieving zero net energy
residential buildings by 2020 and zero net energy commercial buildings
by 2030.
(2) In conducting its review, the committee shall consider other
state approaches in achieving zero net energy buildings.
(3) The committee, where appropriate, may consult with individuals
from the public and private sector or ask such individuals to establish
an advisory committee. Members of such an advisory committee are not
entitled to expense reimbursement.
(4) Staff support for the study must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house office of program research.
(5) Legislative members of the committee shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The expenses of the study must be paid jointly by the senate
and the house of representatives. Expenditures are subject to approval
by the senate facilities and operations committee and the house
executive rules committee, or their successor committees.
(7) The committee shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2008.
(8) This section expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---