BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.06.030 and 1998 c 136 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for a food and beverage service worker's permit
under RCW 69.06.010 must submit documentation, in a format approved by
the state board of health, that the applicant has tested negative for
tuberculosis within twenty working days prior to the issuance of the
permit. The state board of health may establish testing requirements
for permit applicants for other infectious diseases that may threaten
the public health at food service establishments.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any person afflicted with any
contagious or infectious disease that may be transmitted by food or
beverage to work in or about any place where unwrapped or unpackaged
food and/or beverage products are prepared or sold, or offered for sale
for human consumption and it shall be unlawful for any person knowingly
to employ a person so afflicted. Nothing in this section eliminates
any authority or requirement to control or suppress communicable
diseases pursuant to chapter 70.05 RCW and RCW 43.20.050(2)(e).

--- END ---