BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that too few people
understand the rich learning opportunities presented by the field of
geography. Geography is more than places on a map. Geography
addresses global connections, people and cultures, and economics and
environments. Our young people need to know geography in order to
understand today's world and succeed in tomorrow's. But students do
not have enough opportunities to explore and learn geography. A
national geographic survey shows that half of young Americans cannot
locate world powers like Japan and India. Twenty percent cannot locate
the Pacific Ocean. Without geography, our children are not ready for
the world. With geography, children have the power of global
knowledge. Geography education offers a wealth of opportunities to
integrate instruction and learning across disciplines such as art,
music, dance, history, science, economics, and languages, and to build
skills in inquiry, research, analysis, reading, and writing. Therefore
the legislature intends to support an endowment for geography education
in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with a national
organization to establish, maintain, and operate an endowment for the
promotion of geography education in Washington state. The national
organization must have experience operating geography education
endowments in other states and must provide equal nonstate matching
funds to the state funds provided in the contract. All funds in and
any interest earned on the endowment shall be used exclusively for
geography education programs including, but not limited to, curriculum
materials, resource collections, and professional development
institutes for teachers and administrators. The national organization
must have an established affiliated advisory committee in the state to
recommend local projects to be funded by the endowment. The contract
shall require that the organization report annually to the
superintendent on the recipients of endowment funds and the amounts and
purposes of expenditures from the fund.

--- END ---