BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Placental and umbilical cord blood is recognized as a viable
and more accessible alternative to bone marrow in many medical
therapies. Science has discovered ways to treat many types of cancer,
blood, and immune disorders through the use of stem cells from
placental and umbilical cord blood. Placental and umbilical cord blood
is currently used to treat such diseases as leukemia and over sixty
other fatal immune system diseases;
(2) In the United States there are approximately fifty thousand
units of usable placental and umbilical cord blood. However, at least
one hundred fifty thousand high quality units are needed in order to
meet the nation's demands. While over eight thousand cord blood
transplants have occurred around the world, it is estimated that with
an adequate supply of placental and umbilical cord blood, over eleven
thousand patients could receive life-saving treatment in the United
States every year;
(3) There is an urgent need to dramatically increase the racial and
ethnic diversity of the supply of placental and umbilical cord blood to
improve the possibility of finding compatible donors in all racial and
ethnic communities in Washington;
(4) Washington state is home to several large medical research
institutions and an expanding biomedical research industry. Over
thirty years ago the pioneering work of nobel laureate E. Donnall
Thomas, and his colleagues at the Fred Hutchinson cancer research
center, made bone marrow transplantation a reality. The use of
placental and umbilical cord blood promises to build upon this legacy
as well as lead to other new medical therapies; and
(5) Research on prematurity at children's hospital and public
banking at the Puget Sound blood center have led to gains in efficiency
in the retrieval and collection of placental and umbilical cord blood.
Efforts by these organizations can be expanded to benefit the broader
population in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of health shall identify
and provide funding to a work group charged with the expansion of
umbilical cord blood collection practices consisting of representatives
from a major health research institution engaged in premature birth
research, a nationally recognized cancer treatment and research
institution, a nonprofit blood bank engaged in umbilical cord blood
collection, an accredited private cord blood bank engaged in umbilical
cord blood collection in Washington, and an organization representing
hospitals.
(2) The department of health shall support the work group in the
development of:
(a) Model educational materials for expectant parents and health
care providers regarding the process for donating umbilical cord blood
and its uses. The materials must include information about the full
range of options available for umbilical cord blood banking that is
sufficient to allow a pregnant woman to make an informed decision
before her third trimester of pregnancy on whether to participate in a
public or private umbilical cord blood banking program or to donate
umbilical cord blood for research. The materials shall be culturally
appropriate for individuals of various races and ethnic backgrounds;
(b) Common protocols for use by hospitals and blood banks in the
retrieval and collection of umbilical cord blood to increase efficiency
to promote the expansion of umbilical cord blood retrieval and
collection statewide; and
(c) Methods to decrease the cost of umbilical cord blood banking
for both research and transplantation.
(3) The work group shall provide advice and consultation to the
pilot project established in section 3 of this act and review its
progress to inform the work group's efforts.
(4) By July 1, 2010, the department of health shall submit a report
of the work group to the legislature and governor. The report shall
contain the work group's recommendations for model educational
materials, retrieval and collection protocols, and any recommendations
for decreasing the cost of umbilical cord blood banking and expanding
umbilical cord blood collection across the state and to diverse
communities. In addition, the report must summarize the findings of
the pilot project established in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of health, in consultation
with the work group created in section 2 of this act, shall identify an
institution actively conducting prematurity research in Washington that
requires the collection of blood and specimens from women during
pregnancy and at delivery, including the collection of umbilical cord
blood, to participate in a pilot project. The pilot project shall take
place in three hospitals in eastern Washington that are conducting
research and that are selected for the purpose of increasing the ethnic
and racial diversity of the umbilical cord blood units that are
collected for research and transplantation. The pilot project must
support the additional staff and resources necessary to expand
retrieval and collection, which will be overseen by the institution
conducting the research, using protocols and methods provided by the
work group created in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---