BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 73.16.010 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 198 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
In every public department, and upon all public works of the state,
and of any county thereof, honorably discharged soldiers, sailors, and
marines who are veterans of any war of the United States, or of any
military campaign for which a campaign ribbon shall have been awarded,
and their widows or widowers and children, shall be preferred for
appointment and employment. Age, loss of limb, or other physical
impairment, which does not in fact incapacitate, shall not be deemed to
disqualify them, provided they possess the capacity necessary to
discharge the duties of the position involved: PROVIDED, That spouses
and the children of honorably discharged veterans who have a service
connected permanent and total disability shall also be preferred for
appointment and employment.

--- END ---