BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.32.010 and 2003 c 111 s 801 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall, whenever at least one statewide
measure or office is scheduled to appear on the general election
ballot, print and distribute a voters' pamphlet.
The secretary of state shall distribute the voters' pamphlet to
each household in the state, to public libraries, and to any other
locations he or she deems appropriate. The secretary of state shall
also produce taped or Braille transcripts of the voters' pamphlet,
publicize their availability, and mail without charge a copy to any
person who requests one.
The secretary of state ((may)) shall make the material required to
be distributed by this chapter available to the public ((in electronic
form)) on his or her web site. The secretary of state may provide
((the)) material in electronic form to computer bulletin boards, print
and broadcast news media, community computer networks, and similar
services at the cost of reproduction or transmission of the data.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.32.031 and 2008 c 1 s 12 (Initiative Measure No.
960) are each amended to read as follows:
The voters' pamphlet must contain:
(1) Information about each measure for an advisory vote of the
people and each ballot measure initiated by or referred to the voters
for their approval or rejection as required by RCW 29A.32.070;
(2) In even-numbered years, statements, if submitted, advocating
the candidacies of nominees for the office of president and vice
president of the United States, United States senator, United States
representative, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state,
state treasurer, state auditor, attorney general, commissioner of
public lands, superintendent of public instruction, insurance
commissioner, state senator, state representative, justice of the
supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or judge of the superior
court. Candidates may also submit a campaign mailing address and
telephone number and a photograph not more than five years old and of
a size and quality that the secretary of state determines to be
suitable for reproduction in the voters' pamphlet. Candidates are
encouraged to submit digital photographs and statements electronically;
(3) In odd-numbered years, if any office voted upon statewide
appears on the ballot due to a vacancy, then statements and photographs
for candidates for any vacant office listed in subsection (2) of this
section must appear;
(4) In even-numbered years, a section explaining how voters may
participate in the election campaign process; the address and telephone
number of the public disclosure commission established under RCW
42.17.350; and a summary of the disclosure requirements that apply when
contributions are made to candidates and political committees;
(5) In even-numbered years the name, address, and telephone number
of each political party with nominees listed in the pamphlet, if filed
with the secretary of state by the state committee of a major political
party or the presiding officer of the convention of a minor political
party;
(6) In each odd-numbered year immediately before a year in which a
president of the United States is to be nominated and elected,
information explaining the precinct caucus and convention process used
by each major political party to elect delegates to its national
presidential candidate nominating convention. The pamphlet must also
provide a description of the statutory procedures by which minor
political parties are formed and the statutory methods used by the
parties to nominate candidates for president;
(7) An application form for an absentee ballot;
(8) A brief statement explaining the deletion and addition of
language for proposed measures under RCW 29A.32.080;
(9) Any additional information pertaining to elections as may be
required by law or in the judgment of the secretary of state is deemed
informative to the voters.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.32.110 and 2003 c 111 s 811 are each amended to
read as follows:
All photographs of candidates submitted for publication must
conform to standards established by the secretary of state by rule.
Candidates are encouraged to submit digital photographs and statements
electronically. No photograph may reveal clothing or insignia
suggesting the holding of a public office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 29A.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary of state must make available on its web site an
electronic voters' pamphlet for every primary election and general
election in which any office listed under RCW 29A.32.031 is scheduled
to appear on the primary or general election ballot, including any
office appearing on the ballot due to a vacancy. The information
included in the electronic voters' pamphlet shall conform to the
requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.32.210 and 2003 c 111 s 813 are each amended to
read as follows:
At least ninety days before any primary or general election, or at
least forty days before any special election held under RCW
((29A.04.320)) 29A.04.321 or 29A.04.330, the legislative authority of
any county or first-class or code city may adopt an ordinance
authorizing the publication and distribution of a local voters'
pamphlet. The pamphlet shall provide information on all measures
((within that jurisdiction and may, if specified in the ordinance,
include information on)) and candidates within that jurisdiction,
including judicial candidates. If both a county and a first-class or
code city within that county authorize a local voters' pamphlet for the
same election, the pamphlet shall be produced jointly by the county and
the first-class or code city. If no agreement can be reached between
the county and first-class or code city, the county and first-class or
code city may each produce a pamphlet. Any ordinance adopted
authorizing a local voters' pamphlet may be for a specific primary,
special election, or general election or for any future primaries or
elections. The format of any local voters' pamphlet shall, whenever
applicable, comply with the provisions of this chapter regarding the
publication of the state candidates' and voters' pamphlets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 29A.32 RCW
to read as follows:
Each county elections department must make available on the
county's web site a primary voters' pamphlet and a general election
voters' pamphlet any time in which any office within that county not
covered in RCW 29A.32.031 is scheduled to appear on the primary or
general election ballot, including judicial office and any office on
the ballot due to a vacancy. The electronic voters' pamphlets shall
include information on all measures within that jurisdiction and
candidates' statements and photographs. Candidates' statements may not
be more than one hundred fifty words. The information included in the
electronic voters' pamphlets shall conform to the requirements of this
chapter. Candidates are encouraged to submit digital photographs and
statements electronically. If the secretary of state has candidate
information required under RCW 29A.32.031 that is applicable to the
county, the county shall use the secretary of state's information or
provide a link from the county's electronic voters' pamphlet to the
secretary of state's electronic voters' pamphlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---