BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is likely that more than eighty-five
percent of students in the class of 2008 who had accumulated sufficient
course credits by the time they entered their senior year will complete
all high school graduation requirements by June of 2008, including
meeting the state standard in reading and writing on the high school
Washington assessment of student learning or an approved alternative.
However, it is also likely that as many as ten thousand or more
students across the state will not be ready to graduate in June as a
result of not meeting the state standard in reading, writing, or both.
Furthermore, it is likely that each year in the future, some proportion
of students will simply not be ready to graduate after twelve years of
school. These students will need additional instruction so they can
earn their diplomas. New courses and instructional strategies must be
developed that are appropriate for these students. Perhaps more
important, these students will need support, encouragement, guidance,
and access to learning opportunities that will help them transition
beyond high school and make progress in a career pathway that will lead
to additional education and a family wage job. Such learning
opportunities exist, but they need to be expanded, and more effort must
be made to inform students about them.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop information and training for counselors and mentor teachers on
providing guidance to students who have completed required course
credits but will not be ready to graduate with their class because they
need additional skills in key academic areas, including meeting state
standards on the Washington assessment of student learning. Guidance
and counseling programs for these students must include encouragement
and support for high school completion and specific assistance with
entering and making progress in a career pathway that will lead to
additional education and a family wage job. The programs must also
provide information on the local availability of options and programs
for these students, including:
(a) Options for students who are not ready to graduate with their
class to continue receiving instruction geared to high school
completion or obtaining a GED, or both, and certification through high
schools, skill centers, and community and technical colleges;
(b) Skills training and tutoring options for young adults offered
through local community-based organizations;
(c) Online learning opportunities targeted to basic skills
acquisition;
(d) Workforce education and training options and pathways,
especially in occupations that will lead to family wage jobs and are in
demand by employers; and
(e) Availability of financial aid for postsecondary education and
assistance for students and families in accessing financial aid,
including the opportunity grant program under RCW 28B.50.271.
(2) Beginning in the summer of 2008, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall create and offer a training
module through the summer institutes for high school counselors and
mentor teachers on the topics described in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate funds to school
districts and educational service districts to provide the enhanced
guidance, counseling, support, and assistance described in this
section, which shall be targeted first to students who have completed
required course credits but will not be ready to graduate with their
class. Funds shall be allocated as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act. The legislature's intent is that funding under
this subsection be allocated primarily on the basis of the anticipated
number of students in the target population in a district, with funds
allocated to educational service districts where regional outreach is
a more feasible method of service delivery due to small numbers of
students dispersed among multiple school districts. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall annually collect and report
statistics on the number of students served by the enhanced programs
under this subsection and the number of subsequent high school or
certificate completions among students in the target population.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants to
school districts, skill centers, and educational service districts to
create high school plus programs targeted to students who have
completed required course credits but are not ready to graduate with
their class because they need additional skills in key academic areas,
including meeting state standards on the Washington assessment of
student learning.
(2) High school plus programs must include, at a minimum:
(a) Skill instruction and tutoring for students in the key academic
areas necessary for them to meet state standards on the Washington
assessment of student learning, offered using alternative service
delivery methods such as flexible scheduling, evening and weekend
classes, self-paced and outcome-based curriculum, or online courses;
(b) Assistance with development of a collection of evidence
alternative assessment;
(c) Enhanced guidance, counseling, support, and assistance; and
(d) Opportunities for students to enroll in additional courses,
work-based learning, internships, or other programs that provide entry
to a career pathway that will lead to additional education and a family
wage job. Grant recipients may offer the career pathway opportunities
directly or in partnership with community-based organizations and
community and technical colleges.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate the grants under this section on a competitive basis but rely
on a simple application and allocate funds largely on the number of
students in the target population. In order to provide services to
students in the class of 2008, the first grant recipients shall be
announced no later than June 15, 2008, with an additional round of
applications possible if there are an insufficient number of initial
respondents. To maximize available resources, school districts are
encouraged to submit collaborative applications that coordinate
services across multiple districts.
(4) Grants under this section may be used for program design and
development, start-up costs, curriculum, and capacity to operate and
sustain a special program for small numbers of students. To support
high school plus programs, school districts may also use funding for
programs under RCW 28A.150.22O for students under the age of twenty-one
who are enrolled for the purpose of completing a high school diploma,
any enhanced funding for guidance and counseling such as that described
under section 2 of this act, and other available resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall submit a report on the program design and outcomes of
high school plus programs created under section 3 of this act to the
education committees of the legislature by September 15, 2009. The
office shall also recommend a funding mechanism for high school plus
programs that does not rely on competitive grants and any additional
changes to improve the effectiveness of the programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---