BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Mathematics and science education are critical to the future
prosperity of the state and its citizens;
(2) The need for quality mathematics and science instruction is
significant and growing. Forty-six percent of Washington students who
enroll in community or technical colleges immediately after high school
require mathematics remediation before they can begin work toward a
degree or certificate. High school graduation requirements in
mathematics and science will be increasing;
(3) Significant vacancies exist for qualified mathematics and
science teachers in Washington's K-12 school system. Competition for
mathematics and science teachers is increasing and many who are now
teaching in these subject areas have not been appropriately certified
or received adequate preparation; and
(4) Immediate action is needed to improve mathematics and science
instruction and to help fill mathematics and science teaching
vacancies. The state must improve, unify, and accelerate recruitment
and preparation programs for mathematics and science teachers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By September 15, 2008, the professional
educator standards board shall submit a report with recommendations for
strengthening the state's corps of K-12 mathematics and science
teachers to the governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and
the education committees of the legislature. The report shall:
(a) Quantify demand by detailing the number of K-12 mathematics and
science teachers needed statewide and regionally by the 2010-11 school
year. In order for the professional educator standards board to
quantify demand, each school district shall provide to the board, by a
date and in a format specified by the board, the number of teachers
assigned to teach mathematics and science, both with and without
appropriate certification and endorsement in those subjects, and the
number of mathematics and science teaching vacancies needing to be
filled, and the board shall include this data, by district, in its
analysis;
(b) Specify how demand will be met by the 2010-11 school year,
including:
(i) The impact of state-funded recruitment programs such as the
pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship, retooling to teach
mathematics and science conditional scholarship, alternative routes
conditional scholarship, future teachers conditional scholarship, and
the recruiting Washington teachers program;
(ii) How alternative route certification programs can be
streamlined and accelerated, based on best practices in other states,
to enable mid-career professionals with mathematics and science
expertise to become certified as K-12 teachers; and
(iii) Financial incentives, based on best practices in other
states, that can be used to hire, support, and retain mathematics and
science teachers in a competitive marketplace; and
(c) Specify strategies for improving retention of mathematics and
science teachers and increasing their classroom effectiveness,
including:
(i) Outlining how to improve the induction of new mathematics and
science teachers using a multiyear approach, mandatory participation by
all school districts, orientation and training sessions before the
start of the school year, highly skilled mentors, and ongoing
professional development for new teachers and mentors; and
(ii) Identifying strategies, based on best practices, to improve
the rigor and productivity of state-funded mathematics and science
teacher preparation programs.
(2) The board's analysis and recommendations shall take into
account increased K-12 graduation requirements from the state board of
education and opportunities provided by the revised mathematics and
science standards and recommended curricula. The board shall seek
assistance from the Washington center for strengthening the teaching
profession and other educational organizations and stakeholder groups
in preparing the report and recommendations and consider the possible
role of a public-private partnership in helping to meet the demand for
mathematics and science teachers and in improving the quality of
instruction in these subject areas.
(3) The professional educator standards board shall also conduct a
study of differential pay for teachers in high-demand subject areas
such as mathematics and science. The study shall examine the design,
successes, and limitations of differential pay programs in other
states. The board may collaborate with the Washington state institute
for public policy in conducting the differential pay study or may
contract with a third party to conduct the study. The board shall
provide a report of its findings and recommendations to the governor,
the superintendent of public instruction, the education committees of
the legislature, and the basic education finance task force by
September 1, 2008.
(4) The professional educator standards board will survey current
math and science teachers across the state to identify barriers to
teaching math and science in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The professional educator standards board
shall act as the lead agency to convene the various organizations and
stakeholders that administer programs that include educator recruitment
efforts and shall develop a collaborative statewide plan for educator
recruitment by September 15, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---