BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Research has shown there is a negative
impact on student achievement in schools with a very large proportion
of low-income students and that this effect is larger than would
otherwise be expected without the poverty concentration. This
multiplier effect is the reason that federal Title I programs require
a special schoolwide approach to remediation in schools with greater
than forty percent low-income students. State allocations for the
learning assistance program also provide a resource enhancement for
school districts with greater than forty percent low-income students.
(2) Research has not been conducted regarding a possible multiplier
effect on student achievement from high concentrations of English
language learner students. However, it is very clear that English
language learner students face significant challenges in meeting the
state's academic learning standards. Resources from the transitional
bilingual instruction program are intended to provide these students
with English language competencies, but a significant proportion of
these students need additional learning opportunities and assistance if
they are expected to meet the same standards as other students. Some
school districts in the state have a disproportionate number of both
English language learner and low-income students and thus face a
disproportionate challenge in assisting these students.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to provide a resource
enhancement to school districts through the learning assistance program
based on high concentrations of English language learner students.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.165.055 and 2005 c 489 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each school district with an approved program is eligible for
state funds provided for the learning assistance program. The funds
shall be appropriated for the learning assistance program in accordance
with the biennial appropriations act. The distribution formula is for
school district allocation purposes only. The distribution formula
shall be based on one or more family income factors measuring economic
need.
(2) In addition to the funds allocated to eligible school districts
on the basis of family income factors, enhanced funds shall be
allocated for school districts where more than twenty percent of
students are eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual
instruction program under chapter 28A.180 RCW as provided in this
subsection. The enhanced funding provided in this subsection shall
take effect beginning in the 2008-09 school year.
(a) If, in the prior school year, a district's percent of October
headcount student enrollment in grades kindergarten through twelve who
are enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program, based
on an average of the program headcount taken in October and May,
exceeds twenty percent, twenty percent shall be subtracted from the
district's percent transitional bilingual instruction program
enrollment and the resulting percent shall be multiplied by the
district's kindergarten through twelve annual average full-time
equivalent enrollment for the prior school year.
(b) The number calculated under (a) of this subsection shall be the
number of additional funded students for purposes of this subsection,
to be multiplied by the per-funded student allocation rates specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(c) School districts are only eligible for the enhanced funds under
this subsection if their percentage of October headcount enrollment in
grades kindergarten through twelve eligible for free or reduced price
lunch exceeded forty percent in the prior school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---