BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the health of
students is at risk due to overconsumption of nonnutritious food, lack
of understanding or interest in sound nutrition and healthy lifestyle
practices, and insufficient exercise and physical activity. Schools
attempt to provide information to students about these risks through
classroom instruction in health and fitness courses and physical
education, but students need the opportunity for learning activities in
health, fitness, and nutrition that are informative, positive,
engaging, and fun. In many communities around the state,
community-based organizations, hospital foundations, public health
agencies, and clinics can offer such programs in partnership with the
schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall allocate funds on a
competitive basis to support the healthy student grant program created
in this section. Healthy student grants shall be used to develop and
offer innovative and engaging instruction and activities in health,
fitness, and nutrition. School districts, community-based
organizations, hospitals, public health agencies, and other
organizations may submit grant applications. An application by an
organization other than a school district must have a school district
partner and the school district shall act as the fiscal agent. On an
annual basis, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall prepare a report on the activities supported by the grant program
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act shall be known and cited as "the
healthy student act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---