BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state has
committed to raise the achievement of all children of Washington
including children with visual impairments or blindness. The
legislature also finds that children with visual impairments and
blindness can benefit greatly if they are taught by an educator who is
trained to understand the learning, communication, and
orientation/mobility issues that blind and visually impaired children
encounter. Individuals who receive teacher training in educating the
visually impaired and blind acquire strategies to assist students in
reacting to and interacting with their environment and reach
achievement levels equal to sighted children. The legislature intends
to take the first steps to having such an in-state teacher preparation
program for teachers of visually impaired and blind students by
assessing the needs of the state in this area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The professional educator standards board
shall consider approving out-of-state institutions of higher education
for the purposes of establishing a specialty endorsement program. By
December 15, 2008, the board shall report to the education committees
of the legislature the process used by the board for such consideration
and whether the board supports approval of out-of-state institutions of
higher education for the purposes of establishing a specialty
endorsement program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) As part of the state needs assessment
process conducted by the higher education coordinating board in
accordance with RCW 28B.76.230, the board shall assess the need for
baccalaureate and/or postgraduate degree programs in Washington that
specialize in teacher preparation programs for teachers of visually
impaired and blind students and orientation/mobility teachers in
Washington's preschools, and elementary, middle, and high schools. If
the board determines that there is a need for one or more programs in
Washington, then the board shall encourage the appropriate institutions
of higher education or institutional sectors to create such a program
or programs.
(2) By August 31, 2008, the board shall report to the legislature
on the needs assessment. The report shall also include a
recommendation on the appropriate level of one-time or start-up funding
to support the educator preparation program for teachers of visually
impaired and blind students and orientation/mobility teachers in
Washington's elementary, middle, and high schools. Additionally, the
report shall indicate which institutions or institutional sectors
demonstrate an interest or could be successful in building and
sustaining a high quality program, including which institutions:
(a) Demonstrate the capacity to make a long-term commitment of
resources to build and sustain a program; and
(b) Can readily engage faculty appropriately qualified to develop
and deliver a high quality curriculum at the baccalaureate and/or
postgraduate level.

--- END ---