BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the statewide
need for increased capacity and the already existing array of
educational opportunities for students in King and south Snohomish
counties and further finds that the needs of students in north
Snohomish, Island, and Skagit counties should equally receive
consideration. To this end, potential sites at Smokey Point in
Marysville and Pacific Station in Everett should each receive careful
consideration using all of the siting studies conducted in the area.
The legislature finds that, when considering the location of future
institutions of higher education in the north Puget Sound region,
responding to the future needs of students should be the paramount
consideration. Locations that can adequately accommodate the future
educational and recreational needs of five thousand students or more,
without further real estate acquisition, must be given priority.
The legislature further finds that state investments in higher
education should focus on increasing the educational opportunities of
students, not urban renewal, enhancing urban infrastructure, or
increasing parking capacity. Facilities must be located so that they
do not interfere with present or future major transportation
interfaces. The legislature finds that environmental, transportation,
and local economic impacts must be carefully considered with input from
the state department of ecology and the department of transportation.
The legislature intends to prioritize the criteria used to select
sites for an institution of higher education in the north Puget Sound
region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) When considering the location of an
institution of higher education in the north Puget Sound region, the
legislature shall give primary consideration to whether the potential
site is centrally located in the Snohomish, Island, and Skagit county
area, space for adequate parking and transit facilities, and
additionally to the availability of:
(a) Properly zoned land with sufficient acreage to accommodate the
educational and recreational needs of a future five thousand student
institution;
(b) Existing infrastructure including water, sewer, regional storm
water facilities, and transportation access;
(c) Land that does not pose significant environmental issues;
(d) Interim facilities to accommodate to facilitate startup;
(e) Close-by opportunities for internship programs in programs
emphasized by the institution; and
(f) Significant support from area communities and interest groups.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---