BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to prohibit the use
of those instruments and procedures that have no legitimate use for the
provision of health care. Such devices pose a risk to the public by
denying or delaying legitimate, proven methods of treatment to patients
who need it.
The legislature finds that medical instruments and procedures that
may not have accepted uses at the time of their initial release may
achieve acceptance in the medical field in the future. The
legislature, therefore, expects that consideration shall be given to
the evolving nature of medicine as reviews of instruments and
procedures are conducted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board may adopt rules to identify those instruments,
categories of instruments, procedures, or categories of procedures that
are approved or prohibited for use by a podiatric physician or surgeon
for therapeutic or diagnostic purposes.
(2) Any rules must be based upon consideration of the following
factors as applicable to any procedure, category of procedures,
instrument, or category of instruments to be approved or prohibited:
(a) The instruction of use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments at approved schools
of podiatric medicine and surgery;
(b) The scientific basis for the use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments;
(c) Any direct and positive relationship between the procedure,
category of procedures, instrument, or category of instruments and
patient care;
(d) A comparison of potential risks and benefits to the patient;
and
(e) Other factors deemed relevant by the board.
(3)(a) A podiatric physician or surgeon licensed under this chapter
or manufacturer or vendor of an instrument or category of instruments
for treatment or diagnostic evaluation may request that the board
determine the classification of a procedure, category of procedures,
instrument, or category of instruments not addressed by the rules.
(b) The use of an instrument, category of instruments, procedure,
or category of procedures that has been prohibited by the board
constitutes unprofessional conduct under this chapter and chapter
18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission may adopt rules to identify those instruments,
categories of instruments, procedures, or categories of procedures that
are approved or prohibited for use by a chiropractor for treatment or
diagnostic evaluation.
(2) Any rules must be based upon consideration of the following
factors as applicable to any procedure, category of procedures,
instrument, or category of instruments to be approved or prohibited:
(a) The instruction of use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments at approved
chiropractic schools and colleges;
(b) The scientific basis for the use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments;
(c) Any direct and positive relationship between the procedure,
category of procedures, instrument, or category of instruments and
patient care;
(d) A comparison of potential risks and benefits to the patient;
and
(e) Other factors deemed relevant by the commission.
(3)(a) Any chiropractor licensed under this chapter or manufacturer
or vendor of an instrument or category of instruments for treatment or
diagnostic evaluation may request that the commission determine the
classification of a procedure, category of procedures, instrument, or
category of instruments not addressed by the rules.
(b) The use of an instrument, category of instruments, procedure,
or category of procedures that has been prohibited by the commission
constitutes unprofessional conduct under this chapter and chapter
18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission may adopt rules to identify those instruments,
categories of instruments, procedures, or categories of procedures that
are approved or prohibited for use by a dentist for treatment or
diagnostic evaluation.
(2) Any rules must be based upon consideration of the following
factors as applicable to any procedure, category of procedures,
instrument, or category of instruments to be approved or prohibited:
(a) The instruction of use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments at approved schools
of dentistry;
(b) The scientific basis for the use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments;
(c) Any direct and positive relationship between the procedure,
category of procedures, instrument, or category of instruments and
patient care;
(d) A comparison of potential risks and benefits to the patient;
and
(e) Other factors deemed relevant by the commission.
(3)(a) Any dentist licensed under this chapter or manufacturer or
vendor of an instrument or category of instruments for treatment or
diagnostic evaluation may request that the commission determine the
classification of a procedure, category of procedures, instrument, or
category of instruments not addressed by the rules.
(b) The use of an instrument, category of instruments, procedure,
or category of procedures that has been prohibited by the commission
constitutes unprofessional conduct under this chapter and chapter
18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.36A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary, in coordination with the committee, may adopt
rules to identify those instruments, categories of instruments,
procedures, or categories of procedures that are approved or prohibited
for use by a naturopath for treatment or diagnostic evaluation.
(2) Any rules must be based upon consideration of the following
factors for any procedure, category of procedures, instrument, or
category of instruments to be approved or prohibited:
(a) The instruction of use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments at approved
naturopathic education programs;
(b) The scientific basis for the use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments;
(c) Any direct and positive relationship between the procedure,
category of procedures, instrument, or category of instruments and
patient care;
(d) A comparison of potential risks and benefits to the patient;
and
(e) Other factors deemed relevant by the secretary, in coordination
with the committee.
(3)(a) Any naturopath licensed under this chapter or manufacturer
or vendor of an instrument or category of instruments for treatment or
diagnostic evaluation may request that the secretary, in coordination
with the committee, determine the classification of a procedure,
category of procedures, instrument, or category of instruments not
addressed by the rules.
(b) The use of an instrument, category of instruments, procedure,
or category of procedures that has been prohibited by the secretary
constitutes unprofessional conduct under this chapter and chapter
18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board may adopt rules to identify those instruments,
categories of instruments, procedures, or categories of procedures that
are approved or prohibited for use by an osteopathic physician or
surgeon or osteopathic physicians' assistant for treatment or
diagnostic evaluation.
(2) Any rules must be based upon consideration of the following
factors for any procedure, category of procedures, instrument, or
category of instruments to be approved or prohibited:
(a) The instruction of use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments at approved schools
of osteopathic medicine or osteopathic physician assistant training
programs;
(b) The scientific basis for the use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments;
(c) Any direct and positive relationship between the procedure,
category of procedures, instrument, or category of instruments and
patient care;
(d) A comparison of potential risks and benefits to the patient;
and
(e) Other factors deemed relevant by the board.
(3)(a) Any osteopathic physician or surgeon licensed under this
chapter or osteopathic physicians' assistant licensed under chapter
18.57A RCW or manufacturer or vendor of an instrument or category of
instruments for treatment or diagnostic evaluation may request that the
board determine the classification of a procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments not addressed by the
rules.
(b) The use of an instrument, category of instruments, procedure,
or category of procedures that has been prohibited by the board
constitutes unprofessional conduct under this chapter and chapter
18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission may adopt rules to identify those instruments,
categories of instruments, procedures, or categories of procedures that
are approved or prohibited for use by a physician or surgeon or
physician assistant for treatment or diagnostic evaluation.
(2) Any rules must be based upon consideration of the following
factors for any procedure, category of procedures, instrument, or
category of instruments to be approved or prohibited:
(a) The instruction of use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments at approved schools
of medicine or physician assistant programs;
(b) The scientific basis for the use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments;
(c) Any direct and positive relationship between the procedure,
category of procedures, instrument, or category of instruments and
patient care;
(d) A comparison of potential risks and benefits to the patient;
and
(e) Other factors deemed relevant by the commission.
(3)(a) Any physician or surgeon licensed under this chapter or
physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW or manufacturer
or vendor of an instrument or category of instruments for treatment or
diagnostic evaluation may request that the commission determine the
classification of a procedure, category of procedures, instrument, or
category of instruments not addressed by the rules.
(b) The use of an instrument, category of instruments, procedure,
or category of procedures that has been prohibited by the commission
constitutes unprofessional conduct under this chapter and chapter
18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 18.74 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board may adopt rules to identify those instruments,
categories of instruments, procedures, or categories of procedures that
are approved or prohibited for use by a physical therapist for
therapeutic or diagnostic purposes.
(2) Any rules must be based upon consideration of the following
factors for any procedure, category of procedures, instrument, or
category of instruments to be approved or prohibited:
(a) The instruction of use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments at approved physical
therapy programs;
(b) The scientific basis for the use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments;
(c) Any direct and positive relationship between the procedure,
category of procedures, instrument, or category of instruments and
patient care;
(d) A comparison of potential risks and benefits to the patient;
and
(e) Other factors deemed relevant by the board.
(3)(a) A physical therapist licensed under this chapter or
manufacturer or vendor of an instrument or category of instruments for
treatment or diagnostic evaluation may request that the board determine
the classification of a procedure, category of procedures, instrument,
or category of instruments not addressed by the rules.
(b) The use of an instrument, category of instrument, procedure, or
category of procedures that has been prohibited by the board
constitutes unprofessional conduct under this chapter and chapter
18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission may adopt rules to identify those instruments,
categories of instruments, procedures, or categories of procedures that
are approved or prohibited for use by an advanced registered nurse
practitioner for treatment or diagnostic evaluation.
(2) Any rules must be based upon consideration of the following
factors for any procedure, category of procedures, instrument, or
category of instruments to be approved or prohibited:
(a) The instruction of use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments at approved schools
of nursing;
(b) The scientific basis for the use of the procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments;
(c) Any direct and positive relationship between the procedure,
category of procedures, instrument, or category of instruments and
patient care;
(d) A comparison of potential risks and benefits to the patient;
and
(e) Other factors deemed relevant by the commission.
(3)(a) An advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under
this chapter or manufacturer or vendor of an instrument or category of
instruments for treatment or diagnostic evaluation may request that the
commission determine the classification of a procedure, category of
procedures, instrument, or category of instruments not addressed by the
rules.
(b) The use of an instrument, category of instruments, procedure,
or category of procedures that has been prohibited by the commission
constitutes unprofessional conduct under this chapter and chapter
18.130 RCW.

--- END ---