BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.405 and 1987 c 397 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever the secretary of transportation shall determine upon the
basis of an engineering and traffic investigation or when requested to
do so by the legislative authority of a city with a population of one
thousand five hundred or less that any maximum speed hereinbefore set
forth is greater than is reasonable or safe with respect to a state
highway under the conditions found to exist at any intersection or upon
any other part of the state highway system or at state ferry terminals,
or that a general reduction of any maximum speed set forth in RCW
46.61.400 is necessary in order to comply with a national maximum speed
limit, the secretary may determine and declare a reasonable and safe
lower maximum limit or a lower maximum limit which will comply with a
national maximum speed limit, for any state highway, the entire state
highway system, or any portion thereof, which shall be effective when
appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected. If requested by
a city with a population of one thousand five hundred or less, the
lower maximum limit must reflect the limit requested by the city, if
the requested limit is on a state highway within the city. The
secretary may also fix and regulate the speed of vehicles on any state
highway within the maximum speed limit allowed by this chapter for
special occasions including, but not limited to, local parades and
other special events. Any such maximum speed limit may be declared to
be effective at all times or at such times as are indicated upon the
said signs; and differing limits may be established for different times
of day, different types of vehicles, varying weather conditions, and
other factors bearing on safe speeds, which shall be effective (((a)))
(1) when posted upon appropriate fixed or variable signs or (((b))) (2)
if a maximum limit is established for auto stages which is lower than
the limit for automobiles, the auto stage speed limit shall become
effective thirty days after written notice thereof is mailed in the
manner provided in ((subsection (4) of)) RCW 46.61.410(4), as now or
hereafter amended.

--- END ---