BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.215 and 2007 c 413 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A child may petition the juvenile court to reinstate the
previously terminated parental rights of his or her parent under the
following circumstances:
(a) The child was previously found to be a dependent child under
this chapter;
(b) The child's parent's rights were terminated in a proceeding
under this chapter;
(c) The child has not achieved his or her permanency plan within
three years of a final order of termination, or if the final order was
appealed, within three years of exhaustion of any right to appeal the
order terminating parental rights; and
(d) Absent good cause, the child must be at least twelve years old
at the time the petition is filed.
(2) A child seeking to petition under this section shall be
provided counsel at no cost to the child.
(3) The petition must be signed by the child in the absence of a
showing of good cause as to why the child could not do so.
(4) If, after a threshold hearing to consider the parent's apparent
fitness and interest in reinstatement of parental rights, ((it
appears)) the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the
best interests of the child may be served by reinstatement of parental
rights, the juvenile court shall order that a hearing on the merits of
the petition be held.
(5) The court shall give prior notice for any proceeding under this
section, or cause prior notice to be given, to the department, the
child's attorney, and the child. The court shall also order the
department to give prior notice of any hearing to the child's former
parent whose parental rights are the subject of the petition, any
parent whose rights have not been terminated, the child's current
foster parent, relative caregiver, guardian or custodian, and the
child's tribe, if applicable.
(6) The juvenile court shall conditionally grant the petition if it
finds by clear and convincing evidence that the child has not achieved
his or her permanency plan and is not likely to imminently achieve his
or her permanency plan and that reinstatement of parental rights is in
the child's best interest. In determining whether reinstatement is in
the child's best interest the court shall consider, but is not limited
to, the following:
(a) Whether the parent whose rights are to be reinstated is a fit
parent and has remedied his or her deficits as provided in the record
of the prior termination proceedings and prior termination order;
(b) The age and maturity of the child, and the ability of the child
to express his or her preference;
(c) Whether the reinstatement of parental rights will present a
risk to the child's health, welfare, or safety; and
(d) Other material changes in circumstances, if any, that may have
occurred which warrant the granting of the petition.
(7) In determining whether the child has or has not achieved his or
her permanency plan or whether the child is likely to achieve his or
her permanency plan, the department shall provide the court, and the
court shall review, information related to any efforts to achieve the
permanency plan including efforts to achieve adoption or a permanent
guardianship.
(8)(a) If the court conditionally grants the petition under
subsection (6) of this section, the case will be continued for six
months. During this period, the child shall be placed in the custody
of the parent. The department shall develop a permanency plan for the
child reflecting the plan to be reunification and shall provide
transition services to the family as appropriate.
(b) If the child must be removed from the parent due to abuse or
neglect allegations prior to the expiration of the conditional six-month period, the court shall dismiss the petition for reinstatement of
parental rights if the court finds the allegations have been proven by
a preponderance of the evidence.
(c) If the child has been successfully placed with the parent for
six months, the court order reinstating parental rights remains in
effect and the court shall dismiss the dependency.
(9) The granting of the petition under this section does not vacate
or otherwise affect the validity of the original termination order.
(10) Any parent whose rights are reinstated under this section
shall not be liable for any child support owed to the department
pursuant to RCW 13.34.160 for the time period from the date of
termination of parental rights to the date parental rights are
reinstated.
(11) A proceeding to reinstate parental rights is a separate action
from the termination of parental rights proceeding and does not vacate
the original termination of parental rights. An order granted under
this section reinstates the parental rights to the child. This
reinstatement is a recognition that the situation of the parent and
child have changed since the time of the termination of parental rights
and reunification is now appropriate.
(12) This section is retroactive and applies to any child who is
under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court at the time of the hearing
regardless of the date parental rights were terminated.

--- END ---