BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The family and juvenile court improvement grant program is
created. The purpose of the program is to assist superior courts in
improving their family and juvenile court systems, especially in
dependency cases, with the goals of:
(a) Assuring a stable and well-trained judiciary in family and
juvenile law providing consistency of judicial officers hearing all of
the proceedings in a case involving one family, especially in
dependency cases; and
(b) Ensuring judicial accountability in implementing specific
principles and practices for family and juvenile court.
(2) The administrator for the courts shall develop and administer
the program subject to requirements in section 2 of this act.
(3) As part of administering the program, the administrator for the
courts shall define appropriate outcome measures, collect data, and
gather information from courts receiving grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A superior court may apply for grants from the family and
juvenile court improvement grant program by submitting a local
improvement plan with the administrator for the courts. To be eligible
for grant funds, a superior court's local improvement plan must meet
the criteria developed by the administrator for the courts and approved
by the board for judicial administration. The criteria must be
consistent with the principles adopted for unified family courts. At
a minimum, the criteria must require that the court's local improvement
plan meet the following requirements:
(a) Commit to a chief judge assignment to the family and juvenile
court for a minimum of two years;
(b) Implementation of the principle of one judicial team hearing
all of the proceedings in a case involving one family, especially in
dependency cases; and
(c) Require court commissioners and judges assigned to family and
juvenile court to receive a minimum of thirty hours specialized
training in topics related to family and juvenile matters within six
months of assuming duties in family and juvenile court. Where
possible, courts should utilize local, statewide, and national training
forums. A judicial officer's recorded educational history may be
applied toward the thirty-hour requirement. The topics for training
must include:
(i) Parentage;
(ii) Adoption;
(iii) Domestic relations;
(iv) Dependency and termination of parental rights;
(v) Child development;
(vi) The impact of child abuse and neglect;
(vii) Domestic violence;
(viii) Substance abuse;
(ix) Mental health;
(x) Juvenile status offenses;
(xi) Juvenile offenders;
(xii) Self-representation issues;
(xiii) Cultural competency;
(xiv) Roles of family and juvenile court judges and commissioners.
(2) Courts receiving grant money must use the funds to improve and
support family and juvenile court operations based on standards
developed by the administrator for the courts and approved by the board
for judicial administration. The standards may allow courts to use the
funds to:
(a) Pay for family and juvenile court training of commissioners and
judges or pay for pro tem commissioners and judges to assist the court
while the commissioners and judges receive training;
(b) Increase judicial and nonjudicial staff, including
administrative staff to improve case coordination and referrals in
family and juvenile cases, guardian ad litem volunteers or
court-appointed special advocates, security, and other staff;
(c) Improve the court facility to better meet the needs of children
and families;
(d) Improve referral and treatment options for court participants,
including enhancing court facilitator programs and family treatment
court and increasing the availability of alternative dispute
resolution;
(e) Enhance existing family and children support services funded by
the courts and expand access to social service programs for families
and children ordered by the court; and
(f) Improve or support family and juvenile court operations in any
other way deemed appropriate by the administrator for the courts.
(3) The administrator for the courts shall establish a funding
distribution formula for allocating available grant moneys to ensure
that eligible courts in small, medium, and large counties receive grant
moneys.
(4) Money received by the superior court under this program must be
used to supplement, not supplant, any other local, state, and federal
funds for the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state institute for public policy shall evaluate
the implementation of the family and juvenile court improvement grant
program. The institute shall examine each superior court receiving
funding under the program and evaluate each court's implementation and
effectiveness of its local improvement plan.
(2) The institute's study shall specifically consider whether the
court is:
(a) Providing consistent judicial oversight of children and family
cases by implementing the principle of one judicial team hearing all of
the proceedings in a case involving one family, especially in
dependency cases;
(b) Working towards resolving multiple case types through
centralized case management; and
(c) Implementing practices consistent with the criteria developed
by the administrator for the courts and approved by the board for
judicial administration.
(3) By December 31, 2009, the institute shall report to the
legislature the findings of its evaluations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The family and juvenile court improvement grant account is created
in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be made only for the
family and juvenile improvement grant program.

Sec. 5 RCW 2.56.030 and 2007 c 496 s 302 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator for the courts shall, under the supervision and
direction of the chief justice:
(1) Examine the administrative methods and systems employed in the
offices of the judges, clerks, stenographers, and employees of the
courts and make recommendations, through the chief justice, for the
improvement of the same;
(2) Examine the state of the dockets of the courts and determine
the need for assistance by any court;
(3) Make recommendations to the chief justice relating to the
assignment of judges where courts are in need of assistance and carry
out the direction of the chief justice as to the assignments of judges
to counties and districts where the courts are in need of assistance;
(4) Collect and compile statistical and other data and make reports
of the business transacted by the courts and transmit the same to the
chief justice to the end that proper action may be taken in respect
thereto;
(5) Prepare and submit budget estimates of state appropriations
necessary for the maintenance and operation of the judicial system and
make recommendations in respect thereto;
(6) Collect statistical and other data and make reports relating to
the expenditure of public moneys, state and local, for the maintenance
and operation of the judicial system and the offices connected
therewith;
(7) Obtain reports from clerks of courts in accordance with law or
rules adopted by the supreme court of this state on cases and other
judicial business in which action has been delayed beyond periods of
time specified by law or rules of court and make report thereof to
supreme court of this state;
(8) Act as secretary of the judicial conference referred to in RCW
2.56.060;
(9) Submit annually, as of February 1st, to the chief justice, a
report of the activities of the administrator's office for the
preceding calendar year including activities related to courthouse
security;
(10) Administer programs and standards for the training and
education of judicial personnel;
(11) Examine the need for new superior court and district court
judge positions under an objective workload analysis. The results of
the objective workload analysis shall be reviewed by the board for
judicial administration which shall make recommendations to the
legislature. It is the intent of the legislature that an objective
workload analysis become the basis for creating additional district and
superior court positions, and recommendations should address that
objective;
(12) Provide staff to the judicial retirement account plan under
chapter 2.14 RCW;
(13) Attend to such other matters as may be assigned by the supreme
court of this state;
(14) Within available funds, develop a curriculum for a general
understanding of child development, placement, and treatment resources,
as well as specific legal skills and knowledge of relevant statutes
including chapters 13.32A, 13.34, and 13.40 RCW, cases, court rules,
interviewing skills, and special needs of the abused or neglected
child. This curriculum shall be completed and made available to all
juvenile court judges, court personnel, and service providers and be
updated yearly to reflect changes in statutes, court rules, or case
law;
(15) Develop, in consultation with the entities set forth in RCW
2.56.150(3), a comprehensive statewide curriculum for persons who act
as guardians ad litem under Title 13 or 26 RCW. The curriculum shall
be made available July 1, 2008, and include specialty sections on child
development, child sexual abuse, child physical abuse, child neglect,
domestic violence, clinical and forensic investigative and interviewing
techniques, family reconciliation and mediation services, and relevant
statutory and legal requirements. The curriculum shall be made
available to all superior court judges, court personnel, and all
persons who act as guardians ad litem;
(16) Develop a curriculum for a general understanding of crimes of
malicious harassment, as well as specific legal skills and knowledge of
RCW 9A.36.080, relevant cases, court rules, and the special needs of
malicious harassment victims. This curriculum shall be made available
to all superior court and court of appeals judges and to all justices
of the supreme court;
(17) Develop, in consultation with the criminal justice training
commission and the commissions established under chapters 43.113,
43.115, and 43.117 RCW, a curriculum for a general understanding of
ethnic and cultural diversity and its implications for working with
youth of color and their families. The curriculum shall be available
to all superior court judges and court commissioners assigned to
juvenile court, and other court personnel. Ethnic and cultural
diversity training shall be provided annually so as to incorporate
cultural sensitivity and awareness into the daily operation of juvenile
courts statewide;
(18) Authorize the use of closed circuit television and other
electronic equipment in judicial proceedings. The administrator shall
promulgate necessary standards and procedures and shall provide
technical assistance to courts as required;
(19) Develop a Washington family law handbook in accordance with
RCW 2.56.180;
(20) Administer state funds for improving the operation of the
courts and provide support for court coordinating councils, under the
direction of the board for judicial administration;
(21) Administer the family and juvenile court improvement grant
program and distribute amounts appropriated from the family and
juvenile court improvement grant account;
(22)(a) Administer and distribute amounts appropriated from the
equal justice subaccount under RCW 43.08.250(2) for district court
judges' and qualifying elected municipal court judges' salary
contributions. The administrator for the courts shall develop a
distribution formula for these amounts that does not differentiate
between district and elected municipal court judges.
(b) A city qualifies for state contribution of elected municipal
court judges' salaries under (a) of this subsection if:
(i) The judge is serving in an elected position;
(ii) The city has established by ordinance that a full-time judge
is compensated at a rate equivalent to at least ninety-five percent,
but not more than one hundred percent, of a district court judge salary
or for a part-time judge on a pro rata basis the same equivalent; and
(iii) The city has certified to the office of the administrator for
the courts that the conditions in (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection
have been met.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.84.092 and 2007 c 514 s 3 and 2007 c 356 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the Columbia river basin water supply development
account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization
account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense
account, the developmental disabilities community trust account, the
drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance
administrative account, the drinking water assistance repayment
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account,
the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account,
the election account, the emergency reserve fund, the energy freedom
account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the
family and juvenile court improvement grant account, the federal forest
revolving account, the freight congestion relief account, the freight
mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account,
the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account,
the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1
account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving
account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account,
the public works assistance account, the Puyallup tribal settlement
account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the small
city pavement and sidewalk account, the special wildlife account, the
state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the
traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.84.092 and 2007 c 514 s 3, 2007 c 484 s 4, and 2007
c 356 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The budget stabilization
account, the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River
channel construction and operation account, the Central Washington
University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal
and reformatory institutions account, the Columbia river basin water
supply development account, the common school construction fund, the
county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use
tax equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the family and
juvenile court improvement grant account, the federal forest revolving
account, the freight congestion relief account, the freight mobility
investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the health
services account, the public health services account, the health system
capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1
account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving
account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account,
the public works assistance account, the Puyallup tribal settlement
account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the small
city pavement and sidewalk account, the special wildlife account, the
state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the
traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.84.092 and 2007 c 514 s 3, 2007 c 513 s 1, 2007 c
484 s 4, and 2007 c 356 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the Columbia river basin water supply development
account, the common school construction fund, the county arterial
preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account,
the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
licensing services account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the
essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital
projects account, the family and juvenile court improvement grant
account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the freight
mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account,
the grade crossing protective fund, the health services account, the
public health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the high capacity transportation
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the
highway infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, the pilotage account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public transportation systems account,
the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital
construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
safety and education account, the site closure account, the small city
pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the
state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the state patrol highway account, the supplemental pension
account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust account, the
volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Section 7 of this act takes effect July
1, 2008.
(2) Section 8 of this act takes effect July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Section 6 of this act expires July 1,
2008.
(2) Section 7 of this act expires July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---