BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.118.140 and 2007 c 341 s 43 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The department ((of health)) shall transfer the funds
required by RCW 77.60.160 to the appropriate local governments.
Pacific and Grays Harbor counties and Puget Sound shall manage ((the))
their established shellfish -- on-site sewage grant program ((in Puget
Sound and for Pacific and Grays Harbor counties)). The ((department of
health)) local governments, in consultation with the department of
health, shall ((provide)) use the provided funds ((to local health
jurisdictions to be used)) as grants or loans to individuals for
repairing or improving their on-site sewage systems. The grants or
loans may be provided only in areas that have the potential to
adversely affect water quality in commercial and recreational shellfish
growing areas.
(b) A recipient of a grant or loan shall enter into an agreement
with the appropriate local ((health jurisdiction)) government to
maintain the improved on-site sewage system according to specifications
required by the local ((health jurisdiction)) government.
(c) The department ((of health)) shall work closely with local
((health jurisdictions)) governments and it shall be the goal of the
department ((of health)) to attain geographic equity between Grays
Harbor, Willapa Bay, and Puget Sound when making funds available under
this program.
(d) For the purposes of this subsection, "geographic equity" means
issuing on-site sewage grants or loans at a level that matches the
funds generated from the oyster reserve lands in that area.
(2) In Puget Sound, the ((department of health)) local governments
shall give first priority to areas that are:
(a) Identified as "areas of special concern" under WAC 246-272-01001;
(b) Included within a shellfish protection district under chapter
90.72 RCW; or
(c) Identified as a marine recovery area under chapter 70.118A RCW.
(3) In Grays Harbor and Pacific counties, the ((department of
health)) local governments shall give first priority to preventing the
deterioration of water quality in areas where commercial or
recreational shellfish are grown.
(4) The department ((of health)) and each participating local
((health jurisdiction)) government shall enter into a memorandum of
understanding that will establish an applicant income eligibility
requirement for individual grant applicants from within the
jurisdiction and other mutually agreeable terms and conditions of the
grant program.
(5) ((The department of health may recover the costs to administer
this program not to exceed ten percent of the shellfish -- on-site sewage
grant program.
(6))) For the 2007-2009 biennium, from the funds received under
this section, Pacific county ((may)) shall transfer up to two hundred
thousand dollars to the department ((of fish and wildlife for research
identified by the department of fish and wildlife)). Upon receiving
the funds from Pacific county, the department and the appropriate
oyster reserve advisory committee under RCW 77.60.160 shall identify
and execute specific research projects with those funds.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.60.160 and 2007 c 341 s 44 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The oyster reserve land account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from revenues from the lease of land or sale of
shellfish from oyster reserve lands must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only as provided in this
section.
(2) Funds in the account shall be used for the purposes provided
for in this subsection:
(a) Up to forty percent for:
(i) The management expenses incurred by the department that are
directly attributable to the management of the oyster reserve lands;
and ((for))
(ii) The expenses associated with new bivalve shellfish research
and development activities at the Pt. Whitney and Nahcotta shellfish
laboratories managed by the department. As used in this subsection,
"new research and development activities" includes an emphasis on the
control of aquatic nuisance species and burrowing shrimp. New research
and development activities must be identified by the department and the
appropriate oyster reserve advisory committee;
(b) Up to ten percent may be deposited into the state general fund;
and
(c) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, all
remaining funds in the account shall be used for the shellfish - on-site sewage grant program established in RCW 70.118.140 (as recodified
by this act).
(3)(a) No later than January 1st of each year, ((from revenues
received from the Willapa bay oyster reserve, the department shall
transfer one hundred thousand dollars to the on-site sewage grant
program established in RCW 70.118.140)) the department shall transfer
up to fifty percent of the annual revenues generated in the preceding
year from the Willapa harbor oyster reserve to the on-site sewage grant
program established under RCW 70.118.140 (as recodified by this act) as
necessary to achieve a fund balance of one hundred thousand dollars.
(b) All remaining revenues received from the Willapa ((bay)) harbor
oyster reserve shall be used to fund research activities as specified
in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 70.118.140 is recodified as a section in
chapter 77.60 RCW.

--- END ---