BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person engaged in medical or dental pursuits, any person in
charge of an institution regularly conducted as a hospital or
sanitarium for the care of persons in ill health, or a home devoted
exclusively to the care of aged persons, may obtain alcohol in a
nonbeverage form directly from a supplier under a permit issued under
RCW 66.20.010(1).
(2) Any person engaged in the mechanical or manufacturing business
or in scientific pursuits requiring the use of alcohol may obtain
alcohol in a nonbeverage form directly from a supplier under a permit
issued under RCW 66.20.010(2).

--- END ---