BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.185C.200 and 2007 c 483 s 604 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall establish a pilot program to provide grants to eligible
organizations, as described in RCW 43.185.060, to provide transitional
housing assistance to offenders who are reentering the community and
are in need of housing.
(2)(a) Initially, there shall be a minimum of two pilot programs
established in two counties. The pilot programs shall be selected
through a request for proposal process and in consultation with the
department of corrections. The department shall select the pilot sites
by January 1, 2008.
(b) After the effective date of this section, the department shall,
within funds appropriated for purposes of this act, expand the pilot
program to include sites in other counties.
(3) The pilot program shall:
(a) ((Be operated in collaboration with the community justice
center existing in the location of the pilot site;
(b))) Offer transitional supportive housing that includes
individual support and mentoring available on an ongoing basis, life
skills training, and close working relationships with community justice
centers or community transition coordination networks, if any, and
community corrections officers. Supportive housing services can be
provided directly by the housing operator, or in partnership with
community-based organizations;
(((c))) (b) In providing assistance, give priority to offenders who
are designated as high risk or high needs as well as those determined
not to have a viable release plan by the department of corrections;
(((d))) (c) Optimize available funding by utilizing cost-effective
community-based shared housing arrangements or other noninstitutional
living arrangements; and
(((e))) (d) Provide housing assistance for a period of time not to
exceed twelve months for a participating offender.
(4) ((The department may also use up to twenty percent of the
funding appropriated in the operating budget for this section to
support the development of additional supportive housing resources for
offenders who are reentering the community.
(5))) The department shall:
(a) Collaborate with the department of corrections in developing
criteria to determine who will qualify for housing assistance; and
(b) Gather data, and report to the legislature by November 1, 2008,
on the number of offenders seeking housing, the number of offenders
eligible for housing, the number of offenders who receive the housing,
and the number of offenders who commit new crimes while residing in the
housing to the extent information is available.
(((6))) (5) The department of corrections shall collaborate with
organizations receiving grant funds to:
(a) Help identify appropriate housing solutions in the community
for offenders;
(b) Where possible, facilitate an offender's application for
housing prior to discharge;
(c) Identify enhancements to training provided to offenders prior
to discharge that may assist an offender in effectively transitioning
to the community;
(d) Maintain communication between the organization receiving grant
funds, the housing provider, and corrections staff supervising the
offender; and
(e) Assist the offender in accessing resources and services
available through the department of corrections and a community justice
center or community transition coordination network in the same county
as the location of the pilot site, if any.
(((7))) (6) The state, department of community, trade, and economic
development, department of corrections, local governments, local
housing authorities, eligible organizations as described in RCW
43.185.060, and their employees are not liable for civil damages
arising from the criminal conduct of an offender solely due to the
placement of an offender in housing provided under this section or the
provision of housing assistance.
(((8))) (7) Nothing in this section allows placement of an offender
into housing without an analysis of the risk the offender may pose to
that particular community or other residents.

--- END ---