BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall establish a grant program to enhance the funding, treatment, and
services for victims of felony crimes and for enhanced local
prosecutorial costs.
(2) Funding may be used to build on efforts by existing community
programs, coordinating those efforts, or developing cooperating efforts
to make the most effective use of resources to provide services to
victims and to prosecute a greater number of felony cases.
(3) Funds shall be disbursed through a request for proposal
process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of
community, trade, and economic development for the purposes of section
1 of this act.

--- END ---