BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
promote the achievement of statewide growth management act housing
affordability goals through grants and loans, transportation-oriented
development, infrastructure projects, zoning ordinances, local
improvement district or tax increment financing, and economic
development.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.155.070 and 2007 c 341 s 24 and 2007 c 231 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board
must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if such request
is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040
which has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited
from receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if the
comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required
by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a loan or loan
guarantee.
(3) In considering awarding loans for public facilities to special
districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board shall
consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) The board shall only award loans to local governments if the
jurisdiction has adopted a housing ordinance that includes at least two
of the following:
(a) A plan to more effectively enhance the availability of new
affordable housing and implementation of the housing element adopted
under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(b) A plan for transportation-oriented development that will serve
housing;
(c) A plan to fulfill the affordability provisions specified in a
housing element adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(d) A plan for additional infrastructure capacity to increase
housing affordability and affordable housing inventory, including
adding infrastructure capacity for infill in established residential
neighborhoods; or
(e) A plan for greater equity between employment projections for
the jurisdiction and the number of housing units needed for the
projected workforce.
(5) The board shall develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board shall attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
shall consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority
to a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(d) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(e) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;
(f) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(g) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(h) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(i) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system;
(j) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(k) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(((5))) (6) Existing debt or financial obligations of local
governments shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local
government applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure
additional local or other sources of funding for each public works
project for which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(((6))) (7) Before November 1st of each year, the board shall
develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives a description of the loans made under RCW
43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (((9))) (10) of this section
during the preceding fiscal year and a prioritized list of projects
which are recommended for funding by the legislature, including one
copy to the staff of each of the committees. The list shall include,
but not be limited to, a description of each project and recommended
financing, the terms and conditions of the loan or financial guarantee,
the local government jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration
of the jurisdiction's critical need for the project and documentation
of local funds being used to finance the public works project. The
list shall also include measures of fiscal capacity for each
jurisdiction recommended for financial assistance, compared to
authorized limits and state averages, including local government sales
taxes; real estate excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or
taxes on sewerage, water, garbage, and other utilities.
(((7))) (8) The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise
financially obligate funds from the public works assistance account
before the legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of
public works projects. The legislature may remove projects from the
list recommended by the board. The legislature shall not change the
order of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.
(((8))) (9) Subsection (((7))) (8) of this section does not apply
to loans made under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (((9)))
(10) of this section.
(((9))) (10) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans
shall be exempted from subsection (((7))) (8) of this section.
(((10))) (11) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or
recycling facilities under this chapter, a city or county must
demonstrate that the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent
with and necessary to implement the comprehensive solid waste
management plan adopted by the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.
(((11))) (12) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to
address the effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be
funded under this section only if the project is not in conflict with
the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.160.060 and 2007 c 231 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board is authorized to make direct loans to political
subdivisions of the state and to federally recognized Indian tribes for
the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions and federally
recognized Indian tribes in financing the cost of public facilities,
including development of land and improvements for public facilities,
project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility, and marketing studies and plans; project
design, site planning, and analysis; project debt and revenue impact
analysis; as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration,
expansion, or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be
authorized for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and
to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the
limited resources of the political subdivision or the federally
recognized Indian tribe and the finding by the board that financial
circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project to move
forward. However, at least ten percent of all financial assistance
provided by the board in any biennium shall consist of grants to
political subdivisions and federally recognized Indian tribes.
Application for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the
board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board shall conform
to the following requirements:
(1) The board shall not provide financial assistance:
(a) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote a retail shopping development or expansion.
(b) For any project that evidence exists would result in a
development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other
community in the state.
(c) For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and
other fixtures which are a part of real property.
(d) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote gambling.
(e) For projects within a political subdivision or a federally
recognized Indian tribe that have not adopted a housing ordinance that
includes at least two of the following:
(i) A plan to more effectively enhance the availability of new
affordable housing and implementation of the housing element adopted
under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(ii) A plan for transportation-oriented development that will serve
housing;
(iii) A plan to fulfill the affordability provisions specified in
a housing element adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(iv) A plan for additional infrastructure capacity to increase
housing affordability and affordable housing inventory, including
adding infrastructure capacity for infill in established residential
neighborhoods; or
(v) A plan for greater equity between employment projections for
the jurisdiction and the number of housing units needed for the
projected workforce.
(2) The board shall only provide financial assistance:
(a) For those projects which would result in specific private
developments or expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food
processing, assembly, warehousing, advanced technology, research and
development, and industrial distribution; (ii) for processing
recyclable materials or for facilities that support recycling,
including processes not currently provided in the state, including but
not limited to, de-inking facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard
waste, and problem-waste processing; (iii) for manufacturing facilities
that rely significantly on recyclable materials, including but not
limited to waste tires and mixed waste paper; (iv) which support the
relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban areas to rural
counties or rural natural resources impact areas; or (v) which
substantially support the trading of goods or services outside of the
state's borders.
(b) For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for
the successful maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial
or commercial plants or will otherwise assist in the creation or
retention of long-term economic opportunities.
(c) When the application includes convincing evidence that a
specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will
occur only if the public facility improvement is made.
(3) The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to:
(a) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the
project would create, not just the total number of jobs it would create
after the project is completed and according to the unemployment rate
in the area in which the jobs would be located;
(b) The rate of return of the state's investment, that includes the
expected increase in state and local tax revenues associated with the
project; and
(c) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007.
(4) A responsible official of the political subdivision or the
federally recognized Indian tribe shall be present during board
deliberations and provide information that the board requests.
Before any financial assistance application is approved, the
political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking
the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is
available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from
the community economic revitalization board.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.160.230 and 2007 c 231 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The job development fund program is created to provide grants
for public infrastructure projects that will stimulate job creation or
assist in job retention. The program is to be administered by the
board. The board shall establish a competitive process to request and
prioritize proposals and make grant awards.
(2) For the purposes of chapter 425, Laws of 2005, "public
infrastructure projects" has the same meaning as "public facilities" as
defined in RCW 43.160.020(11).
(3) The board shall conduct a statewide request for project
applications. The board shall apply the following criteria for
evaluation and ranking of applications:
(a) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the
project would create, including, but not limited to: (i) The total
number of jobs; (ii) the total number of full-time, family wage jobs;
(iii) the unemployment rate in the area; and (iv) the increase in
employment in comparison to total community population;
(b) The present level of economic activity in the community and the
existing local financial capacity to increase economic activity in the
community;
(c) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;
(d) The rate of return of the state's investment, that includes the
expected increase in state and local tax revenues associated with the
project;
(e) The lack of another timely source of funding available to
finance the project which would likely prevent the proposed community
or economic development, absent the financing available under chapter
425, Laws of 2005;
(f) The ability of the project to improve the viability of existing
business entities in the project area;
(g) Whether or not the project is a partnership of multiple
jurisdictions;
(h) Demonstration that the requested assistance will directly
stimulate community and economic development by facilitating the
creation of new jobs or the retention of existing jobs; and
(i) The availability of existing assets that applicants may apply
to projects.
(4) Job development fund program grants may only be awarded to
those applicants that have entered into or expect to enter into a
contract with a private developer relating to private investment that
will result in the creation or retention of jobs upon completion of the
project. Job development fund program grants shall not be provided for
any project where:
(a) The funds will not be used within the jurisdiction or
jurisdictions of the applicants; ((or))
(b) Evidence exists that the project would result in a development
or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other community
in the state; or
(c) The applicant has not adopted a housing ordinance that includes
at least two of the following:
(i) A plan to more effectively enhance the availability of new
affordable housing and implementation of the housing element adopted
under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(ii) A plan for transportation-oriented development that will serve
housing;
(iii) A plan to fulfill the affordability provisions specified in
a housing element adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(iv) A plan for additional infrastructure capacity to increase
housing affordability and affordable housing inventory, including
adding infrastructure capacity for infill in established residential
neighborhoods; or
(v) A plan for greater equity between employment projections for
the jurisdiction and the number of housing units needed for the
projected workforce.
(5) The board shall, with the joint legislative audit and review
committee, develop performance criteria for each grant and evaluation
criteria to be used to evaluate both how well successful applicants met
the community and economic development objectives stated in their
applications, and how well the job development fund program performed
in creating and retaining jobs.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.26.282 and 2002 c 189 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In any project funded by the transportation improvement board,
except for projects in cities having a population of less than five
thousand persons, and in addition to any other items required to be
considered by statute, the board also shall consider the land use
implications of the project, such as whether the programs and projects:
(((1))) (a) Support development in and revitalization of existing
downtowns;
(((2))) (b) Implement local comprehensive plans for rural and urban
residential and nonresidential densities;
(((3))) (c) Have land use planning and regulations encouraging
compact development for rural and urban residential and nonresidential
densities; and
(((4))) (d) Promote the use of multimodal transportation.
(2) The transportation improvement board shall only award funds to
jurisdictions that have adopted a housing ordinance that includes at
least two of the following:
(a) A plan to more effectively enhance the availability of new
affordable housing and implementation of the housing element adopted
under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(b) A plan for transportation-oriented development that will serve
housing;
(c) A plan to fulfill the affordability provisions specified in a
housing element adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(d) A plan for additional infrastructure capacity to increase
housing affordability and affordable housing inventory, including
adding infrastructure capacity for infill in established residential
neighborhoods; or
(e) A plan for greater equity between employment projections for
the jurisdiction and the number of housing units needed for the
projected workforce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 4 of this act expires June 30, 2011.

--- END ---