BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The academic research is clear that
effective teachers have a significant impact and are the most important
school-related factor affecting student achievement. According to the
Washington state institute for public policy, a student with five
consecutive highly effective teachers could see an increase in thirty
scale points on the Washington assessment of student learning. In
theory, a significant, sustained, and systemwide increase in teacher
effectiveness has the potential to boost the state's graduation rate by
as much as thirteen percentage points.
(2) What is less clear is how to obtain effective teachers.
National reports reveal an ongoing debate about the best way to prepare
future teachers and raise significant questions about the quality of
both university-based and alternative programs.
(a) More scrutiny is needed to determine if there is a disconnect
between the core teaching competencies and subject area knowledge
provided by preparation programs and those needed in today's schools
and classrooms.
(b) Washington's colleges of education produce five thousand four
hundred newly certified teachers each year, but forty-three percent of
them are endorsed in elementary education. Fewer than three hundred
are endorsed in special education or one of the sciences, and fewer
than two hundred are endorsed in mathematics or English as a second
language. Strategies must be developed to increase program capacity
and certificate production in critical high-demand subject areas.
(c) Programs offered in Washington are subject to state approval
through the professional educator standards board, but additional
opportunities for accountability should be examined to ensure the
desired outcome of the most effective teachers possible.
(3) Therefore the legislature intends to examine more thoroughly
the issues regarding preparation of effective teachers and develop
strategies for improving the quality of the future teaching workforce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall review and analyze teacher preparation in
Washington state and identify possible strategies for improving the
effectiveness of future teachers through:
(a) Strengthening the essential competencies and knowledge that
preparation programs are expected to provide for initial teacher
certification and reducing unnecessary or lower priority requirements;
(b) Increasing program capacity and degree production in
high-demand subject areas; and
(c) Enhancing the state's accountability system for teacher
preparation programs.
(2) In conducting the review and analysis, the institute shall at
a minimum:
(a) Review the research literature on teacher preparation,
including any rigorous studies of the characteristics of teacher
preparation programs that are associated with effective teachers or
effective teaching;
(b) If necessary, rely on multiple sources of information to
compensate for limited outcomes-based research, including surveys,
interviews with educators, case studies, data collection and analysis,
and an examination of innovative programs in Washington or in other
states; and
(c) Develop an evaluation framework and conduct an in-depth review
of a sample of teacher preparation programs, including alternative
route programs, to identify strengths, weaknesses, and opportunities
for improvement.
(3) The institute shall also propose a rigorous study of the
relationship between teacher effectiveness and teacher preparation
programs, including the necessary data elements, research design,
timelines, and costs.
(4) The institute shall submit an interim report to the education
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008. The interim report
may include a preliminary literature review, the proposed study under
subsection (3) of this section, and an outline of the remaining review
and analysis. A final report including the results of the program
evaluation and possible strategies for improvement shall be submitted
by December 1, 2009.

--- END ---