BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.255 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or contract, and in
addition to other remedies provided by law, any person or business that
is required to disclose a breach of the security of the system under
RCW 19.255.010, if that breach was comprised of five thousand or more
unencrypted individual names or account numbers, shall be liable to a
financial institution in negligence for actions reasonably undertaken
in order to protect consumers including, but not limited to, any costs
incurred in connection with:
(a) The cancellation or reissuance of an access device affected by
the breach;
(b) The closing of a deposit, transaction, checking, share draft,
or other account affected by the breach and any action to stop payment
or block a transaction with respect to the account;
(c) The opening or reopening of a deposit, transaction, checking,
share draft, or other account affected by the breach;
(d) A refund or credit made to an account holder to cover the cost
of any unauthorized transaction related to the breach;
(e) The notification of account holders affected by the breach;
(f) Credit monitoring services on accounts affected by the breach
for a period of one year from the time the issuer of the access device
is notified of the breach; and
(g) Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs associated with the
action.
(2) A person or business will not be liable under this section if
the person or business providing the data breach notice met industry
standards for the handling, processing, and storage of personal
information, maintained a policy on the treatment of personal
information, and consistently provided training to staff on this policy
at the time of the data breach.
(3) In an action under this section, a financial institution that
provided or approved equipment used to process payment transactions, to
a person or business, will be precluded from recovering under this
section against the person or business, provided that the breach of the
security of the system was directly related to the equipment provided
or approved by the financial institution, and the equipment was being
used in the manner recommended by the financial institution.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Access device" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.56.010.
(b) "Breach of the security of the system" has the same meaning as
in RCW 19.255.010.
(c) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as in RCW
30.22.040.
(d) "Unencrypted" means that the personal information was not
transformed using an algorithm making the information unreadable to
anyone except those possessing a key, using standards appropriate for
the industry at the time of the breach of the security of the system.

--- END ---