BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.540 and 1992 c 139 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The examination of any specific public record may be enjoined if,
upon motion and affidavit by ((an agency or its representative or)) a
person who is named in the record or to whom the record specifically
pertains, the superior court for the county in which the movant resides
or in which the record is maintained, finds that such examination would
clearly not be in the public interest and would substantially and
irreparably damage any person, or would substantially and irreparably
damage vital governmental functions. An agency has the option of
notifying persons named in the record or to whom a record specifically
pertains, that release of a record has been requested. However, this
option does not exist where the agency is required by law to provide
such notice.

--- END ---