BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Adult family homes may participate in a voluntary adult family
home certification program through the University of Washington
geriatric education center. In addition to the minimum qualifications
required under RCW 70.128.120, individuals participating in the
voluntary adult family home certification program shall complete
fifty-two hours of class requirements as established by the University
of Washington geriatric education center. Subjects covered by the
class requirements shall include: Specific age-related physical or
mental health conditions that can be prevented, postponed, or
alleviated by a health promotion intervention, how to establish health
promotion programs in residential settings and communities, preventing
falls, addressing health issues of aging families, and issues and
health concerns of ethnic older adults and those with developmental
disabilities.
(2) Individuals completing the requirements of RCW 70.128.120 and
the voluntary adult family home certification program shall be issued
a certified adult family home license by the department of social and
health services.
(3) The department shall adopt rules implementing the provisions of
this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.128.120 and 2006 c 249 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each adult family home provider and each resident manager shall
have the following minimum qualifications, except that only providers
are required to meet the provisions of subsection (10) of this section:
(1) Twenty-one years of age or older;
(2) For those applying after September 1, 2001, to be licensed as
providers, and for resident managers whose employment begins after
September 1, 2001, a United States high school diploma or general
educational development (GED) certificate or any English or translated
government documentation of the following:
(a) Successful completion of government-approved public or private
school education in a foreign country that includes an annual average
of one thousand hours of instruction over twelve years or no less than
twelve thousand hours of instruction;
(b) A foreign college, foreign university, or United States
community college two-year diploma;
(c) Admission to, or completion of coursework at, a foreign
university or college for which credit was granted;
(d) Admission to, or completion of coursework at, a United States
college or university for which credits were awarded;
(e) Admission to, or completion of postgraduate coursework at, a
United States college or university for which credits were awarded; or
(f) Successful passage of the United States board examination for
registered nursing, or any professional medical occupation for which
college or university education preparation was required;
(3) Good moral and responsible character and reputation;
(4) Literacy in the English language, however, a person not
literate in the English language may meet the requirements of this
subsection by assuring that there is a person on staff and available
who is able to communicate or make provisions for communicating with
the resident in his or her primary language and capable of
understanding and speaking English well enough to be able to respond
appropriately to emergency situations and be able to read and
understand resident care plans;
(5) Management and administrative ability to carry out the
requirements of this chapter;
(6) Satisfactory completion of department-approved basic training
and continuing education training as specified by the department in
rule, based on recommendations of the community long-term care training
and education steering committee and working in collaboration with
providers, consumers, caregivers, advocates, family members, educators,
and other interested parties in the rule-making process;
(7) Satisfactory completion of department-approved, or equivalent,
special care training before a provider may provide special care
services to a resident;
(8) Not been convicted of any crime listed in RCW 43.43.830 and
43.43.842;
(9) For those applying after September 1, 2001, to be licensed as
providers, and for resident managers whose employment begins after
September 1, 2001, at least three hundred twenty hours of successful,
direct caregiving experience obtained after age eighteen to vulnerable
adults in a licensed or contracted setting prior to operating or
managing an adult family home; ((and))
(10) Prior to being granted a license, providers applying after
January 1, 2007, must complete a department-approved forty-eight hour
adult family home administration and business planning class. The
department shall promote and prioritize bilingual capabilities within
available resources and when materials are available for this purpose;
and
(11) Following licensure, completion of two hours of administrative
continuing education administered by the department in collaboration
with the adult family home advisory committee and taught by adult
family home association providers with five or more years of
experience. For the purpose of this subsection, "adult family home
association" means an organized group of adult family home providers
with a proven history of advocacy of at least five years with a
sustained membership of at least one hundred members as approved by the
department. Internet access and bilingual training materials shall be
promoted and prioritized when available and appropriate. The
department shall ensure balanced participation, by the appointment of
stakeholders equally, between adult family home providers and consumers
to the adult family home advisory committee.

--- END ---