BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A law enforcement agency shall reimburse an officer's training
agency for the total amount of salary and benefits received by the
officer while he or she was enrolled in basic law enforcement training
if the law enforcement agency: (a) Is larger than the training agency,
thereby employing a greater number of full-time commissioned officers;
and (b) hires the respective officer within twenty-four months of the
officer's completion of basic law enforcement training. The law
enforcement agency shall reimburse the training agency within ninety
days of the officer's first day of employment.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "training agency" means a law
enforcement agency that: (a) Pays salary and any benefits to an
officer while he or she is enrolled in basic law enforcement training;
and (b) has ten or less full-time commissioned law enforcement
officers.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.330 and 2003 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall
transfer into the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this section from the general fund the sum of four
million six hundred thousand dollars divided into four equal deposits
occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For each
fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the total
transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025,
forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial management in
November of the preceding year. ((The moneys))
(a) Of the total amount deposited in the municipal criminal justice
assistance account for distribution under this section, less any moneys
appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of this section, a total
of three hundred thousand dollars shall be distributed to the criminal
justice training commission to reimburse participating city law
enforcement agencies with ten or fewer full-time commissioned patrol
officers for the cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is
enrolled in basic law enforcement training provided in RCW 43.101.200.
(b) In addition to any moneys remaining undistributed by the
criminal justice training commission in (a) of this subsection, the
remaining amount deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance
account shall be distributed to the cities of the state as follows:
(((a))) (i) Twenty percent appropriated for distribution shall be
distributed to cities with a three-year average violent crime rate for
each one thousand in population in excess of one hundred fifty percent
of the statewide three-year average violent crime rate for each one
thousand in population. The three-year average violent crime rate
shall be calculated using the violent crime rates for each of the
preceding three years from the annual reports on crime in Washington
state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs. Moneys shall be distributed under this subsection (1)(((a)))
(b)(i) ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management, but no city may receive more than one dollar per
capita. ((Moneys remaining undistributed under this subsection at the
end of each calendar year shall be distributed to the criminal justice
training commission to reimburse participating city law enforcement
agencies with ten or fewer full-time commissioned patrol officers the
cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic
law enforcement training, as provided in RCW 43.101.200.
(b))) (ii) Sixteen percent shall be distributed to cities ratably
based on population as last determined by the office of financial
management, but no city may receive less than one thousand dollars.
The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under this subsection shall be distributed at
such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150.
Moneys distributed under this subsection shall be expended
exclusively for criminal justice purposes and shall not be used to
replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal justice purposes are
defined as activities that substantially assist the criminal justice
system, which may include circumstances where ancillary benefit to the
civil justice system occurs, and which includes domestic violence
services such as those provided by domestic violence programs,
community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020.
Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar
year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes.
Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice
purposes exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events
not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal
justice services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction
receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.
(2) In addition to the distributions under subsection (1) of this
section:
(a) Ten percent shall be distributed on a per capita basis to
cities that contract with another governmental agency for the majority
of the city's law enforcement services. Cities that subsequently
qualify for this distribution shall notify the department of community,
trade, and economic development by November 30th for the upcoming
calendar year. The department of community, trade, and economic
development shall provide a list of eligible cities to the state
treasurer by December 31st. The state treasurer shall modify the
distribution of these funds in the following year. Cities have the
responsibility to notify the department of community, trade, and
economic development of any changes regarding these contractual
relationships. Adjustments in the distribution formula to add or
delete cities may be made only for the upcoming calendar year; no
adjustments may be made retroactively.
(b) The remaining fifty-four percent shall be distributed to cities
and towns by the state treasurer on a per capita basis. These funds
shall be used for: (i) Innovative law enforcement strategies; (ii)
programs to help at-risk children or child abuse victim response
programs; and (iii) programs designed to reduce the level of domestic
violence or to provide counseling for domestic violence victims.
The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under this subsection, less any moneys
appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of this section, shall
be distributed at the times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150. ((Moneys remaining undistributed under this subsection at
the end of each calendar year shall be distributed to the criminal
justice training commission to reimburse participating city law
enforcement agencies with ten or fewer full-time commissioned patrol
officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is
enrolled in basic law enforcement training, as provided in RCW
43.101.200.))
If a city is found by the state auditor to have expended funds
received under this subsection in a manner that does not comply with
the criteria under which the moneys were received, the city shall be
ineligible to receive future distributions under this subsection until
the use of the moneys are justified to the satisfaction of the director
or are repaid to the state general fund.
(3) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the
distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals
its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the
county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or
3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located.
(4) Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the
municipal criminal justice assistance account shall be available for
appropriations for enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory
system and the continuing costs related to these enhancements. Funds
appropriated from this account for such enhancements shall not supplant
existing funds from the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is established in the criminal justice training
commission a grant program to reimburse law enforcement training
agencies for salary and benefits received by an officer in training.
(2) The criminal justice training commission shall make grant
awards, subject to funds appropriated by the legislature, to training
agencies as defined under section 1(2) of this act under the following
terms:
(a) Beginning on July 1, 2008, grant awards shall be used to
reimburse city law enforcement agencies for each full-time commissioned
patrol officer that has been hired and employed at its agency for at
least twenty-four months but not more than forty-eight months after
such patrol officer has completed training at the criminal justice
training commission.
(b) Any portion of a new full-time commissioned officer's salary or
benefits that have been reimbursed under section 1 of this act shall
not be eligible for a grant award under this section.
(c) Eligibility for grant awards shall primarily be given to, but
is not limited to, training agencies that show a high level of need, as
evidenced by training-related costs, vacancy rates, turnover rates,
small agency size, and other exigent financial circumstances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the criminal
justice training commission for the purposes of implementing section 3
of this act.

--- END ---