BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At least one unstaffed ballot drop-off site shall be located at
each institution of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(2) "Ballot deposit site" means the site or sites designated by the
county auditor in which a voter may deposit his or her ballot in a
secure collection device on or before election day.
(a) Staffed ballot deposit sites must be staffed by at least two
people. Staffed deposit sites may be open prior to the election
according to dates and times established by the county auditor and, if
open on election day, must be open from 7:00 a.m. until 8:00 p.m.
(b) Unstaffed ballot deposit sites must consist of secured ballot
boxes that allow return envelopes, once deposited, to only be removed
by authorized staff. Unstaffed ballot deposit sites must be available
to receive ballots from eighteen days prior to an election until 8:00
p.m. on election day.

--- END ---