BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The legislature finds that pollution
from storm water runoff is a leading source of pollution in Puget Sound
and in important water bodies in eastern Washington like the Columbia
river. The decisions and actions of those living in adjacent
communities impact the health of these water bodies. The loss of
native and mature nonnative, nonnaturalized trees in urban areas
throughout the region has contributed significantly to storm water and
flooding problems in the region.
(b) The legislature further finds that the preservation and
enhancement of city trees and urban and community forests are one of
the most cost-effective ways to protect and improve water quality, air
quality, human well-being, and our quality of life.
(c) The legislature further finds that appropriate selection,
siting, and installation of trees can reduce heating and cooling energy
costs and related greenhouse gas emissions. Retaining natural soils
and vegetation, managing urban trees, planting additional trees, and
restoring the functionality of forests on public lands can reduce the
amount of pollutants in our communities, reduce utility infrastructure
damage, reduce requirements for storm water retention and treatment
facilities, and reduce flooding caused by major storm events that can
cost the state economy millions of dollars a day. Reforesting urban
stream channels can reduce or eliminate regulatory requirements such as
total maximum daily load requirements.
(d) The legislature further finds that there are innovative urban
forest management programs and partnerships led by many cities across
the state. However, there is no statewide inventory or assessment of
our community and urban forests. Few cities have clear goals and
standards for their urban forests. About twelve percent of
Washington's cities have urban forest management plans and less than
half of Washington's communities have tree ordinances. Many
communities report the need for better enforcement.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to:
(a) Recognize and support city efforts to conserve, protect,
improve, and expand Washington's urban forest in order to reduce storm
water pollution in Puget Sound, flooding, energy consumption and
greenhouse gas emissions, air pollution, and storm impacts to utility
infrastructure.
(b) Assist cities and counties by developing a statewide community
and urban forest inventory, assessment, model plans, and model
ordinances, and by providing technical assistance, incentives, and
resources to help cities become evergreen cities by utilizing these
tools, maintenance programs, new partnerships, and community
involvement.
(c) Develop the statewide community and urban forest inventory in
a way that is compatible with emerging reporting protocols and that
could facilitate future access to carbon markets for cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Community and urban forest assessment" means an analysis of
the community and urban forest inventory to establish the scope and
scale of forest-related benefits and services, the economic valuation
of such benefits, highlight trends and issues of concern, identify high
priority areas to be addressed, outline strategies for addressing the
critical issues and urban landscapes, and identify opportunities for
retaining trees, expanding forest canopy, and planting additional trees
to sustain Washington's urban and community forests.
(2) "Community and urban forest inventory" means a management tool
designed to gauge the condition, management status, health, and
diversity of a community and urban forest. An inventory may evaluate
individual trees or groups of trees or canopy cover within community
and urban forests, and will be periodically updated by the department
of natural resources.
(3) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) "Evergreen cities ordinances" means ordinances adopted by the
legislative body of a city, town, or county, or other political
subdivision of the state that relate to urban forests and are
consistent with this chapter.
(5) "Evergreen city" means a city or county designated as such
under section 6 of this act.
(6) "Management plan" means an evergreen cities urban forest
management plan developed pursuant to this chapter.
(7) "Public facilities" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
36.70A.030.
(8) "Public forest" means urban forests owned by the state, city,
county, or other public entity within or adjacent to the urban growth
areas.
(9) "Reforestation" means establishing and maintaining trees and
urban forest canopy in plantable spaces such as street rights-of-way,
transportation corridors, urban interchanges and highways, riparian
areas, unstable slopes, shorelines, public lands, and property of
willing private land owners.
(10) "Tree canopy" means the layer of leaves, branches, and stems
of trees that cover the ground when viewed from above and that can be
measured as a percentage of a city's land area shaded by trees.
(11) "Urban forest" has the same definition as provided for the
term "community and urban forest" in RCW 76.15.010.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.15.020 and 1991 c 179 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((may)) shall establish and maintain a program
in community and urban forestry to accomplish the purpose stated in RCW
76.15.007. The department may assist municipalities and counties in
establishing and maintaining community and urban forestry programs and
encourage persons to engage in appropriate and improved tree management
and care.
(2) The department ((may)) shall advise, encourage, and assist
municipalities, counties, and other public and private entities in the
development and coordination of policies, programs, and activities for
the promotion of community and urban forestry.
(3) The department may appoint a committee or council, in addition
to the technical advisory committee created in section 4 of this act to
advise the department in establishing and carrying out a program in
community and urban forestry.
(4) The department may assist municipal and county tree maintenance
programs by making surplus equipment available on loan where feasible
for community and urban forestry programs and cooperative projects.
(5)(a) The department shall, in collaboration with educational
institutions, municipalities, corporations, the technical advisory
committee created in section 4 of this act, state and national service
organizations, and environmental organizations, conduct a prioritized
statewide inventory of community and urban forests.
(b) For purposes of efficiency, existing data and current inventory
technologies must be utilized in the development of the inventory.
Statewide data must be maintained and periodically updated by the
department and made available to every municipality in the state.
(c) The criteria established for the statewide community and urban
forest inventory must support the planning needs of local governments.
(d) The criteria for the statewide community and urban forest
inventory may include but not be limited to: Tree size, species,
location, site appropriateness, condition and health, contribution to
canopy cover and volume, available planting spaces, and ecosystem,
economic, social, and monetary value.
(e) In developing the statewide community and urban forest
inventory, the department shall strive to enable Washington cities'
urban forest managers to access carbon markets by working to ensure the
inventory developed under this section is compatible with existing and
developing urban forest reporting protocols designed to facilitate
access to those carbon markets.
(6) The department shall, in collaboration with a statewide
organization representing urban and community forestry programs, and
with the evergreen cities partnership task force established in section
16 of this act, conduct an urban forest assessment and develop
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature to
improve community and urban forestry in Washington.
(7) The inventory and assessment required in this section must be
capable of supporting the adoption and implementation of evergreen
cities management plans and ordinances described in section 9 of this
act.
(8) The department shall, in collaboration with municipalities, the
technical advisory committee created in section 4 of this act, and a
statewide organization representing urban and community forestry
programs, develop an implementation plan for the inventory and
assessment of the community and urban forests in Washington.
(9)(a) The criteria and implementation plan for the statewide
community and urban forest inventory and assessment required under this
section must be completed by December 1, 2008. Upon the completion of
the criteria and implementation plan's development, the department
shall report the final product to the appropriate committees of the
legislature. Subsequent annual reports must be submitted each December
until the statewide assessment required under this section is complete.
(b) An initial inventory and assessment, consisting of the
community and urban forests of the willing municipalities located in
one county located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and the
willing municipalities located in one county located west of the crest
of the Cascade mountains must be completed by June 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 76.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner of public lands shall appoint a technical
advisory committee to provide advice to the department during the
development of the criteria and implementation plan for the statewide
community and urban forest inventory and assessment required under RCW
76.15.020.
(2) The technical advisory committee must include, but not be
limited to, representatives from the following groups: Arborists;
municipal foresters; educators; consultants; researchers; public works
and utilities professionals; information technology specialists; and
other affiliated professionals.
(3) The technical advisory committee members shall serve without
compensation. Advisory committee members who are not state employees
may receive reimbursement for travel expenses as provided by RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Costs associated with the technical advisory
committee may be paid from the general fund appropriation made
available to the department for community and urban forestry.
(4) The technical advisory committee created in this section must
be disbanded by the commissioner upon the completion of the criteria
and implementation plan for the statewide community and urban forest
inventory and assessment required under RCW 76.15.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department shall, in the implementation
of this chapter, coordinate with the department of natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department, with the advice of the
evergreen cities partnership task force created in section 16 of this
act, shall develop the criteria for an evergreen cities recognition
program whereby the state can recognize cities and counties, to be
designated as evergreen cities, who are developing excellent urban
forest management programs that include urban forestry inventories,
assessments, plans, ordinances, maintenance programs, partnerships, and
community involvement.
(2)(a) Designation as an evergreen city must include no fewer than
two graduated steps.
(b) The first graduated step of designation as an evergreen city
includes satisfaction of the following requirements:
(i) The development and implementation of a city tree board or tree
department;
(ii) The development of a tree care ordinance;
(iii) The implementation of a community forestry program with an
annual budget of at least two dollars for every city resident;
(iv) Official recognition of arbor day; and
(v) The completion of an updated community and urban forest
inventory for the city or the formal adoption of an inventory developed
for the city by the department of natural resources pursuant to RCW
76.15.020.
(c) The second graduated step of designation as an evergreen city
includes the adoption of an evergreen cities urban forest management
plan that exceeds the minimum standards in the model evergreen city
urban forestry management plan adopted by the department under section
9 of this act.
(d) The department may require additional graduated steps and
establish the minimum requirements for each recognized step.
(3) The department shall develop gateway signage and logos for
evergreen cities and evergreen counties.
(4) The department shall, unless the duty is assumed by the
governor, recognize, certify, and designate cities satisfying the
criteria developed under this section as evergreen cities.
(5) Applications for evergreen city status must be submitted to and
evaluated by the department of natural resources.
(6) Any county may apply for evergreen city designation and receive
the recognition and benefits that come with the designation. Applying
counties must be held to the same standards and requirements under this
chapter as cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 76.15 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall manage the application and evaluation of
candidates for evergreen city designation under section 6 of this act,
and forward its recommendations to the department of community, trade,
and economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The department shall, subject to the
availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose,
coordinate with the department of natural resources in the development
and implementation of a needs-based evergreen cities grant and
competitive awards program to provide financial assistance to cities,
towns, and counties for the development, adoption, or implementation of
evergreen cities management plans or ordinances developed under section
13 of this act.
(2) The grant program authorized in this section shall address both
the goals of rewarding innovation by successful evergreen cities and of
providing resources and assistance to the applicants with the greatest
financial need.
(3) The department may only provide grants to cities, towns,
counties under this chapter if the local government is recognized as an
evergreen city consistent with section 6 of this act, or is applying
for funds that would aid them in their pursuit of evergreen city
recognition.
(4) Prior to receiving a grant under this section, a city, town, or
county must demonstrate to the department's satisfaction that it has
developed or is in the process of developing partnerships with local
not-for-profit organizations that contribute to urban forest or habitat
expertise, education programs, or volunteers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The department shall develop model
evergreen city urban forest management plans and ordinances pursuant to
sections 11 and 12 of this act with measurable goals and timelines to
guide local government plan and ordinance adoption or development
consistent with section 13 of this act.
(2) Model plans and ordinances developed under this section must:
(a) Recognize ecoregional differences in the state;
(b) Provide flexibility for the diversity of urban character and
relative differences in density and zoning found in Washington's towns,
cities, and counties;
(c) Recognize and provide for vegetation management practices and
programs that prevent vegetation from interfering with or damaging
utilities, public facilities, and solar panels or buildings
specifically designed to optimize passive solar energy; and
(d) Provide for vegetation management practices and programs that
reflect and are consistent with the priorities and goals of the growth
management act, chapter 36.70A RCW.
(3) All model plans and ordinances developed by the department must
be developed in conjunction with the evergreen cities partnership task
force created in section 16 of this act.
(4) After the development of model plans and ordinances under this
section, the department shall, in conjunction with the department of
natural resources, distribute and provide outreach regarding the model
plans and ordinances and associated best management practices to local
jurisdictions to aid the local jurisdictions in obtaining evergreen
city recognition under section 6 of this act.
(5) By December 1, 2010, the department shall, at a minimum,
develop the model plans and ordinances required under this section for
areas of the state where the department of natural resources has
completed community and urban forest inventories pursuant to RCW
76.15.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall deliver a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature following the development of the model
plan and ordinance under section 9 of this act recommending any next
steps and additional incentives to increase voluntary participation by
local governments in the evergreen cities program established in
section 6 of this act.
(2) By the fifteenth day of each consecutive December leading up to
the adoption of the model plan and ordinance, the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall deliver a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature outlining progress made
towards the development of the model plan and ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 In the development of model evergreen
cities management plans under section 9 of this act, the department
shall consider including, but not be limited to considering, the
following elements:
(1) Inventory and assessment of the jurisdiction's urban and
community forests utilized as a dynamic management tool to set goals,
implement programs, and monitor outcomes that may be adjusted over
time;
(2) Canopy cover goals;
(3) Plans for reforestation and tree canopy expansion within the
jurisdiction's boundaries;
(4) Plans for restoration of public forests;
(5) Plans to achieve forest stand and diversity goals;
(6) Plans to maximize vegetated storm water management with trees
and other vegetation that reduces runoff, increases soil infiltration,
and reduces storm water pollution;
(7) Plans for other environmental health goals specific to air
quality, habitat for wildlife, and energy conservation;
(8) Plans for vegetation management practices and programs to
prevent vegetation from interfering with or damaging utilities and
public facilities;
(9) Prioritized planting sites;
(10) Standards for tree selection, siting, planting, and pruning;
(11) Scheduled maintenance and stewardship for new and established
trees;
(12) Staff and volunteer training requirements emphasizing
appropriate expertise and professionalism;
(13) Guidelines for protecting existing trees from
construction-related damage and damage related to preserving
territorial views;
(14) Integrated disease and pest management plans;
(15) Wood waste utilization;
(16) Plans for community outreach, participation, education
programs, and partnerships with nongovernment organizations;
(17) Time frames for achieving plan goals, objectives, and tasks;
(18) Plans for monitoring and measuring progress toward those
benchmarks and goals; and
(19) Consistency with the urban wildland interface codes developed
by the state building code council;
(20) An emphasis on landscape and revegetation plans in residential
and commercial development areas where tree retention objectives are
challenging to achieve; and
(21) Plans for maximizing building heating and cooling energy
efficiency through appropriate siting of trees for summer shading,
passive solar heating in winter, and for wind breaks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The department shall, in the development of
model evergreen cities tree ordinances under section 9 of this act,
consider including, but not be limited to considering, the following
policy elements:
(1) Tree canopy cover, density, and spacing;
(2) Tree conservation and retention;
(3) Vegetated storm water runoff management using native trees and
appropriate nonnative, nonnaturalized vegetation;
(4) Clearing, grading, protection of soils, reductions in soil
compaction, and use of appropriate soils with low runoff potential and
high infiltration rates;
(5) Appropriate tree siting and maintenance for vegetation
management practices and programs to prevent vegetation from
interfering with or damaging utilities and public facilities;
(6) Native species and nonnative, nonnaturalized species diversity
selection to reduce disease and pests in urban forests;
(7) Tree maintenance;
(8) Street tree installation and maintenance;
(9) Tree and vegetation buffers for riparian areas, critical areas,
transportation and utility corridors, and commercial and residential
areas;
(10) Tree assessments for new construction permitting;
(11) Recommended forest conditions for different land use types;
(12) Variances for hardship and safety;
(13) Variances to avoid conflicts with renewable solar energy
infrastructure, passive solar building design, and locally grown
produce; and
(14) Permits and appeals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) A local jurisdiction may adopt an
evergreen cities ordinance and an evergreen cities urban forest
management plan, including enforcement mechanisms and civil penalties
for violations of their jurisdiction's evergreen city ordinance.
(2) Ordinances adopted under this section may not prohibit or
conflict with vegetation management practices and programs undertaken
to prevent vegetation from interfering with or damaging utilities and
public facilities.
(3) Management plans developed by cities must be based on urban
forest inventories for the jurisdiction covered by the management plan.
The city or town developing the management plan may produce independent
inventories themselves or rely solely on inventories developed,
commissioned, or approved by the department of natural resources under
chapter 76.15 RCW.
(4) Local jurisdictions may establish a local evergreen cities
advisory board or utilize existing citizen boards focused on municipal
tree issues to achieve appropriate expert and stakeholder participation
in the adoption and development of inventories, assessments,
ordinances, and plans consistent with this chapter.
(5) Local jurisdictions shall invite the expert advice of utilities
serving within their jurisdiction for the purpose of developing and
adopting appropriate plans for vegetation management practices and
programs to prevent vegetation from interfering with or damaging
utilities and public facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any county may adopt an evergreen cities ordinance, as that
term is defined in section 2 of this act, which the county must apply
to new building or land development in the unincorporated portions of
the county's urban growth areas, as that term is defined in RCW
36.70A.030, and may apply to other areas of the county as deemed
appropriate by the county.
(2) As an alternative to subsection (1) of this section, a city may
request that the county in which it is located apply to any new
building or land development permit in the unincorporated portions of
the urban growth areas, as defined in RCW 36.70A.030, the evergreen
cities ordinance standards adopted under section 13 of this act by the
city or town in the county located closest to the proposed building or
development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) A local jurisdiction seeking evergreen
cities recognition under section 6 of this act shall submit their
management plan and evergreen cities ordinance to the department for
review and comment at least sixty days prior to its planned
implementation date.
(2) The department shall, together with the department of natural
resources, review any evergreen cities ordinances or urban forest
management plans submitted. When reviewing an ordinance or plan under
this section, the department shall focus its review on the plan's
consistency with this chapter and the model evergreen cities management
plans and ordinances adopted under section 9 of this act. Both
departments may provide written comments on either plans or ordinances.
(3) Together with the department of natural resources, the
department may offer technical assistance in the development of
evergreen cities ordinances and management plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The director of the department shall
assemble and convene the evergreen cities partnership task force of no
more than twenty-five individuals to aid and advise the department in
the administration of this chapter.
(2) At the discretion of the department, the evergreen cities
partnership task force may be disbanded once the urban and community
forests assessments conducted by the department of natural resources
under RCW 76.15.020 and the model management plans and ordinances
developed under section 9 of this act are completed.
(3) Representatives of the department of natural resources and the
department of ecology shall participate in the evergreen cities
partnership task force.
(4) The department shall invite individuals representing the
following entities to serve on the task force:
(a) A statewide council representing urban and community forestry
programs authorized under RCW 76.15.020;
(b) A conservation organization with expertise in Puget Sound storm
water management;
(c) At least two cities, one from a city east and one from a city
west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;
(d) At least two counties, one from a county east and one from a
county west of the crest of the Cascade mountains;
(e) Two land development professionals or representative
associations representing development professionals affected by tree
retention ordinances and storm water management policies;
(f) A national conservation organization with a network of chapter
volunteers working to conserve habitat for birds and wildlife;
(g) A land trust conservation organization facilitating urban
forest management partnerships;
(h) A national conservation organization with expertise in
backyard, schoolyard, and community wildlife habitat development;
(i) A public works professional;
(j) A private utility;
(k) A national forest land trust exclusively dedicated to
sustaining America's vast and vital private forests and safeguarding
their many public benefits;
(l) Professionals with expertise in local land use planning,
housing, or infrastructure; and
(m) The timber industry.
(5) The department is encouraged to recruit task force members who
are able to represent two or more of the stakeholder groups listed in
subsection (4) of this section.
(6) In assembling the task force, the director of the department
shall strive to achieve representation from as many of the state's
major ecoregions as possible.
(7) Each member of the task force shall serve without compensation.
Task force members that are not state employees may be reimbursed for
travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Nothing in this chapter may be construed
to:
(1) Conflict or supersede with any requirements, duties, or
objectives placed on local governments under chapter 36.70A RCW with
specific emphasis on allowing cities and unincorporated urban growth
areas to achieve their desired residential densities in a manner and
character consistent with RCW 36.70A.110; or
(2) Apply to lands designated under chapters 76.09, 79.70, 79.71,
84.33, and 84.34 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The department is authorized to spend
moneys appropriated by the legislature or any other moneys contributed
for the purpose of supporting cities being recognized as evergreen
cities under section 6 of this act or to implement evergreen cities
management plans under section 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) Moneys appropriated to the department
of natural resources for the evergreen cities program must be used for
an evergreen cities pilot program.
(2) The evergreen cities pilot program is to be designed so as to
encourage, through grants, cities and counties to be recognized as an
evergreen city under section 6 of this act.
(3) Grants may be awarded in the following priority order:
(a) To cities and counties for public involvement and assessments
of community tree goals and values or for local tree inventories that
integrate with the statewide inventory in RCW 76.15.020; and
(b) To cities and counties for forest management plans, tree
maintenance, and planting.
(4) Grants must be awarded on a competitive basis using an
application process and criteria developed jointly by the department of
community, trade, and economic development and the department of
natural resources.
(5) In awarding grants, the department of natural resources shall
give priority to cities and counties that state an intent to become
recognized as an evergreen city under section 6 of this act.

Sec. 20 RCW 35.92.390 and 1993 c 204 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Municipal utilities under this chapter are encouraged to
provide information to their customers regarding landscaping that
includes tree planting for energy conservation.
(2)(a) Municipal utilities under this chapter are encouraged to
request voluntary donations from their customers for the purposes of
urban forestry. The request may be in the form of a check-off on the
billing statement or other form of request for a voluntary donation.
(b) Voluntary donations collected by municipal utilities under this
section may be used by the municipal utility to:
(i) Support the development and implementation of evergreen cities
ordinances, as that term is defined in section 2 of this act, for
cities, towns, or counties within their service areas; or
(ii) Complete projects consistent with the model urban forest
management plans and ordinances developed under section 9 of this act.
(c) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the
gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business
under chapter 82.16 RCW.

Sec. 21 RCW 35A.80.040 and 1993 c 204 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Code cities providing utility services under this chapter are
encouraged to provide information to their customers regarding
landscaping that includes tree planting for energy conservation.
(2)(a) Code cities providing utility services under this chapter
are encouraged to request voluntary donations from their customers for
the purposes of urban forestry. The request may be in the form of a
check-off on the billing statement or other form of a request for a
voluntary donation.
(b) Voluntary donations collected by code cities under this section
may be used by the code city to:
(i) Support the development and implementation of evergreen cities
ordinances, as that term is defined in section 2 of this act, for
cities, towns, or counties within their service areas; or
(ii) Complete projects consistent with the model urban forest
management plans and ordinances developed under section 9 of this act.
(c) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the
gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business
under chapter 82.16 RCW.

Sec. 22 RCW 80.28.300 and 1993 c 204 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Gas companies and electrical companies under this chapter
((may)) are encouraged to provide information to their customers
regarding landscaping that includes tree planting for energy
conservation.
(2)(a) Gas companies and electrical companies under this chapter
may request voluntary donations from their customers for the purposes
of urban forestry. The request may be in the form of a check-off on
the billing statement or other form of a request for a voluntary
donation.
(b) Voluntary donations collected by gas companies and electrical
companies under this section may be used by the gas companies and
electrical companies to:
(i) Support the development and implementation of evergreen cities
ordinances, as that term is defined in section 2 of this act, for
cities, towns, or counties within their service areas; or
(ii) Complete projects consistent with the model urban forest
management plans and ordinances developed under section 9 of this act.
(c) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the
gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business
under chapter 82.16 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Public utility districts may request voluntary donations from
their customers for the purposes of urban forestry. The request may be
in the form of a check-off on the billing statement or other form of a
request for a voluntary donation.
(2) Voluntary donations collected by public utility districts under
this section may be used by the public utility district to:
(a) Support the development and implementation of evergreen cities
ordinances, as that term is defined in section 2 of this act, for
cities, towns, or counties within their service areas; or
(b) Complete projects consistent with the model urban forest
management plans and ordinances developed under section 9 of this act.
(3) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the
gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business
under chapter 82.16 RCW.

Sec. 24 RCW 76.15.010 and 2000 c 11 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Community and urban forest" is that land in and around human
settlements ranging from small communities to metropolitan areas,
occupied or potentially occupied by trees and associated vegetation.
Community and urban forest land may be planted or unplanted, used or
unused, and includes public and private lands, lands along
transportation and utility corridors, and forested watershed lands
within populated areas.
(2) "Community and urban forest assessment" has the same meaning as
defined in section 2 of this act.
(3) "Community and urban forest inventory" has the same meaning as
defined in section 2 of this act.
(4) "Community and urban forestry" means the planning,
establishment, protection, care, and management of trees and associated
plants individually, in small groups, or under forest conditions within
municipalities and counties.
(((3))) (5) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(((4))) (6) "Municipality" means a city, town, port district,
public school district, community college district, irrigation
district, weed control district, park district, or other political
subdivision of the state.
(((5))) (7) "Person" means an individual, partnership, private or
public municipal corporation, Indian tribe, state entity, county or
local governmental entity, or association of individuals of whatever
nature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 (1) In an effort to better understand the
needs of cities, towns, and counties interested in pursuing designation
as an evergreen city under section 6 of this act, the legislature
intends to encourage local governments to:
(a) Identify their interests in becoming an evergreen city; and
(b) Identify community and urban forests within their applicable
urban growth areas that are appropriately situated for the local
government to assume ownership from willing sellers for urban forest
management purposes consistent with this act.
(2) If a local government opts to provide a list of identified
properties under this section, including the estimated value of the
properties and documentation on the owner's willingness to participate,
the information must be provided to the department of community, trade,
and economic development by October 31, 2008.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must report a summary of the properties reported to it under this
section, along with the itemized and summarized estimated costs
involved with the purchases, to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 15, 2008.
(4) This section expires July 31, 2009.

Sec. 26 RCW 43.155.070 and 2007 c 341 s 24 and 2007 c 231 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board
must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if such request
is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040
which has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited
from receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if the
comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required
by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a loan or loan
guarantee.
(3) In considering awarding loans for public facilities to special
districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board shall
consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) The board shall develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board shall attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
shall consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority
to a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(d) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(e) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;
(f) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(g) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(h) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(i) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system;
(j) Except as otherwise conditioned by section 31 of this act, and
effective one calendar year following the development of model
evergreen cities management plans and ordinances under section 9 of
this act, whether the entity receiving assistance has been recognized,
and what gradation of recognition was received, in the evergreen cities
recognition program created in section 6 of this act;
(k) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(((k))) (l) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government
applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure additional
local or other sources of funding for each public works project for
which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(6) Before November 1st of each year, the board shall develop and
submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives a description of the loans made under RCW 43.155.065,
43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section during the preceding
fiscal year and a prioritized list of projects which are recommended
for funding by the legislature, including one copy to the staff of each
of the committees. The list shall include, but not be limited to, a
description of each project and recommended financing, the terms and
conditions of the loan or financial guarantee, the local government
jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration of the jurisdiction's
critical need for the project and documentation of local funds being
used to finance the public works project. The list shall also include
measures of fiscal capacity for each jurisdiction recommended for
financial assistance, compared to authorized limits and state averages,
including local government sales taxes; real estate excise taxes;
property taxes; and charges for or taxes on sewerage, water, garbage,
and other utilities.
(7) The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially
obligate funds from the public works assistance account before the
legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of public works
projects. The legislature may remove projects from the list
recommended by the board. The legislature shall not change the order
of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does not apply to loans made
under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section.
(9) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans shall be
exempted from subsection (7) of this section.
(10) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or recycling
facilities under this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that
the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent with and necessary
to implement the comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by
the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.
(11) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be funded under
this section only if the project is not in conflict with the action
agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 27 RCW 70.146.070 and 2007 c 341 s 60 and 2007 c 341 s 26
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When making grants or loans for water pollution control
facilities, the department shall consider the following:
(a) The protection of water quality and public health;
(b) The cost to residential ratepayers if they had to finance water
pollution control facilities without state assistance;
(c) Actions required under federal and state permits and compliance
orders;
(d) The level of local fiscal effort by residential ratepayers
since 1972 in financing water pollution control facilities;
(e) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 70.146.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(f) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(g) Except as otherwise provided in section 32 of this act, and
effective one calendar year following the development and statewide
availability of model evergreen cities management plans and ordinances
under section 9 of this act, whether the project is sponsored by an
entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of recognition was
received, in the evergreen cities recognition program created in
section 6 of this act;
(h) The extent to which the applicant county or city, or if the
applicant is another public body, the extent to which the county or
city in which the applicant public body is located, has established
programs to mitigate nonpoint pollution of the surface or subterranean
water sought to be protected by the water pollution control facility
named in the application for state assistance; and
(((h))) (i) The recommendations of the Puget Sound partnership,
created in RCW 90.71.210, and any other board, council, commission, or
group established by the legislature or a state agency to study water
pollution control issues in the state.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 may not receive a grant or loan for water
pollution control facilities unless it has adopted a comprehensive
plan, including a capital facilities plan element, and development
regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not
require any county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to
adopt a comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting
or receiving a grant or loan under this chapter if such request is made
before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040.
A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 which has not
adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations within the
time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited from
receiving a grant or loan under this chapter if the comprehensive plan
and development regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040
before submitting a request for a grant or loan.
(3) Whenever the department is considering awarding grants or loans
for public facilities to special districts requesting funding for a
proposed facility located in a county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040, it shall consider whether the county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the
proposed facility is located has adopted a comprehensive plan and
development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
effects of water pollution on Puget Sound may be funded under this
chapter only if the project is not in conflict with the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 28 RCW 89.08.520 and 2007 c 341 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In administering grant programs to improve water quality and
protect habitat, the commission shall:
(a) Require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental
benefits of the project into their grant applications;
(b) In its grant prioritization and selection process, consider:
(i) The statement of environmental benefits;
(ii) Whether, except as conditioned by RCW 89.08.580, the applicant
is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, and except as
otherwise provided in section 33 of this act, and effective one
calendar year following the development and statewide availability of
model evergreen cities management plans and ordinances under section 9
of this act, whether the applicant is an entity that has been
recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the
evergreen cities recognition program created in section 6 of this act;
and
(iii) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310; and
(c) Not provide funding, after January 1, 2010, for projects
designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound that are in conflict
with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under
RCW 90.71.310.
(2)(a) The commission shall also develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be used both for management and
performance assessment of the grant program.
(b) The commission shall work with the districts to develop uniform
performance measures across participating districts and, to the extent
possible, the commission should coordinate its performance measure
system with other natural resource-related agencies as defined in RCW
43.41.270. The commission shall consult with affected interest groups
in implementing this section.

Sec. 29 RCW 79.105.150 and 2007 c 341 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW
79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW 79.115.150(2), all moneys
received by the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic
lands and from the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic
lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which
is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these
funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for
the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public
purposes; for providing and improving access to the lands; and for
volunteer cooperative fish and game projects.
(2) In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the
((interagency committee for outdoor)) recreation and conservation
funding board shall:
(a) Require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental
benefits of the project into their grant applications;
(b) Utilize the statement of environmental benefits, consideration,
except as provided in RCW 79.105.610, of whether the applicant is a
Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, ((and)) whether a
project is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound
partnership under RCW 90.71.310, and except as otherwise provided in
section 34 of this act, and effective one calendar year following the
development and statewide availability of model evergreen cities
management plans and ordinances under section 9 of this act, whether
the applicant is an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation
of recognition was received, in the evergreen cities recognition
program created in section 6 of this act in its prioritization and
selection process; and
(c) Develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be
used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.
(3) To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its
performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies
as defined in RCW 43.41.270.
(4) The department shall consult with affected interest groups in
implementing this section.
(5) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the
project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the
Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 30 RCW 79A.15.040 and 2007 c 341 s 34 and 2007 c 241 s 29
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Moneys appropriated for this chapter to the habitat
conservation account shall be distributed in the following way:
(a) Not less than forty percent through June 30, 2011, at which
time the amount shall become forty-five percent, for the acquisition
and development of critical habitat;
(b) Not less than thirty percent for the acquisition and
development of natural areas;
(c) Not less than twenty percent for the acquisition and
development of urban wildlife habitat; and
(d) Not less than ten percent through June 30, 2011, at which time
the amount shall become five percent, shall be used by the board to
fund restoration and enhancement projects on state lands. Only the
department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife
may apply for these funds to be used on existing habitat and natural
area lands.
(2)(a) In distributing these funds, the board retains discretion to
meet the most pressing needs for critical habitat, natural areas, and
urban wildlife habitat, and is not required to meet the percentages
described in subsection (1) of this section in any one biennium.
(b) If not enough project applications are submitted in a category
within the habitat conservation account to meet the percentages
described in subsection (1) of this section in any biennium, the board
retains discretion to distribute any remaining funds to the other
categories within the account.
(3) Only state agencies may apply for acquisition and development
funds for natural areas projects under subsection (1)(b) of this
section.
(4) State and local agencies may apply for acquisition and
development funds for critical habitat and urban wildlife habitat
projects under subsection (1)(a) and (c) of this section.
(5)(a) Any lands that have been acquired with grants under this
section by the department of fish and wildlife are subject to an amount
in lieu of real property taxes and an additional amount for control of
noxious weeds as determined by RCW 77.12.203.
(b) Any lands that have been acquired with grants under this
section by the department of natural resources are subject to payments
in the amounts required under the provisions of RCW 79.70.130 and
79.71.130.
(6)(((a))) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 79A.15.140 or
section 35 of this act, the ((committee)) board in its evaluating
process shall consider the following in determining distribution
priority:
(((i))) (a) Whether the entity applying for funding is a Puget
Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010; ((and
(ii))) (b) Effective one calendar year following the development
and statewide availability of model evergreen cities management plans
and ordinances under section 9 of this act, whether the entity
receiving assistance has been recognized, and what gradation of
recognition was received, in the evergreen cities recognition program
created in section 6 of this act; and
(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.
(7) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the
project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the
Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 A new section is added to chapter 43.155
RCW to read as follows:
When administering funds under this chapter, the board shall give
preference only to evergreen cities recognized under section 6 of this
act in comparison to other entities that are eligible to receive
evergreen city designation. Entities not eligible for designation as
an evergreen city shall not be given less preferential treatment than
evergreen cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 A new section is added to chapter 70.146
RCW to read as follows:
When administering funds under this chapter, the department shall
give preference only to evergreen cities recognized under section 6 of
this act in comparison to other entities that are eligible to receive
evergreen city designation. Entities not eligible for designation as
an evergreen city shall not be given less preferential treatment than
evergreen cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 A new section is added to chapter 89.08 RCW
to read as follows:
When administering funds under this chapter, the commission shall
give preference only to evergreen cities recognized under section 6 of
this act in comparison to other entities that are eligible to receive
evergreen city designation. Entities not eligible for designation as
an evergreen city shall not be given less preferential treatment than
evergreen cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 A new section is added to chapter 79.105
RCW to read as follows:
When administering funds under this chapter, the recreation and
conservation funding board shall give preference only to evergreen
cities recognized under section 6 of this act in comparison to other
entities that are eligible to receive evergreen city designation.
Entities not eligible for designation as an evergreen city shall not be
given less preferential treatment than evergreen cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 A new section is added to chapter 79A.15
RCW to read as follows:
When administering funds under this chapter, the recreation and
conservation funding board shall give preference only to evergreen
cities recognized under section 6 of this act in comparison to other
entities that are eligible to receive evergreen city designation.
Entities not eligible for designation as an evergreen city shall not be
given less preferential treatment than evergreen cities.

Sec. 36 RCW 80.28.010 and 1995 c 399 s 211 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All charges made, demanded or received by any gas company,
electrical company or water company for gas, electricity or water, or
for any service rendered or to be rendered in connection therewith,
shall be just, fair, reasonable and sufficient. Reasonable charges
necessary to cover the cost of administering the collection of
voluntary donations for the purposes of urban forestry under RCW
80.28.300 shall be deemed as prudent and necessary for the operation of
a utility.
(2) Every gas company, electrical company and water company shall
furnish and supply such service, instrumentalities and facilities as
shall be safe, adequate and efficient, and in all respects just and
reasonable.
(3) All rules and regulations issued by any gas company, electrical
company or water company, affecting or pertaining to the sale or
distribution of its product, shall be just and reasonable.
(4) Utility service for residential space heating shall not be
terminated between November 15 through March 15 if the customer:
(a) Notifies the utility of the inability to pay the bill,
including a security deposit. This notice should be provided within
five business days of receiving a payment overdue notice unless there
are extenuating circumstances. If the customer fails to notify the
utility within five business days and service is terminated, the
customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and fulfilling
the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this
chapter;
(b) Provides self-certification of household income for the prior
twelve months to a grantee of the department of community, trade, and
economic development which administers federally funded energy
assistance programs. The grantee shall determine that the household
income does not exceed the maximum allowed for eligibility under the
state's plan for low-income energy assistance under 42 U.S.C. 8624 and
shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of household
income. The grantee may verify information provided in the self-certification;
(c) Has applied for home heating assistance from applicable
government and private sector organizations and certifies that any
assistance received will be applied to the current bill and future
utility bills;
(d) Has applied for low-income weatherization assistance to the
utility or other appropriate agency if such assistance is available for
the dwelling;
(e) Agrees to a payment plan and agrees to maintain the payment
plan. The plan will be designed both to pay the past due bill by the
following October 15 and to pay for continued utility service. If the
past due bill is not paid by the following October 15, the customer
shall not be eligible for protections under this chapter until the past
due bill is paid. The plan shall not require monthly payments in
excess of seven percent of the customer's monthly income plus one-
twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is made and
thereafter during November 15 through March 15. A customer may agree
to pay a higher percentage during this period, but shall not be in
default unless payment during this period is less than seven percent of
monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date
application is made and thereafter. If assistance payments are
received by the customer subsequent to implementation of the plan, the
customer shall contact the utility to reformulate the plan; and
(f) Agrees to pay the moneys owed even if he or she moves.
(5) The utility shall:
(a) Include in any notice that an account is delinquent and that
service may be subject to termination, a description of the customer's
duties in this section;
(b) Assist the customer in fulfilling the requirements under this
section;
(c) Be authorized to transfer an account to a new residence when a
customer who has established a plan under this section moves from one
residence to another within the same utility service area;
(d) Be permitted to disconnect service if the customer fails to
honor the payment program. Utilities may continue to disconnect
service for those practices authorized by law other than for nonpayment
as provided for in this subsection. Customers who qualify for payment
plans under this section who default on their payment plans and are
disconnected can be reconnected and maintain the protections afforded
under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if any, and by
paying all amounts that would have been due and owing under the terms
of the applicable payment plan, absent default, on the date on which
service is reconnected; and
(e) Advise the customer in writing at the time it disconnects
service that it will restore service if the customer contacts the
utility and fulfills the other requirements of this section.
(6) A payment plan implemented under this section is consistent
with RCW 80.28.080.
(7) Every gas company and electrical company shall offer
residential customers the option of a budget billing or equal payment
plan. The budget billing or equal payment plan shall be offered low-income customers eligible under the state's plan for low-income energy
assistance prepared in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 8624(C)(1) without
limiting availability to certain months of the year, without regard to
the length of time the customer has occupied the premises, and without
regard to whether the customer is the tenant or owner of the premises
occupied.
(8) Every gas company, electrical company and water company shall
construct and maintain such facilities in connection with the
manufacture and distribution of its product as will be efficient and
safe to its employees and the public.
(9) An agreement between the customer and the utility, whether oral
or written, shall not waive the protections afforded under this
chapter.
(10) In establishing rates or charges for water service, water
companies as defined in RCW 80.04.010 may consider the achievement of
water conservation goals and the discouragement of wasteful water use
practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 Sections 1, 2, 5, 6, 8, 9, 11 through 13,
15 through 18, and 25 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 This act may be known and cited as the
evergreen cities act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---