BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the state has a compelling interest in
encouraging adoption of children from foster care. The legislature
also finds that children adopted out of the foster care system often
have particular or unique needs as a result of their life experiences.
These needs may emerge, in part, as a result of the adoption process
and may intensify as children enter the sometimes turbulent
developmental period of adolescence. The legislature also finds that
adoptive families may from time to time require intensive supports to
meet the mental and behavioral needs of their adoptive children,
including the need for access to residential treatment for adoptive
children. The legislature further finds that residential treatment
provided at the appropriate time can stabilize children and ultimately
preserve adoptions. The availability of voluntary agreements for the
provision of residential treatment also serves to demonstrate the
state's commitment to promoting successful and enduring adoptions of
children from the foster care system.
The legislature intends to authorize limited voluntary placement
agreements for the purpose of responding to children adopted from the
foster care system who may have severe mental health or behavioral
health needs. These limited voluntary placement agreements are
intended to be initiated only when the sole reason for the out-of-home
placement is the adoptive child's mental health or behavioral health
needs and when the child's behavioral and functional difficulties
exceed the parent's ability to effectively and safely manage and meet
the child's needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Adopted" means that a valid decree of adoption regarding the
child and parent was entered and remains intact in Washington or in
another jurisdiction.
(b) "Child" means any child under the age of eighteen who was found
to be dependent, placed in out-of-home care, and subsequently was
adopted from an out-of-home placement.
(c) "Licensed facility" means a facility licensed under chapter
74.15 RCW to provide residential evaluation and treatment services for
children.
(d) "Parent" means the adoptive and legal parent of a child
according to the terms of a valid decree of adoption, or the legal
guardian of an adopted child.
(e) "Voluntary placement agreement" means a written agreement
between the department and a child's parent authorizing the department
to place the child in a licensed facility for the purpose of receiving
mental health or behavioral health treatment intended to stabilize the
child's functioning and support the child's return home. Under the
terms of a voluntary placement agreement, the parent retains legal
custody of the child while the department temporarily assumes
responsibility for the child's placement and care.
(2) A parent may request and the department may agree to enter into
a voluntary placement agreement whenever the following conditions are
met:
(a) The child resides in Washington state;
(b) Less intensive and traditional family preservation services,
community resources, and/or adoption supports have been unsuccessful or
are not likely to be successful in stabilizing the child's behavior and
functioning; and
(c) The parent has no reasonable alternative to access the level of
care necessary to meet the child's needs and preserve the adoption.
(3)(a) Whenever the department assumes responsibility for the
placement and care of a child under this section, the department, in
consultation with the child, the child's parent, and a mental health
professional, shall develop a plan for the child's eventual return
home. If the plan anticipates the child will remain in out-of-home
care one hundred eighty days or longer, or if at any time it appears
the child will remain in out-of-home care longer than one hundred
eighty days, the department and the parent shall jointly seek a
judicial determination that the agreement is in the child's best
interests. If the child exits the out-of-home placement before one
hundred eighty days have elapsed, no judicial determination is
required.
(b) To obtain the judicial determination required under this
section, the department and the parent shall file a joint petition
alleging there is located or residing within the county a child who was
adopted from the foster care system whose current behavioral health or
mental health needs can not be met adequately by the child's parent,
and that as a result the child has been placed in out-of-home care
pursuant to this section. The petition shall request that the court
conduct periodic reviews of the child's placement and make a
determination whether continued placement is in the best interests of
the child. The petition shall contain the name, date of birth, and
residence of the child and the names and residences of the child's
parent or legal guardian who has consented to the voluntary placement
agreement. The department shall make reasonable attempts to ascertain
and set forth in the petition the identity, location, and custodial
status of any parent who is not a party to the placement agreement and
reasons why that parent cannot assume placement and care authority of
the child.
(c) Permanency planning for the child shall be the joint
responsibility of the department and the parent.
(4) A written agreement under this section must specify the legal
status of the child and the rights and obligations of the parent, the
child, and the department while the child is in the licensed facility.
Any party to the agreement may terminate the agreement at any time by
providing advance notice to the other party and to the child if he or
she is thirteen years of age or older. Upon termination of the
agreement, the child must be returned to the care of his or her parent
unless the child has been taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050
or 26.44.050, placed in shelter care pursuant to RCW 13.34.060, or
placed in foster care pursuant to RCW 13.34.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that as a condition of the state's
receipt of federal funds for foster care under Title IV-B and Title IV-E of the social security act, all children in foster care must be
subjected to periodic court review. Unfortunately, this requirement
includes children who were adopted out of foster care and who
subsequently are temporarily returned to a foster care placement solely
because their parents have determined that the child's mental health or
behavioral health service needs require an out-of-home placement.
Except for providing such needed services, the parents of these
children are completely competent to care for the children. The
legislature intends that court review of out-of-home placements
pursuant to section 2 of this act be structured to minimize the stress
and inconvenience to families caused by complying with these federal
requirements.
(2) Upon filing of the petition required under section 2 of this
act, the clerk of the court shall schedule the petition for a hearing
to be held no later than fourteen calendar days after the petition has
been filed. The department shall provide notification of the time,
date, and purpose of the hearing to the parent or legal guardian who
has agreed to the child's placement in out-of-home care. The
department shall also make reasonable attempts to notify any parent who
is not a party to the placement agreement, if the parent's identity and
location are known. Notification under this section may be given by
the most expedient means, including but not limited to mail, personal
service, and telephone.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.13.080 and 1987 c 170 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 74.13.350 and section 2 of this act, the
department shall not make payment for any child in group care placement
unless the group home is licensed and the department has the ((custody
of)) placement and care authority for the child under a court order or
a voluntary placement agreement and the authority to remove the child
in a cooperative manner after at least seventy-two hours notice to the
child care provider; such notice may be waived in emergency situations.
However, this requirement shall not be construed to prohibit the
department from making or mandate the department to make payment for
Indian children placed in facilities licensed by federally recognized
Indian tribes pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.

--- END ---