BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.71.110 and 2007 c 345 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Puget Sound scientific research account is created in the state
treasury. All gifts, grants, federal moneys, or appropriations made to
the account must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for research programs and projects selected pursuant
to ((section 2 of this act)) the process developed and overseen by the
Puget Sound science panel as provided in RCW 90.71.280(1)(c).

Sec. 2 RCW 90.71.280 and 2007 c 341 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The panel shall:
(a) Assist the council, board, and executive director in carrying
out the obligations of the partnership, including preparing and
updating the action agenda;
(b) As provided in RCW 90.71.290, assist the partnership in
developing an ecosystem level strategic science program that:
(i) Addresses monitoring, modeling, data management, and research;
and
(ii) Identifies science gaps and recommends research priorities;
(c) Develop and provide oversight of a competitive peer-reviewed
process for soliciting, strategically prioritizing, and funding
research and modeling projects;
(d) Develop and implement an appropriate process for peer review of
monitoring, research, and modeling conducted as part of the strategic
science program;
(e) Provide input to the executive director in developing biennial
implementation strategies; and
(((e))) (f) Offer an ecosystem-wide perspective on the science work
being conducted in Puget Sound and by the partnership.
(2) The panel should collaborate with other scientific groups and
consult other scientists in conducting its work. To the maximum extent
possible, the panel should seek to integrate the state-sponsored Puget
Sound science program with the Puget Sound science activities of
federal agencies, including working toward an integrated research
agenda and Puget Sound science work plan.
(3) By July 31, 2008, the panel shall identify environmental
indicators measuring the health of Puget Sound, and recommend
environmental benchmarks that need to be achieved to meet the goals of
the action agenda. The council shall confer with the panel on
incorporating the indicators and benchmarks into the action agenda.

--- END ---