BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The concurring opinion of the Washington
state supreme court in Rickert v. State, 161 Wn.2d 843 (2007), found
the statute that prohibits persons from sponsoring, with actual malice,
political advertising and electioneering communications about a
candidate containing false statements of material fact to be invalid
under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution because it
posed no requirement that the prohibited statements be defamatory.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to amend chapter 42.17 RCW
to find that a violation of state law occurs if a person sponsors false
statements about candidates in political advertising and electioneering
communications when the statements are made with actual malice and are
defamatory.
(3) The legislature finds that in such circumstances damages are
presumed and do not need to be established when such statements are
made with actual malice in political advertising and electioneering
communications and constitute libel or defamation per se under RCW
9.58.010 (1) or (3). The legislature finds that incumbents,
challengers, voters, and the political process will benefit from
vigorous political debate that is not made with actual malice and is
not defamatory.
(4) The legislature finds that when such defamatory statements
contain a false statement of material fact about a candidate for public
office they expose the candidate to contempt, ridicule, or reproach and
can deprive the candidate of the benefit of public confidence, or
prejudice him or her in his or her profession, trade, or vocation. The
legislature finds that when such statements falsely represent that a
candidate is the incumbent for the office sought when in fact the
candidate is not the incumbent they deprive the actual incumbent and
the candidates of the benefit of public confidence and injure the
actual incumbent in the ability to effectively serve as an elected
official. The legislature further finds that defamatory statements
made by an incumbent regarding the incumbent's challenger may deter
individuals from seeking public office and harm the democratic process.
Further, the legislature finds that when such statements make, either
directly or indirectly, a false claim stating or implying the support
or endorsement of any person or organization when in fact the candidate
does not have such support or endorsement, they deprive the person or
organization of the benefit of public confidence and/or will expose the
person or organization to contempt, ridicule, or reproach, or injure
the person or organization in their business or occupation.
(5) The legislature finds that defamatory statements, made with
actual malice, damage the integrity of elections by distorting the
electoral process. Democracy is premised on an informed electorate.
To the extent such defamatory statements misinform the voters, they
interfere with the process upon which democracy is based. Such
defamatory statements also lower the quality of campaign discourse and
debate, and lead or add to voter alienation by fostering voter cynicism
and distrust of the political process.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.530 and 2005 c 445 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a violation of this chapter for a person to sponsor with
actual malice a statement constituting libel or defamation per se under
RCW 9.58.010 (1) or (3) under the following conditions:
(a) Political advertising or an electioneering communication that
contains a false statement of material fact about a candidate for
public office((. However, this subsection (1)(a) does not apply to
statements made by a candidate or the candidate's agent about the
candidate himself or herself));
(b) Political advertising or an electioneering communication that
falsely represents that a candidate is the incumbent for the office
sought when in fact the candidate is not the incumbent;
(c) Political advertising or an electioneering communication that
makes either directly or indirectly, a false claim stating or implying
the support or endorsement of any person or organization when in fact
the candidate does not have such support or endorsement.
(2) It is not a violation of this section for a candidate or his or
her agent to make statements described in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of
this section about the candidate himself or herself because a person
cannot defame himself or herself. It is not a violation of this
section for a person or organization referenced in subsection (1)(c) of
this section to make a statement about that person or organization
because such persons and organizations cannot defame themselves.
(3) Any violation of this section shall be proven by clear and
convincing evidence. If a violation is proven, damages are presumed
and do not need to be proven.

--- END ---