BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.108.025 and 1991 c 3 s 254 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, the board may:
(1) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to
implement this chapter, subject to the approval of the secretary;
(2) Define, evaluate, approve, and designate those schools,
programs, and apprenticeship programs including all current and
proposed curriculum, faculty, and health, sanitation, and facility
standards from which graduation will be accepted as proof of an
applicant's eligibility to take the licensing examination;
(3) Review approved schools and programs periodically;
(4) Prepare, grade, administer, and supervise the grading and
administration of, examinations for applicants for licensure; ((and))
(5) Establish and administer requirements for continuing education,
which shall be a prerequisite to renewing a license under this chapter;
and
(6) Determine which states have educational and licensing
requirements equivalent to those of this state.
The board shall establish by rule the standards and procedures for
approving courses of study and may contract with individuals or
organizations having expertise in the profession or in education to
assist in evaluating courses of study. The standards and procedures
set shall apply equally to schools and training within the United
States of America and those in foreign jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.108 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary must grant a massage practitioner an inactive
credential if the massage practitioner submits a letter to the board
stating his or her intent to obtain an inactive credential, and he or
she:
(a) Holds an active Washington state massage practitioner's
license;
(b) Is in good standing, as determined by the board; and
(c) Does not practice massage in the state of Washington.
(2) The secretary may reinstate the massage practitioner's license
if the massage practitioner:
(a) Pays the current active renewal fee and other fees for active
licensure;
(b) Provides a written declaration that:
(i) No action has been taken by a state or federal jurisdiction or
a hospital which would prevent or restrict the practitioner's practice
of massage therapy;
(ii) He or she has not voluntarily given up any credential or
privilege or been restricted in the practice of massage therapy to
avoid other sanctions; and
(iii) He or she has satisfied continuing education and competency
requirements for the two most recent years; and
(c) Meets other requirements for reinstatement, as may be
determined by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---