BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 During fiscal years 2008 and 2009, the fee
increases and new fees in subsections (1) through (6) of this section
authorized by the Washington state gambling commission, pursuant to its
authority under RCW 9.46.070 (5) and (6), are approved.
(1) Effective January 1, 2009, the commission may increase the fees
to the amount necessary to cover costs of processing these licensing
actions. The fee shall be based on and not exceed the average actual
cost to process the actions as determined by the commission:
(a) Business change of location fee to one hundred sixty-seven
dollars;
(b) Change of business classification fee to one hundred
sixty-seven dollars;
(c) Change in license class fee to one hundred sixty-seven dollars;
and
(d) Change in corporate stock/limited liability corporation
shares/units to three hundred sixty dollars.
(2) Effective January 1, 2009, the commission may increase the
following Washington state identification and inspection stamp fees as
necessary to offset fiscal growth factor-related rounding limitations
experienced in the past:
(a) Punchboard/pull-tab games with wagers fifty cents or lower to
thirty-five cents;
(b) Punchboard/pull-tab games with wagers over fifty cents to one
dollar and thirty-seven cents;
(c) Mechanical or electromechanical pull-tab dispensers to
thirty-five cents;
(d) Disposable bingo cards, sets of individual cards or sheets of
cards, to thirty-five cents; and
(e) Disposable bingo cards, collations of cards, to one dollar and
fifty cents.
(3) Effective July 1, 2008, the commission may replace the current
manufacturer annual license fee with a fee that is three percent of
annual gross gambling sales and services.
(4) Effective July 1, 2008, the commission may establish an
additional fee to cover costs of reviewing company information for
publicly traded companies that are licensed or hold an ownership
interest in a licensee. The fee shall not exceed six thousand five
hundred dollars annually.
(5) Effective July 1, 2008, the commission may establish a new
individual license fee for corporate/limited liability company officers
who are not already licensed, in order to ensure individuals that
influence the operation of the organization are licensed. The fee
shall not exceed three hundred thirty-seven dollars annually.
(6) All other commission fees may be increased once in fiscal years
2008 and 2009. The increase in fiscal year 2008 shall not exceed the
fiscal growth factor of five and fifty-three one-hundredths percent,
and the increase in fiscal year 2009 shall not exceed the estimated
fiscal growth factor of five and thirty-eight one-hundredths percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---