BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.030 and 1989 c 12 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The specifications for every contract for the construction,
reconstruction, maintenance, or repair of any public work, to which the
state or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by
its laws is a party, shall contain a provision stating the hourly
minimum rate of wage, not less than the prevailing rate of wage, which
may be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics in each trade or
occupation required for such public work employed in the performance of
the contract either by the contractor, subcontractor or other person
doing or contracting to do the whole or any part of the work
contemplated by the contract, and the contract shall contain a
stipulation that such laborers, workers, or mechanics shall be paid not
less than such specified hourly minimum rate of wage.
(2) For purposes of compliance with this chapter, including
identifying certified payroll records to be requested from a contractor
or subcontractor, every contract for the construction, reconstruction,
maintenance, or repair of any public work, to which the state or any
county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws is
a party, must contain a provision requiring the general contractor to
submit a list of all subcontractors that will supply any off-site
prefabricated, nonstandard, project-specific products. The list must
identify all products supplied, the name of each subcontractor, the
employer identification number of each subcontractor, and each
product's anticipated cost.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.12.040 and 2007 c 210 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before
payment is made by or on behalf of the state, or any county,
municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, of any sum
or sums due on account of a public works contract, it shall be the duty
of the officer or person charged with the custody and disbursement of
public funds to require the contractor and each and every subcontractor
from the contractor or a subcontractor to submit to such officer a
"Statement of Intent to Pay Prevailing Wages". For a contract in
excess of ten thousand dollars, the statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages shall include:
(((a))) (i) The contractor's registration certificate number; and
(((b))) (ii) The prevailing rate of wage for each classification of
workers entitled to prevailing wages under RCW 39.12.020 and the
estimated number of workers in each classification. Each statement of
intent to pay prevailing wages must be approved by the industrial
statistician of the department of labor and industries before it is
submitted to said officer.
(b) Unless otherwise authorized by the department of labor and
industries, each voucher claim submitted by a contractor for payment on
a project estimate shall state that the prevailing wages have been paid
in accordance with the prefiled statement or statements of intent to
pay prevailing wages on file with the public agency.
(c) For purposes of compliance with this chapter, including
identifying certified payroll records to be requested from a contractor
or subcontractor, for a public works project involving the off-site
prefabrication of a nonstandard, project-specific product, before final
acceptance of the project, the awarding agency must require the
contractor or subcontractor of all such products to submit a list to
the awarding agency and to the department of labor and industries. The
list must be certified by the contractor or subcontractor and identify:
(i) The contractor or subcontractor's name; (ii) the contractor or
subcontractor's employer identification number; (iii) the contract or
subcontract amount; (iv) the labor hours expended producing the
product; and (v) hourly minimum rate of wages paid in each trade or
occupation producing the product.
(d) Following the final acceptance of a public works project, it
shall be the duty of the officer charged with the disbursement of
public funds, to require the contractor and each and every
subcontractor from the contractor or a subcontractor to submit to such
officer an "Affidavit of Wages Paid" before the funds retained
according to the provisions of RCW 60.28.010 are released to the
contractor. Each affidavit of wages paid must be certified by the
industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries
before it is submitted to said officer.
(2) As an alternate to the procedures provided for in subsection
(1) of this section, for public works projects of two thousand five
hundred dollars or less and for projects where the limited public works
process under RCW 39.04.155(3) is followed:
(a) An awarding agency may authorize the contractor or
subcontractor to submit the statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
directly to the officer or person charged with the custody or
disbursement of public funds in the awarding agency without approval by
the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries.
The awarding agency shall retain such statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages for a period of not less than three years.
(b) Upon final acceptance of the public works project, the awarding
agency shall require the contractor or subcontractor to submit an
affidavit of wages paid. Upon receipt of the affidavit of wages paid,
the awarding agency may pay the contractor or subcontractor in full,
including funds that would otherwise be retained according to the
provisions of RCW 60.28.010. Within thirty days of receipt of the
affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency shall submit the affidavit
of wages paid to the industrial statistician of the department of labor
and industries for approval.
(c) A statement of intent to pay prevailing wages and an affidavit
of wages paid shall be on forms approved by the department of labor and
industries.
(d) In the event of a wage claim and a finding for the claimant by
the department of labor and industries where the awarding agency has
used the alternative process provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, the awarding agency shall pay the wages due directly to the
claimant. If the contractor or subcontractor did not pay the wages
stated in the affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency may take
action at law to seek reimbursement from the contractor or
subcontractor of wages paid to the claimant, and may prohibit the
contractor or subcontractor from bidding on any public works contract
of the awarding agency for up to one year.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to allow an
awarding agency to subdivide any public works project of more than two
thousand five hundred dollars for the purpose of circumventing the
procedures required by ((RCW 39.12.040(1))) subsection (1) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW
to read as follows:
If an interested party makes a written request of a contractor or
subcontractor to file certified payroll records under rules regarding
payroll which have been adopted by the department of labor and
industries to enforce this chapter and the records requested are for
the off-site prefabrication of a nonstandard, project-specific product,
the contractor or subcontractor must file the certified copy of the
payroll records only with the awarding agency.

--- END ---