BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that it
is the policy of the state of Washington to prevent the loss of human
lives and the loss of property and vehicles, and to protect the
traveling environment of the state of Washington through sound and
consistent regulatory provisions for interstate and intrastate motor
carriers.
The legislature further finds and declares that it is a policy of
the state of Washington to require commercial motor vehicles operating
on state roadways to comply with rigorous federal and state safety
regulations. The legislature also finds that intrastate and interstate
commercial motor vehicles should comply with consistent state and
federal commercial vehicle rules and regulations. For interstate motor
carriers, those carriers operating in multiple states, the rules and
regulations are established through the federal code. However, for
intrastate motor carriers operating only in Washington, the rules and
regulations are established by the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state patrol must adopt rules that implement
section 395 of the federal motor carrier safety administration
regulations, relating to the hours of service for both intrastate and
interstate motor carriers. For the purpose of ensuring uniformity
between the applicable state and federal interstate and intrastate
motor carrier regulations, the patrol must update quarterly the rules
adopted under this section in order to incorporate any changes in the
applicable federal regulations.
(2) Motor carrier drivers or motor carriers, who violate the
hour-of-service rules adopted by the patrol under this section, are
subject to one or all of the following penalties and/or fines, which
may be assessed by either state or local law enforcement officials, or
both:
(a) State and local law enforcement officials may impose civil
penalties on the motor carrier driver or the motor carrier when
performing terminal audits. A motor carrier driver or motor carrier
that fails to prepare or maintain an hour of service record required by
the Washington state patrol, or prepares or maintains a required record
that is incomplete, inaccurate, or false, is subject to a maximum civil
penalty of five hundred fifty dollars for each day the violation
continues, up to five thousand five hundred fifty dollars;
(b) State and local law enforcement officials may impose fines on
the motor carrier driver or the motor carrier when performing roadside
inspections of five hundred fifty dollars for hour-of-service rule
violations which may not be reduced or eliminated. Each violation is
a separate and distinct offense.
(c) The motor carrier's safety rating may be lowered. The degree
to which the rating is lowered is dependent on the severity of the rule
violation; and/or
(d) Federal criminal penalties may be brought against: (i) Motor
carriers, who knowingly and willfully allow, or require, hours of
service that are in violation of the patrol's adopted rules; or (ii)
motor carrier drivers, who knowingly and willfully violate the hours of
service rules adopted under this section.

--- END ---