BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.600 and 1980 c 97 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person driving or in charge of a motor vehicle shall permit
it to stand unattended without first stopping the engine, locking the
ignition, removing the key and effectively setting the brake thereon
and, when standing upon any perceptible grade, turning the front wheels
to the curb or side of the highway. However, a person driving or in
charge of a motor vehicle may permit it to stand unattended with the
engine running, the ignition locked, the brake effectively set, and,
when standing upon any perceptible grade, the front wheels turned to
the curb or side of the highway, if reasonably necessary to allow
defrosting equipment to remove ice, snow, or condensation from the
motor vehicle.
(2) The most recent driver of a motor vehicle which the driver has
left standing unattended, who learns that the vehicle has become set in
motion and has struck another vehicle or property, or has caused injury
to any person, shall comply with the requirements of:
(a) RCW 46.52.010 if his vehicle strikes an unattended vehicle or
property adjacent to a public highway; or
(b) RCW 46.52.020 if his vehicle causes damage to an attended
vehicle or other property or injury to any person.
(3) Any person failing to comply with subsection (2)(b) of this
section shall be subject to the sanctions set forth in RCW 46.52.020.

--- END ---