BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.76.060 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.060 are
each amended to read as follows:
As used in RCW 9A.76.070 and 9A.76.080, "relative" means a person:
(1) Who is related as husband or wife, brother or sister, parent or
grandparent, child or grandchild, step-child or step-parent to the
person to whom criminal assistance is rendered; ((and))
(2) Who does not render criminal assistance to another person in
one or more of the means defined in subsections (4), (5), or (6) of RCW
9A.76.050; and
(3) Who was under the age of eighteen at the time of the offense.

--- END ---