BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that classified
instructional assistants are key partners with classroom teachers in
improving student achievement. Research on rigorous reading programs,
including the reading first programs in our own state, proves that when
instructional assistants are skilled, well-trained in a particular
intervention, and positively supported by the classroom teacher or
coach, they can have a significant impact on student reading
attainment. The legislature further finds that school district
practice provides sufficient evidence of the need for instructional
assistants. Statewide, school districts relied on more than nineteen
thousand classified instructional assistants, equal to nearly ten
thousand full-time equivalent staff, during the 2006-07 school year.
Therefore, the legislature intends to support instructional assistants
by providing opportunities for high quality professional development to
make them more effective partners in the classroom.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with various groups representing school district
classified employees, shall develop and offer a training strand through
the summer institutes and the winter conference targeted to classified
instructional assistants and designed to help them maximize their
effectiveness in improving student achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---