BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.300 and 2000 c 107 s 239 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project
activities if the person constructs any form of hydraulic project or
performs other work on a hydraulic project and:
(a) Fails to have a hydraulic project approval required under
chapter 77.55 RCW for such construction or work; or
(b) Violates any requirements or conditions of the hydraulic
project approval for such construction or work.
(2)(a) Except for actions involving small scale prospecting and
mining, as defined in RCW 77.55.011, that are in violation of the
requirements of an individual hydraulic permit or the gold and fish
pamphlet published by the department under RCW 77.55.091, and
violations of chapter 77.55 RCW involving small scale prospecting using
motorized equipment, unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project
activities is a gross misdemeanor.
(b) For actions involving small scale prospecting and mining, as
defined in RCW 77.55.011, that are in violation of the requirements of
an individual hydraulic permit or the gold and fish pamphlet, and
violations of chapter 77.55 RCW involving small scale prospecting using
motorized equipment, published by the department under RCW 77.55.091,
and violations of chapter 77.55 RCW involving small scale prospecting
using motorized equipment, unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project
activities is a natural resources infraction punishable under chapter
7.84 RCW.

--- END ---