BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.365.020 and 2006 c 247 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt criteria for an approved motion
picture competitiveness program with the sole purpose of revitalizing
the state's economic, cultural, and educational standing in the
national and international market of motion picture production. Rules
adopted by the department shall allow the program, within the
established criteria, to provide funding assistance only when it
captures economic opportunities for Washington's communities and
businesses and shall only be provided under a contractual arrangement
with a private entity. In establishing the criteria, the department
shall consider:
(a) The additional income and tax revenue to be retained in the
state for general purposes;
(b) The creation and retention of family wage jobs which provide
health insurance and payments into a retirement plan;
(c) The impact of motion picture projects to maximize in-state
labor and the use of in-state film production and film postproduction
companies;
(d) The impact upon the local economies and the state economy as a
whole, including multiplier effects;
(e) The intangible impact on the state and local communities that
comes with motion picture projects;
(f) The regional, national, and international competitiveness of
the motion picture filming industry;
(g) The revitalization of the state as a premier venue for motion
picture production and national television commercial campaigns;
(h) Partnerships with the private sector to bolster film production
in the state and serve as an educational and cultural purpose for its
citizens;
(i) The vitality of the state's motion picture industry as a
necessary and critical factor in promoting the state as a premier
tourist and cultural destination;
(j) Giving preference to additional seasons of television series
that have previously qualified;
(k) Other factors the department may deem appropriate for the
implementation of this chapter.
(2) The board of directors created under RCW 43.365.030 shall
create and administer an account for carrying out the purposes of
subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Money received by an approved motion picture competitiveness
program shall be used only for: (a) Health insurance and payments into
a retirement plan, and other costs associated with film production; (b)
a tax credit marketer to market the tax credits authorized under RCW
82.04.4489; and (c) staff and related expenses to maintain the
program's proper administration and operation.
(4) Maximum funding assistance from an approved motion picture
competitiveness program is limited to an amount up to twenty percent of
the total actual investment in the state of at least:
(a) ((Twenty percent of a total actual investment in the state of
at least)) Five hundred thousand dollars((,)) for a single feature film
produced in Washington state;
(b) ((Twenty percent of a total actual investment in the state of
at least)) Three hundred thousand dollars per television episode
produced in Washington state; or
(c) ((Twenty percent of a total actual investment in the state of
at least two)) One hundred fifty thousand dollars for an infomercial or
television commercial associated with a national or regional
advertisement campaign produced in Washington state.
(5) ((No single motion picture production or episodic television
project may be awarded an amount greater than one million dollars from
an approved motion picture competitiveness program.
(6))) Funding assistance approval must be determined by the
approved motion picture competitiveness program within a maximum of
thirty calendar days from when the application is received, if the
application is submitted after August 15, 2006.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.365.030 and 2006 c 247 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A Washington motion picture competitiveness program under this
chapter shall be administered by a board of directors appointed by the
governor, and the appointments shall be made within sixty days
following enactment. The department, after consulting with the board,
shall adopt rules for the standards that shall be used to evaluate the
applications for funding assistance prior to June 30, 2006.
(2) The board shall evaluate and award financial assistance to
motion picture projects under rules set forth under RCW 43.365.020.
(3) The board shall consist of the following members:
(a) One member representing the Washington motion picture
production industry;
(b) One member representing the Washington motion picture
postproduction industry;
(c) Two members representing labor unions affiliated with
Washington motion picture production;
(d) One member representing the Washington visitors and convention
bureaus;
(e) One member representing the Washington tourism industry;
(f) One member representing the Washington restaurant, hotel, and
airline industry; and
(g) A chairperson, chosen at large, shall serve at the pleasure of
the governor.
(4) The term of the board members, other than the chair, is four
years, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(5) The governor shall appoint board members in 2010 to two-year or
four-year staggered terms. Once the initial two-year or four-year
terms expire, all subsequent terms shall be for four years. The terms
of the initial board members shall be as follows:
(a) The board positions in subsection (3)(b), (d), and (f) of this
section, and one position from subsection (3)(c) of this section shall
be appointed to two-year terms; and
(b) The remaining board positions in subsection (3) of this section
shall be appointed to four-year terms.
(6) A board member appointed by the governor may be removed by the
governor for cause under RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080.
(((5))) (7) Five members of the board constitute a quorum.
(((6))) (8) The board shall elect a treasurer and secretary
annually, and other officers as the board members determine necessary,
and may adopt bylaws or rules for its own government.
(((7))) (9) The board shall make any information available at the
request of the department to administer this chapter.
(((8))) (10) Contributions received by a board shall be deposited
into the account described in RCW 43.365.020(2).

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.4489 and 2006 c 247 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, a credit is allowed
against the tax imposed under this chapter for contributions made by a
person to a Washington motion picture competitiveness program.
(2) The person must make the contribution before claiming a credit
authorized under this section. Credits earned under this section may
be claimed against taxes due for the calendar year in which the
contribution is made. The amount of credit claimed for a reporting
period shall not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
that reporting period. No person may claim more than one million
dollars of credit in any calendar year, including credit carried over
from a previous calendar year. No refunds may be granted for any
unused credits.
(3) The maximum credit that may be earned for each calendar year
under this section for a person is limited to the lesser of((:
(a))) one million dollars((;)) or
(((b)(i) Through calendar year 2008,)) an amount equal to one
hundred percent of the contributions made by the person to a program
during the calendar year((; and
(ii) For calendar years after 2008, an amount equal to ninety
percent of the contributions made by the person to a program during the
calendar year)).
(4) Except as provided under subsection (5) of this section, a tax
credit claimed under this section may not be carried over to another
year.
(5) Any amount of tax credit otherwise allowable under this section
not claimed by the person in any calendar year may be carried over and
claimed against the person's tax liability for the next succeeding
calendar year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding
calendar year may be carried forward and claimed against the person's
tax liability for the second succeeding calendar year; and any credit
not used in that second succeeding calendar year may be carried over
and claimed against the person's tax liability for the third succeeding
calendar year, but may not be carried over for any calendar year
thereafter.
(6) Credits are available on a first in-time basis. The department
shall disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the
total amount of credits claimed under this section during any calendar
year to exceed ((three)) ten million ((five hundred thousand)) dollars.
If this limitation is reached, the department shall notify all
Washington motion picture competitiveness programs that the annual
statewide limit has been met. In addition, the department shall
provide written notice to any person who has claimed tax credits in
excess of the ((three)) ten million ((five hundred thousand)) dollar
limitation in this subsection. The notice shall indicate the amount of
tax due and shall provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from
the date of such notice. The department shall not assess penalties and
interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the
initial notice if the amount due is paid by the due date specified in
the notice, or any extension thereof.
(7) To claim a credit under this section, a person must
electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any
other information required by the department, in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(8) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section.
(9) A Washington motion picture competitiveness program shall
provide to the department, upon request, such information needed to
verify eligibility for credit under this section, including information
regarding contributions received by the program.
(10) The department shall not allow any credit under this section
before July 1, 2006.
(11) For the purposes of this section, "Washington motion picture
competitiveness program" or "program" means an organization established
pursuant to chapter 43.365 RCW.
(12) No credit may be earned for contributions made on or after
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---