BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.180.160 and 2006 c 262 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The total amount of outstanding indebtedness of the commission may
not exceed ((four)) six and one-half billion dollars at any time. The
calculation of outstanding indebtedness shall include the initial
principal amount of an issue and shall not include interest that is
either currently payable or that accrues as a part of the face amount
of an issue payable at maturity or earlier redemption. Outstanding
indebtedness shall not include notes or bonds as to which the
obligation of the commission has been satisfied and discharged by
refunding or for which payment has been provided by reserves or
otherwise.

--- END ---