BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that while state and
local governments invest billions of dollars per year in infrastructure
development and rehabilitation through numerous programs, there is no
overall strategy guiding our state's infrastructure investments. The
legislature also finds that the state often undertakes significant new
policy initiatives that impact how infrastructure funds are spent,
without identifying funding needs or sources necessary to achieve the
policy objectives. Therefore, the legislature finds that a statewide
infrastructure investment strategy is necessary to provide policy
direction for our infrastructure investments and to identify sufficient
and sustainable funding for infrastructure investments that will help
the state achieve its policy priorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The office of financial management, in
consultation with the joint legislative infrastructure oversight
committee on a statewide infrastructure investment strategy created in
section 3 of this act, is directed to develop a twenty-year statewide
infrastructure investment strategy to provide policy direction for
state infrastructure investments and identify sufficient and
sustainable funding for investments needed to implement policy
initiatives of the state. The strategy must provide the following:
(1) Identify the state's financial responsibility for
infrastructure investment necessary to achieve the state's policy goals
and obligations over the next twenty years relating to:
(a) Basic infrastructure;
(b) Housing to accommodate growth;
(c) Economic development;
(d) Transportation mobility and congestion relief;
(e) Parks and recreational facilities;
(f) Open space and the environment;
(g) K-12 and higher education;
(h) Community development and arts facilities;
(i) Historic and cultural sites; and
(j) Criminal justice and public safety;
(2) Identify appropriate funding sources and forecasted revenues
during the next twenty years for infrastructure investments identified
in categories outlined in subsection (1)(a) through (j) of this
section;
(3) In the event available funding falls short of identified need,
identify potential new funding sources to meet the twenty-year funding
need;
(4) Determine whether existing state infrastructure funding
programs appropriately reflect and support the achievement of the
state's policy goals and obligations for the infrastructure categories
identified in subsection (1)(a) through (j) of this section; and
(5) Make appropriate recommendations for either restructuring state
infrastructure funding assistance programs or creating new programs, or
both, to help meet state policy goals and obligations. Recommendations
must include criteria necessary for eligibility to receive funding
assistance for each state infrastructure funding assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The joint legislative infrastructure
oversight committee on a statewide infrastructure investment strategy
is created. The committee consists of the chair and ranking minority
member of the following legislative committees:
(a) The senate ways and means committee;
(b) The house of representatives capital budget committee; and
(c) The senate and house of representatives transportation
committees.
(2) The office of financial management and the joint legislative
infrastructure oversight committee on a statewide infrastructure
investment strategy must produce a progress report by December 1, 2008,
for review by the appropriate standing committees of the legislature.
During 2009, the office of financial management and the committee shall
conduct public meetings with stakeholders to solicit input on the final
report. The final report must be completed and submitted to the
senate, the house of representatives, and the office of financial
management by December 1, 2009.

--- END ---