BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) This chapter will protect our urban environment and help with
the recovery of threatened salmon within urban areas.
(2) Creek systems connect urban neighborhoods with the natural
environment. Creek systems should be a top priority for our
environmental stewardship because they provide salmon and wildlife
habitat and open space.
(3) The degradation of creeks in our urban areas has reduced their
flood-carrying capacity, resulting in severe damage to downstream
properties and to critical fish and wildlife habitat, threatening the
extinction of salmon within urban creeks.
(4) This flooding impact is especially severe when creek segments
are directed into underground pipes rather than through natural, open
channels. In most circumstances, the pipes also create fish passage
barriers, which are illegal and must be removed under state law.
(5) Removing a creek from an underground pipe and redirecting it
into a natural, open channel abates the ongoing harm by restoring the
creek's flood-carrying capacity, water quality benefits, and fish and
wildlife habitat. A creek's historic channel contains soils uniquely
suited for flood control, and a creek should be redirected into its
historic channel if available.
(6) This chapter requires private property owners to restore creeks
only when carrying out major creekside development. This is required
to abate ongoing impacts and to mitigate the direct, indirect, and
cumulative impacts of major creekside development, which include
increased impervious surfaces, pollution, lighting, noise, trampling,
pollution, and shading.
(7) This chapter will reduce ongoing flooding and property damage
caused by creek degradation. It will also restore fish and wildlife
habitat and remove fish passage barriers. Thus, this chapter is
necessary to protect the public health, safety, and welfare and is
authorized under Article XI, section 11 of the state Constitution, as
well as through specific authority under RCW 35.21.090 and elsewhere in
state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adjacent" means a creek or its buffers are beneath a right-of-way abutting the parcel.
(2) "Buffer" means the buffer required under local or state law.
For a creek that is underground or being daylighted, buffers must be a
minimum of fifty feet wide on each side of the creek, except that
buffer averaging is allowed.
(3) "City" means a city with a population of five hundred thousand
or greater.
(4) "Creek" includes any stream or watercourse located in a city
with a population of five hundred thousand or greater that flows year-round or potentially supports or historically supported salmonids.
This definition applies equally to portions of a creek that have been
placed in a pipe or culvert, or that have been relocated, straightened,
channelized, or otherwise altered, and applies regardless of whether
the watercourse is regulated by the city's critical areas ordinance or
shorelines master program.
(5) "Daylighting" means restoring a creek segment that was
previously directed into a pipe or drainage or sewer system by
redirecting it into a natural, open channel.
(6) "Development" means development or redevelopment.
(7) "Development approval" includes any permit, master use permit,
or other approval required as a condition of changing the use of the
property or constructing any structure on the property.
(8) "Fish passage barrier" includes (a) any culvert failing to meet
the standards under WAC 220-110-070(3) or (b) any other impediment to
fish passage. This determination assumes the removal of downstream
man-made fish passage barriers.
(9) "Floodable wetland bench" or "floodway" is a strip of wetland
bordering a creek channel that is designed to inundate during high
stream flows to provide shelter to fish and decrease downstream
flooding.
(10) "Long-term creek restoration plan" means a plan that, at a
minimum, has the following components:
(a) The city's objectives for creek restoration, including at a
minimum the policies set forth in section 7 of this act;
(b) A plan, timeline, and identification of funding source for
accelerating the city's creek restoration programs and implementing the
policies set forth in section 7 of this act;
(c) A plan and eighteen-month timeline during which the city must
evaluate strategies and adopt regulations to further reduce storm water
pollution and impacts to creek ecosystems. Strategies to be evaluated
include requirements of low-impact development, pervious pavement,
increased buffer widths, wetland restoration, increased use of
infiltration, and restrictions on pesticide and fertilizer on parcels
draining to creeks;
(d) A plan and eighteen-month timeline during which the city must
update existing creek protection regulations, including critical areas
regulations and shoreline master programs;
(e) A plan and eighteen-month timeline during which the city must
phase out the use of pesticides, herbicides, and fungicides on city-owned land within two hundred feet of creeks;
(f) A plan and twenty-year timeline for daylighting creeks on parks
and other public property;
(g) A plan, regulatory framework, and long-term timeline for
daylighting creeks on private property;
(h) A plan and timeline for conducting education and outreach to
creekside property owners concerning creek and riparian function and
best management practices; and
(i) A plan and timeline for specific and proactive joint planning
and information exchange with other political jurisdictions sharing
responsibilities for creeks that flow entirely or partly within the
city.
Where an existing city program or document satisfies one or more of
these requirements, the program or document may be incorporated into
the plan by reference.
(11) "Major creekside development" means a project that satisfies
each of the following criteria:
(a) A commercial, multifamily residential, mixed-use, or light or
heavy industrial development, subdivision, or short plat that exceeds
the state environmental policy act (chapter 43.21C RCW) exemption
thresholds set forth in city ordinance;
(b) Proposed on a parcel having a combined area of over one-half
acre; and
(c) At least one such parcel or right-of-way contains a creek or
its buffer or is adjacent to a creek or its buffer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The city shall adopt a long-term creek
restoration plan.
(1) Within six months after the effective date of this section, the
city shall prepare a draft long-term creek restoration plan. The city
shall involve the public and interested organizations in creating the
draft plan and shall consider public comments and any existing
watershed plans. The city shall hold public meetings and solicit
comments from the public and interested organizations on the draft plan
and shall adopt a final plan within twelve months after the effective
date of this section.
(2) The goal of the long-term creek restoration plan is to adopt
objectives and timelines for restoring creeks and carrying out the
policies and directives of this chapter.
(3) The city shall restore creeks in accordance with the long-term
creek restoration plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Developers are required to assist in creek
restoration when building a major creekside development.
(1) Applicants proposing a major creekside development are required
to restore the creek running on or adjacent to the development site,
satisfying the requirements of section 6 of this act. This requirement
must be stated as a condition on any development approval issued to the
project. The city shall decide whether such restoration will be
carried out by the applicant under the city's supervision or through a
city effort funded by the applicant, and shall support the project
consistent with subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Each applicant for a major development on creekside property
shall submit a creek restoration plan as part of its application for
development approval. That plan must include a city-approved
engineering plan for conducting the restoration required by this
chapter concurrent with the development, and the basis for any
exemptions requested under section 6(2) of this act. Any public notice
issued regarding the major development shall elicit comments on the
restoration plan and its consistency with this chapter.
(3) The department of fish and wildlife shall coordinate the
restoration efforts required by this section and the city shall
contribute to such projects to the extent necessary to avoid a
constitutional taking of private property and as deemed appropriate to
create incentives for restoration. At a minimum, the city shall ensure
that development potential on the site is not lost due to the
restoration project and shall grant open space credit. The city may
also purchase the creek corridor and/or provide loan financing, grants,
or other valuable benefit such as density bonuses to support the
restoration project to the extent deemed appropriate and allowed by
law. The city and the developer should agree upon ownership and
maintenance responsibilities for the restored creek, and wherever
possible the restored creek should be transferred to public ownership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The city shall ensure that creeks are
restored concurrently with major creekside development.
(1) In the event that the city should fail to enforce section 4 of
this act, for whatever reason, the city shall carry out creek
restoration as defined in section 6 of this act concurrently with any
major creekside development. In accomplishing this, the city shall use
all of its authority, including that under RCW 35.21.090. The city
shall in such event prepare and solicit comments on the creek
restoration plan as set forth in section 4(2) of this act.
(2) A creek that is directed through a pipe or that contains a fish
passage barrier satisfies the definition of a natural watercourse that
is obstructed, broken, inoperative, inadequate, and liable to cause
damage to public or private property. To the extent allowed by law,
the city shall require a property owner to either daylight such a creek
or remove such a barrier, or both, during a major creekside
development, or after giving required notice shall carry out the same
and bill the costs to the property owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) For the purposes of sections 4 and 5 of
this act, restoration required during major creekside development
includes:
(a) Planting native vegetation and removing invasive species;
(b) Within the creek buffers, establishing wetland areas, floodable
wetland benches, or other means to slow the rate of water, unless
topography or other existing structures make such restoration
impractical;
(c) Removal of fish passage barriers, if such barriers exist on or
adjacent to the development site; and
(d) Daylighting the creek on the development site, if the creek
presently flows through a pipe or culvert section fifty feet or longer,
exclusive of a right-of-way crossing, that is either:
(i) On the development site; or
(ii) Under a street or right-of-way adjacent to the site, if the
creek's channel was on the development site at any time prior to being
moved to its present location.
The creek must be daylighted for the entire length in which it runs
on or adjacent to the development site, except that daylighting is not
required where it is necessary that the creek cross a right-of-way or
an existing structure that is to remain as part of the development.
(2) The city or a private party may obtain an exemption from the
requirements of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section by proving
either (a) that the creek segment in question, if restored as required
under this section, would have insufficient surface area and/or flow to
provide rearing or refugia habitat for juvenile salmonids, assuming
removal of downstream man-made fish passage barriers; or (b) that so
much of the creek downstream is in pipes that the segment in question
will as a practical matter never become accessible to salmonids.
(3) Any party wishing to apply for an exemption under this section
must submit with the creek restoration plan a written opinion from the
department of fish and wildlife certifying that this exemption standard
is met, based upon best available science, and pay the costs for such
an opinion. Public comment must be solicited on the exemption request.
The granting of such an exemption is appealable to the superior court.
In such appeal, the parties supporting the exemption shall bear the
burden of proving that the standards for granting an exemption are met
based upon clear and convincing evidence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following applies to cities with a
population of five hundred thousand or greater:
(1) Creeks and their buffers must be restored as a means to reduce
flood damage to downstream property and to fish and wildlife habitat
and to promote salmon recovery.
(2) In the few instances where creeks are being directed through
underground pipes, the creek shall be redirected into a natural, open
channel, except where it crosses a public right-of-way.
(3) The opportunity to restore and daylight a creek on private
property comes very infrequently, usually only during a major creekside
development. A city must take advantage of these rare opportunities by
ensuring that creeks are restored and daylighted during major creekside
development.
(4) The city shall protect the opportunity to restore creeks by
prohibiting any future development over creeks or their buffers.
(5) Where a creek was previously removed from its historic corridor
and diverted into a pipe at a location where it cannot be restored
(e.g., a location now covered by a building or road) or into a storm
water or sewage system, the city shall protect the opportunity to
restore the creek by prohibiting any future development over the
creek's historic corridor or, if requested by the parcel owner, an
alternative corridor on that same parcel.
(6) The city should increase floodable wetland benches (floodways)
in creeks to reduce downstream flooding impacts and enhance habitat.
(7) The city shall remove fish passage barriers from creeks.
(8) The city shall provide for the education of property owners on
maintaining creek and riparian function.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Development may not be allowed to preclude
future creek restoration. Under this chapter, creek restoration is a
long-term strategy, except where required to be concurrent with major
development. To preserve the potential to restore all creeks in the
future, the city shall grant no development approval that is
inconsistent with the policy stated in section 7 (4) or (5) of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The intent of this chapter is to
accelerate the restoration of creeks within a city. This accelerated
restoration effort shall supplement existing creek restoration programs
of the city, which shall be maintained at least at their current
levels.
(2) The city shall create a creek restoration account to fund the
costs of this chapter. Within six months after the effective date of
this section, the city shall complete a study of new revenue sources
available to fund the creek restoration account. Within three months
after the study's completion, the city shall adopt the funding
mechanisms it finds most appropriate.
(3) The additional cost to be incurred by the public shall not be
greater than five dollars per household per year within a city required
to comply with this chapter. Property owners, businesses, and
institutions are also required to assist in funding the creek
restoration account, and such a contribution shall also be reasonably
limited. This new revenue source and the funds in the account may be
used to finance bonds for creek restoration projects to the extent
deemed appropriate and allowed by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Within six months after the effective date
of this section, a city required to comply with this chapter must
prepare a supplemental environmental impact statement for its
comprehensive plan that specifically addresses the impact of ongoing
development and city activities on creeks. It shall evaluate the
impact of increased impervious surfaces, lighting, noise, trampling,
pollutants, storm water runoff, and shading, and shall serve as a basis
for requiring mitigation of creek impacts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The legislature declares that this
chapter responds to an emergency posed by ongoing flooding, property
damage, and environmental impacts of degraded and piped creeks. This
requires abatement of these ongoing impacts. Thus, the restoration
requirements imposed by this chapter cannot be defeated by vested
rights.
(2) Notwithstanding any court construction of subsection (1) of
this section, the following vesting rule is enacted by this section.
Applications for a major creekside development, as defined in this
chapter, shall vest upon submission of a fully complete building
application, which shall be construed strictly, and shall at a minimum
satisfy the requirements of RCW 19.27.095 and shall also include a
creek restoration plan as required by this chapter, a storm water
management plan, and a plan for complying with the federal clean water
act, the federal endangered species act, and all other applicable
environmental laws. This subsection applies notwithstanding the
previous issuance of a master use permit, general development plan, or
site plan approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The mandates of this chapter create
nondiscretionary duties for the city and its agencies, and any resident
of the state or organization has standing to seek enforcement of this
chapter by mandamus or other action. If the city is found to be in
violation of the mandates of this chapter or to have issued any
development approval or exemption that is inconsistent with this
chapter, the party bringing the action to enforce this chapter is
entitled to recover only the reasonable costs and attorneys' fees
incurred in maintaining such an action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This chapter is to be liberally construed
to advance the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 14 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

--- END ---