BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.32.215 and 2003 c 57 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant holding a valid license and currently engaged in
practice in another state may be granted a license without examination
required by this chapter, on the payment of any required fees, if the
applicant:
(a) Is a graduate of a dental college, school, or dental department
of an institution approved by the commission under RCW 18.32.040(1); or
(b)(i) Has practiced in another state for at least five years; and
(ii) Has completed a one-year postdoctoral residency approved by
the commission.
(2) The commission may also require the applicant to: (((1))) (a)
File with the commission documentation certifying the applicant is
licensed to practice in another state; and (((2))) (b) provide
information as the commission deems necessary pertaining to the
conditions and criteria of the Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130
RCW, and to demonstrate to the commission a knowledge of Washington law
pertaining to the practice of dentistry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.32 RCW
to read as follows:
By November 15, 2009, the commission shall report to the governor
and the legislature with recommendations for appropriate standards for
issuing a license to a foreign-trained dentist. The recommendations
shall consider the balance between maintaining assurances that
Washington's dental professionals are well-qualified and planning for
an adequate supply of dentists to meet the future needs of Washington's
diverse urban and rural communities. In addition to considering the
use of standards established by accreditation organizations, the
recommendations shall consider other options to reduce barriers to
licensure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2010.

--- END ---