BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that lead hazards
associated with lead-containing consumer products represent a
significant and preventable environmental health problem. Lead
negatively affects every system of the body. It is harmful to
individuals of all ages and is especially harmful to children and
adults of childbearing age. The effects of lead on a child's
cognitive, behavioral, and developmental abilities may necessitate
large expenditures of public funds for health care and special
education. The irreversible damage to children and subsequent
expenditures could be avoided if exposure to lead is reduced. When
consumers are provided with more and accurate information about
products, consumers may better choose products that they feel will
provide the best benefit to them individually, and the marketplace
works more efficiently.
(2) For the welfare of the people of the state of Washington, this
chapter establishes labeling requirements for lead-containing consumer
products to help educate the general public regarding its exposure to
lead.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Consumer" means an individual who seeks to obtain, obtains, or
has obtained a lead-containing consumer product from a retailer that is
to be used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(4) "Lead-containing consumer product" means a product, commodity,
chemical, or compound that contains lead and is being sold to a
consumer for personal, family, or household use. "Lead-containing
consumer product" includes products with a component that contains lead
or a lead compound.
(5) "Manufacturer" includes any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture that produces a lead-containing consumer product or an importer
or domestic distributor of a lead-containing consumer product produced
in a foreign country. In the case of a multicomponent product
containing lead, the manufacturer is the last manufacturer to produce
or assemble the product. If the multicomponent product containing lead
is produced in a foreign country, the manufacturer is the importer or
domestic distributor.
(6) "Package" means the immediate container or wrapping in which
any product is contained for marketing, protecting, handling, or for
use by consumers, and also means any outer container or wrapping used
in the retail display of such a product to consumers.
(7) "Retailer" means a retailer of a lead-containing consumer
product.
(8) "Wholesaler" means every person who purchases, sells, or
distributes lead-containing consumer products to retailers for the
purpose of resale only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Nothing in this chapter should be
interpreted to apply when in conflict with federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Effective January 1, 2010, a
manufacturer or wholesaler may not sell a lead-containing consumer
product at retail in this state, to a retailer in this state, or for
use in this state, unless the lead-containing consumer product is
labeled according to the guidelines listed under subsection (2) of this
section. However, this section does not apply to: (a) Lead-containing
consumer products that contain less than four one-hundredths percent
lead; (b) ammunition and ammunition components; (c) lead-containing
consumer products that are under one-half inch in all dimensions; (d)
lead- containing consumer products in which the lead portion of the
product does not come into human contact during normal use; (e) fishing
gear; or (f) any lead-containing consumer product that is in compliance
with (i) the provisions of directive 2002.95/EC of the European Union,
adopted by the European parliament and council of the European Union on
January 27, 2003; and (ii) the decisions of the technical adaptation
committee established by directive 2002.95/EC that have been issued as
of the effective date of this section.
(2) A lead-containing consumer product is considered properly
labeled under this section if it has:
(a) A label that states the percentage content of lead in a minimum
ten-point font affixed on the outer portion of the package viewable to
consumers at time of purchase, or, if the lead-containing consumer
product is not contained in a package, then affixed directly onto the
lead-containing consumer product (for example, if the lead-containing
consumer product contains eight percent lead, the label must state
"eight percent lead content"); and
(b) An imprint directly on the lead-containing consumer product
that identifies the percentage content of lead in a minimum ten-point
font.
(3) The responsibility for affixing labels and the imprint required
under this section is on the manufacturer and not on the wholesaler or
retailer.
(4) Nothing in this section restricts the ability of a
manufacturer, importer, or domestic distributor from transporting
products through the state or storing products in the state for later
distribution outside the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer may
not remove from a lead-containing consumer product any label or imprint
affixed to it that relates in whole or part to lead or lead hazards and
which label is required by this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A violation of this chapter or any rule
adopted under this chapter is punishable by a civil penalty not to
exceed one thousand dollars for each violation in the case of a first
violation. Repeat violators are liable for a civil penalty not to
exceed five thousand dollars for each repeat violation. Penalties
collected under this section must be deposited in the state toxics
control account created in RCW 70.105D.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department may adopt rules to implement
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---