BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
preserve and promote a safe and beneficial learning environment for all
students while also balancing each student's right to be free from
unreasonable use of physical restraint. The legislature recognizes
that a truly beneficial learning environment is dependent on the
quality of the interaction between staff, students, and parents and is
fostered through the development of a sense of community within the
school. The legislature acknowledges that school district boards of
directors may find it necessary to employ school security personnel or
to rely upon school resource officers in order to preserve a safe and
beneficial learning environment within certain schools. The
legislature finds that the establishment of appropriate student
discipline policies, security models, and training requirements, which
stress techniques meant to diffuse anger, de-escalate conflict, and
reduce violent behavior within the school, through use of
research-based, school-wide, positive behavior intervention supports,
will help to further a quality learning environment where all students
are treated with dignity and respect. The legislature further finds
that use of physical restraint as an intervention in the school
environment should be used only in emergency situations after other
less intensive alternatives have failed or have been deemed
inappropriate and, if used, should only be used by appropriately
trained personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Chemical restraint" means the use of force or physical
intervention to control a student or limit a student's freedom of
movement through the use of pepper spray or the administration of any
medication for the purpose of restraining the student.
(b) "Mechanical restraint" means the use of force or physical
intervention to control a student or limit a student's freedom of
movement through the use of a mechanical device including, but not
limited to, metal handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather
cuffs, other hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons.
(c) "Physical restraint" means the use of bodily force or physical
intervention to control a student or limit a student's freedom of
movement in a way that does not involve a mechanical restraint or
chemical restraint.
(d) "School resource officer" means a commissioned law enforcement
officer who provides security and law enforcement services at one or
more public schools under the direction of a school administrator.
(e) "School security officer" means a person other than a
commissioned law enforcement officer who provides security services at
one or more public schools under the direction of a school
administrator.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the use
of mechanical or chemical restraint on students in the public schools
is prohibited.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the use
of physical restraint on students in the public schools is limited to
the use of reasonable force under the following circumstances only:
(a) The student's behavior poses a threat of imminent, serious,
physical harm to property, to self, or to others; and
(b) Nonphysical interventions would not be effective in removing
the imminent threat of harm.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the use
of physical restraint in the public schools is prohibited in the
following circumstances:
(a) As a means of punishment; or
(b) As a disciplinary response to destruction of school property,
disruption of school or classroom order, noncompliance with a school
rule or staff directive, or communication of a verbal threat that does
not constitute a threat of imminent, serious, physical harm.
(5) This section does not prohibit:
(a) The right of any individual to report to appropriate
authorities a crime committed by a student or other individual;
(b) Commissioned law enforcement officers, including school
resource officers, or judicial authorities from exercising their
authority or executing their responsibilities, including the physical
detainment of a student or other person; or
(c) A school security officer from using metal handcuffs or plastic
ties to restrain a student while awaiting the arrival of a commissioned
law enforcement officer under the following circumstances only:
(i) The student's behavior poses a threat of imminent, serious,
physical harm to property, to self, or to others; and
(ii) Nonphysical interventions would not be effective in removing
the imminent threat of harm.
(6) Each school district shall establish a written policy regarding
the use of physical, mechanical, or chemical restraint that is
available to students and parents or guardians. The policy shall
include at a minimum:
(a) A description and explanation of the methods of restraint
authorized at the school;
(b) A description of the school's training requirements for those
authorized to use physical, mechanical, or chemical restraints; and
(c) Incident reporting requirements and the follow-up procedures
used when physical, mechanical, or chemical restraint is used on a
student including what must be included in a written report of the
incident and the timeline for when the student's parents or guardians
will be informed of the incident and manner by which the information
will be provided to parents or guardians.
(7) School districts shall report annually to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction:
(a) The total number of instances when physical restraint was used,
including:
(i) The type of restraint used, including the holds used;
(ii) The duration of the restraint if longer than five minutes;
(iii) A brief description or classification of the activity that
was the cause of the restraint;
(iv) The program staff member who administered the restraint;
(v) Whether the restraint resulted in any injury to the student or
staff member;
(vi) What additional disciplinary action was taken towards the
student; and
(vii) The age, grade, sex, race, and distinct ethnic category
within the racial subgroup of the restrained student;
(b) The total number of instances when mechanical restraint was
used, including:
(i) The type of mechanical restraint device used;
(ii) The duration of the restraint if longer than five minutes;
(iii) A brief description or classification of the activity that
was the cause of the restraint;
(iv) The program staff member who administered the restraint;
(v) Whether the restraint resulted in any injury to the student or
staff member;
(vi) What additional disciplinary action was taken towards the
student; and
(vii) The age, grade, sex, race, and distinct ethnic category
within the racial subgroup of the restrained student;
(c) The total number of instances when chemical restraint was used,
including:
(i) The type of chemical restraint device used;
(ii) The duration of the restraint if longer than five minutes;
(iii) A brief description or classification of the activity that
was the cause of the restraint;
(iv) The program staff member who administered the restraint;
(v) Whether the restraint resulted in any injury to the student or
staff member;
(vi) What additional disciplinary action was taken towards the
student; and
(vii) The age, grade, sex, race, and distinct ethnic category
within the racial subgroup of the restrained student.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to be inconsistent
with chapter 28A.155 RCW, Section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act
of 1973 as amended (29 U.S.C. 794), or the rules and regulations
adopted thereunder.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.400.110 and 1997 c 266 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within each school the school principal shall determine that
appropriate student discipline is established and enforced. In order
to assist the principal in carrying out the intent of this section, the
principal ((and)), the certificated employees, and school security
officers and school resource officers as defined in section 2 of this
act in a school building shall confer at least annually in order to
develop and/or review building disciplinary standards and uniform
enforcement of those standards. Such building standards shall be
consistent with the provisions of RCW 28A.600.020(3).
School principals ((and)), certificated employees, and classified
employees who have contact with students shall also confer annually, to
establish criteria for determining when certificated employees, and
classified employees who have contact with students, must complete
classes to improve classroom management skills, including the use of
research-based, school-wide, positive behavior intervention supports.

--- END ---