BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that schools are
increasingly required to play an expanding role in protecting our
children's health and that school nurses play a pivotal role in
improving the health and education success of school-age children.
Current data from the office of the superintendent of public
instruction indicates the statewide average ratio of nurses to students
is one to two thousand six hundred fifty.
Certificated school nurses are increasingly responsible for the
health and well-being of students including medically fragile students.
The Legislature finds that:
(1) Peanut allergies in children have doubled in the five-year
period covering 1997-2002;
(2) The number of asthmatic students has increased over four
percent per year; and
(3) Diabetes type 2 is currently described as a new epidemic
affecting the American pediatric population with a thirty-three percent
increase in prevalence in the past ten years.
The legislature further finds that the need for injections,
administering prescription medicines, creating and maintaining safe
school environments, providing mandatory health education, health
screening, and immunizations, delivering early intervention services,
designing wellness-driven programs, and providing vital medical
services to students with chronic and acute illnesses are crucial to
the health and well-being of all students. This is in addition to the
increasing list of duties and responsibilities school nurses are
required to perform. Current nurse staffing must be improved in order
to ensure the safety and health of all students.
The legislature finds that each school district has unique
challenges to provide the level of support needed to safely meet the
needs of students with special health care needs. Smaller, rural,
isolated communities may be challenged to obtain or keep a nurse when
offering only a part-time position. In addition, districts need
additional support and technical assistance at a regional level as
individual student health needs increase and policies regarding the
care of those students change.
The legislature finds that unless students are healthy, they cannot
learn to their maximum potential. Studies show that an adequate nurse-to-student staffing ratio requires one nurse per seven hundred fifty
students. Therefore, in order to adequately attend to the increasing
health care needs of students, the legislature intends to create a
nurse-to-student ratio of one to seven hundred fifty.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2006 c 263 s 322 are each amended to
read as follows:
The basic education allocation for each annual average full time
equivalent student shall be determined in accordance with the following
procedures:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula based on a ratio of students
to staff for the distribution of a basic education allocation for each
annual average full time equivalent student enrolled in a common
school. The distribution formula shall have the primary objective of
equalizing educational opportunities and shall provide appropriate
recognition of the following costs among the various districts within
the state:
(a) Certificated instructional staff and their related costs;
(b) Certificated administrative staff and their related costs;
(c) Classified staff and their related costs;
(d) Nonsalary costs;
(e) Extraordinary costs, including school facilities, of remote and
necessary schools as judged by the superintendent of public
instruction, with recommendations from the school facilities citizen
advisory panel under RCW 28A.525.025, and small high schools, including
costs of additional certificated and classified staff; and
(f) The attendance of students pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and
28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district.
(2)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall
be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature. The formula shall be for allocation
purposes only. While the legislature intends that the allocations for
additional instructional staff be used to increase the ratio of such
staff to students, nothing in this section shall require districts to
reduce the number of administrative staff below existing levels.
(b) The formula adopted by the legislature shall reflect the
following ratios at a minimum: (i) Forty-nine certificated
instructional staff to one thousand annual average full time equivalent
students enrolled in grades kindergarten through three; (ii) forty-six
certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average full
time equivalent students in grades four through twelve; (iii) four
certificated administrative staff to one thousand annual average full
time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through twelve; ((and))
(iv) sixteen and sixty-seven one-hundredths classified personnel to one
thousand annual average full time equivalent students enrolled in
grades kindergarten through twelve; and (v) by the 2013-14 school year,
a ratio of one certificated nurse per seven hundred fifty full-time
equivalent students provided solely for that purpose, phased-in over
five years commencing with the 2008-09 school year, in accordance with
distribution provisions specified in the omnibus state appropriations
act.
(c) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect: PROVIDED, That the distribution formula developed
pursuant to this section shall be for state apportionment and
equalization purposes only and shall not be construed as mandating
specific operational functions of local school districts other than
those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 and
28A.150.100. The enrollment of any district shall be the annual
average number of full time equivalent students and part time students
as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of
each month and shall exclude full time equivalent students with
disabilities recognized for the purposes of allocation of state funds
for programs under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100. The definition
of full time equivalent student shall be determined by rules of the
superintendent of public instruction: PROVIDED, That the definition
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any revision of the present
definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the office of financial management shall make
a monthly review of the superintendent's reported full time equivalent
students in the common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.
(3)(a) Certificated instructional staff shall include those persons
employed by a school district who are nonsupervisory employees within
the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(8): PROVIDED, That in exceptional cases,
people of unusual competence but without certification may teach
students so long as a certificated person exercises general
supervision: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the hiring of such classified
people shall not occur during a labor dispute and such classified
people shall not be hired to replace certificated employees during a
labor dispute.
(b) Certificated administrative staff shall include all those
persons who are chief executive officers, chief administrative
officers, confidential employees, supervisors, principals, or assistant
principals within the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, if
funded, shall establish the school nurse corps. The purpose of the
school nurse corps is to provide a regional school health service
system with the goal of improving the health, wellness, and safety of
students.
(2) The school nurse corps shall assign a school nurse to each
educational service district.
(3) The school nurse corps shall provide health services to
students in the neediest school districts. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall establish a process for
school districts to receive additional health services. The resources
provided by the school nurse corps shall not supplant funding already
being used by the school districts for this purpose. To the extent the
funding is available, the school nurse corps shall:
(a) Assist the office of the superintendent in conducting an annual
school health services district assessment for all participating school
districts;
(b) Provide technical assistance and consultation to districts in
development and implementation of school health services and
coordinated school health programs as needed;
(c) Coordinate and collaborate with community partners in
addressing school health-related issues;
(d) Offer school nurse professional development for districts
within the region; and
(e) Assist in the orientation and mentoring of new school nurses.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
report annually to the legislature on the school nurse corps and the
school districts and students served by the program starting December
1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
In order to provide for the health and safety of students, public
school districts must provide for professional registered nurse
services to manage the student and school health services, as
established in RCW 28A.150.260.

--- END ---