BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.40.124 and 2007 c 123 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 1 or plan 2 employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals
judge, or superior court judge may make a one-time irrevocable
election, filed in writing with the member's employer, the department,
and the administrative office of the courts, to accrue an additional
benefit equal to one and one-half percent of average final compensation
for each year of future service credit from the date of the election in
lieu of future employee and employer contributions to the judicial
retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW.
(2)(a) A member who ((chooses to make)) made the election under
subsection (1) of this section may apply, at the time of filing a
written application for retirement with the department, to the
department to increase the member's benefit multiplier by an additional
one and one-half percent per year of service for the period in which
the member served as a justice or judge prior to the election. The
member may purchase, beginning with the most recent judicial service,
the higher benefit multiplier for ((up to seventy percent of)) that
portion of the member's prior judicial service for which the higher
benefit multiplier was not previously purchased, and that would ensure
that the member has no more than a seventy-five percent of average
final compensation benefit ((accrued by age sixty-four for members of
plan 1, and age sixty-six for members of plan 2)). The member shall
pay five percent of the salary earned for each month of service for
which the higher benefit multiplier is being purchased, plus ((interest
as determined by the director)) five and one-half percent interest
applied from the dates that the service was earned. The purchase price
shall not exceed the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in
the member's benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit
multiplier. This payment must be made prior to retirement ((and prior
to December 31, 2007. After December 31, 2007, a member may purchase
the higher benefit multiplier for any of the member's prior judicial
service at the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the
member's benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier,
as determined by the director)), subject to rules adopted by the
department.
(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.40.127 and 2007 c 123 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 1 or plan 2 employed as a district court judge or municipal court
judge may make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in writing with
the member's employer and the department, to accrue an additional
benefit equal to one and one-half percent of average final compensation
for each year of future service credit from the date of the election.
(2)(a) A member who ((chooses to make)) made the election under
subsection (1) of this section may apply, at the time of filing a
written application for retirement with the department, to the
department to increase the member's benefit multiplier by one and one-half percent per year of service for the period in which the member
served as a judge prior to the election. The member may purchase,
beginning with the most recent judicial service, the higher benefit
multiplier for ((up to seventy percent of)) that portion of the
member's prior judicial service for which the higher benefit multiplier
was not previously purchased, and that would ensure that the member has
no more than a seventy-five percent of average final compensation
benefit ((accrued by age sixty-four for members of plan 1, and age
sixty-six for members of plan 2)). The member shall pay five percent
of the salary earned for each month of service for which the higher
benefit multiplier is being purchased, plus ((interest as determined by
the director)) five and one-half percent interest applied from the
dates that the service was earned. The purchase price shall not exceed
the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the member's
benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier. This
payment must be made prior to retirement ((and prior to December 31,
2007. After December 31, 2007, a member may purchase the higher
benefit multiplier for any of the member's prior judicial service at
the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the member's
benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier, as
determined by the director)), subject to rules adopted by the
department.
(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.40.870 and 2007 c 123 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 3 employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or
superior court judge may make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in
writing with the member's employer, the department, and the
administrative office of the courts, to accrue an additional plan 3
defined benefit equal to six-tenths percent of average final
compensation for each year of future service credit from the date of
the election in lieu of future employer contributions to the judicial
retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW.
(2)(a) A member who ((chooses to make)) made the election under
subsection (1) of this section may apply, at the time of filing a
written application for retirement with the department, to the
department to increase the member's benefit multiplier by six-tenths
percent per year of service for the period in which the member served
as a justice or judge prior to the election. The member may purchase,
beginning with the most recent judicial service, the higher benefit
multiplier for ((up to seventy percent of)) that portion of the
member's prior judicial service for which the higher benefit multiplier
was not previously purchased, and that would ensure that the member has
no more than a thirty-seven and one-half percent of average final
compensation benefit ((accrued by age sixty-six)). The member shall
pay two and one-half percent of the salary earned for each month of
service for which the higher benefit multiplier is being purchased,
plus ((interest as determined by the director)) five and one-half
percent interest applied from the dates that the service was earned.
The purchase price shall not exceed the actuarially equivalent value of
the increase in the member's benefit resulting from the increase in the
benefit multiplier. This payment must be made prior to retirement
((and prior to December 31, 2007. After December 31, 2007, a member
may purchase the higher benefit multiplier for any of the member's
prior judicial service at the actuarially equivalent value of the
increase in the member's benefit resulting from the increase in the
benefit multiplier, as determined by the director)), subject to rules
adopted by the department.
(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.
(3) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection (1)
of this section shall contribute a minimum of seven and one-half
percent of pay to the member's defined contribution account.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.40.873 and 2007 c 123 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 3 employed as a district court judge or municipal court judge may
make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in writing with the
member's employer and the department, to accrue an additional plan 3
defined benefit equal to six-tenths percent of average final
compensation for each year of future service credit from the date of
the election.
(2)(a) A member who ((chooses to make)) made the election under
subsection (1) of this section may apply, at the time of filing a
written application for retirement with the department, to the
department to increase the member's benefit multiplier by six-tenths
percent per year of service for the period in which the member served
as a judge prior to the election. The member may purchase, beginning
with the most recent judicial service, the higher benefit multiplier
for ((up to seventy percent of)) that portion of the member's prior
judicial service for which the higher benefit multiplier was not
previously purchased, and that would ensure that the member has no more
than a thirty-seven and one-half percent of average final compensation
benefit ((accrued by age sixty-six)). The member shall pay two and
one-half percent of the salary earned for each month of service for
which the higher benefit multiplier is being purchased, plus ((interest
as determined by the director)) five and one-half percent interest
applied from the dates that the service was earned. The purchase price
shall not exceed the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in
the member's benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit
multiplier. This payment must be made prior to retirement ((and prior
to December 31, 2007. After December 31, 2007, a member may purchase
the higher benefit multiplier for any of the member's prior judicial
service at the actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the
member's benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier,
as determined by the director)), subject to rules adopted by the
department.
(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.
(3) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection (1)
of this section shall contribute a minimum of seven and one-half
percent of pay to the member's defined contribution account.

--- END ---