BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The sum of eighteen million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2009, from the state building construction account to
the City of Kent to acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip,
reequip, repair, finance, and operate a regional center, as defined in
RCW 35.57.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of twelve million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2009, from the state building construction account to
the Yakima convention center public facilities district to acquire,
construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, finance, and
operate a regional center to be used for community events, and
artistic, musical, theatrical, or other cultural exhibitions,
presentations, or performances and having two thousand or fewer
permanent seats.
(2) Distributions under this section must be used for the purposes
set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount from
other public or private sources equal to four million dollars, provided
that amounts generated from nonvoter-approved taxes authorized under
chapter 35.57 RCW may not constitute a public or private source. For
the purpose of this section, public or private sources include, but are
not limited to, cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the
development or improvement of the regional center, land that is donated
and used for the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind
contributions from public or private foundations, or amounts attributed
to private sector partners as part of a public and private partnership
agreement negotiated by the public facilities district.
(3) For the purpose of this section, "regional center" has the
meaning provided in RCW 35.57.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sum of nine million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2009, from the state building construction account fund
to the Cowlitz county public facilities district to acquire, construct,
own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, finance, and operate a
regional center to be used for community events, and artistic, musical,
theatrical, or other cultural exhibitions, presentations, or
performances and having two thousand or fewer permanent seats.
(2) Distributions under this section must be used for the purposes
set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount from
other public or private sources equal to three million dollars,
provided that amounts generated from nonvoter-approved taxes authorized
under chapter 35.57 RCW may not constitute a public or private source.
For the purpose of this section, public or private sources include, but
are not limited to, cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of
the development or improvement of the regional center, land that is
donated and used for the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind
contributions from public or private foundations, or amounts attributed
to private sector partners as part of a public and private partnership
agreement negotiated by the public facilities district.
(3) For the purpose of this section, "regional center" has the
meaning provided in RCW 35.57.020.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.14.390 and 2007 c 486 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
governing body of a public facilities district (a) created before July
31, 2002, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction
of a new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an
existing new regional center, before January 1, 2004; (b) created
before July 1, 2006, under chapter 35.57 RCW in a county or counties in
which there are no other public facilities districts on June 7, 2006,
and in which the total population in the public facilities district is
greater than ninety thousand that commences construction of a new
regional center before February 1, 2007; (c) ((created under the
authority of RCW 35.57.010(1)(d); or (d))) created before September 1,
2007, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW, in a county or counties in
which there are no other public facilities districts on July 22, 2007,
and in which the total population in the public facilities district is
greater than seventy thousand, that commences construction of a new
regional center before January 1, 2009, may impose a sales and use tax
in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition
to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the public facilities
district. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.033 percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used
in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public facilities
district.
(3) No tax may be collected under this section before August 1,
2000. The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds
issued for the construction of the regional center and related parking
facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years after the
tax is first collected.
(4) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the
purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount
from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three percent of
the amount collected under this section, provided that amounts
generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 35.57
RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 36.100 RCW
shall not constitute a public or private source. For the purpose of
this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited to
cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used for
the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions from
public or private foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector
partners as part of a public and private partnership agreement
negotiated by the public facilities district.
(5) The combined total tax levied under this section shall not be
greater than 0.033 percent. If both a public facilities district
created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public facilities district
created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this section, the
tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57
RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.
(6) A public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW
is not eligible to impose the tax under this section if the legislative
authority of the county where the public facilities district is located
has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.14.390 and 2007 c 486 s 2 and 2007 c 6 s 904 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the
governing body of a public facilities district (a) created before July
31, 2002, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction
of a new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an
existing new regional center, before January 1, 2004; (b) created
before July 1, 2006, under chapter 35.57 RCW in a county or counties in
which there are no other public facilities districts on June 7, 2006,
and in which the total population in the public facilities district is
greater than ninety thousand that commences construction of a new
regional center before February 1, 2007; (c) ((created under the
authority of RCW 35.57.010(1)(d); or (d))) created before September 1,
2007, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW, in a county or counties in
which there are no other public facilities districts on July 22, 2007,
and in which the total population in the public facilities district is
greater than seventy thousand, that commences construction of a new
regional center before January 1, 2009, may impose a sales and use tax
in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition
to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the public facilities
district. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.033 percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used
in the case of a use tax.
(2)(a) The governing body of a public facilities district imposing
a sales and use tax under the authority of this section may increase
the rate of tax up to 0.037 percent if, within three fiscal years of
July 1, 2008, the department determines that, as a result of RCW
82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW 82.14.020,
a public facilities district's sales and use tax collections for fiscal
years after July 1, 2008, have been reduced by a net loss of at least
0.50 percent from the fiscal year before July 1, 2008. The fiscal year
in which this section becomes effective is the first fiscal year after
July 1, 2008.
(b) The department shall determine sales and use tax collection net
losses under this section as provided in RCW 82.14.500 (2) and (3).
The department shall provide written notice of its determinations to
public facilities districts. Determinations by the department of a
public facilities district's sales and use tax collection net losses as
a result of RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to
RCW 82.14.020 are final and not appealable.
(c) A public facilities district may increase its rate of tax after
it has received written notice from the department as provided in (b)
of this subsection. The increase in the rate of tax must be made in
0.001 percent increments and must be the least amount necessary to
mitigate the net loss in sales and use tax collections as a result of
RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW
82.14.020. The increase in the rate of tax is subject to RCW
82.14.055.
(3) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public facilities
district.
(4) No tax may be collected under this section before August 1,
2000. The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds
issued for the construction of the regional center and related parking
facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years after the
tax is first collected.
(5) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the
purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount
from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three percent of
the amount collected under this section, provided that amounts
generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 35.57
RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 36.100 RCW
shall not constitute a public or private source. For the purpose of
this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited to
cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used for
the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions from
public or private foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector
partners as part of a public and private partnership agreement
negotiated by the public facilities district.
(6) The combined total tax levied under this section shall not be
greater than 0.037 percent. If both a public facilities district
created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public facilities district
created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this section, the
tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57
RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.
(7) A public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW
is not eligible to impose the tax under this section if the legislative
authority of the county where the public facilities district is located
has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 82.14.485 (Sales and use taxes for
regional centers) and 2007 c 486 s 3 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 4 of this act expires July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1,
2008.

--- END ---