BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.37.040 and 2007 sp.s. c 2 s 4 (SSB 6178) are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Each claimant electing to defer payment of special assessments
or real property tax obligations, or both, under this chapter shall
file with the county assessor, on forms prescribed by the department
and supplied by the assessor, a written declaration thereof. The
declaration to defer special assessments and/or real property taxes for
any year shall be filed no later than the first day of September of the
year for which the deferral is sought: PROVIDED, That for good cause
shown, the department may waive this requirement.
(2) The declaration shall designate the property to which the
deferral applies, and shall include a statement setting forth (a) a
list of all members of the claimant's household, (b) the claimant's
equity value in his or her residence, (c) facts establishing the
eligibility for the deferral under the provisions of this chapter, and
(d) any other relevant information required by the rules of the
department. Each copy shall be signed by the claimant subject to the
penalties as provided in chapter 9A.72 RCW for false swearing. For
declarations to defer property taxes for years following the first
year, the county assessor is not required to verify the information in
the declaration on an annual basis; however, the assessor shall verify
such information at least once every fourth year in which a declaration
to defer property taxes is filed under this chapter.
(3) The county assessor shall determine if each claimant shall be
granted a deferral for each year but the claimant shall have the right
to appeal this determination to the county board of equalization, in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038, whose decision shall
be final as to the deferral of that year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.37 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may conduct audits of the administration by county
assessors of the property tax deferral program under this chapter as it
deems necessary. The powers of the department under chapter 84.08 RCW
apply to these audits.

--- END ---