BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.31.450 and 2005 c 402 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that economic well-being encompasses not only
income, spending, and consumption, but also savings, investment, and
asset-building. The legislature recognizes that low-income working
families often encounter significant barriers as they strive to achieve
financial self-sufficiency. Their challenges include acquiring
employment that pays enough to cover the costs of daily living,
accumulating funds for the down payment on a home, and setting aside
money for their children's education or for retirement. The
legislature also finds that one in five American households owes more
than it owns, and in the event of a job loss, one in four households
cannot support itself at the poverty line for three months. Asset-poor
families do not have enough cash reserves or equity in their homes or
businesses to meet basic needs through a period of joblessness, health
emergency, divorce, or other unexpected financial hardship. The
building of assets, in particular, can improve individuals' economic
independence and stability. The legislature further finds that it is
appropriate for the state to institute an asset-based strategy to
assist low-income families. It is the purpose of chapter 402, Laws of
2005 and chapter . . . , Laws of 2008 (this act) to promote job
training, home ownership, and business development among low-income
individuals and to provide assistance in meeting the financial goals of
low-income individuals.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.31.455 and 2005 c 402 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 43.31.450
through 43.31.475 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Asset building" means investment or savings for an investment
in a family home, higher education, small business, or other long-term
asset that will assist low-income families to attain greater self-sufficiency.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(((2))) (3) "Director" means the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development.
(((3))) (4) "Foster youth" means a person who is fifteen years of
age or older who is a dependent of the department of social and health
services; or a person who is at least fifteen years of age, but not
more than twenty-three years of age, who was a dependent of the
department of social and health services for at least twenty-four
months after attaining thirteen years of age.
(((4))) (5) "Individual development account" or "account" means an
account established by contract between a low-income individual and a
sponsoring organization for the benefit of the low-income individual
and funded through periodic contributions by the low-income individual
which are matched with contributions by or through the sponsoring
organization.
(((5))) (6) "Low-income individual" means a person whose household
income is equal to or less than either:
(a) Eighty percent of the median family income, adjusted for
household size, for the county or metropolitan statistical area where
the person resides; or
(b) Two hundred percent of the federal poverty guidelines updated
periodically in the federal register by the United States department of
health and human services under the authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902(2).
(((6))) (7) "Program" means the individual development account
program established pursuant to RCW 43.31.450 through 43.31.475.
(((7))) (8) "Sponsoring organization" means: (a) A nonprofit,
fund-raising organization that is exempt from taxation under section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code as amended and in effect on
January 1, 2005; (b) a housing authority established under RCW
35.82.030; or (c) a federally recognized Indian tribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
ASSET BUILDING COALITIONS. (1) The Washington asset building
coalition is created. Its mission is to provide statewide leadership
on initiatives that foster financial self-sufficiency and economic
security for low-income working families and foster youth. The
Washington asset building coalition shall be staffed by the department
and shall work together with the department, community asset building
coalitions, and other public and private sector partners to:
(a) Create private and public prosperity products;
(b) Develop and promote public and private lending policies that
encourage asset building;
(c) Market savings, smart borrowing, and federal tax credit
programs;
(d) Expand financial literacy opportunities and outcomes; and
(e) Identify and promote other approaches that will help low-income
working families reach self-sufficiency by building and managing their
assets.
(2)(a) Community-based asset building coalitions involve
collaboration among local social service, faith-based, governmental,
job training, and health care agencies and the private sector,
including financial institutions. They are important partners to the
department and the statewide coalition because they deliver direct
services to low-income working families.
(b) The department shall help initiate, expand, and strengthen
services of community-based asset building coalitions by providing them
with technical assistance and grants.
(c) To the extent that funding is appropriated for this purpose,
the department shall conduct an application process and evaluate and
select community-based asset building coalitions for grant awards. The
application must identify a local lead agency, specific needs,
appropriate community partners, and any matching funds or in-kind
contributions to complement the state's grant.
(3) To the extent funding is appropriated for this purpose, for the
2009-2011 biennium, the department shall work with the Washington asset
building coalition, relevant state agencies, community-based asset
building coalitions, and other partners to design, implement, and fund
a statewide public education and outreach campaign. The department
shall use state funds to attract matching investments by other public
and private sector organizations. The campaign shall feature
marketing, self-help tools, and local services, including activities
such as:
(a) Creation of a web site with financial information, savings and
investment calculators, credit repair links, and other self-help tools;
(b) Call-in assistance and referrals through a universal telephone
number that provides a directory to local services;
(c) Public service announcements and other educational outreach
through media outlets, WorkFirst agencies, the temporary assistance for
needy families program, mailing inserts, and print and electronic
materials designed to reach target groups such as seniors, the
military, foster youth, former offenders, WorkFirst participants,
recipients of temporary assistance for needy families, limited English
speakers, and other high-need groups;
(d) An outreach campaign to increase the number of eligible
low-income working families who claim the federal earned income tax
credit and the federal child and dependent care tax credit.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.31.460 and 2005 c 402 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
An individual development account program is hereby established
within the department for the purpose of facilitating the creation by
sponsoring organizations of individual development accounts for low-income individuals.
(1) The department shall select sponsoring organizations to
establish and monitor individual development accounts using the
following criteria:
(a) The ability of the sponsoring organization to implement and
administer an individual development account program, including the
ability to verify a low-income individual's eligibility, certify that
matching deposits are used only for approved purposes, and exercise
general fiscal accountability;
(b) The capacity of the sponsoring organization to provide or raise
funds to match the contributions made by low-income individuals to
their individual development accounts;
(c) The capacity of the sponsoring organization to provide or
arrange for the provision of financial counseling and other related
services to low-income individuals;
(d) The links the sponsoring organization has to other activities
and programs related to the purpose of chapter 402, Laws of 2005; and
(e) Such other criteria as the department determines are consistent
with the purpose of chapter 402, Laws of 2005 and ease of
administration.
(2) An individual development account may be established by or on
behalf of an eligible low-income individual to enable the individual to
accumulate funds for the following purposes:
(a) The acquisition of postsecondary education or job training;
(b) The purchase of a primary residence, including any usual or
reasonable settlement, financing, or other closing costs;
(c) The capitalization of a small business. Account moneys may be
used for capital, land, plant, equipment, and inventory expenses or for
working capital pursuant to a business plan. The business plan must
have been developed with a business counselor, trainer, or financial
institution approved by the sponsoring organization. The business plan
shall include a description of the services or goods to be sold, a
marketing strategy, and projected financial statements;
(d) The purchase of a computer, an automobile if necessary for
employment or postsecondary education, or home ((improvements))
repairs; or
(e) The purchase of assistive technologies that will allow a person
with a disability to participate in community and work-related
activities.
(3) An eligible low-income individual participating in the program
must contribute to an individual development account. The
contributions may be derived from earned income or other income, as
provided by the department. Other income shall include child support
payments, supplemental security income, and disability benefits.
(4) A sponsoring organization may authorize a low-income individual
for whom an individual development account has been established to
withdraw all or part of the individual's deposits for the following
emergencies:
(a) Necessary medical expenses;
(b) To avoid eviction of the individual from the individual's
residence;
(c) Necessary living expenses following loss of employment; or
(d) Such other circumstances as the sponsoring organization
determines merit emergency withdrawal.
The low-income individual making an emergency withdrawal shall
reimburse the account for the amount withdrawn within twelve months of
the date of withdrawal or the individual development account shall be
closed.
(5) Funds held in an individual development account established
under RCW 43.31.450 through 43.31.475 shall not be used in the
determination of eligibility for, or the amount of, assistance in any
state or federal means-tested program.
(6) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement
chapter 402, Laws of 2005, including rules regulating the use of
individual development accounts by eligible low-income individuals.
The department's rules shall require that funds held in an individual
development account are to be withdrawn only for the purposes specified
in subsection (2) of this section or withdrawn as permitted for
emergencies under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create an
entitlement to matching moneys.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.31.465 and 2005 c 402 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A foster youth individual development account program is hereby
established within the individual development account program
established pursuant to RCW 43.31.460 for the purpose of facilitating
the creation by sponsoring organizations of individual development
accounts for foster youth.
(2) The department shall select sponsoring organizations to
establish and monitor individual development accounts for foster youth
from those entities with whom the department of social and health
services contracts for independent living services for youth who are or
have been dependents of the department of social and health services.
(3) An individual development account may be established by or on
behalf of a foster youth to enable the individual to accumulate funds
for the following purposes:
(a) The acquisition of postsecondary education or job training;
(b) Housing needs, including rent, security deposit, and utilities
costs;
(c) The purchase of a computer if necessary for postsecondary
education or job training;
(d) The purchase of a car if necessary for employment or
postsecondary education; ((and))
(e) Payment of health insurance premiums; and
(f) The purchase of assistive technologies that will allow a person
with a disability to participate in community and work-related
activities.
(4) Contributions to an individual development account may be made
by a foster youth participating in the program ((must contribute to an
individual development account)) or by other sources, including but not
limited to, foster parents and community organizations. The
contributions may be derived from earned income or other income, as
provided by the department. Other income shall include financial
incentives for educational achievement provided by entities contracted
with the department of social and health services for independent
living services for youth who are or have been dependents of the
department of social and health services.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.31.470 and 2005 c 402 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An account is created in the custody of the state treasurer to
be known as the individual development account program account. The
account shall consist of all moneys appropriated to the account by the
legislature and any other federal, state, or private funds,
appropriated or nonappropriated, as the department receives for the
purpose of matching low-income individuals' contributions to their
individual development accounts. Expenditures from the account may be
used only for the following:
(a) Grants to sponsoring organizations selected by the department
to participate in the individual development account program to assist
sponsoring organizations in providing or arranging for the provision of
financial counseling and other related services to low-income
individuals participating in the program and for program administration
purposes;
(b) A match to be determined by the department of up to four
dollars for every dollar deposited by an individual into the
individual's individual development account, except that the maximum
amount provided as a match for each individual development account
shall be four thousand dollars; and
(c) The department's administrative expenses in carrying out the
purposes of chapter 402, Laws of 2005 and chapter . . . , Laws of 2008
(this act).
(2) Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account.
(3) The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.31.480 and 2005 c 402 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall ((annually)) report biennially to the
legislature and the governor on the individual development account
program and other financial self-sufficiency programs established
pursuant to RCW 43.31.450 through 43.31.475 and section 3 of this act.
The report shall include the status of the programs in place, the
outcomes achieved since the previous report, and recommendations for
changed practices and additional tools that would improve program
outcomes. For the report due in 2010, the department shall assess and
make a recommendation regarding the need and options for formalizing
membership and operations of the Washington asset building coalition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 APPROPRIATION. The sum of two million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund solely for
expenditure into the individual development account program account in
RCW 43.31.470.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 APPROPRIATION TO THE DEPARTMENT. The sum of
two million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, from the
individual development account program account to the department of
community, trade, and economic development solely for the purpose of
RCW 43.31.460.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

--- END ---