BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the
state's best interest to promote and provide adult literacy education.
In order to reach all of those in need of literacy instruction, the
legislature finds that it is necessary to better understand adult
literacy needs and available resources, and to more effectively
advertise and promote adult literacy-related services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall study and, no later than December 1, 2008, report
on the status of adult literacy education to the governor, the
appropriate policy committees of the legislature, and the state board
for community and technical colleges.
(2) The study shall include:
(a) A review of literacy rates nationally, in Washington, and in
Washington counties;
(b) A review of research literature on adult literacy, including
literature focused on adult basic education, English language learners,
and individuals with diagnosed and undiagnosed learning disabilities;
(c) A description of literacy-related services provided by
Washington state agencies and community-based organizations in the
state; and
(d) Analysis of data from Washington state agencies and community-based organizations in the state regarding literacy levels and other
client and student characteristics.
(3) Data and populations to be studied include:
(a) Clients served by the department of social and health services;
(b) Students enrolled in the state's common schools;
(c) Students at the state's community and technical colleges;
(d) Incarcerated individuals and others under the supervision of
the department of corrections; and
(e) Others as identified through the research process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The state board for community and technical
colleges shall conduct a media campaign to increase public awareness
about the availability of adult, family, and workforce literacy
services and resources, as well as the benefits from literacy which
result, to the individual, the family, the community, and the workforce
in the state. This campaign may include, but is not limited to, media
such as the internet, television, radio, newspapers, books, and
magazines. The state board for community and technical colleges may
subcontract all or part of the activities associated with the media
campaign to qualified private nonprofit organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Following receipt of the report prepared by
the Washington state institute for public policy in accordance with
section 2 of this act, the state board for community and technical
colleges shall coordinate and convene a one-day summit with the
principal goal of informing the public, adult literacy instructional
personnel, and local, state, and community leaders about the status of
adult literacy and adult literacy education as reported by the
institute. The state board for community and technical colleges may
subcontract all or part of the activities associated with the summit to
qualified private nonprofit organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Beginning December 1, 2010, and every two
years thereafter, the state board for community and technical colleges
shall prepare and submit a status report to the governor and the
appropriate legislative policy committees regarding state and national
progress in increasing adult, family, and workforce literacy. The
status report shall include:
(1) A summary of state and local, as well as national, initiatives
related to adult, family, and workforce literacy, including related
funding mechanisms;
(2) A description of the adult, family, and workforce literacy
programs and services offered at the state's community and technical
colleges and through community-based organizations in the state,
including the numbers served by each;
(3) A description of partnerships and planning efforts with local
businesses, workforce investment boards, and nonprofit and community
organizations directed at advertising and expanding access to adult,
family, and workforce literacy programs and services, as well as making
such services more available and affordable;
(4) Performance measures and targets and whether and how these were
met and will be met in the future;
(5) Current information regarding proven and effective
instructional techniques and technology for improving literacy
outcomes; and
(6) Strategies and recommendations to provide adult literacy
instructional personnel with professional development opportunities and
access to proven and effective instructional techniques.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 28B.50 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---