BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.060 and 2003 c 121 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following property shall be exempt from taxation:
(a) All art, scientific, or historical collections of associations
maintaining and exhibiting such collections for the benefit of the
general public and not for profit, together with all real and personal
property of such associations used exclusively for the safekeeping,
maintaining and exhibiting of such collections;
(b) All the real and personal property owned by or leased to
associations engaged in the production and performance of musical,
dance, artistic, dramatic, or literary works for the benefit of the
general public and not for profit, which real and personal property is
used exclusively for this production or performance;
(c) All fire engines and other implements used for the
extinguishment of fire, and the buildings used exclusively for their
safekeeping, and for meetings of fire companies, as long as the
property belongs to any city or town or to a fire company; and
(d) All property owned by humane societies in this state in actual
use by the societies.
(2) To receive an exemption under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this
section:
(a) An organization must be organized and operated exclusively for
artistic, scientific, historical, literary, musical, dance, dramatic,
or educational purposes and receive a substantial part of its support
(exclusive of income received in the exercise or performance by such
organization of its purpose or function) from the United States or any
state or any political subdivision thereof or from direct or indirect
contributions from the general public.
(b) If the property is not currently being used for an exempt
purpose but will be used for an exempt purpose within a reasonable
period of time, the nonprofit organization, association, or corporation
claiming the exemption must submit proof that a reasonably specific and
active program is being carried out to construct, remodel, or otherwise
enable the property to be used for an exempt purpose. The property
does not qualify for an exemption during this interim period if the
property is used by, loaned to, or rented to a for-profit organization
or business enterprise. Proof of a specific and active program to
build or remodel the property so it may be used for an exempt purpose
may include, but is not limited to:
(i) Affirmative action by the board of directors, trustees, or
governing body of the nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation toward an active program of construction or remodeling;
(ii) Itemized reasons for the proposed construction or remodeling;
(iii) Clearly established plans for financing the construction or
remodeling; or
(iv) Building permits.
(3) The use of property exempt under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of
this section by entities not eligible for a property tax exemption
under this chapter, except as provided in this section, nullifies the
exemption otherwise available for the property for the assessment year.
The exemption is not nullified if:
(a) The property is used by entities not eligible for a property
tax exemption under this chapter for periods of not more than ((twenty-five)) fifty days in the calendar year;
(b) The property is not used for pecuniary gain or to promote
business activities for more than ((seven)) fifteen of the ((twenty-five)) fifty days in the calendar year;
(c) The property is used for artistic, scientific, or historic
purposes, for the production and performance of musical, dance,
artistic, dramatic, or literary works, or for community gatherings or
assembly, or meetings; and
(d) The amount of any rent or donations is reasonable and does not
exceed maintenance and operation expenses created by the user.

--- END ---