BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.118.110 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 910 are each
amended to read as follows:
If the new motor vehicle will be registered in the state of
Washington, a three-dollar arbitration fee shall be collected by either
the new motor vehicle dealer or vehicle lessor from the consumer upon
execution of a retail sale or lease agreement. The fee shall be
forwarded to the department of licensing at the time of title
application for deposit in the new motor vehicle arbitration account
hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account shall be
used for the purposes of this chapter, subject to appropriation.
During the 1995-97 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys
from the account to the extent that the moneys are not necessary for
the purposes of this chapter.
At the end of each fiscal year, the attorney general shall prepare
a report listing the annual revenue generated and the expenses incurred
in implementing and operating the arbitration program under this
chapter.

--- END ---