BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Washington state courts are required by chapter 49.60 RCW, the
law against discrimination, and by 42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq., the
Americans with disabilities act, to provide equal access to persons
with disabilities. To assist the courts to comply with these laws, the
administrative office of the courts shall, subject to the availability
of funds appropriated for this purpose, create the position of court
access and accommodations coordinator.
(2) The coordinator shall:
(a) Review the needs of courts statewide for training and other
assistance required to provide access and accommodation for persons
with disabilities;
(b) Provide guidance and assistance upon request;
(c) Identify appropriate assistive devices and establish a system
to improve courts' access to such devices.
(3) In carrying out the duties under this section, the coordinator
shall consult with persons with disabilities, and shall facilitate
communication between the administrative office of the courts and such
persons and their representative groups.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---