BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
Local government access channels shall develop policies to avoid
preferential treatment of incumbent candidates for the county or city
legislature or for city or county executive that apply beginning June
1st of an election year and continue through the general election in
November.

--- END ---