BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.750 and 2003 c 379 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section applies to offenses committed on or before July 1,
1985.
(1) If restitution is ordered, the court shall determine the amount
of restitution due at the sentencing hearing or within one hundred
eighty days. The court may continue the hearing beyond the one hundred
eighty days for good cause. The court shall then set a minimum monthly
payment that the offender is required to make towards the restitution
that is ordered. The court should take into consideration the total
amount of the restitution owed, the offender's present, past, and
future ability to pay, as well as any assets that the offender may
have.
(2) During the period of supervision, the community corrections
officer may examine the offender to determine if there has been a
change in circumstances that warrants an amendment of the monthly
payment schedule. The community corrections officer may recommend a
change to the schedule of payment and shall inform the court of the
recommended change and the reasons for the change. The sentencing
court may then reset the monthly minimum payments based on the report
from the community corrections officer of the change in circumstances.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section,
restitution ordered by a court pursuant to a criminal conviction shall
be based on easily ascertainable damages for injury to or loss of
property, actual expenses incurred for treatment for injury to persons,
((and)) lost wages resulting from injury, and reimbursement of costs to
a public safety agency for investigation, arrest, detention, fire
suppression, or emergency medical services. For purposes of this
subsection, "public safety agency" means a general authority Washington
law enforcement agency as defined in RCW 10.93.020, except "general
authority Washington law enforcement agency" does not include the
department of fish and wildlife, and any county, city, town, public
hospital district, fire protection district, regional fire protection
service authority, or emergency medical service district. Restitution
shall not include reimbursement for damages for mental anguish, pain
and suffering, or other intangible losses, but may include the costs of
counseling reasonably related to the offense. The amount of
restitution shall not exceed double the amount of the offender's gain
or the victim's loss from the commission of the offense.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the offender shall remain
under the court's jurisdiction for a term of ten years following the
offender's release from total confinement or ten years subsequent to
the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period is longer.
Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the superior
court may extend jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an additional
ten years for payment of restitution. The portion of the sentence
concerning restitution may be modified as to amount, terms and
conditions during either the initial ten-year period or subsequent ten-year period if the criminal judgment is extended, regardless of the
expiration of the offender's term of community supervision and
regardless of the statutory maximum sentence for the crime. The court
may not reduce the total amount of restitution ordered because the
offender may lack the ability to pay the total amount. The offender's
compliance with the restitution shall be supervised by the department
only during any period which the department is authorized to supervise
the offender in the community under RCW 9.94A.728, 9.94A.501, or in
which the offender is in confinement in a state correctional
institution or a correctional facility pursuant to a transfer agreement
with the department, and the department shall supervise the offender's
compliance during any such period. The department is responsible for
supervision of the offender only during confinement and authorized
supervision and not during any subsequent period in which the offender
remains under the court's jurisdiction. The county clerk is authorized
to collect unpaid restitution at any time the offender remains under
the jurisdiction of the court for purposes of his or her legal
financial obligations.
(5) Restitution may be ordered whenever the offender is convicted
of an offense which results in injury to any person or damage to or
loss of property or as provided in subsection (6) of this section. In
addition, restitution may be ordered to pay for an injury, loss, or
damage if the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer
offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the
offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or
offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement.
(6) Restitution for the crime of rape of a child in the first,
second, or third degree, in which the victim becomes pregnant, shall
include: (a) All of the victim's medical expenses that are associated
with the rape and resulting pregnancy; and (b) child support for any
child born as a result of the rape if child support is ordered pursuant
to a proceeding in superior court or administrative order for support
for that child. The clerk must forward any restitution payments made
on behalf of the victim's child to the Washington state child support
registry under chapter 26.23 RCW. Identifying information about the
victim and child shall not be included in the order. The offender
shall receive a credit against any obligation owing under the
administrative or superior court order for support of the victim's
child. For the purposes of this subsection, the offender shall remain
under the court's jurisdiction until the offender has satisfied support
obligations under the superior court or administrative order but not
longer than a maximum term of twenty-five years following the
offender's release from total confinement or twenty-five years
subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period
is longer. The court may not reduce the total amount of restitution
ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay the total
amount. The department shall supervise the offender's compliance with
the restitution ordered under this subsection.
(7) In addition to any sentence that may be imposed, an offender
who has been found guilty of an offense involving fraud or other
deceptive practice or an organization which has been found guilty of
any such offense may be ordered by the sentencing court to give notice
of the conviction to the class of persons or to the sector of the
public affected by the conviction or financially interested in the
subject matter of the offense by mail, by advertising in designated
areas or through designated media, or by other appropriate means.
(8) This section does not limit civil remedies or defenses
available to the victim or offender including support enforcement
remedies for support ordered under subsection (6) of this section for
a child born as a result of a rape of a child victim. The court shall
identify in the judgment and sentence the victim or victims entitled to
restitution and what amount is due each victim. The state or victim
may enforce the court-ordered restitution in the same manner as a
judgment in a civil action. Restitution collected through civil
enforcement must be paid through the registry of the court and must be
distributed proportionately according to each victim's loss when there
is more than one victim.

--- END ---