BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71.0191 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 326 are each amended
to read as follows:
The secretary of the department of health shall ((appoint, from a
list of three names supplied by the commission,)) employ an executive
director ((who shall act to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
The secretary shall also employ such additional staff including
administrative assistants, investigators, and clerical staff as are
required to enable the commission to accomplish its duties and
responsibilities. The executive director is exempt from the provisions
of the civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, as now or hereafter
amended)), hired by the commission and serving in accordance with RCW
43.70.240. The executive director shall perform all of the duties
specified in RCW 43.70.240 and assist the board, as directed, in
carrying out its responsibilities under this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.64.310 and 1996 c 191 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall:
(1) Establish reasonable license and examination fees and fees for
services to other agencies in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and
43.70.280. In cases where there are unanticipated demands for
services, the department may request payment for services directly from
the agencies for whom the services are performed, to the extent that
revenues or other funds are available. Drug-related investigations
regarding licensed health care practitioners shall be funded by an
appropriation to the department from the health professions account.
The payment may be made on either an advance or a reimbursable basis as
approved by the director of financial management;
(2) Employ((, with confirmation by the board,)) an executive
((officer)) director, ((who shall be exempt from the provisions of
chapter 41.06 RCW and who shall be a pharmacist licensed in Washington,
and employ inspectors, investigators, chemists, and other persons as
necessary to assist it for any purpose which it may deem necessary))
hired by the board and serving in accordance with RCW 43.70.240. The
executive director shall perform all of the duties specified in RCW
43.70.240 and assist the board, as directed, in carrying out its
responsibilities under this chapter;
(3) Investigate and prosecute, at the direction of the board,
including use of subpoena powers, violations of law or regulations
under its jurisdiction or the jurisdiction of the board of pharmacy;
(4) Make, at the direction of the board, inspections and
investigations of pharmacies and other places, including dispensing
machines, in which drugs or devices are stored, held, compounded,
dispensed, sold, or administered to the ultimate consumer, to take and
analyze any drugs or devices and to seize and condemn any drugs or
devices which are adulterated, misbranded, stored, held, dispensed,
distributed, administered, or compounded in violation of or contrary to
law. The written operating agreement between the department and the
board, as required by RCW 43.70.240 shall include provisions for the
department to involve the board in carrying out its duties required by
this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.79.130 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 413 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary shall ((appoint, after consultation with the
commission,)) employ an executive director ((who shall act to carry out
this chapter. The secretary shall also employ such professional,
secretarial, clerical, and other assistants as may be necessary to
effectively administer this chapter. The secretary shall fix the
compensation and provide for travel expenses for the executive director
and all such employees, in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060)), hired by the commission and serving in accordance with RCW
43.70.240. The executive director shall perform all of the duties
specified in RCW 43.70.240 and assist the board, as directed, in
carrying out its responsibilities under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.70.240 and 1998 c 245 s 73 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary and each of the professional licensing and
disciplinary boards ((under the administration of the department shall
enter into written operating agreements on administrative procedures
with input from the regulated profession and the public. The intent of
these agreements is to provide a process for the department to consult
each board on administrative matters and to ensure that the
administration and staff functions effectively enable each board)) and
commissions shall enter into written joint operating agreements that
detail the budgetary, staffing, administrative, and other licensing and
disciplinary support that the department will provide each board and
commission. The intent of these agreements is to provide a legal
framework for ensuring that each board and commission is provided with
adequate administrative and staff support from the department to
effectively enable the board or commission to fulfill its statutory
responsibilities.
(2) The joint agreements shall include, but are not ((be)) limited
to, the following provisions:
(((1) Administrative activities supporting the board's policies,
goals, and objectives;
(2) Development and review of the agency budget as it relates to
the board; and
(3) Board related personnel issues.
The agreements shall be reviewed and revised in like manner if
appropriate at the beginning of each fiscal year, and at other times
upon written request by the secretary or the board.))
(a) With regard to the independent executive director:
(i) That the executive director is hired by and serves at the
pleasure of the board or commission;
(ii) Each board or commission, depending on their budget, scope of
duties expected of its executive director, and other considerations,
may reach agreement with another board or commission to hire and share
the services of the same executive director, or, in the alternative,
reach an agreement with the secretary to perform the duties of the
executive director;
(iii) That the position is exempt from the provisions of the civil
service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, and the executive director's salary is
established by the board or commission;
(iv) That the executive director is responsible for hiring,
evaluating, dismissing, disciplining, and directing department of
health professional, clerical, technical, investigative, legal, and
administrative personnel necessary to carry on the work of the board or
commission; and
(v) That the executive director handles all administrative duties
of the board or commission, including preparing an annual budget, and
any other duties so delegated to the executive director by the board or
commission.
(b) With regard to an annual budget:
(i) The board or commission is responsible for proposing its own
biennial budget;
(ii) The secretary must forward the budgets proposed by the board
or commission to the office of financial management; and
(iii) Prior to adopting licensing and registration fees under RCW
43.70.250, the secretary shall work with the boards and commissions to
determine the appropriate fees for the individual profession.
(c) With regard to rules and guidelines: Prior to the secretary
exercising the secretary's authority to adopt uniform rules and
guidelines, or any other actions that might impact the licensing or
disciplining authority of a board or commission, the secretary shall
first meet with the board or commission to determine how those rules or
guidelines, or changes to rules or guidelines, might impact the board
or commission's ability to effectively carry out its statutory duties.
If the board or commission, in consultation with the secretary,
determines that the proposed rules or guidelines, or changes to
existing rules or guidelines, will negatively impact the board's or
commission's ability to effectively carry out its statutory duties,
then the individual board or commission shall collaborate with the
secretary to develop alternative solutions to mitigate the impacts. If
an alternative solution cannot be reached, the parties may resolve the
dispute through a mediator as set forth in (e) of this subsection.
(d) With regard to performance measurements: Annually, each board
and commission in consultation with the secretary shall set
performance-based goals for the upcoming year.
(e) With regard to dispute resolution: In the event there is a
disagreement between a board or commission and the secretary, that is
unable to be resolved through negotiation, a representative of both
parties shall agree on the designation of a third party to mediate the
dispute.
(f) With regard to an annual review: Joint agreements must be
reviewed annually in June. The parties are required to have an
agreement on proposed changes, if any, in place by July 1st of that
year. If the parties fail to reach an agreement by July 1st, a
mediator must be brought in to resolve the dispute as set forth in (e)
of this subsection. Until such time as the dispute is resolved, the
terms of the current agreement remain in effect.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.70.250 and 2006 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost
of each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be
fully borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business.
The secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all
application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees,
permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing
or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered
by the department. In fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the
fees for each program at a sufficient level to defray the costs of
administering that program and the cost of regulating licensed
volunteer medical workers in accordance with RCW 18.130.360, except as
provided in RCW 18.79.202 until June 30, 2013. All such fees shall be
fixed by rule adopted by the secretary in accordance with the
provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) By September of each year, the secretary shall provide each of
the health professions boards and commissions a detailed accounting of
how the fees collected from each of the boards and commissions
deposited into the health professions account was used to support that
particular profession's program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.22 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall employ an executive director hired by the board
and serving in accordance with RCW 43.70.240. The executive director
shall perform all of the duties specified in RCW 43.70.240 and assist
the board, as directed, in carrying out its responsibilities under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.25 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall employ an executive director hired by the
commission and serving in accordance with RCW 43.70.240. The executive
director shall perform all of the duties specified in RCW 43.70.240 and
assist the commission, as directed, in carrying out its
responsibilities under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 18.30 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall employ an executive director hired by the board
and serving in accordance with RCW 43.70.240. The executive director
shall perform all of the duties specified in RCW 43.70.240 and assist
the board, as directed, in carrying out its responsibilities under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 18.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall employ an executive director hired by the
commission and serving in accordance with RCW 43.70.240. The executive
director shall perform all of the duties specified in RCW 43.70.240 and
assist the commission, as directed, in carrying out its
responsibilities under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 18.35 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall employ an executive director hired by the board
and serving in accordance with RCW 43.70.240. The executive director
shall perform all of the duties specified in RCW 43.70.240 and assist
the board, as directed, in carrying out its responsibilities under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 18.52 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall employ an executive director hired by the board
and serving in accordance with RCW 43.70.240. The executive director
shall perform all of the duties specified in RCW 43.70.240 and assist
the board, as directed, in carrying out its responsibilities under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 18.54 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall employ an executive director hired by the board
and serving in accordance with RCW 43.70.240. The executive director
shall perform all of the duties specified in RCW 43.70.240 and assist
the board, as directed, in carrying out its responsibilities under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall employ an executive director hired by the board
and serving in accordance with RCW 43.70.240. The executive director
shall perform all of the duties specified in RCW 43.70.240 and assist
the board, as directed, in carrying out its responsibilities under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 18.59 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall employ an executive director hired by the board
and serving in accordance with RCW 43.70.240. The executive director
shall perform all of the duties specified in RCW 43.70.240 and assist
the board, as directed, in carrying out its responsibilities under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 18.74 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall employ an executive director hired by the board
and serving in accordance with RCW 43.70.240. The executive director
shall perform all of the duties specified in RCW 43.70.240 and assist
the board, as directed, in carrying out its responsibilities under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 18.83 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall employ an executive director hired by the
board and serving in accordance with RCW 43.70.240. The executive
director shall perform all of the duties specified in RCW 43.70.240 and
assist the board, as directed, in carrying out its responsibilities
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 18.92 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall employ an executive director hired by the board
and serving in accordance with RCW 43.70.240. The executive director
shall perform all of the duties specified in RCW 43.70.240 and assist
the board, as directed, in carrying out its responsibilities under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 18.108
RCW to read as follows:
The secretary shall employ an executive director hired by the
board and serving in accordance with RCW 43.70.240. The executive
director shall perform all of the duties specified in RCW 43.70.240 and
assist the board, as directed, in carrying out its responsibilities
under this chapter.

--- END ---