BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2007 c 392 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The specialized forest products work group is established. The
work group must consist of appropriate representation from: The
department of natural resources; county sheriffs; county prosecutors;
industrial and small forest landowners; tribes; recreational and
professional wood carvers; cedar and specialty wood processors; and
other appropriate persons invited by the commissioner of public lands.
(2) The specialized forest products work group must review the
current specialized forest products statute, chapter 76.48 RCW, as well
as applicable theft laws. The specialized forest products work group
must evaluate the statute, as well as its application, and make
recommendations, if any, to ensure that the specialized forest products
requirements: Provide reasonable tools for law enforcement and
reasonably protect landowners from theft; are not unduly burdensome to
harvesters, those possessing or transporting specialized forest
products, or cedar or specialty wood processors or buyers; are clear
and may be readily understood by law enforcement and the public; and
are administered and enforced consistently throughout the state.
(3) The specialized forest products work group must be staffed by
the department of natural resources.
(4) The specialized forest products work group must provide a
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature containing its
recommendations, as well as draft legislation implementing its
recommendations, by December 1, ((2007)) 2008.
(5) This section expires July 1, ((2008)) 2009.

--- END ---