BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A legislative task force on
specialized forest products is established, with members as provided in
this subsection.
(i) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives having served on the house of representatives
agriculture and natural resources committee during the 2008 session.
(ii) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate having served on the senate
natural resources, ocean and recreation committee during the 2008
session.
(iii) The speaker of the house of representatives and the president
of the senate shall jointly appoint at least seven members representing
county sheriffs, county prosecutors, industrial and small forest
landowners, tribes, recreational and professional wood carvers, cedar
and specialty wood processors, and other appropriate interests. If
possible, individual appointees should be consistent with the
membership that served on the specialized forest products work group
created in section 2, chapter 392, Laws of 2007.
(iv) In addition, the department of natural resources shall
cooperate with the task force and maintain a liaison representative who
shall serve as a member. The department shall also cooperate with the
task force and provide information as the chair of the task force may
reasonably request.
(b) The task force shall choose its chair from among its
legislative membership. The speaker of the house of representatives
and the president of the senate shall jointly select one legislative
member to convene the initial meeting of the task force.
(2) The task force shall review the current specialized forest
products statute, chapter 76.48 RCW, as well as applicable theft laws
to ensure that the specialized forest products requirements:
(a) Provide reasonable tools for law enforcement and reasonably
protect landowners from theft;
(b) Are not unduly burdensome to harvesters, those possessing or
transporting specialized forest products, or cedar or specialty wood
processors or buyers;
(c) Are clear and may be readily understood by law enforcement and
the public; and
(d) Are administered and enforced consistently throughout the
state.
(3) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by the house
office of program research and senate committee services.
(4) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations in
the form of proposed legislation to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2008.
(7) This section expires July 31, 2009.

--- END ---