BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds the power of workers
to make sound decisions concerning their careers, workplace choices,
workplace representation, and other areas of importance hinges on a
worker's access to useful and relevant information. The legislature
finds it is important to ensure public sector workers are provided with
useful information concerning their membership in a labor union through
thorough and complete public disclosure of union finances and by
protecting a worker's freedom of speech, assembly, and other rights.
The legislature finds today's workforce is more educated,
empowered, and familiar with financial data and transactions than at
any time in the state's history. Workers are presented with more
choices concerning their careers than in the past, in areas such as
compensation packages, benefits, and other matters related to their
careers. Whether and how to exercise a worker's self-governance rights
is among the choices a worker faces.
The legislature finds transparency in organizational finances
central to sound decision making. The legislature recognizes the
federal labor management reporting and disclosure act provides for the
reporting of financial data for private sector labor organizations.
The legislature intends for all public sector labor organizations in
Washington to provide similar, relevant financial data to their
members.
Residents of Washington state have a cherished populist tradition
of involvement in and knowledge of public affairs. The people have
already called for open public meetings, government documents upon
request, increased legislative awareness through various traditional
and electronic media, and transparency of candidate and campaign
committee finances. These methods serve as a powerful deterrent
against corruption and for people to make decisions about their
individual and collective futures.
The legislature intends for increased transparency and financial
disclosure to provide public sector workers with the knowledge they
need to make wise decisions about themselves, their careers, and their
families. Sound decision making depends on sound information, and
workers cannot be expected to make decisions in their own best interest
without access to unbiased and candid information. The legislature
intends to ensure members of labor organizations are provided with more
complete, timely, and comprehensible information about their union's
financial practices, investments, solvency, and expenditures to empower
them to protect their personal financial interests and exercise their
democratic rights of self-governance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employee organization must annually, not more than sixty
days after the end of its fiscal year, provide financial disclosure
information to all employees in the bargaining unit and to the general
public by filing with the commission a report containing the following
information, detailed by functional spending categories, that
accurately discloses its financial condition and operations for the
preceding fiscal year:
(a) Assets and liabilities at the beginning and end of the fiscal
year;
(b) Salary, the cost of fringe benefits, allowances, and other
direct or indirect disbursements to each officer of the local, the
employee organization, and the support staff, as well as all
contributions to state or national affiliates and any official or
employee thereof;
(c) All income received or the value of services furnished to an
employee organization by either a parent affiliated labor organization
or by any other labor organization on behalf of the employee
organization;
(d) A report of the total amount spent by the employee
organization, and an itemization of expenditures of more than one
thousand five hundred dollars for:
(i) Contract negotiation and administration;
(ii) Organizing activities;
(iii) Strike activities;
(iv) Litigation, specifying the matters and cases involved;
(v) Public relations activities;
(vi) Political activities, including contributions to candidates,
ballot measures, member communications, and get out the vote efforts;
(vii) Activities attempting to influence the passage or defeat of
federal, state, or local legislation or the content or enforcement of
federal, state, or local regulations or policies;
(viii) Voter education and issue advocacy activities;
(ix) Training activities for each officer of the employee
organization or employee organization support staff; and
(x) Conference, convention, and travel activities engaged in by the
employee organization;
(e) The percentage of the employee organization's total
expenditures that were spent for each of the activities described in
(d) of this subsection;
(f) The names, addresses, and activities of any of the law firms,
public relations firms, or lobbyists whose services are used by the
employee organization for any activity described in (d) of this
subsection;
(g) A list of political candidates, political organizations,
charitable organizations, nonprofit organizations, and community
organizations to which the employee organization contributed financial
or in-kind assistance and the dollar amount of such assistance; and
(h) The name and address of any political action committees with
which the employee organization is affiliated or to whom it provides
contributions, the total amount of contributions to those committees,
the candidates or causes to which the committees provided any financial
assistance, and the amount provided to each candidate or cause.
(2) The report required in subsection (1) of this section must be
prepared by an auditing organization, independent of the employee
organization, using generally accepted auditing standards and generally
accepted accounting principles, that ensures the accuracy and veracity
of the information provided by the employee organization. All
expenditures must be reported as either germane to collective
bargaining, contract administration, or grievance processing, or not so
related.
(3) The employee organization must disclose information to all
employees in the bargaining unit and to the general public by filing
with the commission a report signed by its president and secretary or
corresponding principal officers, and containing the following
information:
(a) The name of the employee organization, its mailing address, and
any other address at which it maintains its principal office or at
which it keeps records;
(b) The name and title of each of its officers;
(c) The initiation fee or fees required from a new or transferred
member;
(d) The regular dues or fees or other periodic payments required to
remain a member of the reporting employee organization; and
(e) Detailed statements regarding the provisions made and
procedures followed with respect to each of the following:
(i) Qualifications for, or restrictions on, membership;
(ii) Levying of assessments;
(iii) Participating in insurance or other benefit plans;
(iv) Authorization for disbursement of funds of the employee
organization;
(v) Audit of financial transactions of the employee organization;
(vi) The calling of regular and special meetings;
(vii) The selection of officers and stewards;
(viii) Discipline or removal of officers or agents;
(ix) Imposition of fines, suspensions, and expulsions of members,
including the grounds for such an action and any provision made for
notice, hearing, judgment, and appeal;
(x) Authorization for bargaining demands; and
(xi) Ratification of contract terms.
(4) Any change in the information required by subsection (3) of
this section must be reported to the commission at the time the
employee organization files with the commission the annual financial
report required in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) Every officer of an employee organization and every employee of
an employee organization, other than an employee performing exclusively
clerical or custodial services, shall file with the commission within
sixty days of the end of its fiscal year a signed report listing and
describing for the preceding fiscal year:
(a) Any stock, bond, security, loan given or received, or other
interest, legal or equitable, which he or she or a spouse or minor
child directly or indirectly held in, and any income or any other
benefit with monetary value, including reimbursed expenses, which he or
she or a spouse or minor child directly or indirectly derived from, any
business any part of which consists of buying from, selling or leasing
to, or otherwise dealing with, the employer;
(b) Any stock, bond, security, loan given or received, or other
interest, legal or equitable, which he or she or a spouse or minor
child directly or indirectly held in, and any income or any other
benefit with monetary value, including reimbursed expenses, which he or
she or a spouse or minor child directly or indirectly derived from, a
business any part of which consists of buying from, or selling or
leasing directly or indirectly to, or otherwise dealing with, the
employee organization;
(c) Any direct or indirect business transaction or arrangement
between him or her or a spouse or minor child and the employer or any
subsidiary thereof whose employees the organization represents or is
actively seeking to represent, except work performed and payments and
benefits received as a bona fide employee of the employer; and
(d) Any payment of money or other thing of value, including
reimbursed expenses, which he or she or a spouse or minor child
received directly or indirectly from any person who acts as a labor
relations consultant to the employer.
(6) The provisions of subsection (5)(a) through (d) of this section
do not require any officer or employee to report his or her bona fide
investments in securities traded on a securities exchange registered as
a national securities exchange under the securities exchange act of
1934, in shares in an investment company registered under the
investment company act, or in securities of a public utility holding
company registered under the public utility holding company act of
1935, or to report any income derived therefrom.
(7) Every person required to file any report under subsections (1),
(3), and (5) of this section shall maintain records on the matters
required to be reported which will provide in sufficient detail the
necessary basic information and data from which the documents filed
with the commission may be verified, explained or clarified, and
checked for accuracy and completeness, and shall include vouchers,
worksheets, receipts, and applicable resolutions, and shall keep the
records available for examination for a period of not less than six
years after the filing of the documents based on the information which
they contain. The commission shall preserve the statements or reports
for not less than ten years. The contents of the reports and documents
filed with the commission under subsections (1), (3), and (5) of this
section are public information and shall be made available to the
public in the following manners:
(a) The commission shall by rule make reasonable provision for the
inspection and examination, on the request of any person, of the
information and data contained in any report or other document filed
under subsections (1), (3), and (5) of this section.
(b) The commission shall furnish copies of reports or other
documents filed with the commission under subsections (1), (3), and (5)
of this section at a charge based on the cost of the service.
(c) By ninety days after the effective date of this section, the
commission shall operate a web site or contract for the operation of a
web site that allows public access to reports, copies of reports, or
copies of data and information submitted in reports, filed with the
commission under subsections (1), (3), and (5) of this section.
(d) The employee organization must make copies of reports or other
documents filed under subsections (1), (3), and (5) of this section
available to every employee in the bargaining unit, and must annually
notify every employee in the bargaining unit that the reports are
available on the commission's web site.
(8) The commission may determine whether an actual violation of
this section has occurred, and following that determination issue and
enforce an appropriate order subject to the following terms:
(a) If the commission finds that an employee organization has
violated this section by failing or refusing to prepare the reports as
required in subsections (1), (3), and (5) of this section or by
preparing an incomplete or inaccurate report, the commission shall
issue an order compelling compliance and assess a fine of fifty dollars
for each day each report was overdue.
(b) On finding a second violation by the employee organization, the
commission shall:
(i) Issue an order compelling compliance; and
(ii) Assess a fine of fifty dollars for each day each report was
overdue or order the refund of all membership dues or agency shop fees
to employees in the bargaining unit for the period covered by the
report, whichever amount is greater.
(c) On finding a third violation by the employee organization, the
commission shall:
(i) Issue an order compelling compliance;
(ii) Assess a fine of fifty dollars for each day each report was
overdue or order the refund of all membership dues or agency shop fees
to employees in the bargaining unit for the period covered by the
report, whichever amount is greater; and
(iii) Order an employee election in the affected bargaining unit to
determine whether the employee organization will continue to be the
exclusive bargaining representative of the bargaining unit. The
election shall be conducted upon the expiration of the existing
collective bargaining agreement covering the affected bargaining unit.
(d) The commission may make determinations and issue and enforce
orders at its own discretion or as a response to a petition filed by
the employer, any employee in the bargaining unit before expiration of
the applicable collective bargaining agreement, or any member of the
general public. The commission may, at its discretion, refer matters
of compliance to the state attorney general or other enforcement
agency.
(9) Civil enforcement provisions:
(a) Any person who willfully violates this section shall be fined
not more than ten thousand dollars.
(b) Any person who makes a false statement or representation of a
material fact, knowing it to be false, or who knowingly fails to
disclose a material fact, in any document, report, or other information
required under this section shall be fined not more than ten thousand
dollars.
(c) Any person who willfully makes a false entry in or willfully
conceals, withholds, or destroys any books, records, reports, or
statements required to be kept by this section shall be fined not more
than ten thousand dollars.
(d) Each individual required to sign reports under subsections (1),
(3), and (5) of this section is personally responsible for the filing
of those reports and for any statement contained therein which he or
she knows to be false.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A ferry employee organization must annually, not more than
sixty days after the end of its fiscal year, provide financial
disclosure information to all employees in the bargaining unit and to
the general public by filing with the commission a report containing
the following information, detailed by functional spending categories,
that accurately discloses its financial condition and operations for
the preceding fiscal year:
(a) Assets and liabilities at the beginning and end of the fiscal
year;
(b) Salary, the cost of fringe benefits, allowances, and other
direct or indirect disbursements to each officer of the local, the
ferry employee organization, and the support staff, as well as all
contributions to state or national affiliates and any official or
employee thereof;
(c) All income received or the value of services furnished to a
ferry employee organization by either a parent affiliated labor
organization or by any other labor organization on behalf of the ferry
employee organization;
(d) A report of the total amount spent by the ferry employee
organization, and an itemization of expenditures of more than one
thousand five hundred dollars for:
(i) Contract negotiation and administration;
(ii) Organizing activities;
(iii) Strike activities;
(iv) Litigation, specifying the matters and cases involved;
(v) Public relations activities;
(vi) Political activities, including contributions to candidates,
ballot measures, member communications, and get out the vote efforts;
(vii) Activities attempting to influence the passage or defeat of
federal, state, or local legislation or the content or enforcement of
federal, state, or local regulations or policies;
(viii) Voter education and issue advocacy activities;
(ix) Training activities for each officer of the ferry employee
organization or ferry employee organization support staff; and
(x) Conference, convention, and travel activities engaged in by the
ferry employee organization;
(e) The percentage of the ferry employee organization's total
expenditures that were spent for each of the activities described in
(d) of this subsection;
(f) The names, addresses, and activities of any of the law firms,
public relations firms, or lobbyists whose services are used by the
ferry employee organization for any activity described in (d) of this
subsection;
(g) A list of political candidates, political organizations,
charitable organizations, nonprofit organizations, and community
organizations to which the ferry employee organization contributed
financial or in-kind assistance and the dollar amount of such
assistance; and
(h) The name and address of any political action committees with
which the ferry employee organization is affiliated or to whom it
provides contributions, the total amount of contributions to those
committees, the candidates or causes to which the committees provided
any financial assistance, and the amount provided to each candidate or
cause.
(2) The report required in subsection (1) of this section must be
prepared by an auditing organization, independent of the ferry employee
organization, using generally accepted auditing standards and generally
accepted accounting principles, that ensures the accuracy and veracity
of the information provided by the ferry employee organization. All
expenditures must be reported as either germane to collective
bargaining, contract administration, or grievance processing, or not so
related.
(3) The ferry employee organization must disclose information to
all employees in the bargaining unit and to the general public by
filing with the commission a report signed by its president and
secretary or corresponding principal officers, and containing the
following information:
(a) The name of the ferry employee organization, its mailing
address, and any other address at which it maintains its principal
office or at which it keeps records;
(b) The name and title of each of its officers;
(c) The initiation fee or fees required from a new or transferred
member;
(d) The regular dues or fees or other periodic payments required to
remain a member of the reporting ferry employee organization; and
(e) Detailed statements regarding the provisions made and
procedures followed with respect to each of the following:
(i) Qualifications for, or restrictions on, membership;
(ii) Levying of assessments;
(iii) Participating in insurance or other benefit plans;
(iv) Authorization for disbursement of funds of the ferry employee
organization;
(v) Audit of financial transactions of the ferry employee
organization;
(vi) The calling of regular and special meetings;
(vii) The selection of officers and stewards;
(viii) Discipline or removal of officers or agents;
(ix) Imposition of fines, suspensions, and expulsions of members,
including the grounds for such an action and any provision made for
notice, hearing, judgment, and appeal;
(x) Authorization for bargaining demands; and
(xi) Ratification of contract terms.
(4) Any change in the information required by subsection (3) of
this section must be reported to the commission at the time the ferry
employee organization files with the commission the annual financial
report required in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) Every officer of a ferry employee organization and every
employee of a ferry employee organization, other than an employee
performing exclusively clerical or custodial services, shall file with
the commission within sixty days of the end of its fiscal year a signed
report listing and describing for the preceding fiscal year:
(a) Any stock, bond, security, loan given or received, or other
interest, legal or equitable, which he or she or a spouse or minor
child directly or indirectly held in, and any income or any other
benefit with monetary value, including reimbursed expenses, which he or
she or a spouse or minor child directly or indirectly derived from, any
business any part of which consists of buying from, selling or leasing
to, or otherwise dealing with, the employer;
(b) Any stock, bond, security, loan given or received, or other
interest, legal or equitable, which he or she or a spouse or minor
child directly or indirectly held in, and any income or any other
benefit with monetary value, including reimbursed expenses, which he or
she or a spouse or minor child directly or indirectly derived from, a
business any part of which consists of buying from, or selling or
leasing directly or indirectly to, or otherwise dealing with, the ferry
employee organization;
(c) Any direct or indirect business transaction or arrangement
between him or her or a spouse or minor child and the employer or any
subsidiary thereof whose employees the organization represents or is
actively seeking to represent, except work performed and payments and
benefits received as a bona fide employee of the employer; and
(d) Any payment of money or other thing of value, including
reimbursed expenses, which he or she or a spouse or minor child
received directly or indirectly from any person who acts as a labor
relations consultant to the employer.
(6) The provisions of subsection (5)(a) through (d) of this section
do not require any officer or employee to report his or her bona fide
investments in securities traded on a securities exchange registered as
a national securities exchange under the securities exchange act of
1934, in shares in an investment company registered under the
investment company act, or in securities of a public utility holding
company registered under the public utility holding company act of
1935, or to report any income derived therefrom.
(7) Every person required to file any report under subsections (1),
(3), and (5) of this section shall maintain records on the matters
required to be reported which will provide in sufficient detail the
necessary basic information and data from which the documents filed
with the commission may be verified, explained or clarified, and
checked for accuracy and completeness, and shall include vouchers,
worksheets, receipts, and applicable resolutions, and shall keep the
records available for examination for a period of not less than six
years after the filing of the documents based on the information which
they contain. The commission shall preserve the statements or reports
for not less than ten years. The contents of the reports and documents
filed with the commission under subsections (1), (3), and (5) of this
section are public information and shall be made available to the
public in the following manners:
(a) The commission shall by rule make reasonable provision for the
inspection and examination, on the request of any person, of the
information and data contained in any report or other document filed
under subsections (1), (3), and (5) of this section.
(b) The commission shall furnish copies of reports or other
documents filed with the commission under subsections (1), (3), and (5)
of this section at a charge based on the cost of the service.
(c) By ninety days after the effective date of this section, the
commission shall operate a web site or contract for the operation of a
web site that allows public access to reports, copies of reports, or
copies of data and information submitted in reports, filed with the
commission under subsections (1), (3), and (5) of this section.
(d) The ferry employee organization must make copies of reports or
other documents filed under subsections (1), (3), and (5) of this
section available to every employee in the bargaining unit, and must
annually notify every employee in the bargaining unit that the reports
are available on the commission's web site.
(8) The commission may determine whether an actual violation of
this section has occurred, and following that determination issue and
enforce an appropriate order subject to the following terms:
(a) If the commission finds that a ferry employee organization has
violated this section by failing or refusing to prepare the reports as
required in subsections (1), (3), and (5) of this section or by
preparing an incomplete or inaccurate report, the commission shall
issue an order compelling compliance and assess a fine of fifty dollars
for each day each report was overdue.
(b) On finding a second violation by the ferry employee
organization, the commission shall:
(i) Issue an order compelling compliance; and
(ii) Assess a fine of fifty dollars for each day each report was
overdue or order the refund of all membership dues or agency shop fees
to employees in the bargaining unit for the period covered by the
report, whichever amount is greater.
(c) On finding a third violation by the ferry employee
organization, the commission shall:
(i) Issue an order compelling compliance;
(ii) Assess a fine of fifty dollars for each day each report was
overdue or order the refund of all membership dues or agency shop fees
to employees in the bargaining unit for the period covered by the
report, whichever amount is greater; and
(iii) Order an employee election in the affected bargaining unit to
determine whether the ferry employee organization will continue to be
the exclusive bargaining representative of the bargaining unit. The
election shall be conducted upon the expiration of the existing
collective bargaining agreement covering the affected bargaining unit.
(d) The commission may make determinations and issue and enforce
orders at its own discretion or as a response to a petition filed by
the employer, any employee in the bargaining unit before expiration of
the applicable collective bargaining agreement, or any member of the
general public. The commission may, at its discretion, refer matters
of compliance to the state attorney general or other enforcement
agency.
(9) Civil enforcement provisions:
(a) Any person who willfully violates this section shall be fined
not more than ten thousand dollars.
(b) Any person who makes a false statement or representation of a
material fact, knowing it to be false, or who knowingly fails to
disclose a material fact, in any document, report, or other information
required under this section shall be fined not more than ten thousand
dollars.
(c) Any person who willfully makes a false entry in or willfully
conceals, withholds, or destroys any books, records, reports, or
statements required to be kept by this section shall be fined not more
than ten thousand dollars.
(d) Each individual required to sign reports under subsections (1),
(3), and (5) of this section is personally responsible for the filing
of those reports and for any statement contained therein which he or
she knows to be false.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.52 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 2 of this act applies to employee organizations under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The requirements applicable to employee organizations under section
2 of this act apply to bargaining representatives under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 2 of this act applies to employee organizations under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 41.76 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 2 of this act applies to employee organizations under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 41.80 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 2 of this act applies to employee organizations under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---