BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a viable
manufacturing industry is critical to providing the state economy with
family-wage jobs and improving the quality of life for workers and
communities. To perform in the emerging global marketplace, Washington
manufacturers must master new technologies, streamline production
processes, improve quality assurance, expand environmental compliance,
and enhance methods of work organization. Only through innovation and
modernization techniques, reflecting the specific needs and
capabilities of the individual firms, can Washington manufacturers both
compete successfully in the market of the future and pay good living
wages.
Most small and midsize manufacturers do not have the resources that
will allow them to easily access innovation and modernization technical
assistance and the skills training needed to make them globally
competitive. Because of the statewide public benefit to be gained from
increasing the availability of innovation and modernization services,
it is the intent of the legislature to create a new mechanism in a
manner that reduces the up-front costs of these services for small and
midsize manufacturing firms. It is further the intent of the
legislature that Washington state increase its support for the federal
manufacturing extension partnership program, to expand the delivery of
innovation and modernization services to small and midsize Washington
manufacturers, and to leverage federal funding and private resources
devoted to such efforts.
The successful implementation of innovation and modernization
services will enable a manufacturing firm to reduce costs, increase
sales, become more profitable, and ultimately expand job opportunities
for Washington citizens. Such growth will result in increased revenue
from the state business and occupation taxes paid by manufacturers who
have engaged in innovation and modernization services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Costs of extension services" and "extension service costs"
mean the direct costs experienced under a contract with a qualified
manufacturing extension partnership affiliate for modernization
extension services, including but not limited to amounts in the
contract for costs of consulting, instruction, materials, equipment,
rental of class space, marketing, and overhead.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(4) "Innovation and modernization extension voucher" and "voucher"
mean an instrument issued to a successful applicant from the
department, verifying that funds from the manufacturing innovation and
modernization account will be forwarded to the qualified manufacturing
extension partnership affiliate selected by the participant and will
cover identified costs of extension services.
(5) "Innovation and modernization extension services" and "service"
mean a service funded under this chapter and performed by a qualified
manufacturing extension partnership affiliate. The services may
include but are not limited to strategic planning, continuous
improvement, business development, six sigma, quality improvement,
environmental health and safety, lean processes, energy management,
innovation and product development, human resources and training,
supply chain management, and project management.
(6) "Outreach services" means those activities performed by an
affiliate to either assess the technical assistance needs of Washington
manufacturers or increase manufacturers' awareness of the opportunities
and benefits of implementing cutting edge technology, techniques, and
best practices. "Outreach services" includes but is not limited to
salaries of outreach staff, needs assessments, client follow-up, public
educational events, manufacturing orientated trade shows, electronic
communications, newsletters, advertising, direct mail efforts, and
contacting business organizations for names of manufacturers who might
need assistance.
(7) "Program" means the Washington manufacturing innovation and
modernization extension service program created in section 3 of this
act.
(8) "Program participant" and "participant" mean an applicant for
assistance under the program that has received a voucher or a small
manufacturer receiving services through an industry association or
cluster association that has received a voucher.
(9) "Qualified manufacturing extension partnership affiliate" and
"affiliate" mean a private nonprofit organization established under RCW
24.50.010 or other organization that is eligible or certified to
receive federal matching funds from the national institute of standards
and technology manufacturing extension partnership program of the
United States department of commerce.
(10) "Small manufacturer" means a private employer whose primary
business is adding value to a product through a manufacturing process
and employs one hundred or fewer employees within Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington manufacturing innovation
and modernization extension service program is created to provide
assistance to small manufacturers located in the state of Washington.
The program shall be administered by the department.
(2)(a) Application to receive assistance under this program must be
made to the department in a form and manner specified by the
department. Successful applicants will receive an innovation and
modernization extension voucher from the department to cover the costs
of extension services performed by a qualified manufacturing extension
partnership affiliate. An applicant may not receive a voucher or
vouchers of over two hundred thousand dollars per calendar year. The
department shall only allocate up to sixty percent of available funding
during the first year of a biennium.
(b) Applicants must:
(i) Have a valid agreement with a qualified manufacturing extension
partnership affiliate to engage in innovation and modernization
extension services;
(ii) Agree to: (A) Make a contribution to the manufacturing
innovation and modernization account created in section 8 of this act,
in an amount equal to twenty-five percent of the amount of the
innovation and modernization extension voucher, upon completion of the
innovation and modernization extension service; and (B) make monthly or
quarterly contributions over the subsequent eighteen months, as
specified in their agreement with the affiliate, to the manufacturing
innovation and modernization account created in section 8 of this act
in an amount equal to eighty percent of the amount of the innovation
and modernization extension voucher;
(iii) Be a small manufacturer or an industry association or cluster
association at the time the applicant entered into an agreement with a
qualified manufacturing extension partnership affiliate; and
(iv) If a small manufacturer, ensure that the number of employees
the applicant has in the state during the calendar year following the
completion of the program will be equal to or greater than the number
of employees the applicant had in the state in the calendar year
preceding the start of the program.
(3) The director may solicit and receive gifts, grants, funds,
fees, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, from tribal, local,
federal, or other governmental entities, as well as private sources,
for the purpose of providing funding for the innovation and
modernization extension services and outreach services specified in
this chapter. All revenue solicited and received by the department
pursuant to this subsection must be deposited into the manufacturing
innovation and modernization account created in section 8 of this act.
(4) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.
(5) Any qualified manufacturing extension partnership affiliate
receiving funding under this program is required to submit a copy of
its annual independent federal audit to the department within three
months of its issuance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This chapter, being necessary for the
welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed
to effect its purposes. Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are
inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special law, or
parts thereof, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for participants in the Washington manufacturing innovation and
modernization extension services program created in section 3 of this
act. The credit allowed under this section is equal to fifty percent
of the value of a program participant's contributions to the
manufacturing innovation and modernization account created in section
8 of this act. If a participant in the program does not meet the
qualifications in section 3(2)(b)(iv) of this act, the participant must
remit to the department the value of any credits taken plus interest.
The credit earned by a participant in one calendar year may be carried
over to be credited against taxes incurred in subsequent calendar
years. The annual statewide credit available is limited to one million
two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2) Each person claiming a tax credit under section 5 of this act
shall report information to the department by filing a complete annual
survey. The survey is due by March 31st of the year following any
calendar year in which a tax credit under section 5 of this act is
taken. The department may extend the due date for timely filing of
annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The
survey shall include the amount of tax credit taken. The survey shall
also include the following information for employment positions in
Washington:
(a) The number of total employment positions;
(b) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(c) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(d) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
The first survey filed under this subsection shall also include
information for the twelve-month period immediately before first use of
a tax incentive.
(3) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the credit program, to be submitted at the same
time as the survey.
(4) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax credit taken, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW
82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax credit taken is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330.
(5) If a person fails to submit an annual survey under subsection
(2) of this section by the due date of the report or any extension
under RCW 82.32.590, the department shall declare the amount of taxes
credited for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and
payable. The department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on
the amounts due under this section. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the credit was claimed, and shall accrue
until the taxes for which the credit was claimed are repaid. This
information is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330.
(6) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(7) The department shall study the tax credit authorized in section
5 of this act. The department shall submit a biennial report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature beginning December 1, 2013.
The report shall measure the effect of the credit on job creation, job
retention, company growth, the movement of firms or the consolidation
of firms' operations into the state, and such other factors as the
department selects.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.32.590 and 2006 c 354 s 17, 2006 c 300 s 10, 2006
c 177 s 8, 2006 c 112 s 7, and 2006 c 84 s 7 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey or annual report under RCW 82.04.4452, section 6 of
this act, 82.32.5351, 82.32.650, 82.32.635, 82.32.640, 82.32.630,
82.32.610, or 82.74.040 by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall extend the
time for filing the survey or report. Such extension shall be for a
period of thirty days from the date the department issues its written
notification to the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under
this section. The department may grant additional extensions as it
deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey or annual report by the due date was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department
shall be guided by rules adopted by the department for the waiver or
cancellation of penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of
any tax was due to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The manufacturing innovation and
modernization account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding
activities of the Washington manufacturing innovation and modernization
extension services program created in section 3 of this act.
(3) All payments by a program participant in the Washington
manufacturing innovation and modernization extension services program
created in section 3 of this act shall be deposited into the
manufacturing innovation and modernization account. Of the total
payments deposited into the account by program participants, the
department may use up to three percent for administration of this
program. The deposit of payments under this section from a program
participant cease when the department specifies that the program
participant has met the monetary contribution obligations of the
program.
(4) All revenue solicited and received under the provisions of
section 3(3) of this act shall be deposited into the manufacturing
innovation and modernization account.
(5) The legislature intends that all payments from the
manufacturing innovation and modernization account made to qualified
manufacturing extension partnership affiliates will be eligible as the
state match in an affiliate's application for federal matching funds
under the manufacturing extension partnership program of the United
States department of commerce's national institute of standards and
technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Any qualified manufacturing extension
partnership affiliate receiving funding under the program shall collect
and submit to the department annually data on the number of clients
served, the scope of services provided, and outcomes achieved during
the previous calendar year. The department must evaluate the data
submitted and use it in a biennial report on the program submitted to
the appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 43.131
RCW to read as follows:
The Washington manufacturing innovation and modernization extension
service program under chapter 43.--- RCW (created in section 13 of this
act) shall be terminated June 30, 2012, as provided in section 11 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.131
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2013:
(1) Section 1 of this act;
(2) Section 2 of this act;
(3) Section 3 of this act;
(4) Section 4 of this act;
(5) Section 8 of this act;
(6) Section 9 of this act;
(7) Section 5 of this act; and
(8) Section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 4, 8, and 9 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---