BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.52.500 and 1994 c 154 s 220 are each amended to
read as follows:
If an ethics board finds that there is reasonable cause to believe
that a violation has occurred, the board shall consider the possibility
of the alleged violator having to pay a total amount of penalty and
costs of more than five hundred dollars. Based on such consideration,
the board may give the person who is the subject of the complaint the
option to have an administrative law judge conduct the hearing and rule
on procedural and evidentiary matters. The board may also, on its own
initiative, provide for retaining an administrative law judge. ((An
ethics board may not require total payment of more than five hundred
dollars in penalty and costs in any case where an administrative law
judge is not used and the board did not give such option to the person
who is the subject of the complaint.))

--- END ---