BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
Institutions of higher education shall:
(1) In accordance with RCW 29A.08.310, put in place a prompt and
link to the secretary of state's voter registration web site;
(2) Make voter registration forms available in places of prominence
within the premises of each campus;
(3) In consultation with the secretary of state and the student
government association, or its equivalent, develop and implement
policies regarding distribution of voter registration forms to students
at the beginning of each term and in campus housing facilities; and
(4) Collaborate with the student government association, or its
equivalent, to conduct nonpartisan voter information activities, which
may include voter registration, candidate debates, and issue forums.
Responsibility for proposing such activities shall reside with the
student government association, or its equivalent.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.08.105 and 2004 c 267 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In compliance with the Help America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252),
the centralized statewide voter registration list maintained by the
secretary of state is the official list of eligible voters for all
elections.
(2) In all counties, the county auditor shall be the chief
registrar of voters for every precinct within the county. The auditor
may appoint registration assistants to assist in registering persons
residing in the county. Each registration assistant holds office at
the pleasure of the county auditor and must be a registered voter.
(3) The county auditor shall ensure that mail-in voter registration
application forms are readily available to the public at locations to
include but not limited to the elections office, and all common
schools, fire stations, institutions of higher education as defined in
RCW 28B.10.016, and public libraries.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.260 and 2004 c 267 s 118 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall distribute forms by which a person may
register to vote by mail and transfer any previous registration in this
state. The county auditor shall keep a supply of voter registration
forms in his or her office at all times for political parties and
others interested in assisting in voter registration, and shall make
every effort to make these forms generally available to the public.
The county auditor shall provide voter registration forms to city and
town clerks, state offices, schools, fire stations, institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and any other locations
considered appropriate by the auditor or secretary of state for
extending registration opportunities to all areas of the county. After
the initial distribution of voter registration forms to a given
location, a representative designated by the official in charge of that
location shall notify the county auditor of the need for additional
voter registration supplies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---