BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The governor shall appoint a task force
to study the interstate compact on educational opportunity for military
children and make recommendations to the legislature by December 1,
2008, on whether it is in the state's interest to adopt the compact.
(2) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(a) The attorney general or his designee;
(b) The superintendent of public instruction or her designee;
(c) A representative from the department of defense;
(d) A representative from each educational service district;
(e) A representative from the state board of education; and
(f) A superintendent from a school district with a high
concentration of military children.
(3) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---