BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 8.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The attorney general's office, by December 1, 2009, shall
publish, and update when appropriate, a pamphlet, written in plain
language, explaining eminent domain and its purposes and scope, the
authority of agencies and entities exercising eminent domain, the
rights of persons subject to eminent domain proceedings, and any other
issues pertaining to eminent domain as determined by the attorney
general. The attorney general, in his or her discretion, may revise
the pamphlet as required.
(2) A copy of the pamphlet must be mailed with each notice of
planned final action as described under RCW 8.25.290(2).

Sec. 2 RCW 8.25.290 and 2007 c 68 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The condemnor must provide notice as required by this section
before:
(a) A state agency or other entity subject to chapter 8.04 RCW
takes a final action to authorize the condemnation of a specific
property;
(b) A county or other entity subject to chapter 8.08 RCW takes a
final action deeming a specific property to be "for county purposes" as
provided in RCW 8.08.010;
(c) A city or town or other entity subject to chapter 8.12 RCW
takes a final action authorizing condemnation as provided in RCW
8.12.040;
(d) A school district or other entity subject to chapter 8.16 RCW
takes a final action selecting property for condemnation as provided in
RCW 8.16.010;
(e) Any other corporation authorized to condemn property takes a
final action to authorize condemnation as provided in RCW 8.20.010; or
(f) Any other entity subject to chapter 8.04, 8.08, 8.12, 8.16, or
8.20 RCW takes any final action to authorize the condemnation of a
specific property.
(2)(a)(i) Notice of the planned final action, and a copy of the
eminent domain information pamphlet described under section 1 of this
act, shall be mailed by certified mail to each and every property owner
of record as indicated on the tax rolls of the county to the address
provided on such tax rolls, for each property potentially subject to
condemnation, at least fifteen days before the final action. If no
address is provided for a property on the tax rolls of the county, the
potential condemnor shall conduct a diligent inquiry for the address
for each and every property owner of record and send the notice to that
address. In case the property sought to be appropriated is school or
county land, such notice shall be mailed to the auditor of the county
in which the property sought to be acquired and appropriated is
situated.
(ii) The notice must contain a general description of the property
such as an address, lot number, or parcel number and specify that
condemnation of the property will be considered during the final
action. The notice must also describe the date, time, and location of
the final action at which the potential condemnor will decide whether
or not to authorize the condemnation of the property.
(iii) Mailing of the certified letter to the proper addressee or
addressees is deemed to be sufficient notice under this subsection
(2)(a).
(b)(i) Notice of a planned final action described in subsection (1)
of this section shall also be given by publication in the legal
newspaper with the largest circulation in the jurisdiction where such
property is located once a week for two successive weeks before the
final action. A second publication must also be given in the legal
newspaper routinely used by the potential condemnor, where such
newspaper does not also have the largest circulation in the
jurisdiction. Proof of circulation shall be established by publisher's
affidavit filed with the potential condemnor. Such publication shall
be deemed sufficient notice in lieu of a certified letter for each
property owner of record for the property whose address is unknown and
cannot be ascertained after a diligent inquiry.
(ii) The notice published under this subsection (2)(b) shall
contain the same information as is required under (a) of this
subsection.
(3) In a condemnation action subject to this section in which a
condemnee alleges insufficient notice under this section, the court may
determine whether the condemnor made a diligent attempt to provide
sufficient notice and issue a finding on the sufficiency of the notice.
Lack of sufficient notice under this section shall render the
subsequent proceedings void as to the person improperly notified, but
the subsequent proceedings shall not be void as to all persons or
parties having been notified as provided in this section, either by
publication or otherwise. A potential condemnor may cure insufficient
notice under this section by providing an additional sufficient notice
prior to taking a new final action, and filing a new petition if one
was previously filed, for condemnation for the property owner of record
who received insufficient notice. In such a case, RCW 8.12.530 shall
not apply and a subsequent proceeding may be filed sooner than one year
after discontinuance.
(4)(a) For potential condemnors subject to chapter 42.30 RCW, the
open public meetings act, "final action" has the same meaning as that
provided in RCW 42.30.020.
(b) For state agencies not subject to chapter 42.30 RCW, the office
of the attorney general shall publish procedures that define "final
action" for state agencies to ensure that property owners of record are
provided with notice and opportunity for comment before the agency
makes a final decision to authorize the condemnation of specific
property.
(c) For all other entities subject to chapter 68, Laws of 2007,
"final action" means a public meeting at which the entity informs
potentially affected property owners of record about the scope and
reasons for a potential condemnation action. A meeting must be held in
each county where property being considered for condemnation is
located. The meeting must be open to the public and conducted by a
duly authorized representative of the entity.

--- END ---