BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.20.050 and 2007 c 343 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state board of health shall provide a forum for the
development of public health policy in Washington state. It is
authorized to recommend to the secretary means for obtaining
appropriate citizen and professional involvement in all public health
policy formulation and other matters related to the powers and duties
of the department. It is further empowered to hold hearings and
explore ways to improve the health status of the citizenry.
(a) At least every five years, the state board shall convene
regional forums to gather citizen input on public health issues.
(b) Every two years, in coordination with the development of the
state biennial budget, the state board shall prepare the state public
health report that outlines the health priorities of the ensuing
biennium. The report shall:
(i) Consider the citizen input gathered at the forums;
(ii) Be developed with the assistance of local health departments;
(iii) Be based on the best available information collected and
reviewed according to RCW 43.70.050 ((and recommendations from the
council));
(iv) Be developed with the input of state health care agencies. At
least the following directors of state agencies shall provide timely
recommendations to the state board on suggested health priorities for
the ensuing biennium: The secretary of social and health services, the
health care authority administrator, the insurance commissioner, the
superintendent of public instruction, the director of labor and
industries, the director of ecology, and the director of agriculture;
(v) Be used by state health care agency administrators in preparing
proposed agency budgets and executive request legislation;
(vi) Be submitted by the state board to the governor by January 1st
of each even-numbered year for adoption by the governor. The governor,
no later than March 1st of that year, shall approve, modify, or
disapprove the state public health report.
(c) In fulfilling its responsibilities under this subsection, the
state board may create ad hoc committees or other such committees of
limited duration as necessary.
(2) In order to protect public health, the state board of health
shall:
(a) Adopt rules necessary to assure safe and reliable public
drinking water and to protect the public health. Such rules shall
establish requirements regarding:
(i) The design and construction of public water system facilities,
including proper sizing of pipes and storage for the number and type of
customers;
(ii) Drinking water quality standards, monitoring requirements, and
laboratory certification requirements;
(iii) Public water system management and reporting requirements;
(iv) Public water system planning and emergency response
requirements;
(v) Public water system operation and maintenance requirements;
(vi) Water quality, reliability, and management of existing but
inadequate public water systems; and
(vii) Quality standards for the source or supply, or both source
and supply, of water for bottled water plants.
(b) Adopt rules and standards for prevention, control, and
abatement of health hazards and nuisances related to the disposal of
wastes, solid and liquid, including but not limited to sewage, garbage,
refuse, and other environmental contaminants; adopt standards and
procedures governing the design, construction, and operation of sewage,
garbage, refuse and other solid waste collection, treatment, and
disposal facilities;
(c) Adopt rules controlling public health related to environmental
conditions including but not limited to heating, lighting, ventilation,
sanitary facilities, cleanliness and space in all types of public
facilities including but not limited to food service establishments,
schools, institutions, recreational facilities and transient
accommodations and in places of work;
(d) Adopt rules for the imposition and use of isolation and
quarantine;
(e) Adopt rules for the prevention and control of infectious and
noninfectious diseases, including food and vector borne illness, and
rules governing the receipt and conveyance of remains of deceased
persons, and such other sanitary matters as admit of and may best be
controlled by universal rule; and
(f) Adopt rules for accessing existing databases for the purposes
of performing health related research.
(3) The state board shall adopt rules that are advisory only for
the design, construction, installation, operation, and maintenance of
((those)) on-site sewage systems with design flows ((of)) equal to or
less than three thousand five hundred gallons per day. The department
shall provide technical assistance to local health jurisdictions
concerning regulation of these on-site sewage systems.
(4) The state board may delegate any of its rule-adopting authority
to the secretary and rescind such delegated authority.
(5) All local boards of health, health authorities and officials,
officers of state institutions, police officers, sheriffs, constables,
and all other officers and employees of the state, or any county, city,
or township thereof, shall enforce all rules adopted by the state board
of health. In the event of failure or refusal on the part of any
member of such boards or any other official or person mentioned in this
section to so act, he or she shall be subject to a fine of not less
than fifty dollars, upon first conviction, and not less than one
hundred dollars upon second conviction.
(6) The state board may advise the secretary on health policy
issues pertaining to the department of health and the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.05.072 and 1995 c 263 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The local health officer may grant a waiver from specific
requirements adopted by the ((state)) local board of health for on-site
sewage systems if:
(1) The on-site sewage system for which a waiver is requested is
for sewage flows ((under)) equal to or less than three thousand five
hundred gallons per day;
(2) The waiver request is evaluated by the local health officer on
an individual, site-by-site basis; and
(3) The local health officer determines that the waiver is
consistent with the standards in, and the intent of, the ((state))
local board of health rules((; and
(4) The local health officer submits quarterly reports to the
department regarding any waivers approved or denied.
Based on review of the quarterly reports, if the department finds
that the waivers previously granted have not been consistent with the
standards in, and intent of, the state board of health rules, the
department shall provide technical assistance to the local health
officer to correct the inconsistency, and may notify the local and
state boards of health of the department's concerns.
If upon further review of the quarterly reports, the department
finds that the inconsistency between the waivers granted and the state
board of health standards has not been corrected, the department may
suspend the authority of the local health officer to grant waivers
under this section until such inconsistencies have been corrected)).

Sec. 3 RCW 70.05.074 and 1997 c 447 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The local health officer must respond to the applicant for an
on-site sewage system permit within thirty days after receiving a fully
completed application. The local health officer must respond that the
application is either approved, denied, or pending. All conditions of
compliance for the permit must be included on or physically attached to
the permit.
(2) If the local health officer denies an application to install an
on-site sewage system, the denial must be for cause and based upon
public health and environmental protection concerns, including concerns
regarding the ability to operate and maintain the system, or conflicts
with other existing laws, regulations, or ordinances. The local health
officer must provide the applicant with a written justification for the
denial, along with an explanation of the procedure for appeal.
(3) If the local health officer identifies the application as
pending and subject to review beyond thirty days, the local health
officer must provide the applicant with a written justification that
the site-specific conditions or circumstances necessitate a longer time
period for a decision on the application. The local health officer
must include any specific information necessary to make a decision and
the estimated time required for a decision to be made.
(4) A local health officer may not limit the number of alternative
sewage systems within his or her jurisdiction without cause. Any such
limitation must be based upon public health and environmental
protection concerns, including concerns regarding the ability to
operate and maintain the system, or conflicts with other existing laws,
regulations, or ordinances. If such a limitation is established, the
local health officer must justify the limitation in writing, with
specific reasons, and must provide an explanation of the procedure for
appealing the limitation.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.05.077 and 1998 c 34 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of health, in consultation and cooperation with
local environmental health officers, shall develop a one-day course to
train local environmental health officers, health officers, and
environmental health specialists and technicians to address the
application of the waiver authority granted under RCW 70.05.072 as well
as other existing statutory or regulatory flexibility for siting on-site sewage systems.
(2) The training course shall include the following topics:
(a) The statutory authority to grant waivers ((from the state on-site sewage system rules)) by the local health officer;
(b) The regulatory framework for the application of on-site sewage
treatment and disposal technologies, with an emphasis on the
differences between rules, standards, and guidance. The course shall
include instruction on interpreting the intent of a rule rather than
the strict reading of the language of a rule, and also discuss the
liability assumed by a unit of local government when local rules,
policies, or practices deviate from the state administrative code;
(c) The application of site evaluation and assessment methods to
match the particular site and development plans with the on-site sewage
treatment and disposal technology suitable to protect public health
((to at least the level provided by state rule)); and
(d) Instruction in the concept and application of mitigation
waivers.
(3) The training course shall be made available to all local health
departments and districts in various locations in the state without
fee. Updated guidance documents and materials shall be provided to all
participants, including examples of the types of waivers and processes
that other jurisdictions in the region have granted and used. The
first training conducted under this section shall take place by June
30, 1999.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.118.020 and 1994 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter,)) The ((terms defined)) definitions in
this section ((shall have the meanings indicated)) apply throughout
this chapter unless the context clearly ((indicates)) requires
otherwise.
(1) "Nonwater-carried sewage disposal devices" means any device
that stores and treats nonwater-carried human urine and feces.
(2) "Alternative methods of effluent disposal" means systems
approved by the department of health or local boards of health,
including at least, mound systems, alternating drainfields, anaerobic
filters, evapotranspiration systems, and aerobic systems.
(3) "Failure" means: (a) Effluent has been discharged on the
surface of the ground prior to approved treatment; or (b) effluent has
percolated to the surface of the ground; or (c) effluent has
contaminated or threatens to contaminate a groundwater supply.
(4) "Additive" means any commercial product intended to affect the
performance or aesthetics of an on-site sewage disposal system.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.
(6) "On-site sewage disposal system" means any system of piping,
treatment devices, or other facilities that convey, store, treat, or
dispose of sewage on the property where it originates or on nearby
property under the control of the user where the system is not
connected to a public sewer system. For purposes of this chapter, an
on-site sewage disposal system does not include indoor plumbing and
associated fixtures.
(7) "Chemical additive" means those additives containing acids,
bases, or other chemicals deemed unsafe by the department or local
boards of health for use in an on-site sewage disposal system.
(8) "Additive manufacturer" means any person who manufactures,
formulates, blends, packages, or repackages an additive product for
sale, use, or distribution within the state.
(9) "Small on-site sewage disposal system" means an on-site sewage
disposal system with design flows of equal to or less than three
thousand five hundred gallons per day.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.118.030 and 1998 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Local boards of health shall adopt regulations concerning on-site sewage disposal systems, shall identify failing septic tank
drainfield systems in the normal manner, and will use reasonable effort
to determine new failures. The local health officer, environmental
health director, or equivalent officer may apply for an administrative
search warrant to a court official authorized to issue a criminal
search warrant. The warrant may only be applied for after the local
health officer or the health officer's designee has requested
inspection of the person's property under the specific administrative
plan required in this section, and the person has refused the health
officer or the health officer's designee access to the person's
property. Timely notice must be given to any affected person that a
warrant is being requested and that the person may be present at any
court proceeding to consider the requested search warrant. The court
official may issue the warrant upon probable cause. A request for a
search warrant must show (([that])) that the inspection, examination,
test, or sampling is in response to pollution in commercial or
recreational shellfish harvesting areas or pollution in fresh water.
A specific administrative plan must be developed expressly in response
to the pollution. The local health officer, environmental health
director, or equivalent officer shall submit the plan to the court as
part of the justification for the warrant, along with specific evidence
showing that it is reasonable to believe pollution is coming from the
septic system on the property to be accessed for inspection. The plan
must include each of the following elements:
(a) The overall goal of the inspection;
(b) The location and identification by address of the properties
being authorized for inspection;
(c) Requirements for giving the person owning the property and the
person occupying the property if it is someone other than the owner,
notice of the plan, its provisions, and times of any inspections;
(d) The survey procedures to be used in the inspection;
(e) The criteria that would be used to define an on-site sewage
system failure; and
(f) The follow-up actions that would be pursued once an on-site
sewage system failure has been identified and confirmed.
(2) Discretionary judgment will be made in implementing corrections
by specifying nonwater-carried sewage disposal devices or other
alternative methods of treatment and effluent disposal as a measure of
ameliorating existing substandard conditions. Local regulations shall
be consistent with the intent and purposes stated in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.118A
RCW to read as follows:
A local health officer has discretionary authority to make a
determination to not fulfill the requirements under this chapter. A
local health officer shall consult with the local board of health
before making such a determination. A local health officer shall
report a determination to not fulfill the requirements of this chapter
to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 70.118.130 (Civil penalties) and 2007 c
343 s 9 are each repealed.

--- END ---