BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 20.01.125 and 1986 c 178 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every dealer and commission merchant dealing in hay or straw shall
obtain a certified vehicle tare weight and a certified vehicle gross
weight for each load hauled and shall furnish the consignor with a copy
of such certified weight ticket within seventy-two hours after taking
delivery. It shall be a violation of this chapter for any licensee to
transport hay or straw which has been purchased by weight without
having obtained a certified weight ticket from the first licensed
public weighmaster which would be encountered on the ordinary route to
the destination where the hay or straw is to be unloaded. If agreed
upon in writing between a dealer or commission merchant and a grower or
consigner, a certified vehicle tare weight and certified vehicle gross
weight may be obtained from a hay or straw processing facility with a
scale approved by the director.

--- END ---