BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.027 and 2002 c 292 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A Washington state motor vehicle driver's license issued to any
service member if valid and in force and effect while such person is
serving in the armed forces or the foreign service, shall remain in
full force and effect so long as such service continues unless the same
is sooner suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law
and for not to exceed ninety days following the date on which the
holder of such driver's license is honorably separated from service in
the armed forces or the foreign service of the United States. A
Washington state driver's license issued to the spouse or dependent
child of such service member likewise remains in full force and effect
if the person is residing with the service member.
For purposes of this section, "service member" means every person
serving in (1) the armed forces whose branch of service as of the date
of application for the driver's license is included in the definition
of veteran pursuant to RCW 41.04.007 or the person will meet the
definition of veteran at the time of discharge, or (2) the foreign
service.

--- END ---