BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The office of minority and women's
business enterprises shall establish a plan, with timelines, to
complete the following, with the overall goal of improving the
effectiveness of the office of minority and women's business
enterprises:
(a) A project to streamline the statewide certification process and
improve the efficiency by which business applications for certification
are submitted and approved. The project must also include improvements
in outreach capability and improvements to the certification process
that will facilitate certified firms' inclusion in purchases made by
state agencies and educational institutions.
(b) A project to improve the ability of the office to encourage
participation of firms certified under chapter 39.19 RCW as prime
contractors and subcontractors in contracts awarded by state agencies
and educational institutions.
(c) A database that allows the office to communicate and obtain
data from other state agencies and to develop reports related to the
participation in agency contracts of firms certified under chapter
39.19 RCW. The report required under subsection (2) of this section
must include fiscal information, including identification of fund
sources for the database project.
(2) The office must develop the plan in consultation with the
advisory committee on minority and women's business enterprises, and
must report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2008, on the plan required by this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.19.041 and 1995 c 269 s 1302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2008, the director ((may)) shall establish ((ad hoc
advisory committees, as necessary,)) an advisory committee on minority
and women's business enterprises to assist in the development of
policies to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(2) It is the legislature's intent that the advisory committee be
as representative and diverse as possible.
(a) The advisory committee membership must include at least the
following representation and take into account statewide geographic
distribution of members:
(i) Businesses certified under this chapter;
(ii) Organizations that represent businesses certified under this
chapter; and
(iii) State agencies, with representation of both large and small
agencies.
(b) The legislature strongly recommends that local jurisdictions
also participate on the advisory committee.

--- END ---