BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.131.389 and 1998 c 108 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of public defense and its powers and duties shall be
terminated on June 30, ((2008)) 2023, as provided in RCW 43.131.390.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.131.390 and 1998 c 108 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, ((2009)) 2024:
(1) RCW 2.70.005 and 1996 c 221 s 1;
(2) RCW 2.70.010 and 1996 c 221 s 2;
(3) RCW 2.70.020 and 1996 c 221 s 3;
(4) RCW 2.70.030 and 2005 c 111 s 1 and 1996 c 221 s 4; and
(5) RCW 2.70.040 and 1996 c 221 s 5.

--- END ---