BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.12.260 and 2007 c 469 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each commissioner of a port district shall receive ninety
dollars per day or portion thereof spent (a) in actual attendance at
official meetings of the port district commission, or (b) in
performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the
district. The total per diem compensation of a port commissioner shall
not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars in a year, or ten
thousand eight hundred dollars in any year for a port district with
gross operating income of twenty-five million or more in the preceding
calendar year. This subsection does not apply to port districts
subject to subsection (7) of this section.
(2) Except as required by subsection (7) of this section, port
commissioners shall receive additional compensation as follows: (a)
Each commissioner of a port district with gross operating revenues of
twenty-five million dollars or more in the preceding calendar year
shall receive a salary of five hundred dollars per month; and (b) each
commissioner of a port district with gross operating revenues of from
one million dollars to less than twenty-five million dollars in the
preceding calendar year shall receive a salary of two hundred dollars
per month.
(3) Except as required by subsection (7) of this section, in lieu
of the compensation specified in this section, a port commission may
set compensation to be paid to commissioners.
(4) For any commissioner who has not elected to become a member of
public employees retirement system before May 1, 1975, the compensation
provided pursuant to this section shall not be considered salary for
purposes of the provisions of any retirement system created pursuant to
the general laws of this state nor shall attendance at such meetings or
other service on behalf of the district constitute service as defined
in RCW 41.40.010(9): PROVIDED, That in the case of a port district
when commissioners are receiving compensation and contributing to the
public employees retirement system, these benefits shall continue in
full force and effect notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 53.12.260
and 53.12.265.
(5) The dollar thresholds established in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial
management every five years, beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes
in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price
index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average
consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and
clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and
statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor
and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas
within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people,
covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and
including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in
this section. The office of financial management must calculate the
new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser
for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month
before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.
(6) A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.
(7) Each commissioner of a port district in a county with one
million or more residents must serve in a full-time employment capacity
and must be compensated for the performance of his or her official
services and duties at an amount equaling the salary paid to members of
the county legislative authority of the county in which the port is
located.

Sec. 2 RCW 53.12.270 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 12 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The commission may delegate to the managing official of a port
district such administerial powers and duties of the commission as it
may deem proper for the efficient and proper management of port
district operations. Any such delegation shall be authorized by
appropriate resolution of the commission, which resolution must also
establish guidelines and procedures for the managing official to
follow.
(2) Nothing in this section allows the managing official or
employees of a port district to waive policies related to competition
in the procurement of goods and services without receiving prior
approval, by resolution, from the commission.
(3) Nothing in this section allows the managing official of a port
district to supervise or otherwise direct administrative staff and
confidential assistants hired under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 53.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Each commissioner of a port district in a county with one million
or more residents must have at least one full-time administrative staff
member and one full-time confidential assistant. Administrative staff
and confidential assistants hired under this section: (1) Must assist
the commissioner in the performance of his or her official services and
duties; (2) must be subject to terms of employment established in
accordance with RCW 53.08.170; and (3) may not be supervised or
otherwise directed by the managing official of the port.
Administrative staff hired under this section must have experience
in fiscal analysis.

--- END ---