BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office shall develop and maintain a grants, contracts, and
loan management system for use by all state agencies. State agencies
must use the grants, contracts, and loan management system developed by
the office. Beginning July 1, 2008, the department of ecology and the
department of community, trade, and economic development must use the
system. By July 1, 2012, all other state agencies shall use the
system.
(2) The legislative evaluation and accountability program shall
have access to the grants, contracts, and loan management system put in
place by the office.
(3) As part of the grants, contracts, and loan management system,
the office must develop a single searchable web site accessible by the
public, at no cost to access information, on awards of state grants,
contracts, and loans.
(a) At a minimum, the searchable web site shall contain a link to
the public disclosure commission's searchable campaign finance database
and shall include the following information on awards:
(i) The name of the entity receiving the award, as well as the
names of any parent company or affiliations;
(ii) The amount of the award;
(iii) The amount paid by fiscal year;
(iv) Information on the award, including purpose of the award,
funding agency, program, and division; and award title descriptive of
the purpose of each funding action;
(v) The location of the entity receiving the award and the primary
location of performance under the award, including the city and county;
and
(vi) Any other relevant information specified by the office.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, awards of grants, contracts, and loans
made by the department of ecology and the department of community,
trade, and economic development must be posted on the web site. By
July 1, 2010, awards of grants, contracts, and loans made by all state
agencies shall be posted on the web site.
(c) The director is authorized to designate one or more state
agencies to participate in the development, establishment, operation,
and support of the web site.
(d) The web site shall include a comment section that will allow
the public to provide input about the utility of the web site and
recommendations for improvements.
(e) Information shall be displayed on the web site immediately
after an award is made. Any changes to the original award must be
listed on the web site.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Award" means state financial assistance and expenditures
including grants, subgrants, loans, awards, cooperative agreements,
contracts, subcontracts, purchase orders, task orders, and delivery
orders.
(b) "Entity" means any corporation, association, partnership,
limited liability company, limited liability partnership, sole
proprietorship, legal business, or person in receipt of a grant,
contract, loan, award, or any other financial award or assistance from
an agency of the state.
(c) "Searchable web site" means a web site that allows the public
to search and aggregate state funding of grants, contracts, and loans
in order to determine the total amount of state funding awarded and
paid to an entity through a state award by fiscal year, and download
data from searches.

--- END ---