BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that it is essential to the state's fiscal
stability, economic vitality, and ability to ensure the provision of
adequate public services to its citizens that it have more than a two-year outlook on the state's operating budget. The legislature finds
that long-term planning has been an important tool in the preparation
and periodic revision of the state's capital and transportation
budgets, and that long-term planning should be extended, in an
appropriate manner, to the state's operating budget as well. The
legislature further finds that it is important for the governor and the
legislature to have a thoughtful, systematic, and credible means of
estimating the future budget impacts of the expenditure and revenue
decisions it makes. The legislature further finds that it would
improve budget transparency, government accountability, and better
public understanding of state finances for the state to prepare in an
open and public process a long-term outlook on the budget, to regularly
review and update that outlook, and to make it available to the public
in a clear form and easily accessible manner.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.135.025 and 2005 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state shall not expend from the general fund and related
funds during any fiscal year state moneys in excess of the state
expenditure limit established under this chapter.
(2) Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW
43.135.035 or pursuant to an appropriation under RCW
43.135.045(((4)(b))) (2)(b), the state treasurer shall not issue or
redeem any check, warrant, or voucher that will result in a state
general fund or related fund expenditure for any fiscal year in excess
of the state expenditure limit established under this chapter. A
violation of this subsection constitutes a violation of RCW 43.88.290
and shall subject the state treasurer to the penalties provided in RCW
43.88.300.
(3) The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the
previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit increased by a
percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.
(4) For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, the phrase "the previous fiscal
year's state expenditure limit" means the total state expenditures from
the state general fund and related funds, not including federal funds,
for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, plus the fiscal growth
factor.
(5) A state ((expenditure limit committee)) council on fiscal
management is established for the purpose of determining and adjusting
the state expenditure limit as provided in this chapter and preparing,
updating, and presenting a long-term outlook on the state's operating
budget. The members of the ((state expenditure limit committee))
council are the director of financial management, the ((attorney
general or the attorney general's designee)) state auditor, and the
chairs and ranking minority members of the senate committee on ways and
means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The council shall adopt rules governing its operation. All actions of
the ((state expenditure limit committee)) council taken pursuant to
this chapter require an affirmative vote of at least four members.
(6) Each November, the ((state expenditure limit committee))
council shall adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding fiscal
year based on actual expenditures and known changes in the fiscal
growth factor and then project an expenditure limit for the next two
fiscal years. If, by November 30th, the ((state expenditure limit
committee)) council has not adopted the expenditure limit adjustment
and projected expenditure limit as provided in subsection (5) of this
section, the ((attorney general or his or her designee)) state auditor
shall adjust or project the expenditure limit, as necessary.
(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average growth in state
personal income for the prior ten fiscal years.
(8) "General fund" means the state general fund.
(9) "Related fund" means the health services account, violence
reduction and drug enforcement account, public safety and education
account, water quality account, or student achievement fund.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.135.035 and 2008 c 1 s 5 (Initiative Measure No.
960) and 2007 c 484 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises taxes may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature, and then only if state
expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not
exceed the state expenditure limits established under this chapter.
Pursuant to the referendum power set forth in Article II, section 1(b)
of the state Constitution, tax increases may be referred to the voters
for their approval or rejection at an election.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
state ((expenditure limit committee)) council on fiscal management
shall adjust the state expenditure limit by the amount of additional
revenue approved by the voters under this section. This adjustment
shall not exceed the amount of revenue generated by the legislative
action during the first full fiscal year in which it is in effect. The
state expenditure limit shall be adjusted downward upon expiration or
repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
personal income growth?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the nature of the
emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require immediate
government action to alleviate human suffering and provide humanitarian
assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no more
than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund or a related fund to another source of funding,
or if moneys are transferred from the state general fund or a related
fund to another fund or account, the state ((expenditure limit
committee)) council on fiscal management, acting pursuant to RCW
43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure limit to reflect the
shift. For the purposes of this section, a transfer of money from the
state general fund or a related fund to another fund or account
includes any state legislative action taken that has the effect of
reducing revenues from a particular source, where such revenues would
otherwise be deposited into the state general fund or a related fund,
while increasing the revenues from that particular source to another
state or local government account. This subsection does not apply to:
(a) The dedication or use of lottery revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or
property taxes under RCW 84.52.068, in support of education or
education expenditures; or (b) a transfer of moneys to, or an
expenditure from, the budget stabilization account.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function and the ongoing
revenue necessary to fund the program or function are shifted to the
state general fund or a related fund on or after January 1, 2007, the
state ((expenditure limit committee)) council on fiscal management,
acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall increase the state
expenditure limit to reflect the shift unless the shifted revenue had
previously been shifted from the general fund or a related fund.
(6) For the purpose of this act, "raises taxes" means any action or
combination of actions by the legislature that increases state tax
revenue deposited in any fund, budget, or account, regardless of
whether the revenues are deposited into the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
No later than thirty days after enactment of each omnibus operating
budget act, and no later than seven days after adoption of each
quarterly revenue forecast under chapter 82.33 RCW, the state council
on fiscal management shall present a three-biennium outlook on the
state's operating budget. This outlook shall include but not be
limited to:
(1) Estimated resources by fiscal year, including beginning
reserves, revenue as forecast under chapter 82.33 RCW and as projected
by the state council on fiscal management, and all legislative actions
affecting available resources. The council's projection of state
revenue beyond the current forecast period shall include a baseline
projection and alternative optimistic and pessimistic projections.
(2) Budgeted and projected state expenditures, including but not
limited to:
(a) Public schools;
(b) Higher education;
(c) Major health care programs;
(d) Corrections;
(e) Employee compensation;
(f) Pension funding; and
(g) Debt service.
(3) Estimated ending reserves, including unrestricted reserves and
moneys deposited in the budget stabilization account established under
Article VII, section -- of the state Constitution (ESSJR 8206).
(4) The council shall enumerate and explain the assumptions
employed in its projections of revenues and expenditures, and the
reasons for those assumptions.
(5) In addition, the council shall present relevant data supporting
its estimates of expenditures, including but not limited to
enrollments, caseloads, and workloads as forecast under chapter 43.88C
RCW and as projected by the council.
(6) Each long-term outlook adopted under this chapter shall be made
available to the public in online form and in the most easily
accessible manner that is feasible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---