BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that adult
learners entering workforce and academic programs will comprise a
growing percentage of higher education enrollments in coming years. It
is strategically important, for a vital economy and global
competitiveness, to ensure that adult learners move through
postsecondary education in the most efficient manner possible and enter
the workforce well-prepared.
(2) The legislature also finds that Washington must make an effort
to more effectively use resources at the state's public two-year and
four-year institutions of higher education to facilitate wider and
deeper adult participation in postsecondary education.
(3) The legislature also finds that adult learners encounter
barriers in pursuit of their postsecondary education. Institutional
policies and procedures regarding the acceptance of prior learning
credits are not aligned with accreditation rules and national best
practices.
(4) Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to create pathways
for adult learners to gain credit for learning from a variety of
sources so that college level learning acquired before enrollment can
be applied toward academic and workforce degrees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The higher education coordinating board
shall convene a work group that includes representatives from the state
board for community and technical colleges, the workforce training and
education coordinating board, the council of presidents, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, as well as the two-year and
four-year institutions of higher education to examine policies related
to the acceptance of prior learning credits at institutions of higher
education. The work group shall make policy recommendations in the
following two areas related to prior learning assessment, giving
special consideration to recommendations made by the council for adult
and experiential learning and accreditation rules adopted by the
northwest commission on colleges and universities:
(a) The proportion of two-year and four-year academic and workforce
degrees that can be comprised of credits granted through the assessment
of prior learning; and
(b) The applicability of prior learning credits toward general
education requirements and major-specific requirements.
(2) The study shall also include recommendations on implementation
of the work group's recommendations at public two-year and four-year
institutions of higher education.
(3) The work group shall report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---