BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
If the department contracts with a utilization review vendor for
physical therapy services and the vendor's recommendation is not
received within forty-eight hours of the request, the department shall
pay the physical therapy provider for any visits by the injured worker
that occur while the vendor's recommendation is pending.

--- END ---