BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.13.215 and 1986 c 254 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If any portion of a fire protection district is proposed for
annexation to or incorporation into a city, code city, or town, both
the fire protection district and the city, code city, or town shall
inform the employees of the fire protection district about hires,
separations, terminations, and any other changes in employment that are
a direct consequence of annexation or incorporation.
(2) If any portion of a fire protection district is annexed to or
incorporated into a city, code city or town, any employee of the fire
protection district who (((1))) (a) was at the time of such annexation
or incorporation employed exclusively or principally in performing the
powers, duties, and functions which are to be performed by the city,
code city or town fire department (((2))) (b) will, as a direct
consequence of annexation or incorporation, be separated from the
employ of the fire protection district, and (((3))) (c) can perform the
duties and meet the minimum requirements of the position to be filled,
then such employee may transfer employment to the civil service system
of the city, code city or town fire department as provided for in this
section and RCW 35.13.225 and 35.13.235.
(3) For purposes of this section and RCW 35.13.225 and 35.13.235,
employee means an individual whose employment with a fire protection
district has been terminated because the fire protection district was
annexed by a city, code city or town for purposes of fire protection.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.13.225 and 1994 c 73 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An eligible employee may transfer into the civil service system
of the city, code city, or town fire department by filing a written
request with the city, code city, or town civil service commission and
by giving written notice thereof to the board of commissioners of the
fire protection district. Upon receipt of such request by the civil
service commission, the transfer of employment shall be made. ((The
employee so transferring will (a) be on probation for the same period
as are new employees of the city, code city, or town fire department in
the position filled, but if the transferring employee has already
completed a probationary period as a firefighter prior to the transfer,
then the employee may only be terminated during the probationary period
for failure to adequately perform assigned duties, not meeting the
minimum qualifications of the position, or behavior that would
otherwise be subject to disciplinary action, (b) be eligible for
promotion no later than after completion of the probationary period,
(c) receive a salary at least equal to that of other new employees of
the city, code city, or town fire department in the position filled,
and (d) in all other matters, such as retirement, sick leave, and
vacation, have, within the city, code city, or town civil service
system, all the rights, benefits, and privileges to which he or she
would have been entitled as a member of the city, code city, or town
fire department from the beginning of employment with the fire
protection district: PROVIDED, That for purposes of layoffs by the
annexing fire agency, only the time of service accrued with the
annexing agency shall apply unless an agreement is reached between the
collective bargaining representatives of the employees of the annexing
and annexed fire agencies and the annexing and annexed fire agencies.
The board of commissioners of the fire protection district shall, upon
receipt of such notice, transmit to any applicable civil service
commission a record of the employee's service with the fire protection
district which shall be credited to such employee as a part of the
period of employment in the city, code city, or town fire department.
All accrued benefits are transferable provided that the recipient
agency provides comparable benefits. All benefits shall then accrue
based on the combined seniority of each employee in the recipient
agency.
(2) As many of the transferring employees shall be placed upon the
payroll of the city, code city, or town fire department as the
department determines are needed to provide services. These needed
employees shall be taken in order of seniority and the remaining
employees who transfer as provided in this section and RCW 35.13.215
and 35.13.235 shall head the list for employment in the civil service
system in order of their seniority, to the end that they shall be the
first to be reemployed in the city, code city, or town fire department
when appropriate positions become available: PROVIDED, That employees
who are not immediately hired by the city, code city, or town shall be
placed on a reemployment list for a period not to exceed thirty-six
months unless a longer period is authorized by an agreement reached
between the collective bargaining representatives of the employees of
the annexing and annexed fire agencies and the annexing and annexed
fire agencies.)) Transfers under this section shall be made in order of
seniority.
(2) Upon transfer, unless an agreement for different terms of
transfer is reached between the collective bargaining representatives
of the transferring employees and the participating fire protection
jurisdictions, an employee is entitled to the employee rights,
benefits, and privileges to which he or she would have been entitled as
an employee of the fire protection district, including rights to:
(a) Compensation at least equal to the level at the time of
transfer;
(b) Retirement, vacation, sick leave, and any other accrued
benefit;
(c) Promotion and service time accrual; and
(d) The length or terms of probationary periods, including no
requirement for an additional probationary period if one had been
completed before the transfer date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
Cities and towns annexing territory under this chapter shall, prior
to completing the annexation, make legislative findings regarding the
likely effects that the annexation and any associated asset transfers
may have upon the safety of residents within and outside the proposed
annexation area. Findings made under this section shall address, but
are not limited to addressing, the provision of fire protection and
emergency medical services within and outside the proposed annexation
area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Cities annexing territory under this chapter shall, prior to
completing the annexation, make legislative findings regarding the
likely effects that the annexation and any associated asset transfers
may have upon the safety of residents within and outside the proposed
annexation area. Findings made under this section shall address, but
are not limited to addressing, the provision of fire protection and
emergency medical services within and outside the proposed annexation
area.

--- END ---