BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.070 and 2006 c 230 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of labor and industries may charge fees to awarding
agencies on public works for the approval of statements of intent to
pay prevailing wages and the certification of affidavits of wages paid.
The department may also charge fees to persons or organizations
requesting the arbitration of disputes under RCW 39.12.060. The amount
of the fees shall be established by rules adopted by the department
under the procedures in the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW. The fees shall apply to all approvals, certifications, and
arbitration requests made after the effective date of the rules. All
fees shall be deposited in the public works administration account.
The department may refuse to arbitrate for contractors, subcontractors,
persons, or organizations which have not paid the proper fees. The
department may, if necessary, request the attorney general to take
legal action to collect delinquent fees.
The department shall set the fees permitted by this section at a
level that generates revenue that is as near as practicable to the
amount of the appropriation to administer this chapter, including, but
not limited to, the performance of adequate wage surveys, and to
investigate and enforce all alleged violations of this chapter,
including, but not limited to, incorrect statements of intent to pay
prevailing wage, incorrect certificates of affidavits of wages paid,
and wage claims, as provided for in this chapter and chapters 49.48 and
49.52 RCW. However, the fees charged for the approval of statements of
intent to pay prevailing wages and the certification of affidavits of
wages paid shall be ((no greater than twenty-five)) forty dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---