BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the state's management of the Puget
Sound commercial salmon harvest policy needs to be clearly articulated
to reflect key public interests in local employment and support for the
local food economy.
(2) Currently, department managers are not instructed to prioritize
these public interests. Harvests are predominately conducted by a
small number of capital-intensive vessels where salmon quotas are
caught rapidly. Consequently, the local food economy does not obtain
consistent and extended access to this publicly owned natural resource
which is generally recognized for its healthy quality. Moreover, an
increasing percentage of this public resource is exported as a low
value, minimally processed product intended for overseas reprocessing
and subsequent reimportation to the United States. Seafood processing
employment in Washington has declined by one-fifth over the past
decade.
(3) By not prioritizing local, value-added use and consumption of
Puget Sound salmon the state loses taxable values and the economic
multiplier benefits associated with local economic activities.
(4) In response to these findings, department fishery managers are
instructed to facilitate the commercial harvest of Puget Sound salmon
with the Puget Sound salmon commission and prioritize management of
fisheries in ways which, subsequent in priority to meeting conservation
objectives, prioritize the state's interest in promoting local value-added and processing activities, raising taxable values, and supporting
the local food economy of the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.08.010 and 2007 c 350 s 2 and 2007 c 254 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
((As used in)) The definitions in this section apply throughout
this title or rules adopted under this title((,)) unless the context
clearly requires otherwise((:)).
(1) "Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.
(2) "Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.
(3) "Commission" means the state fish and wildlife commission.
(4) "Person" means and includes an individual; a corporation; a
public or private entity or organization; a local, state, or federal
agency; all business organizations, including corporations and
partnerships; or a group of two or more individuals acting with a
common purpose whether acting in an individual, representative, or
official capacity.
(5) "Fish and wildlife officer" means a person appointed and
commissioned by the director, with authority to enforce this title and
rules adopted pursuant to this title, and other statutes as prescribed
by the legislature. Fish and wildlife officer includes a person
commissioned before June 11, 1998, as a wildlife agent or a fisheries
patrol officer.
(6) "Ex officio fish and wildlife officer" means a commissioned
officer of a municipal, county, state, or federal agency having as its
primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in general, while the
officer is in the appropriate jurisdiction. The term "ex officio fish
and wildlife officer" includes special agents of the national marine
fisheries service, state parks commissioned officers, United States
fish and wildlife special agents, department of natural resources
enforcement officers, and United States forest service officers, while
the agents and officers are within their respective jurisdictions.
(7) "To hunt" and its derivatives means an effort to kill, injure,
capture, or harass a wild animal or wild bird.
(8) "To trap" and its derivatives means a method of hunting using
devices to capture wild animals or wild birds.
(9) "To fish," "to harvest," and "to take," and their derivatives
means an effort to kill, injure, harass, or catch a fish or shellfish.
(10) "Open season" means those times, manners of taking, and places
or waters established by rule of the commission for the lawful hunting,
fishing, taking, or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish,
food fish, or shellfish that conform to the special restrictions or
physical descriptions established by rule of the commission or that
have otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest, or
possess by rule of the commission. "Open season" includes the first
and last days of the established time.
(11) "Closed season" means all times, manners of taking, and places
or waters other than those established by rule of the commission as an
open season. "Closed season" also means all hunting, fishing, taking,
or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish, food fish, or
shellfish that do not conform to the special restrictions or physical
descriptions established by rule of the commission as an open season or
that have not otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest,
or possess by rule of the commission as an open season.
(12) "Closed area" means a place where the hunting of some or all
species of wild animals or wild birds is prohibited.
(13) "Closed waters" means all or part of a lake, river, stream, or
other body of water, where fishing or harvesting is prohibited.
(14) "Game reserve" means a closed area where hunting for all wild
animals and wild birds is prohibited.
(15) "Bag limit" means the maximum number of game animals, game
birds, or game fish which may be taken, caught, killed, or possessed by
a person, as specified by rule of the commission for a particular
period of time, or as to size, sex, or species.
(16) "Wildlife" means all species of the animal kingdom whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state. This includes but is not
limited to mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, and
invertebrates. The term "wildlife" does not include feral domestic
mammals, old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of the order
Rodentia, or those fish, shellfish, and marine invertebrates classified
as food fish or shellfish by the director. The term "wildlife"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of wildlife
members.
(17) "Wild animals" means those species of the class Mammalia whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state and the species Rana
catesbeiana (bullfrog). The term "wild animal" does not include feral
domestic mammals or old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of
the order Rodentia.
(18) "Wild birds" means those species of the class Aves whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state.
(19) "Protected wildlife" means wildlife designated by the
commission that shall not be hunted or fished.
(20) "Endangered species" means wildlife designated by the
commission as seriously threatened with extinction.
(21) "Game animals" means wild animals that shall not be hunted
except as authorized by the commission.
(22) "Fur-bearing animals" means game animals that shall not be
trapped except as authorized by the commission.
(23) "Game birds" means wild birds that shall not be hunted except
as authorized by the commission.
(24) "Predatory birds" means wild birds that may be hunted
throughout the year as authorized by the commission.
(25) "Deleterious exotic wildlife" means species of the animal
kingdom not native to Washington and designated as dangerous to the
environment or wildlife of the state.
(26) "Game farm" means property on which wildlife is held or raised
for commercial purposes, trade, or gift. The term "game farm" does not
include publicly owned facilities.
(27) "Fish" includes all species classified as game fish or food
fish by statute or rule, as well as all fin fish not currently
classified as food fish or game fish if such species exist in state
waters. The term "fish" includes all stages of development and the
bodily parts of fish species.
(28) "Raffle" means an activity in which tickets bearing an
individual number are sold for not more than twenty-five dollars each
and in which a permit or permits are awarded to hunt or for access to
hunt big game animals or wild turkeys on the basis of a drawing from
the tickets by the person or persons conducting the raffle.
(29) "Youth" means a person fifteen years old for fishing and under
sixteen years old for hunting.
(30) "Senior" means a person seventy years old or older.
(31) "License year" means the period of time for which a
recreational license is valid. The license year begins April 1st, and
ends March 31st.
(32) "Saltwater" means those marine waters seaward of river mouths.
(33) "Freshwater" means all waters not defined as saltwater
including, but not limited to, rivers upstream of the river mouth,
lakes, ponds, and reservoirs.
(34) "State waters" means all marine waters and fresh waters within
ordinary high water lines and within the territorial boundaries of the
state.
(35) "Offshore waters" means marine waters of the Pacific Ocean
outside the territorial boundaries of the state, including the marine
waters of other states and countries.
(36) "Concurrent waters of the Columbia river" means those waters
of the Columbia river that coincide with the Washington-Oregon state
boundary.
(37) "Resident" means:
(a) A person who has maintained a permanent place of abode within
the state for at least ninety days immediately preceding an application
for a license, has established by formal evidence an intent to continue
residing within the state, and who is not licensed to hunt or fish as
a resident in another state; and
(b) A person age eighteen or younger who does not qualify as a
resident under (a) of this subsection, but who has a parent that
qualifies as a resident under (a) of this subsection.
(38) "Nonresident" means a person who has not fulfilled the
qualifications of a resident.
(39) "Shellfish" means those species of marine and freshwater
invertebrates that have been classified and that shall not be taken
except as authorized by rule of the commission. The term "shellfish"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of shellfish
species.
(40) "Commercial" means related to or connected with buying,
selling, or bartering.
(41) "To process" and its derivatives mean preparing or preserving
fish, wildlife, or shellfish.
(42) "Personal use" means for the private use of the individual
taking the fish or shellfish and not for sale or barter.
(43) "Angling gear" means a line attached to a rod and reel capable
of being held in hand while landing the fish or a hand-held line
operated without rod or reel.
(44) "Fishery" means the taking of one or more particular species
of fish or shellfish with particular gear in a particular geographical
area.
(45) "Limited-entry license" means a license subject to a license
limitation program established in chapter 77.70 RCW.
(46) "Seaweed" means marine aquatic plant species that are
dependent upon the marine aquatic or tidal environment, and exist in
either an attached or free floating form, and includes but is not
limited to marine aquatic plants in the classes Chlorophyta,
Phaeophyta, and Rhodophyta.
(47) "Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage, or
engaging in sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife, or
deleterious exotic wildlife.
(48) "Invasive species" means a plant species or a nonnative animal
species that either:
(a) Causes or may cause displacement of, or otherwise threatens,
native species in their natural communities;
(b) Threatens or may threaten natural resources or their use in the
state;
(c) Causes or may cause economic damage to commercial or
recreational activities that are dependent upon state waters; or
(d) Threatens or harms human health.
(49) "Prohibited aquatic animal species" means an invasive species
of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a prohibited aquatic
animal species by the commission.
(50) "Regulated aquatic animal species" means a potentially
invasive species of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a
regulated aquatic animal species by the commission.
(51) "Unregulated aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has been classified as an unregulated aquatic animal
species by the commission.
(52) "Unlisted aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has not been classified as a prohibited aquatic animal
species, a regulated aquatic animal species, or an unregulated aquatic
animal species by the commission.
(53) "Aquatic plant species" means an emergent, submersed,
partially submersed, free-floating, or floating-leaving plant species
that grows in or near a body of water or wetland.
(54) "Retail-eligible species" means commercially harvested salmon,
crab, and sturgeon.
(55) "Aquatic invasive species" means any invasive, prohibited,
regulated, unregulated, or unlisted aquatic animal or plant species as
defined under subsections (48) through (53) of this section, aquatic
noxious weeds as defined under RCW 17.26.020(5)(c), and aquatic
nuisance species as defined under RCW 77.60.130(1).
(56) "Recreational and commercial watercraft" includes the boat, as
well as equipment used to transport the boat, and any auxiliary
equipment such as attached or detached outboard motors.
(57) "Local food economy" means the locally based network of food
producers, processing workers, consumers, and markets. Particularly
important to this definition are the various local venues that connect
producers and consumers, such as: Farmers markets; off-boat direct
sales; restaurants; grocery stores; school lunch programs; and food
banks.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.50.010 and 2002 c 311 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may authorize commercial fishing for sockeye
salmon within the waters described in subsection (2) of this section
only during the period June 10th to July 25th and for other salmon only
from the second Monday of September through November 30th, except
during the hours between 4:00 p.m. of Friday and 4:00 p.m. of the
following Sunday.
(2) All waters east and south of a line commencing at a concrete
monument on Angeles Point in Clallam county near the mouth of the Elwha
River on which is inscribed "Angeles Point Monument" (latitude 48° 9'
3" north, longitude 123° 33' 01" west of Greenwich Meridian); thence
running east on a line 81° 30' true across the flashlight and bell buoy
off Partridge Point and thence continued to longitude 122° 40' west;
thence north to the southerly shore of Sinclair Island; thence along
the southerly shore of the island to the most easterly point of the
island; thence 46° true to Carter Point, the most southerly point of
Lummi Island; thence northwesterly along the westerly shore line of
Lummi Island to where the shore line intersects line of longitude 122°
40' west; thence north to the mainland, including: The southerly
portion of Hale Passage, Bellingham Bay, Padilla Bay, Fidalgo Bay,
Guemes Channel, Skagit Bay, Similk Bay, Saratoga Passage, Holmes
Harbor, Possession Sound, Admiralty Inlet, Hood Canal, Puget Sound, and
their inlets, passages, waters, waterways, and tributaries.
(3) Consistent with RCW 77.50.120, 15.65.028, and sections 1 and 5
of this act, the commission and department managers are instructed to
facilitate the commercial harvest of Puget Sound salmon with the Puget
Sound salmon commission and prioritize the management of fisheries in
ways that, after meeting conservation objectives, prioritize the
state's interest in promoting local value-added and processing
activities, raising taxable values, and supporting the local food
economy of the state.
(4) The commission may authorize commercial fishing for salmon with
gill net, purse seine, and other lawful gear prior to the second Monday
in September within the waters of Hale Passage, Bellingham Bay, Samish
Bay, Padilla Bay, Fidalgo Bay, Guemes Channel, Skagit Bay, and Similk
Bay, to wit: Those waters northerly and easterly of a line commencing
at Stanwood, thence along the south shore of Skagit Bay to Rocky Point
on Camano Island; thence northerly to Polnell Point on Whidbey Island.
(((4))) (5) Whenever the commission determines that a stock or run
of salmon cannot be harvested in the usual manner, and that the stock
or run of salmon may be in danger of being wasted and surplus to
natural or artificial spawning requirements, the commission may
authorize units of gill net and purse seine gear in any number or
equivalents, by time and area, to fully utilize the harvestable
portions of these salmon runs for the economic well being of the
citizens of this state. Gill net and purse seine gear other than
emergency and test gear authorized by the director shall not be used in
Lake Washington.
(((5))) (6) The commission may authorize commercial fishing for
pink salmon in each odd-numbered year from August 1st through September
1st in the waters lying inside of a line commencing at the most
easterly point of Dungeness Spit and thence projected to Point
Partridge on Whidbey Island and a line commencing at Olele Point and
thence projected easterly to Bush Point on Whidbey Island.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.50.120 and 2001 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that a sustainable
level of salmon is made available for harvest for commercial fishers in
the state. Maintaining consistent harvest levels has become
increasingly difficult with the listing of salmonid species under the
federal endangered species act. Without a stable level of harvest,
fishers cannot develop niche markets that maximize the economic value
of the harvest. New tools and approaches are needed by fish managers
to bring increased stability to the fishing industry.
It is also the intent of the legislature to recognize that in an
attempt to encourage local employment, niche marketing, and the local
food economy, the department of agriculture, pursuant to and consistent
with RCW 15.65.028, has created the Puget Sound salmon commission. The
Puget Sound salmon commission has developed value-added and promotional
programs that link commercial fishers to local consumers, farmers
markets, and grocery stores. The Puget Sound salmon commission, which
is funded by a self-imposed landing tax on the catches of Puget Sound
gill net fishers, plays a key role in the heart of Washington campaign
to support Washington state agriculture. New tools and approaches are
needed by fish managers to bring increased stability to the fishing
industry by supporting the objectives of the Puget Sound salmon
commission.
In the short term, it is the legislature's intent to provide
managers with tools to assure that commercial harvest of targeted
stocks can continue and expand under the constraints of the federal
endangered species act. There are experimental types of commercial
fishing gear that could allow fishers to stabilize harvest levels by
selectively targeting healthy salmon stocks.
For the longer term, the department of fish and wildlife shall
proceed with changes to the operation of certain hatcheries in order to
stabilize harvest levels by allowing naturally spawning and hatchery
origin fish to be managed as a single run. Scientific information from
such hatcheries would guide the department's approach to reducing the
need to mass mark hatchery origin salmon where appropriate.
It is the legislature's further intent, consistent with RCW
77.50.010, 15.65.028, and sections 1 and 5 of this act, that the
commission and department managers are instructed to facilitate the
commercial harvest of Puget Sound salmon with the Puget Sound salmon
commission and prioritize management of fisheries in ways that, after
meeting conservation objectives, prioritize the state's interest in
promoting local value-added and processing activities, raising taxable
values, and supporting the local food economy of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.50 RCW
to read as follows:
In order to fulfill the state's interest in promoting local value-added and processing activity, raising taxable values, and supporting
the local food economy of the state, it is vital that the Puget Sound
commercial salmon harvest be managed, both in terms of number of days
of harvest, particular days of the week of harvest, and speed of the
harvest be prioritized so that fish go first to those that are able to
ensure: (1) An increase in the sale and use of fresh, commercially
harvested Puget Sound salmon in local markets, including local farmers
markets; and (2) an increase in activities that benefit the local
handling, local processing, local marketing, and uses of Puget Sound
salmon.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The code reviser is directed to put the
defined terms in RCW 77.08.010 in alphabetical order.

--- END ---