BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An owner of a companion animal has a cause of action for the
wrongful injury or death of a companion animal against any person who
unlawfully and by willful, intentional, malicious, wanton, reckless, or
negligent act or omission kills, causes or procures the death of,
injures, or causes or procures to be injured, a companion animal. The
owner may recover all economic damages suffered as a result of the
injury or death, including, but not limited to, damages for the actual
value of the companion animal to the owner, veterinary expenses and
other special care expenses incurred on behalf of the companion animal,
including veterinary expenses incurred to restore the companion animal
to its prior condition, burial expenses of a deceased companion animal,
and other expenses incurred by the owner in rectifying the effects of,
or as a consequence of, the pain, suffering, or injuries to the
companion animal.
(2) The remedy provided by this section is in addition to, and does
not replace or supplant, any other remedy provided by law. Nothing in
this section is intended to alter or limit any remedies that may be
available in an action for intentional infliction of emotional distress
or malicious injury to a companion animal.
(3) An action to recover damages under this section shall be
commenced within three years from the date of injury or death or from
the date when the owner knew, or in the exercise of reasonable
diligence should have known, of the factual basis for a cause of
action.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Actual value" means the intrinsic or peculiar value of the
companion animal to the owner, and is not limited to the market value
or replacement value of the companion animal. "Actual value" does not
include extraordinary or unusual sentimental value of the companion
animal to the owner.
(b) "Companion animal" means any nonhuman mammal, bird, reptile,
fish, or amphibian, that is lawfully owned or possessed and is under
the care, custody, or ownership of a person, but does not include any
animal raised solely for meat production, production of products from
the animal, or breeding purposes, nor does it include any wildlife as
defined by RCW 77.08.010, nor any animal regulated under federal law as
a research animal.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.24.320 and 2005 c 419 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who suffers damage to livestock as a result of
actions described in RCW 16.52.205 ((or)), any owner of livestock who
suffers damage as a result of a willful, unauthorized act described in
RCW 9A.56.080 or 9A.56.083, or any owner of a companion animal who
suffers damage as a result of actions described in RCW 16.52.205, may
bring an action against the person or persons committing the act in a
court of competent jurisdiction for exemplary damages up to three times
the actual damages sustained, plus attorney's fees.
(2) As used in this section((,)):
(a) "Livestock" means the animals specified in RCW 9A.56.080; and
(b) "Companion animal" has the meaning given in section 1 of this
act.

--- END ---