BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.12.260 and 2007 c 469 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each commissioner of a port district shall receive ninety
dollars per day or portion thereof spent (a) in actual attendance at
official meetings of the port district commission, or (b) in
performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the
district. The total per diem compensation of a port commissioner shall
not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars in a year, or ten
thousand eight hundred dollars in any year for a port district with
gross operating income of twenty-five million or more in the preceding
calendar year. This subsection does not apply to port districts
subject to subsection (7) of this section.
(2) Except as required by subsection (7) of this section, port
commissioners shall receive additional compensation as follows: (a)
Each commissioner of a port district with gross operating revenues of
twenty-five million dollars or more in the preceding calendar year
shall receive a salary of five hundred dollars per month; and (b) each
commissioner of a port district with gross operating revenues of from
one million dollars to less than twenty-five million dollars in the
preceding calendar year shall receive a salary of two hundred dollars
per month.
(3) Except as required by subsection (7) of this section, in lieu
of the compensation specified in this section, a port commission may
set compensation to be paid to commissioners.
(4) For any commissioner who has not elected to become a member of
public employees retirement system before May 1, 1975, the compensation
provided pursuant to this section shall not be considered salary for
purposes of the provisions of any retirement system created pursuant to
the general laws of this state nor shall attendance at such meetings or
other service on behalf of the district constitute service as defined
in RCW 41.40.010(9): PROVIDED, That in the case of a port district
when commissioners are receiving compensation and contributing to the
public employees retirement system, these benefits shall continue in
full force and effect notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 53.12.260
and 53.12.265.
(5) The dollar thresholds established in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section must be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial
management every five years, beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes
in the consumer price index during that time period. "Consumer price
index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average
consumer price index, for Washington state, for wage earners and
clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and
statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau of labor
and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas
within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people,
covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and
including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in
this section. The office of financial management must calculate the
new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser
for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month
before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.
(6) A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.
(7) Each commissioner of a port district in a county with one
million or more residents must serve in a full-time employment capacity
and must be compensated for the performance of his or her official
services and duties at an amount equaling the salary paid to members of
the county legislative authority of the county in which the port is
located.

Sec. 2 RCW 53.12.270 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 12 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The commission may delegate to the managing official of a port
district such administerial powers and duties of the commission as it
may deem proper for the efficient and proper management of port
district operations. Any such delegation shall be authorized by
appropriate resolution of the commission, which resolution must also
establish guidelines and procedures for the managing official to
follow.
(2) Nothing in this section allows the managing official or
employees of a port district to waive policies related to competition
in the procurement of goods and services without receiving prior
approval, by resolution, from the commission.
(3) Nothing in this section allows the managing official of a port
district to supervise or otherwise direct administrative staff and
confidential assistants hired under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 53.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each commissioner of a port district in a county with one
million or more residents must have at least one full-time
administrative staff member and one full-time confidential assistant.
Administrative staff and confidential assistants hired under this
section: (a) Must assist the commissioner in the performance of his or
her official services and duties; (b) must be subject to terms of
employment established in accordance with RCW 53.08.170; and (c) may
not be supervised or otherwise directed by the managing official of the
port.
(2) Each commission of a port district in a county with one million
or more residents must make public findings regarding the number of
administrative staff that are necessary to provide financial oversight
of the district. If the number of administrative staff recommended in
the findings exceeds the number hired under subsection (1) of this
section, the commission must hire additional administrative staff
until: (a) Each commissioner has an equal number of administrative
staff; and (b) the number of hired administrative staff equals or
exceeds the number recommended in the findings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1)(a) The legislative task force on port
district structure and operation is established, with members as
provided in this subsection:
(i) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(ii) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate, appointed by the president of the senate;
(iii) One member from the Washington public ports association,
appointed by the governor;
(iv) One member from the freight mobility strategic investment
board, appointed by the governor;
(v) One member from county government, appointed by the Washington
state association of counties; and
(vi) One member from city government, appointed by the association
of Washington cities.
(b) The governor shall select a chair from among its legislative
membership.
(2) The task force shall consult with individuals from the public
and private sectors and other interested parties, as may be
appropriate, for technical advice and assistance and may ask those
individuals to establish advisory committees or work groups that report
to the task force.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Examine the constitutional and statutory authorities and duties
of port districts;
(b) Examine the structure and management of ports in Washington and
those of other states and countries that compete with Washington's
ports;
(c) Examine revenue authorities of ports and consider alternative
funding schemes;
(d) Consider the benefits and detriments associated with
consolidating large port districts, their operations, or both;
(e) Consider the benefits and detriments associated with separating
air and sea port operations; and
(f) Consider whether large port districts should be governed wholly
or partially by county legislative authorities.
(4) The task force shall use legislative facilities, and staff
support shall be provided by the house of representatives office of
program research, senate committee services, and the office of
financial management.
(5) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
house of representatives, the senate, and the office of financial
management. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the
senate facilities and operations committee and the house of
representatives executive rules committee, or their successor
committees.
(7) The task force shall report upon its initial actions to the
governor and appropriate committees of the house of representatives and
the senate by December 1, 2008.
(8) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the house of
representatives and the senate by December 1, 2009.
(9) The task force expires May 1, 2010.

Sec. 5 RCW 53.08.120 and 2000 c 138 s 210 are each amended to
read as follows:
((All material required by a port district may be procured in the
open market or by contract and all work ordered may be done by contract
or day labor. All such contracts for work)) (1) All contracts related
to work meeting the definition of "public work" in RCW 39.04.010(4),
the estimated cost of which exceeds two hundred thousand dollars, shall
be bid using a competitive sealed bid process. The contract must be
let at public bidding upon notice published in a newspaper of general
circulation in the district at least thirteen days before the last date
upon which bids will be received, calling for sealed bids upon the
work, plans and specifications for which shall then be on file in the
office of the commission for public inspection. The same notice may
call for bids on such work or material based upon plans and
specifications submitted by the bidder. The competitive bidding
requirements for purchases or public works may be waived pursuant to
RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to
the purchase or public work.
((However)) (2) For all contracts related to work meeting a
definition of "public work" in RCW 39.04.010(4) that are estimated at
less than two hundred thousand dollars, a port district may let
contracts using the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155 in
lieu of calling for sealed bids. Whenever possible, the managing
official shall invite at least one proposal from a minority contractor
who shall otherwise qualify under this section.
When awarding such a contract for work, when utilizing proposals
from the small works roster, the managing official shall give weight to
the contractor submitting the lowest and best proposal, and whenever it
would not violate the public interest, such contracts shall be
distributed equally among contractors, including minority contractors,
on the small works roster.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW
to read as follows:
By January 1, 2010, each port shall maintain a database on a public
web site of all contracts, including public works and personal
services. At a minimum, the database shall identify the contractor,
the purpose of the contract, effective dates and periods of
performance, the cost of the contract and funding source, any
modifications to the contract, and whether the contract was
competitively procured or awarded on a sole source basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the elected oversight body of an individual
port.
(2) "Competitive solicitation" means a documented formal process
providing an equal and open opportunity to qualified parties and
culminating in a selection based on criteria which may include such
factors as the consultant's fees or costs, ability, capacity,
experience, reputation, responsiveness to time limitations,
responsiveness to solicitation requirements, quality of previous
performance, and compliance with statutes and rules relating to
contracts or services.
(3) "Consultant" means an independent individual or firm
contracting with a port to perform a service or render an opinion or
recommendation according to the consultant's methods and without being
subject to the control of the port except as to the result of the work.
The port monitors progress under the contract and authorizes payment.
(4) "Emergency" means a set of unforeseen circumstances beyond the
control of the port that either:
(a) Present a real, immediate threat to the proper performance of
essential functions; or
(b) May result in material loss or damage to property, bodily
injury, or loss of life if immediate action is not taken.
(5) "Evidence of competition" means documentation demonstrating
that the port has solicited responses from multiple firms in selecting
a consultant.
(6) "Personal service" means professional or technical expertise
provided by a consultant to accomplish a specific study, project, task,
or other work statement. "Personal service" does not include purchased
services as defined under subsection (8) of this section.
(7) "Personal service contract" means an agreement, or any
amendment thereto, with a consultant for the rendering of personal
services to the port.
(8) "Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. "Purchased
services" includes, but is not limited to, services for equipment
maintenance and repair; operation of a physical plant; security;
computer hardware and software maintenance; data entry; key punch
services; and computer time-sharing, contract programming, and
analysis.
(9) "Sole source" means a consultant providing professional or
technical expertise of such a unique nature that the consultant is
clearly and justifiably the only practicable source to provide the
service. The justification shall be based on either the uniqueness of
the service or sole availability at the location required.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Personal services may be procured only to
resolve a particular port problem or issue or to expedite a specific
project that is temporary in nature. A port may procure personal
services only if it documents that:
(1) The service is critical to port responsibilities or operations,
or is mandated or authorized by the commission;
(2) Sufficient staffing or expertise is not available within the
port to perform the service; and
(3) Other qualified public resources are not available to perform
the service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 All personal service contracts shall be
entered into pursuant to competitive solicitation, except for:
(1) Emergency contracts;
(2) Sole source contracts;
(3) Contract amendments;
(4) Contracts between a consultant and a port of less than twenty
thousand dollars. However, contracts of five thousand dollars or
greater but less than twenty thousand dollars shall have documented
evidence of competition. Ports shall not structure contracts to evade
these requirements; and
(5) Other specific contracts or classes or groups of contracts
exempted from the competitive solicitation process by the commission
when it has been determined that a competitive solicitation process is
not appropriate or cost-effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Emergency contracts shall be filed with the
commission and made available for public inspection within three
working days following the commencement of work or execution of the
contract, whichever occurs first. Documented justification for
emergency contracts shall be provided to the commission when the
contract is filed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Sole source contracts shall be filed
with the commission and made available for public inspection at least
ten working days prior to the proposed starting date of the contract.
Documented justification for sole source contracts shall be provided to
the commission when the contract is filed. For sole source contracts
of twenty thousand dollars or more, documented justification shall
include evidence that the port attempted to identify potential
consultants by advertising through statewide or regional newspapers.
(2) The commission shall approve sole source contracts of twenty
thousand dollars or more before any such contract becomes binding and
before any services may be performed under the contract. These
requirements shall also apply to sole source contracts of less than
twenty thousand dollars if the total amount of such contracts between
an agency and the same consultant is twenty thousand dollars or more
within a fiscal year. Ports shall ensure that the costs, fees, or
rates negotiated in filed sole source contracts of twenty thousand
dollars or more are reasonable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A port commissioner or employee shall not
expend any funds for personal service contracts subject to this chapter
unless the port has complied with the competitive procurement and other
requirements of this chapter. The port commissioner or employee
executing the personal service contracts is responsible for compliance
with the requirements of this chapter. Failure to comply with the
requirements of this chapter subjects the port commissioner or employee
to a civil penalty in the amount of three hundred dollars. A
consultant who knowingly violates this chapter in seeking or performing
work under a personal services contract is subject to a civil penalty
of three hundred dollars or twenty-five percent of the amount of the
contract, whichever is greater. The state auditor is responsible for
auditing violations of this chapter. The attorney general is
responsible for prosecuting violations of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) Substantial changes in either the scope
of work specified in the contract or in the scope of work specified in
the formal solicitation document must generally be awarded as new
contracts. Substantial changes executed by contract amendments must be
submitted to the commission, and are subject to approval by the
commission.
(2) An amendment or amendments to personal service contracts, if
the value of the amendment or amendments, whether singly or
cumulatively, exceeds fifty percent of the value of the original
contract must be provided to the commission.
(3) The commission shall approve amendments provided to it under
this section before the amendments become binding and before services
may be performed under the amendments.
(4) The amendments must be filed with the commission and made
available for public inspection at least ten working days prior to the
proposed starting date of services under the amendments.
(5) The commission shall approve amendments provided to it under
this section only if they meet the criteria for approval of the
amendments established by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This chapter does not apply to:
(1) Contracts specifying a fee of less than five thousand dollars
if the total of the contracts from that port with the contractor within
a fiscal year does not exceed five thousand dollars;
(2) Contracts awarded to companies that furnish a service where the
tariff is established by the utilities and transportation commission or
other public entity;
(3) Intergovernmental agreements awarded to any governmental
entity, whether federal, state, or local and any department, division,
or subdivision thereof;
(4) Contracts awarded for services to be performed for a standard
fee, when the standard fee is established by the contracting agency or
any other governmental entity and a like contract is available to all
qualified applicants;
(5) Contracts for services that are necessary to the conduct of
collaborative research if prior approval is granted by the funding
source;
(6) Contracts for architectural and engineering services as defined
in RCW 39.80.020, which shall be entered into under chapter 39.80 RCW;
and
(7) Contracts for the employment of expert witnesses for the
purposes of litigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) Personal service contracts subject to
competitive solicitation shall be (a) filed with the commission and
made available for public inspection; and (b) reviewed and approved by
the commission when those contracts provide services relating to
management consulting, organizational development, marketing,
communications, employee training, or employee recruiting.
(2) Personal service contracts subject to competitive solicitation
that provide services relating to management consulting, organizational
development, marketing, communications, employee training, or employee
recruiting shall be made available for public inspection at least ten
working days before the proposed starting date of the contract. All
other contracts shall be effective no earlier than the date they are
filed with the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The port shall maintain a publicly
available list of all personal service contracts it entered into during
each fiscal year. The list shall identify the contractor, the purpose
of the contract, effective dates and periods of performance, the cost
of the contract and funding source, any modifications to the contract,
and whether the contract was competitively procured or awarded on a
sole source basis. The commission shall also ensure that state
accounting definitions and procedures are consistent with this chapter
and permit the reporting of personal services expenditures by type of
service. Designations of type of services shall include, but not be
limited to, management and organizational services, legal and expert
witness services, financial services, computer and information
services, social or technical research, marketing, communications, and
employee training or recruiting services.
(2) The Washington public ports association shall report annually
to the governor and the appropriate committees of the senate and house
of representatives on sole source contracts filed under this chapter.
The report shall describe: (a) The number and aggregate value of
contracts for each category established in this section; (b) the number
and aggregate value of contracts of five thousand dollars or greater
but less than twenty thousand dollars; (c) the number and aggregate
value of contracts of twenty thousand dollars or greater; (d) the
justification provided by ports for the use of sole source contracts;
and (e) any trends in the use of sole source contracts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 As requested by the state auditor, the
ports shall provide information on contracts filed under this chapter
for use in preparation of summary reports on personal services
contracts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) The Washington public ports association
shall adopt uniform guidelines for the effective and efficient
management of personal service contracts by all ports. The guidelines
must, at a minimum, include:
(a) Accounting methods, systems, measures, and principles to be
used by agencies and contractors;
(b) Precontract procedures for selecting potential contractors
based on their qualifications and ability to perform;
(c) Incorporation of performance measures and measurable benchmarks
in contracts, and the use of performance audits;
(d) Uniform contract terms to ensure contract performance and
compliance with state and federal standards;
(e) Proper payment and reimbursement methods to ensure that the
state receives full value for taxpayer moneys, including cost
settlements and cost allowance;
(f) Postcontract procedures, including methods for recovering
improperly spent or overspent moneys for disallowance and adjustment;
(g) Adequate contract remedies and sanctions to ensure compliance;
(h) Monitoring, fund tracking, risk assessment, and auditing
procedures and requirements;
(i) Financial reporting, record retention, and record access
procedures and requirements;
(j) Procedures and criteria for terminating contracts for cause or
otherwise; and
(k) Any other subject related to effective and efficient contract
management.
(2) The Washington public ports association shall submit the
guidelines required by subsection (1) of this section to the governor
and the appropriate standing committees of the legislature no later
than December 1, 2008.
(3) The Washington public ports association shall publish a
guidebook for use by ports containing the guidelines required by
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) A port entering into or renewing
personal service contracts shall follow the guidelines required by
section 18 of this act.
(2) A port that has entered into or renewed personal service
contracts during a calendar year shall, on or before January 1st of the
following calendar year, provide the commission with a report detailing
the procedures the port employed in entering into, renewing, and
managing the contracts.
(3) This section applies to ports entering into or renewing
contracts after January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) The Washington public ports association
shall provide a training course for port personnel responsible for
executing and managing personal service contracts. The course must
contain training on effective and efficient contract management under
the guidelines established under section 18 of this act. Ports shall
require port employees responsible for executing or managing personal
service contracts to complete the training course to the satisfaction
of the commission. Beginning January 1, 2010, no port employee may
execute or manage personal service contracts unless the employee has
completed the training course. Any request for exception to this
requirement shall be submitted to the commission in writing and shall
be approved by the commission prior to the employee executing or
managing the contract.
(2)(a) The office of the state auditor shall conduct risk-based
audits of the contracting practices associated with individual personal
service from multiple port districts to ensure compliance with the
guidelines established in sections 14 and 15 of this act. The office
of the state auditor shall conduct the number of audits deemed
appropriate by the state auditor based on funding provided.
(b) The office of the state auditor shall forward the results of
the audits conducted under this section to the governor, the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature, and the joint
legislative audit and review committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 The state auditor and the attorney general
shall annually by November 30th of each year provide a collaborative
report of contract audit and investigative findings, enforcement
actions, and the status of agency resolution to the governor and the
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.

Sec. 22 RCW 39.04.010 and 2007 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Award" means the formal decision by the state or municipality
notifying a responsible bidder with the lowest responsive bid of the
((state)) state's or municipality's acceptance of the bid and intent to
enter into a contract with the bidder.
(2) "Contract" means a contract in writing for the execution of
public work for a fixed or determinable amount duly awarded after
advertisement and competitive bid, or a contract awarded under the
small works roster process in RCW 39.04.155.
(3) "Municipality" means every city, county, town, port district,
district, or other public agency authorized by law to require the
execution of public work, except drainage districts, diking districts,
diking and drainage improvement districts, drainage improvement
districts, diking improvement districts, consolidated diking and
drainage improvement districts, consolidated drainage improvement
districts, consolidated diking improvement districts, irrigation
districts, or other districts authorized by law for the reclamation or
development of waste or undeveloped lands.
(4) "Public work" means all work, construction, alteration, repair,
or improvement other than ordinary maintenance, executed at the cost of
the state or of any municipality, or which is by law a lien or charge
on any property therein. All public works, including maintenance when
performed by contract shall comply with chapter 39.12 RCW. "Public
work" does not include work, construction, alteration, repair, or
improvement performed under contracts entered into under RCW
36.102.060(4) or under development agreements entered into under RCW
36.102.060(7) or leases entered into under RCW 36.102.060(8).
(5) "Responsible bidder" means a contractor who meets the criteria
in RCW 39.04.350.
(6) "State" means the state of Washington and all departments,
supervisors, commissioners, and agencies of the state.

Sec. 23 RCW 39.04.155 and 2007 c 218 s 87, 2007 c 210 s 1, and
2007 c 133 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This section provides uniform small works roster provisions to
award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling,
alteration, repair, or improvement of real property that may be used by
state agencies and by any local government that is expressly authorized
to use these provisions. These provisions may be used in lieu of other
procedures to award contracts for such work with an estimated cost of
two hundred thousand dollars or less. The small works roster process
includes the limited public works process authorized under subsection
(3) of this section and any local government authorized to award
contracts using the small works roster process under this section may
award contracts using the limited public works process under subsection
(3) of this section.
(2)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may create a
single general small works roster, or may create a small works roster
for different specialties or categories of anticipated work. Where
applicable, small works rosters may make distinctions between
contractors based upon different geographic areas served by the
contractor. The small works roster or rosters shall consist of all
responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list, and where
required by law are properly licensed or registered to perform such
work in this state. A state agency or local government establishing a
small works roster or rosters may require eligible contractors desiring
to be placed on a roster or rosters to keep current records of any
applicable licenses, certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance,
or other appropriate matters on file with the state agency or local
government as a condition of being placed on a roster or rosters. At
least once a year, the state agency or local government shall publish
in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction a notice
of the existence of the roster or rosters and solicit the names of
contractors for such roster or rosters. In addition, responsible
contractors shall be added to an appropriate roster or rosters at any
time they submit a written request and necessary records. Master
contracts may be required to be signed that become effective when a
specific award is made using a small works roster.
(b) A state agency establishing a small works roster or rosters
shall adopt rules implementing this subsection. A local government
establishing a small works roster or rosters shall adopt an ordinance
or resolution implementing this subsection. Procedures included in
rules adopted by the department of general administration in
implementing this subsection must be included in any rules providing
for a small works roster or rosters that is adopted by another state
agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage in these
activities has been delegated to it by the department of general
administration under chapter 43.19 RCW. An interlocal contract or
agreement between two or more state agencies or local governments
establishing a small works roster or rosters to be used by the parties
to the agreement or contract must clearly identify the lead entity that
is responsible for implementing the provisions of this subsection.
(c) Procedures shall be established for securing telephone,
written, or electronic quotations from contractors on the appropriate
small works roster to assure that a competitive price is established
and to award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, as defined in
RCW 39.04.010. Invitations for quotations shall include an estimate of
the scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as materials
and equipment to be furnished. However, detailed plans and
specifications need not be included in the invitation. This subsection
does not eliminate other requirements for architectural or engineering
approvals as to quality and compliance with building codes. Quotations
may be invited from all appropriate contractors on the appropriate
small works roster. As an alternative, quotations may be invited from
at least five contractors on the appropriate small works roster who
have indicated the capability of performing the kind of work being
contracted, in a manner that will equitably distribute the opportunity
among the contractors on the appropriate roster. However, if the
estimated cost of the work is from one hundred thousand dollars to two
hundred thousand dollars, a state agency or local government((, other
than a port district,)) that chooses to solicit bids from less than all
the appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster must
also notify the remaining contractors on the appropriate small works
roster that quotations on the work are being sought. The government
has the sole option of determining whether this notice to the remaining
contractors is made by: (i) Publishing notice in a legal newspaper in
general circulation in the area where the work is to be done; (ii)
mailing a notice to these contractors; or (iii) sending a notice to
these contractors by facsimile or other electronic means. For purposes
of this subsection (2)(c), "equitably distribute" means that a state
agency or local government soliciting bids may not favor certain
contractors on the appropriate small works roster over other
contractors on the appropriate small works roster who perform similar
services.
(d) A contract awarded from a small works roster under this section
need not be advertised.
(e) Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained
shall be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by
telephone inquiry.
(3) In lieu of awarding contracts under subsection (2) of this
section, a state agency or authorized local government may award a
contract for work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement
projects estimated to cost less than thirty-five thousand dollars using
the limited public works process provided under this subsection.
Public works projects awarded under this subsection are exempt from the
other requirements of the small works roster process provided under
subsection (2) of this section and are exempt from the requirement that
contracts be awarded after advertisement as provided under RCW
39.04.010.
For limited public works projects, a state agency or authorized
local government shall solicit electronic or written quotations from a
minimum of three contractors from the appropriate small works roster
and shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder as
defined under RCW 39.04.010. After an award is made, the quotations
shall be open to public inspection and available by electronic request.
A state agency or authorized local government shall attempt to
distribute opportunities for limited public works projects equitably
among contractors willing to perform in the geographic area of the
work. A state agency or authorized local government shall maintain a
list of the contractors contacted and the contracts awarded during the
previous twenty-four months under the limited public works process,
including the name of the contractor, the contractor's registration
number, the amount of the contract, a brief description of the type of
work performed, and the date the contract was awarded. For limited
public works projects, a state agency or authorized local government
may waive the payment and performance bond requirements of chapter
39.08 RCW and the retainage requirements of chapter 60.28 RCW, thereby
assuming the liability for the contractor's nonpayment of laborers,
mechanics, subcontractors, materialpersons, suppliers, and taxes
imposed under Title 82 RCW that may be due from the contractor for the
limited public works project, however the state agency or authorized
local government shall have the right of recovery against the
contractor for any payments made on the contractor's behalf.
(4) The breaking of any project into units or accomplishing any
projects by phases is prohibited if it is done for the purpose of
avoiding the maximum dollar amount of a contract that may be let using
the small works roster process or limited public works process.
(5)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may use the
limited public works process of subsection (3) of this section to
solicit and award small works roster contracts to small businesses that
are registered contractors with gross revenues under one million
dollars annually as reported on their federal tax return.
(b) A state agency or authorized local government may adopt
additional procedures to encourage small businesses that are registered
contractors with gross revenues under two hundred fifty thousand
dollars annually as reported on their federal tax returns to submit
quotations or bids on small works roster contracts.
(6) As used in this section, "state agency" means the department of
general administration, the state parks and recreation commission, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife,
the department of transportation, any institution of higher education
as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated
authority by the department of general administration to engage in
construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration,
improvement, or repair activities.

Sec. 24 RCW 53.36.030 and 1996 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a port
district may at any time contract indebtedness or borrow money for
district purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor not
exceeding an amount, together with any existing indebtedness of the
district not authorized by the voters, of one-fourth of one percent of
the value of the taxable property in the district.
(b) Port districts having less than eight hundred million dollars
in value of taxable property during 1991 may at any time contract
indebtedness or borrow money for port district purposes and may issue
general obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an amount, combined
with existing indebtedness of the district not authorized by the
voters, of three-eighths of one percent of the value of the taxable
property in the district. Prior to contracting for any indebtedness
authorized by this subsection (1)(b), the port district must have a
comprehensive plan for harbor improvements or industrial development
and a long-term financial plan approved by the department of community,
trade, and economic development. The department of community, trade,
and economic development is immune from any liability for its part in
reviewing or approving port district's improvement or development
plans, or financial plans. Any indebtedness authorized by this
subsection (1)(b) may be used only to acquire or construct a facility,
and, prior to contracting for such indebtedness, the port district must
have a lease contract for a minimum of five years for the facility to
be acquired or constructed by the debt.
(2) With the assent of three-fifths of the voters voting thereon at
a general or special port election called for that purpose, a port
district may contract indebtedness or borrow money for district
purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor provided the
total indebtedness of the district at any such time shall not exceed
three-fourths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in
the district.
(3) In addition to the indebtedness authorized under subsections
(1) and (2) of this section, port districts having less than two
hundred million dollars in value of taxable property and operating a
municipal airport may at any time contract indebtedness or borrow money
for airport capital improvement purposes and may issue general
obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an additional one-eighth of one
percent of the value of the taxable property in the district without
authorization by the voters; and, with the assent of three-fifths of
the voters voting thereon at a general or special port election called
for that purpose, may contract indebtedness or borrow money for airport
capital improvement purposes and may issue general obligation bonds
therefor for an additional three-eighths of one percent provided the
total indebtedness of the district for all port purposes at any such
time shall not exceed one and one-fourth percent of the value of the
taxable property in the district.
(4) Any port district may issue general district bonds evidencing
any indebtedness, payable at any time not exceeding fifty years from
the date of the bonds. Any contract for indebtedness or borrowed money
authorized by RCW 53.36.030(1)(b) shall not exceed twenty-five years.
The bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46
RCW.
(5) Elections required under this section shall be held as provided
in RCW 39.36.050.
(6) For the purpose of this section, "indebtedness of the district"
shall not include any debt of a county-wide district with a population
less than twenty-five hundred people when the debt is secured by a
mortgage on property leased to the federal government; and the term
"value of the taxable property" shall have the meaning set forth in RCW
39.36.015.
(7) This section does not apply to a loan made under a loan
agreement under chapter 39.69 RCW, and a computation of indebtedness
under this chapter must exclude the amount of a loan under such a loan
agreement.
(8) A port district may not use property tax revenue derived from
banked levy capacity under RCW 84.55.092 to pay, secure, or guarantee
the payment of principal and interest on general obligation bonds
issued after the effective date of this section without the approval of
the governor. This subsection only applies to a port district in a
county with a population of one million or more.

Sec. 25 RCW 84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
regular property tax levy for each taxing district other than the state
may be set at the amount which would be allowed otherwise under this
chapter if the regular property tax levy for the district for taxes due
in prior years beginning with 1986 had been set at the full amount
allowed under this chapter including any levy authorized under RCW
52.16.160 that would have been imposed but for the limitation in RCW
52.18.065, applicable upon imposition of the benefit charge under
chapter 52.18 RCW.
(2) A port district may not use levy proceeds derived from banked
levy capacity under this section to pay, secure, or guarantee the
payment of principal and interest on general obligation bonds issued
after the effective date of this section unless the increased levy
amount under this section is approved by the governor. This subsection
only applies to a port district in a county with a population of one
million or more.
(3) The purpose of subsection (1) of this section is to remove the
incentive for a taxing district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum
level permitted under this chapter, and to protect the future levy
capacity of a taxing district that reduces its tax levy below the level
that it otherwise could impose under this chapter, by removing the
adverse consequences to future levy capacities resulting from such levy
reductions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 Sections 6 through 21 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 53 RCW.

--- END ---