BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.026 and 2005 c 151 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((All)) Administrative expenses of the board ((incurred on and
after April 1, 1963,)) shall be appropriated and paid from the liquor
revolving fund. These administrative expenses shall include, but not
be limited to: The salaries and expenses of the board and its
employees, the cost of ((establishing, leasing, maintaining, and
operating)) opening additional state liquor stores and warehouses,
legal services, pilot projects, annual or other audits, and other
general costs of conducting the business of the board((, and the costs
of supplying, installing, and maintaining equipment used in state
liquor stores and contract liquor stores for the purchase of liquor
using debit or credit cards)). The administrative expenses shall
not((, however, be deemed to)) include costs of liquor and lottery
tickets purchased, the cost of transportation and delivery to the point
of distribution, the cost of operating, maintaining, relocating, and
leasing state liquor stores and warehouses, other costs pertaining to
the acquisition and receipt of liquor and lottery tickets, ((packaging
and repackaging of liquor,)) agency commissions for contract liquor
stores, transaction fees associated with credit or debit card purchases
for liquor in state liquor stores and in contract liquor stores
pursuant to RCW 66.16.040 and 66.16.041, sales tax, and those amounts
distributed pursuant to RCW 66.08.180, 66.08.190, 66.08.200, 66.08.210
and 66.08.220. Agency commissions for contract liquor stores shall be
established by the liquor control board after consultation with and
approval by the director of the office of financial management. All
expenditures and payment of obligations authorized by this section are
subject to the allotment requirements of chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---