BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.64.015 and 2006 c 270 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any person is arrested for any violation of the traffic
laws or regulations which is punishable as a misdemeanor or by
imposition of a fine, the arresting officer may serve upon him or her
a traffic citation and notice to appear in court. Such citation and
notice shall conform to the requirements of RCW 46.64.010, and in
addition, shall include spaces for the name and address of the person
arrested, the license number of the vehicle involved, the driver's
license number of such person, if any, the offense or violation
charged, and the time and place where such person shall appear in
court. Such spaces shall be filled with the appropriate information by
the arresting officer. An officer may not serve or issue any traffic
citation or notice for any offense or violation except either when the
offense or violation is committed in his or her presence; or when a
person may be arrested pursuant to RCW 10.31.100, as now or hereafter
amended; or when the officer has probable cause to believe that the
person has committed an offense of RCW 46.12.101. The detention
arising from an arrest under this section may not be for a period of
time longer than is reasonably necessary to issue and serve a citation
and notice, except that the time limitation does not apply under any of
the following circumstances:
(1) Where the arresting officer has probable cause to believe that
the arrested person has committed any of the offenses enumerated in RCW
10.31.100(3);
(2) When the arrested person is a nonresident and is being detained
for a hearing under RCW 46.64.035.

--- END ---