BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) through (e) of this subsection,
the following are subject to seizure and forfeiture and no property
right exists in them: All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles,
or vessels, which are used, or intended for use, in any manner to
facilitate a violation of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, 9.68A.102,
9A.88.030, 9A.88.070, 9A.88.080, 9A.88.085, or 9A.88.110, within an
area designated under subsection (11) of this section.
(b) No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the
transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture
under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in
charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation
of an offense listed in (a) of this subsection.
(c) No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section by
reason of any act or omission established by the owner thereof to have
been committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent.
(d) A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security
interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured
party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission.
(e) When the owner of a conveyance has been arrested for a
violation of an offense listed in (a) of this subsection, the
conveyance in which the person is arrested may not be subject to
forfeiture unless it is seized or process is issued for its seizure
within ten days of the owner's arrest.
(2) Personal property subject to forfeiture under this section may
be seized by any law enforcement officer of this state upon process
issued by any superior court having jurisdiction over the property.
Seizure of personal property without process may be made if:
(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search
warrant;
(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior
judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture
proceeding based upon this section;
(c) A law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that
the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of an
offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(3) In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the
seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure
was made shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following
seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in charge
thereof and any person having any known right of interest therein,
including any community property interest, of the seizure and intended
forfeiture of the seized property. Notice of seizure in the case of
property subject to a security interest that has been perfected by
filing a financing statement in accordance with chapter 62A.9A RCW, or
a certificate of title, shall be made by service upon the secured party
or the secured party's assignee at the address shown on the financing
statement or certificate of title. The notice of seizure in other
cases may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule
including but not limited to service by certified mail with return
receipt requested. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon
mailing within the fifteen-day period following the seizure.
(4) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
items specified in subsection (1) of this section within forty-five
days of the seizure, the item seized shall be deemed forfeited.
(5) If any person notifies the law enforcement agency in writing of
the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items
specified in subsection (1) of this section within forty-five days of
the seizure, the person or persons shall be afforded a reasonable
opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall be
before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the
chief law enforcement officer's designee, except where the seizing
agency is a state agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing
shall be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency
or an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW,
except that any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter
to a court of competent jurisdiction. Removal of any matter involving
personal property may only be accomplished according to the rules of
civil procedure. The person seeking removal of the matter must serve
process against the state, county, political subdivision, or
municipality that operates the seizing agency, and any other party of
interest, in accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020, within
forty-five days after the person seeking removal has notified the
seizing law enforcement agency of the person's claim of ownership or
right to possession. The court to which the matter is to be removed
shall be the district court when the aggregate value of personal
property is within the jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020.
A hearing before the seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall be
under Title 34 RCW. In all cases, the burden of proof is upon the law
enforcement agency to establish, by a preponderance of the evidence,
that the property is subject to forfeiture.
The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the
article or articles to the claimant upon a determination by the
administrative law judge or court that the claimant is the present
lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession thereof or items
specified in subsection (1) of this section.
(6) In any proceeding to forfeit property under this section, where
the claimant substantially prevails, the claimant is entitled to
reasonable attorneys' fees reasonably incurred by the claimant. In
addition, in a court hearing between two or more claimants to the
article or articles involved, the prevailing party is entitled to a
judgment for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(7) When property is forfeited under this section, the seizing law
enforcement agency may:
(a) Retain it for official use or upon application by any law
enforcement agency of this state release such property to such agency
for the exclusive use of enforcing the provisions of this chapter;
(b) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and
which is not harmful to the public; or
(c) Request the appropriate sheriff or director of public safety to
take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in
accordance with law.
(8)(a) When property is forfeited, the seizing agency shall keep a
record indicating the identity of the prior owner, if known, a
description of the property, the disposition of the property, the value
of the property at the time of the seizure, and the amount of proceeds
realized from disposition of the property.
(b) Each seizing agency shall retain records of forfeited property
for at least seven years.
(c) Each seizing agency shall file a report including a copy of the
records of forfeited property with the state treasurer each calendar
quarter.
(d) The quarterly report need not include a record of forfeited
property that is still being held for use as evidence during the
investigation or prosecution of a case or during the appeal from a
conviction.
(9)(a) By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency shall
remit to the state treasurer an amount equal to the greater of ten
percent of the net proceeds of any property forfeited during the
preceding calendar year or the net proceeds of any property forfeited
during the year minus the administrative costs of the forfeiture.
Money remitted shall be deposited in the prostitution prevention and
intervention account established under RCW 43.63A.740.
(b) The net proceeds of forfeited property is the value of the
forfeitable interest in the property after deducting the cost of
satisfying any bona fide security interest to which the property is
subject at the time of the seizure; and in the case of sold property,
after deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or
commissions paid to independent selling agents.
(c) The value of sold forfeited property is the sale price. The
value of retained forfeited property is the fair market value of the
property at the time of seizure, determined by reference to any
applicable commonly used index. A seizing agency may use, but need not
use, an independent qualified appraiser to determine the value of
retained property. If an appraiser is used, the value of the property
appraised is net of the cost of the appraisal. The value of destroyed
property is zero.
(d) The administrative costs of the forfeiture include, but are not
limited to, the costs of impoundment, towing, hearings, and employee
time.
(10) Forfeited property and net proceeds not required to be paid to
the state treasurer shall be retained by the seizing law enforcement
agency exclusively for the expansion and improvement of
prostitution-related law enforcement activity. Money retained under
this section may not be used to supplant preexisting funding sources.
(11) A local governing authority may designate areas within which
conveyances are subject to forfeiture under this section. The
designation must be based on evidence indicating that the area has a
disproportionate number of arrests for the offenses listed in
subsection (1)(a) of this section as compared to other areas. The
local governing authority shall post signs that indicate that the area
has been designated under this subsection.

--- END ---