BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.70.240 and 2001 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no state lottery moneys, including shared game lottery
moneys, shall be distributed without the specific affirmative directive
of this section.
(2) The moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:
(((1))) (a) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning
lottery tickets or shares;
(((2))) (b) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve
account created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative
account created by RCW 67.70.260;
(((3))) (c) For purposes of making deposits into the education
construction fund ((and student achievement fund created in RCW
43.135.045. For the transition period from July 1, 2001, until and
including June 30, 2002, fifty percent of the moneys not otherwise
obligated under this section shall be placed in the student achievement
fund and fifty percent of these moneys shall be placed in the education
construction fund. On and after July 1, 2002, until June 30, 2004,
seventy-five percent of these moneys shall be placed in the student
achievement fund and twenty-five percent shall be placed in the
education construction fund. On and after July 1, 2004,)). All
deposits not otherwise obligated under this ((section)) subsection
(2)(c) for the payment of state lottery prizes and agent compensation,
the promotion and administration of the state lottery, or stadium bond
payments, shall be placed in the education construction fund. Moneys
in the state lottery account deposited in the education construction
fund ((and the student achievement fund)) are included in "general
state revenues" under RCW 39.42.070;
(((4))) (d) For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying
the principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to
construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including
reasonably necessary preconstruction costs. Three million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection (2)(d) during calendar year
1996. During subsequent years, such distributions shall equal the
prior year's distributions increased by four percent. Distributions
under this subsection (2)(d) shall cease when the bonds issued for the
construction of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than
twenty years after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;
(((5))) (e) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center
account, created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW
43.99N.070, six million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection (2)(e) during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent
years, such distribution shall equal the prior year's distributions
increased by four percent. No distribution may be made under this
subsection (2)(e) after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for
issuance of the bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions
under this subsection (2)(e) shall cease when the bonds are retired,
but not later than December 31, 2020;
(((6))) (f) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and
game-related services; and
(((7))) (g) For the payment of agent compensation.
The office of financial management shall require the allotment of
all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes
in the allotments.
(3) Moneys from the shared game lottery authorized under RCW
67.70.044 shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 67.70.340.
(4) Moneys deposited in the problem gambling account shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 43.20A.892.
(5) Moneys from unclaimed prizes, which are deposited in the
economic development strategic reserve account created under RCW
43.330.250, shall be distributed as provided in RCW 43.330.250.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.70.240 and 2001 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no state lottery moneys, including shared game lottery
moneys, shall be distributed without the specific affirmative directive
of this section.
(2) The moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:
(((1))) (a) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning
lottery tickets or shares;
(((2))) (b) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve
account created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative
account created by RCW 67.70.260;
(((3))) (c) For purposes of making deposits into the education
construction fund ((and student achievement fund created in RCW
43.135.045. For the transition period from July 1, 2001, until and
including June 30, 2002, fifty percent of the moneys not otherwise
obligated under this section shall be placed in the student achievement
fund and fifty percent of these moneys shall be placed in the education
construction fund. On and after July 1, 2002, until June 30, 2004,
seventy-five percent of these moneys shall be placed in the student
achievement fund and twenty-five percent shall be placed in the
education construction fund. On and after July 1, 2004,)). All
deposits not otherwise obligated under this ((section)) subsection
(2)(c) for the payment of state lottery prizes and agent compensation
or the promotion and administration of the state lottery shall be
placed in the education construction fund. Moneys in the state lottery
account deposited in the education construction fund ((and the student
achievement fund)) are included in "general state revenues" under RCW
39.42.070;
(((4) For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the
principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to
construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including
reasonably necessary preconstruction costs. Three million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during calendar year 1996.
During subsequent years, such distributions shall equal the prior
year's distributions increased by four percent. Distributions under
this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued for the construction
of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than twenty years
after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;
(5) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account,
created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW
43.99N.070, six million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent years,
such distribution shall equal the prior year's distributions increased
by four percent. No distribution may be made under this subsection
after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of the
bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this
subsection shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than
December 31, 2020;
(6))) (d) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and
(((7))) (e) For the payment of agent compensation.
The office of financial management shall require the allotment of
all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes
in the allotments.
(3) Moneys from the shared game lottery authorized under RCW
67.70.044 shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 67.70.340.
(4) Moneys deposited in the problem gambling account shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 43.20A.892.
(5) Moneys from unclaimed prizes, which are deposited in the
economic development strategic reserve account created under RCW
43.330.250, shall be distributed as provided in RCW 43.330.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 67.70.042 (Scratch games -- Baseball stadium construction)
and 1997 c 220 s 207 & 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 104; and
(2) RCW 67.70.043 (New games--Stadium and exhibition center bonds,
operation, and development--Youth athletic facilities) and 1997 c 220
s 205.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect on
the earlier of: (1) The date distributions are no longer made under
RCW 67.70.240(2) (d) and (e); or (2) January 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 1 of this act expires on the earlier
of: (1) The date distributions are no longer made under RCW
67.70.240(2) (d) and (e); or (2) January 1, 2021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The state lottery commission must provide
notice of the effective date of sections 2 and 3 of this act to the
legislature, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed
appropriate by the commission.

--- END ---