BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.43.042 and 1969 ex.s. c 258 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the legislative authority of any city or town has provided
pursuant to law for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction,
purchase, condemnation and purchase, addition to, repair, or renewal of
the whole or any portion of ((a)):
(1) A system for providing the city or town and the inhabitants
thereof with water, which system includes as a whole or as a part
thereof water mains, hydrants or appurtenances which are authorized
subjects for local improvements under RCW 35.43.040(13) or other law;
((or a))
(2) A system for providing the city or town with sewerage and storm
or surface water disposal, which system includes as a whole or as a
part thereof drains, sewers or sewer appurtenances which are authorized
subjects for local improvements under RCW 35.43.040(7) or other law;
((or))
(3) Off-street parking facilities; ((and)) or
(4) Underground facilities for the transmission or distribution of
electricity or communications; and
Has further provided in accordance with any applicable provisions
of the Constitution or statutory authority for the issuance and sale of
revenue bonds to pay the cost of all or a portion of any such system,
such legislative authority shall have the authority to establish
utility local improvement districts, and to levy special assessments on
all property specially benefited by any such local improvement to pay
in whole or in part the damages or costs of any local improvements so
provided for.
The initiation and formation of such utility local improvement
districts and the levying, collection and enforcement of assessments
shall be in the manner and subject to the same procedures and
limitations as are now or hereafter provided by law for the initiation
and formation of local improvement districts in cities and towns and
the levying, collection and enforcement of assessments pursuant
thereto.
It must be specified in any petition or resolution initiating the
formation of such a utility local improvement district in a city or
town and in the ordinance ordered pursuant thereto, that the
assessments shall be for the sole purpose of payment into such revenue
bond fund as may be specified by the legislative authority for the
payment of revenue bonds issued to defray the cost of such system or
facilities or any portion thereof as provided for in this section.
Assessments in any such utility local improvement district may be
made on the basis of special benefits up to but not in excess of the
total cost of the local improvements portion of any system or
facilities payable by issuance of revenue bonds. No warrants or bonds
shall be issued in any such utility local improvement district, but the
collection of interest and principal on all assessments in such utility
local improvement district, when collected, shall be paid into any such
revenue bond fund.
When in the petition or resolution for establishment of a local
improvement district and in the ordinance ordered pursuant thereto, it
is specified or provided that the assessments shall be for the sole
purpose of payment into a revenue bond fund for the payment of revenue
bonds, then the local improvement district shall be designated a
"utility local improvement district".
The provisions of chapters 35.45, 35.47 and 35.48 RCW shall have no
application to utility local improvement districts created under
authority of this section.

--- END ---