BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that local governments
need additional revenues to provide public safety resources in order to
protect the citizens of Washington from fire and crime. The
legislature finds that the current benefit formula and contributions
for the law enforcement officers and firefighters plan 2 are inadequate
to modify that formula in recognition of the shorter working careers
for firefighters and police officers. The legislature recognizes that
although some officers and firefighters are able to work comfortably
beyond twenty-five years, the combat nature of fire suppression and law
enforcement generally require earlier retirement ages. In recognition
of the physical demands of the professions and the inherent risks faced
by law enforcement officers and firefighters, eligibility for
retirement in the law enforcement officers and firefighters plan 2
system has been set at age fifty-three. However, the benefit formula
is designed for careers of thirty-five to forty years, making
retirement at age fifty-three an unrealistic option for many.
Therefore, the legislature declares that it is the purpose of this
act to provide local government public safety employers and the law
enforcement officers and firefighters plan 2 pension plan with
additional shared revenues when state general fund revenues increase by
at least one percent over the prior year's collections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW
to read as follows:
The local public safety enhancement account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from section 4 of this act must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used as
follows:
(1) Fifty percent of the money in the account shall be transferred
to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system
benefits improvement account established in section 3 of this act.
(2) The balance shall be distributed by the state treasurer to all
jurisdictions with law enforcement officers and firefighters plan 2
members on a proportionate share basis based on the number of plan 2
members each jurisdiction has on January 1st of the prior year divided
by the total number of plan 2 members in the system. Moneys
distributed from the balance of the public safety enhancement account
may be used for the following purposes: (a) Criminal justice,
including those where an ancillary benefit to the civil justice occurs,
and includes domestic violence programs; (b) information and assistance
to parents and families dealing with at-risk or runaway youth; or (c)
public safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The local law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system benefits improvement account (benefits account) is
created within the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system plan 2 fund. All receipts from section 2(1) of this
act must be deposited into the account.
(2) The funds in the benefits account shall not be included by the
state actuary in the calculation of the market value of assets of the
law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2
fund until the board directs the state actuary in writing to do so for
purposes of financing benefits adopted by the board pursuant to and
consistent with RCW 41.26.720. The board, in consultation with the
state investment board, shall provide the state actuary, in writing,
the market value of the amount directed from the benefits account for
inclusion in the calculation of the market value of assets of the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 fund.
The market value of the amount directed from the benefits account shall
be determined as of the date of the direction from the board to include
this amount for purposes of financing benefits adopted by the board
pursuant to and consistent with RCW 41.26.720.
(3) The law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2
retirement board shall administer the fund in an actuarially sound
manner.
(4) The state investment board has the full power to invest,
reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment money in the
benefits account. The state investment board is authorized to adopt
investment policies for the money in the benefits account. All
investment and operating costs associated with the investment of money
within the benefits account shall be paid pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160
and 43.84.160. With the exception of these expenses, the earnings from
the investment of the money shall be retained by the benefits account.
(5) All investments made by the state investment board shall be
made with the exercise of that degree of judgment and care pursuant to
RCW 43.33A.140 and the investment policy established by the state
investment board.
(6) When appropriate for investment purposes, the state investment
board may commingle money in the fund with other funds.
(7) The authority to establish all policies relating to the
benefits account, other than the investment policies set forth in this
section, resides with the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
plan 2 retirement board. Other than investments by and expenses of the
state investment board, disbursements from this fund may be made only
on the authorization of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
plan 2 retirement board for purposes of funding the member, employer,
and state cost of financing benefits adopted by the board pursuant to
and consistent with RCW 41.26.720.
(8) The state investment board shall routinely consult with and
communicate with the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan
2 retirement board on the investment policy, earnings of the trust, and
related needs of the benefits account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW
to read as follows:
By September 30th of each year in which the prior fiscal year's
general state revenues exceed the previous fiscal year's revenues by
more than one percent, the state treasurer shall transfer the lesser of
one-third of the increase, or fifty million dollars, to the local
public safety enhancement account.

--- END ---