BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means a person who has submitted the appropriate
form or forms to be considered for an HVAC/R mechanic certificate, a
temporary HVAC/R mechanic certificate, a trainee certificate, or an
HVAC/R operator certificate, as required by the department.
(2) "Board" means the HVAC/R board established in section 23 of
this act.
(3) "Boiler" means a closed vessel in which water is heated, steam
is generated, steam is superheated, or a combination thereof, under
pressure or vacuum by the application of heat, electricity, or nuclear
energy. "Boiler" also includes fired units for heating or vaporizing
liquids other than water where these systems are complete within
themselves.
(4) "BTUH" means British thermal units per hour.
(5) "Certified HVAC/R mechanic" means a person who has been issued
a valid HVAC/R mechanic certificate under section 15 of this act.
(6) "Certified specialty mechanic" means a person who has been
issued one or more valid specialty mechanic certificates under section
15 of this act.
(7) "CFM" means cubic feet per minute.
(8) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department or the
director's designee.
(10) "Gas company" has the same meaning as in RCW 80.04.010.
(11) "Gas company service piping" means gas piping that is owned by
or under the control of a gas company and used for transmission or
distribution of fuel to the point of contact at the premises or
property supplied or to be supplied, including service connections,
meters, or other apparatus or appliance used in the measurement of the
consumption of fuel by the customer. For the purposes of this
subsection, "point of contact" means the outlet of the meter or the
connection to the customer's gas piping, whichever is farther
downstream.
(12) "Gas piping" means pipes, valves, or fittings used to convey
fuel gas installed on a premise or in a building. "Gas piping" does
not include gas company service piping or any gas piping used directly
in the generation of electricity by an electric utility or a
commercial-scale nonutility generator of electricity.
(13) "Gas piping work" means to design, fabricate, construct,
install, replace, or service gas piping and venting related to gas
piping.
(14) "Hours of HVAC/R work" means any combination of accrued hours
of HVAC/R work performed while:
(a) Employed by an HVAC/R contractor or a person exempt from the
requirements of chapter 18.27 RCW, chapter 19.28 RCW, or this chapter;
(b) Employed by a registered or licensed general or specialty
contractor, or the equivalent, in another state or country; or
(c) Serving in the United States armed forces.
(15) "HVAC" means heating, ventilating, and air conditioning.
(16)(a) "HVAC equipment and systems" means equipment necessary for
any system that heats, cools, conditions, ventilates, filters,
humidifies, or dehumidifies environmental air for residential,
industrial, or commercial use, including all related ventilation and
ducting systems.
(b) "HVAC equipment and systems" does not include: (i) Solid fuel
burning devices, such as wood stoves and coal stoves; (ii) gas company
service piping; (iii) gas piping other than that necessary to deliver
fuel; or (iv) boilers.
(17) "HVAC work" means to design, fabricate, construct, install,
replace, service, test, or adjust and balance HVAC equipment and
systems.
(18) "HVAC/R" means heating, ventilating, air conditioning, and
refrigeration.
(19) "HVAC/R contractor" means any person who:
(a) Advertises for, offers to perform, submits a bid for, or
performs any HVAC/R work covered by the provisions of this chapter;
(b) Employs anyone, or offers or advertises to employ anyone, to
perform any HVAC/R work that is subject to the provisions of this
chapter; or
(c) Is registered under section 2(1)(b) of this act.
(20) "HVAC/R equipment and systems" means HVAC equipment and
systems, refrigeration systems, and gas piping.
(21) "HVAC/R mechanic certificate" means any of the certificates
identified under section 6 of this act.
(22) "HVAC/R operator certificate" means the certificate identified
under section 9 of this act.
(23) "HVAC/R work" means all HVAC work, refrigeration work, and gas
piping work not otherwise exempted by this chapter.
(24) "Person" or "company," used interchangeably throughout this
chapter, means any individual, corporation, partnership, limited
partnership, organization, or any other entity whatsoever, whether
public or private.
(25) "Property management company" means a company that is
operating in compliance with state real estate licensing rules and is
under contract with a property owner to manage the buildings.
(26) "Refrigeration system" means a combination of interconnected
refrigerant-containing parts constituting one closed refrigerant
circuit in which a refrigerant is circulated for the purpose of
extracting heat and includes systems in which a secondary coolant,
cooled or heated by the refrigeration system, is circulated to the air
or other substance to be cooled or heated.
(27) "Refrigeration work" means to design, fabricate, construct,
install, replace, or service refrigeration systems.
(28) "Service" means to repair, modify, or perform other work
required for the normal continued performance of HVAC/R equipment and
systems.
(29) "Specialty certificate" means any of the certificates
identified under section 5 of this act.
(30) "Technical college" means a public community or technical
college, or a not-for-profit nationally accredited technical or trade
school licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating
board under chapter 28C.10 RCW.
(31) "Temporary certificate" means any of the certificates issued
under section 7 of this act.
(32) "Trainee" means a person who has been issued a trainee
certificate by the department under section 8 of this act.
(33) "Trainee certificate" means any certificate issued under
section 8 of this act.
(34) "Valid" means not expired, revoked, or suspended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 CONTRACTOR REGISTRATION--CONCURRENT
REGISTRATION--REQUIREMENTS. (1) Except as provided in this chapter, it
is unlawful for:
(a) Any person to engage in business as an HVAC/R contractor,
within the state, without having been issued a valid registration as a
contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW;
(b) Any person, on or after July 1, 2009, to engage in business as
an HVAC/R contractor, within the state, without having been issued a
valid registration as an HVAC/R contractor from the department; and
(c) Any person, on and after July 1, 2010, to employ a person to
perform or offer to perform HVAC/R work who has not been issued a valid
HVAC/R mechanic certificate, specialty certificate, temporary HVAC/R
mechanic certificate, trainee certificate, or HVAC/R operator
certificate issued by the department under this chapter.
(2) The department shall prescribe an application form to be used
to apply for an HVAC/R contractor registration under this chapter, and
shall ensure that the person applying for an HVAC/R contractor
registration is also a registered general or specialty contractor under
chapter 18.27 RCW before it issues that person an HVAC/R contractor
registration.
(3) For a person who may be issued two or more registrations or
licenses provided for in chapter 18.27 RCW, chapter 19.28 RCW, or this
chapter, the department shall establish on or before July 1, 2011, a
single registration/licensing document. The document shall list all of
the person's registrations and licenses.
(4) Regardless of when the HVAC/R contractor registration is
issued, it shall become suspended, revoked, expired, or renewed at the
same time as the registration issued under chapter 18.27 RCW.
(5) No bond or security in addition to that required of
contractors under chapter 18.27 RCW shall be required of an HVAC/R
contractor under this chapter.
(6) This section does not apply to:
(a) A person who is contracting for HVAC/R work on his or her own
residence;
(b) Property management companies whose employees perform only
HVAC/R work exempted under section 4 of this act; or
(c) A person who is specifically exempted under RCW 18.27.090 from
contractor registration requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 CERTIFICATE REQUIRED--LOCAL PREEMPTION. (1)
Except as provided in this chapter, it is unlawful for any person, on
and after July 1, 2010, to perform or offer to perform HVAC/R work
without having been issued a valid HVAC/R mechanic certificate,
specialty certificate, temporary HVAC/R mechanic certificate, or
trainee certificate under this chapter.
(2) No political subdivision of the state shall require a person
possessing a valid HVAC/R certificate, specialty certificate, temporary
HVAC/R mechanic certificate, trainee certificate issued by the
department under this chapter, or any person who is exempted under this
chapter to demonstrate any additional proof of competency in, obtain
any license for, or pay any fee to perform HVAC/R work in that
political subdivision.
(3) The department, with approval of the HVAC/R board, may adopt
rules to establish specific criteria for recognizing a national
certification for propane gas in place of an appropriate or equivalent
level of certification required under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 EXEMPTIONS FROM CERTIFICATION. (1) The
provisions of section 3(1) of this act do not apply to a person:
(a) Cleaning or replacing air filters, lubricating bearings,
replacing fan belts, cleaning evaporators or condensers, cleaning
cooling towers, or equipment logging on any HVAC/R equipment or
systems;
(b) Performing HVAC/R work on HVAC/R equipment or systems that:
(i) Contain six pounds or less of any refrigerant and is actuated by a
motor or engine having a standard rating of one-quarter horsepower or
less; or (ii) are an absorption system that has a rating of one-quarter
ton or less refrigeration effect;
(c) Setting oil tanks and related piping to a furnace;
(d) Setting propane tanks and related piping outside a building;
(e) Performing gas piping work on a fuel burning appliance with a
maximum capacity of five hundred thousand BTUH while holding a valid
journeyman plumber certificate issued under chapter 18.106 RCW or a
valid specialty plumber certificate issued under chapter 18.106 RCW for
performing services in RCW 18.106.010(10)(a);
(f) Performing HVAC/R work at his or her residence, farm, place of
business, or on other property owned by him or her, unless the HVAC/R
work is performed in the construction of a new building intended for
rent, sale, or lease;
(g) Performing HVAC/R work on his or her own property or to
regularly employed persons working on the premises of their employer,
unless the HVAC/R work is performed in the construction of a new
building intended for rent, sale, or lease;
(h) Performing HVAC/R work for or on behalf of a gas company when
such work is (i) incidental to the business of delivering fuel gas to
the premises or (ii) performed pursuant to any tariff on file with the
state utilities and transportation commission;
(i) Licensed under chapter 18.08 or 18.43 RCW who is designing
HVAC/R equipment or systems, but who is not otherwise performing HVAC/R
work;
(j) Making a like-in-kind replacement of a household appliance; or
(k) Installing wood or pellet stoves, including directly related
venting such as a chimney or flue.
(2) Nothing in this section precludes any person who is exempted
under this section from obtaining an HVAC/R mechanic certificate,
specialty certificate, temporary HVAC/R mechanic certificate, trainee
certificate, or HVAC/R operator certificate if they otherwise meet the
requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 SPECIALTY CERTIFICATES--SCOPE OF WORK. The
department may issue the following specialty certificates to an
applicant who has successfully met the requirements under this chapter
for a specialty certificate, and the scope of work that may be
performed by a person under each of the specialty certificates is as
follows:
(1) Gas piping specialty mechanic I/II. A person issued a gas
piping specialty mechanic I/II certificate may perform gas piping work
on a fuel burning appliance with a maximum capacity of five hundred
thousand BTUH.
(2) Refrigeration specialty mechanic I. A person issued a
refrigeration specialty mechanic I certificate may perform
refrigeration work on a refrigeration system with one or more
compressors not exceeding ninety thousand BTUH per compressor using
class A1 refrigerants.
(3) HVAC specialty mechanic I. A person issued an HVAC specialty
mechanic I certificate may perform HVAC work on HVAC equipment and
systems of seven and one-half tons or less or HVAC equipment and
systems of three thousand three hundred seventy-five CFM or less.
(4) Refrigeration specialty mechanic II. A person issued a
refrigeration specialty mechanic II certificate may perform:
(a) Refrigeration work authorized to be performed by a
refrigeration specialty mechanic I;
(b) Installation or replacement of a self-contained refrigeration
system up to three hundred thousand BTUH; and
(c) With the exception of installation or replacement,
refrigeration work on a refrigeration system with one or more
compressors not exceeding three hundred thousand BTUH per compressor
using class A1 refrigerants.
(5) HVAC specialty mechanic II. A person issued an HVAC specialty
mechanic II certificate may perform:
(a) HVAC work authorized to be performed by an HVAC specialty
mechanic I; and
(b) HVAC work on HVAC equipment and systems of twenty tons or less
or HVAC equipment and systems of nine thousand CFM or less.
(6) Gas piping specialty mechanic III. A person issued a gas
piping specialty mechanic III certificate may perform all gas piping
work on any fuel burning appliance.
(7) Refrigeration specialty mechanic III. A person issued a
refrigeration specialty mechanic III certificate may perform
refrigeration work on any refrigeration system using any refrigerant.
(8) HVAC specialty mechanic III. A person issued an HVAC specialty
mechanic III certificate may perform all HVAC work on HVAC equipment
and systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 HVAC/R MECHANIC CERTIFICATES--SCOPE OF WORK.
The department may issue the following HVAC/R mechanic certificates to
an applicant who has successfully met the requirements under this
chapter for an HVAC/R certificate, and the scope of work that may be
performed by a person under each of the HVAC/R mechanic certificates is
as follows:
(1) HVAC/R mechanic I. A person issued an HVAC/R mechanic I
certificate may perform:
(a) Gas piping work authorized to be performed by a gas piping
specialty mechanic I/II;
(b) Refrigeration work authorized to be performed by a
refrigeration specialty mechanic I; and
(c) HVAC work authorized to be performed by an HVAC specialty
mechanic I.
(2) HVAC/R mechanic II. A person issued an HVAC/R mechanic II
certificate may perform:
(a) Gas piping work authorized to be performed by a gas piping
specialty mechanic I/II;
(b) Refrigeration work authorized to be performed by a
refrigeration specialty mechanic II; and
(c) HVAC work authorized to be performed by an HVAC specialty
mechanic II.
(3) HVAC/R mechanic III. A person issued an HVAC/R mechanic III
certificate may perform:
(a) Gas piping work authorized to be performed by a gas piping
specialty mechanic III;
(b) Refrigeration work authorized to be performed by a
refrigeration specialty mechanic III; and
(c) HVAC work authorized to be performed by an HVAC specialty
mechanic III.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 TEMPORARY HVAC/R CERTIFICATE--APPLICATION--EXAMINATION REQUIRED. (1) On and after July 1, 2010, a person who has
performed HVAC/R work in other states or countries may, in a form and
manner prescribed by the department, apply for a temporary HVAC/R
mechanic certificate to perform HVAC/R work in this state. The
application shall contain evidence of the person's hours of HVAC/R work
in the other states or countries that is verifiable by the department.
(2) Upon review of the application provided in subsection (1) of
this section, the department may:
(a) If the applicant has accrued less than two thousand hours of
HVAC/R work, not issue a temporary HVAC/R mechanic certificate;
(b) If the applicant has accrued two thousand hours or more, but
less than four thousand hours of HVAC/R work, issue a temporary HVAC/R
mechanic I certificate;
(c) If the applicant has accrued four thousand hours or more, but
less than eight thousand hours of HVAC/R work, issue a temporary HVAC/R
mechanic II certificate; or
(d) If the applicant has accrued eight thousand hours or more of
HVAC/R work, issue a temporary HVAC/R mechanic III certificate.
(3) The temporary HVAC/R mechanic certificate issued under this
section shall clearly indicate on the document that it is temporary in
nature and contain the period for which it is valid.
(4) A person issued a temporary HVAC/R mechanic certificate shall
have that certificate in his or her possession when performing any
HVAC/R work and shall show the certificate to any authorized
representative of the department upon request.
(5) A person issued a temporary HVAC/R mechanic certificate under
this section may only perform the scope of work authorized under
section 6 of this act for the equivalent HVAC/R mechanic certificate
and may not supervise any person with a trainee certificate issued
under this chapter.
(6) A temporary HVAC/R mechanic certificate issued under this
section shall be valid for ninety days from the date the department
issues a certificate or until the date the department furnishes to the
applicant the results of their examination for the equivalent HVAC/R
mechanic certificate, whichever is later. The applicant must take the
examination provided under this chapter for the equivalent HVAC/R
mechanic certificate within the ninety-day period granted under this
subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 TRAINEE CERTIFICATE. (1) A person may, in
a form and manner prescribed by the department, apply for a trainee
certificate to perform HVAC/R work in the state.
(2) Upon receipt of the application, the department shall issue a
trainee certificate to the applicant.
(3) The HVAC/R work performed under a trainee certificate issued
pursuant to this section must be:
(a) Within the scope of work authorized under that certificate;
(b) On the same job site and under the direction of an
appropriately certified HVAC/R mechanic or an appropriately certified
specialty mechanic; and
(c) Under the applicable supervision ratios required in section 16
of this act.
(4) A trainee shall have his or her certificate in his or her
possession when performing any HVAC/R work and shall show the
certificate to any authorized representative of the department upon
request.
(5) A trainee certificate shall be valid for a maximum of two years
from the date of issuance. The certificate shall include the
expiration date.
(6) The department may only renew a training certificate when the
trainee provides the department with:
(a) An accurate list of the persons who employed the trainee in
HVAC/R work for the previous two-year period and the number of hours of
HVAC/R work performed under each employer; and
(b) Evidence that the trainee has met the continuing education
requirements in section 18 of this act.
(7) If a person applies for a trainee certificate under this
section and electrical trainee status under chapter 19.28 RCW, the
department shall create, on or before July 1, 2011, a single document
for that person that represents this concurrent trainee status.
(8) A trainee who has not successfully passed any portion of the
examinations provided for in section 12 of this act is prohibited from
performing HVAC/R work in excess of two thousand hours beyond the
amount of hours required to become eligible under the requirements of
section 13(2)(c) of this act to take the examination for an HVAC/R
mechanic III certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 HVAC/R OPERATOR CERTIFICATION. (1) An
HVAC/R operating engineer may, in a form and manner prescribed by the
department, apply for an HVAC/R operator certificate. For the purposes
of this subsection, "HVAC/R operating engineer" means a full-time
employee who spends a substantial portion of time in the maintenance
and operation of HVAC/R equipment and systems in a building, or portion
thereof, used for occupant comfort, manufacturing, processing, or
storage of materials or products including, but not limited to,
chemicals, food, candy, and ice cream factories, ice-making plants,
meat packing plants, refineries, perishable food warehouses, hotels,
hospitals, restaurants, and similar occupancies and equipped with a
refrigeration system and whose duty it is to operate, maintain, and
keep safe and in serviceable condition all of the employer's HVAC/R
equipment and systems.
(2) The department may issue an HVAC/R operator certificate to an
applicant who has successfully passed the examination provided for in
subsection (8) of this section.
(3) The scope of work that may be performed by a person under an
HVAC/R operator certificate is as follows:
(a) Cleaning or replacing air filters, lubricating bearings,
replacing fan belts, cleaning evaporators or condensers, cleaning
cooling towers, or equipment logging on any HVAC/R equipment or
systems; or
(b) Performing minor HVAC/R equipment and systems repair and HVAC/R
work on sealed HVAC/R equipment and systems.
(4) A person who performs HVAC/R work on HVAC/R equipment or
systems that: (a) Contain six pounds or less of any refrigerant and is
actuated by a motor or engine having a standard rating of one-quarter
horsepower or less; or (b) are an absorption system that has a rating
of one-quarter ton or less refrigeration effect, is not required to
obtain a certificate under this section.
(5) Any person issued a valid refrigeration operating engineer
license by the city of Seattle shall be issued an HVAC/R operator
certificate without meeting any additional requirements.
(6) A person issued a valid HVAC/R operator certificate under this
section shall have his or her certificate in his or her possession when
performing any HVAC/R work and shall show the certificate to any
authorized representative of the department upon request.
(7) An HVAC/R operator certificate issued under this section shall
be valid for a maximum of three years and shall expire on the holder's
birthdate. The certificate shall include the expiration date.
(8) The department shall develop an examination that an applicant
must pass before they can be issued an HVAC/R operator certificate
under this section. The exam shall be comparable to the current
refrigeration operating engineer license test used by the city of
Seattle.
(9) The hours accrued as an HVAC/R operating engineer under this
section may accrue towards the hours required to be eligible to take an
examination for an HVAC/R mechanic certificate under section 13 of this
act only if the HVAC/R operating engineer is supervised by an
appropriately certified HVAC/R mechanic or appropriately supervised
specialty mechanic and was issued a trainee certificate under section
8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 HVAC/R MECHANIC CERTIFICATION WITHOUT
EXAMINATION. (1) From July 1, 2009, until June 30, 2010, a person who
has performed HVAC/R work may, in a form and manner prescribed by the
department, apply for an HVAC/R mechanic certificate without
examination. The application shall contain evidence of the person's
hours of HVAC/R work or other required information that is verifiable
by the department.
(2) Upon review of the application provided in subsection (1) of
this section, the department shall:
(a) If the applicant has, since January 1, 1988, accrued less than
two thousand hours of HVAC/R work, not issue any HVAC/R mechanic
certificate;
(b) If the applicant has, since January 1, 1988, accrued two
thousand hours or more, but less than four thousand hours of HVAC/R
work, issue an HVAC/R mechanic I certificate;
(c) If the applicant has, since January 1, 1988, accrued four
thousand hours or more, but less than eight thousand hours of HVAC/R
work, issue an HVAC/R mechanic II certificate; or
(d) If the applicant has, since January 1, 1988:
(i) Accrued eight thousand hours or more of HVAC/R work;
(ii) Completed an appropriately related apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW; or
(iii) Completed an appropriately related apprenticeship program in
another state or country equivalent to that provided in chapter 49.04
RCW, issue an HVAC/R mechanic III certificate.
(3) Once the appropriate level of HVAC/R mechanic certificate is
issued to a person under this section, that person shall become subject
to the other provisions of this chapter for any additional
certifications.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 SPECIALTY CERTIFICATION WITHOUT
EXAMINATION. (1) From July 1, 2009, until June 30, 2010, a person who
has performed HVAC/R work may, in a form and manner prescribed by the
department, apply for specialty certificates without examination. The
application shall contain evidence of the person's hours of HVAC/R work
or other required information that is verifiable by the department.
(2) Upon review of the application provided in subsection (1) of
this section, the department shall:
(a) If the applicant holds a valid journey refrigeration mechanic
license issued by the city of Seattle, issue a refrigeration specialty
mechanic III certificate and an HVAC specialty mechanic III
certificate;
(b) If the applicant has, since January 1, 1988, accrued one
thousand hours of gas piping work, issue a gas piping specialty
mechanic I/II certificate;
(c) If the applicant was licensed in any local jurisdiction to
perform gas piping work on a fuel burning appliance with a maximum
capacity of five hundred thousand BTUH or less, issue a gas piping
specialty mechanic I/II certificate; and
(d) If the applicant was licensed in any local jurisdiction to
perform all gas piping work on any fuel burning appliance, issue a gas
piping specialty mechanic III certificate.
(3) The specialty certificates provided for in subsection (2) of
this section shall be in addition to any HVAC/R mechanic certificate
issued by the department under section 10 of this act.
(4) Once the appropriate level of specialty certificate is issued
to a person under this section, that person shall become subject to the
other provisions of this chapter for any additional certifications.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 EXAMINATION. (1) The department, with
advice from the board, shall prepare three separate examinations for
the assessment of each level of HVAC/R mechanic certification created
in section 6 of this act. Within each examination, there shall be a
distinct portion that assesses the competency of the applicant in the
appropriate level of gas piping work, refrigeration work, and HVAC
work. The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.
(2) The examinations provided for under this section shall be
constructed to determine:
(a) Whether the applicant possesses general knowledge of the
technical information and practical procedures that are identified
within the relevant scope of work; and
(b) Whether the applicant is familiar with the applicable laws and
administrative rules of the department pertaining to the relevant scope
of work.
(3) The department, with advice from the board, may enter into a
contract with a professional testing agency to develop, administer, and
score the examinations provided for in this section.
(4) The department must administer, at least four times annually,
each examination provided under this section to applicants who are
eligible for examination under this chapter.
(5) The department must certify the results of each examination
administered under this section upon the terms and after such a period
of time as the department, with the advice of the board, deems
necessary and proper.
(6) A person may be given the appropriate level of examination they
are eligible to take as many times as necessary without limit.
(7) The department, with the advice of the board, may adopt
policies and procedures to make examinations available in alternative
languages or formats to accommodate all applicants who are eligible for
examination under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 APPLICATION FOR EXAMINATION--ELIGIBILITY.
(1) A person with a valid temporary HVAC/R mechanic certificate or
trainee certificate may, in a form and manner prescribed by the
department, apply for any of the examinations provided for in section
12 of this act. The application shall contain evidence of the person's
hours of HVAC/R work or other required information that is verifiable
by the department.
(2) Upon receipt of an application for examination under this
section, the department shall review the application and determine
whether the applicant is eligible to take an examination for an HVAC/R
mechanic certificate using the following criteria:
(a) HVAC/R mechanic I certificate. To be eligible to take the
examination for an HVAC/R mechanic I certificate, the applicant must
have:
(i) Performed a minimum of one thousand hours of HVAC/R work and
the entire amount of those hours must be supervised;
(ii) Performed two thousand hours of HVAC/R work and seventy-five
percent of those hours must be supervised; or
(iii) Successfully completed an appropriately related
apprenticeship program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW that meets the
requirements of this level of certification.
(b) HVAC/R mechanic II certificate. To be eligible to take the
examination for an HVAC/R mechanic II certificate, the applicant must
have:
(i) Performed a minimum of four thousand hours of HVAC/R work and
seventy-five percent of those hours must be supervised; or
(ii) Successfully completed an appropriately related apprenticeship
program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW that meets the requirements of
this level of certification.
(c) HVAC/R mechanic III certificate. To be eligible to take the
examination for an HVAC/R mechanic III certificate, the applicant must
have:
(i) Performed under appropriate supervision levels the amount of
HVAC/R work required for an HVAC/R mechanic II certificate under (b)(i)
of this subsection plus an additional two thousand hours and the entire
amount of the additional hours required under this subsection must be
supervised;
(ii) Performed HVAC/R work for a minimum of eight thousand hours
and seventy-five percent of those hours must be supervised; or
(iii) Successfully completed an appropriately related
apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04 RCW that meets the
requirements of this level of certification.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "supervised" means:
(a) A person has performed HVAC/R work on the same job site and
under the direction of an appropriately certified HVAC/R mechanic or an
appropriately certified specialty mechanic; and
(b) The appropriate supervision ratios required in section 16 of
this act were followed.
(4) If any of an applicant's certificates issued prior to the
current application have been revoked, the department may deny the
current application for up to two years.
(5) Upon determining that the applicant is eligible to take an
examination under this section, the department shall so notify the
applicant, indicating the time and place for taking the examination.
(6) Work hours being accrued by an applicant as hours of HVAC/R
work under this chapter or towards electrical certification under
chapter 19.28 RCW may be credited for both the hours of HVAC/R work
required under this chapter and the hours of work required under
chapter 19.28 RCW.
(7) If an applicant is eligible for an examination under this
section and an examination under chapter 19.28 RCW, the department may
administer all such examinations at the same examination session.
However, upon request of the applicant, the department may administer
each examination at the time required in statute or rule for each
examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 ALTERNATIVES TO WORK EXPERIENCE. (1) A
person who has applied for an examination under section 13 of this act
and who has successfully completed a board-approved program in HVAC/R
work at a technical college, may substitute technical college program
hours for hours of HVAC/R work as follows:

Type of Certificate Substitution for Hours of HVAC/R Work

(a) HVAC/R Mechanic I Up to 1,000 hours of technical college program may be
substituted for up to 1,000 hours of HVAC/R work.

(b) HVAC/R Mechanic II Up to 2,000 hours of technical college program may be
substituted for up to 2,000 hours of required HVAC/R
work.

(c) HVAC/R Mechanic III Up to 4,000 hours of technical college program may be
substituted for up to 4,000 hours of HVAC/R work.

(2) A person who has applied for an examination under section 13 of
this act and who has received training in HVAC/R work in the United
States armed forces may substitute those training hours for hours of
HVAC/R work subject to approval of the department.
(3) The department shall determine whether program hours accrued
under subsection (1) of this section or the training hours accrued
under subsection (2) of this section are in HVAC/R work and are
appropriate as a substitute for hours of HVAC/R work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 ISSUANCE OF CERTIFICATES FOLLOWING
EXAMINATION--RENEWAL. (1) If an applicant passes all portions of the
examination administered to him or her under this chapter, that person:
(a) Is entitled to be issued the appropriate level of HVAC/R
mechanic certificate; and
(b) Is subject to the other provisions of this chapter for
additional certifications.
(2) If an applicant fails to pass one or more portions of an
examination administered to him or her under this chapter, that person:
(a) Is still entitled to be issued the appropriate specialty
certificate for each portion of the examination that was passed; and
(b) Is subject to the other provisions of this chapter for
additional certifications.
(3) An HVAC/R mechanic certificate or specialty certificates issued
under this section shall be valid for a maximum of three years and
shall expire on the holder's birthdate. All certificates shall include
the expiration date.
(4) A person issued an HVAC/R mechanic certificate or specialty
certificates under this section may only perform the scope of work
authorized under sections 5 and 6 of this act for those certificates.
(5) A person issued an HVAC/R mechanic certificate or specialty
certificates shall have those certificates in his or her possession
when performing any HVAC/R work and shall show the certificates to any
authorized representative of the department upon request.
(6) The department shall renew an HVAC/R mechanic certificate or
specialty certificates issued under this section if the person issued
the certificates:
(a) Applies for renewal of his or her certificates not more than
ninety days after the certificates expire; and
(b) Has complied with the continuing education requirement in
section 18 of this act.
(7) The department may not renew a certificate that has been
revoked or suspended.
(8) The department may deny renewal of a certificate if the person
seeking renewal owes outstanding penalties for a final judgment under
this chapter.
(9) The department shall, on or before July 1, 2011, create a
single document and establish a single expiration date for a person who
holds two or more certificates or specialty certificates under chapter
18.106 RCW, chapter 19.28 RCW, and this chapter. The document shall
list all of the person's certificates and specialty certificates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 SUPERVISION RATIOS--SUPERVISION. (1) The
ratio of trainees to appropriately certified HVAC/R mechanics or
appropriately certified specialty mechanics on the same job site must
not be greater than:
(a) For trainees not in a technical college program, two trainees
to each appropriately certified HVAC/R mechanic or appropriately
certified specialty mechanic; or
(b) For trainees in a technical college program, four trainees to
each appropriately certified HVAC/R mechanic or appropriately certified
specialty mechanic.
(2) When the ratio of trainees to appropriately certified HVAC/R
mechanics or appropriately certified specialty mechanics on a job site
is one appropriately certified HVAC/R mechanic or appropriately
certified specialty mechanic to one or two trainees, the appropriately
certified HVAC/R mechanic or appropriately certified specialty mechanic
must be on the same job site as the trainees for a minimum of seventy-
five percent of each working day.
(3) When the ratio of trainees to appropriately certified HVAC/R
mechanics or appropriately certified specialty mechanics on a job site
is one appropriately certified HVAC/R mechanic or appropriately
certified specialty mechanic to three or four trainees, the
appropriately certified HVAC/R mechanic or appropriately certified
specialty mechanic must:
(a) Directly supervise and instruct the trainees and may not
directly make or engage in HVAC/R work; and
(b) Be on the same job site as the trainees for one hundred percent
of each working day.
(4) Hours of HVAC/R work that are performed when the supervision
ratios are not in compliance with this section do not qualify as
supervised hours when accruing hours of HVAC/R work under this chapter.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a person:
(a) Who has successfully completed, or is currently enrolled in, an
approved appropriately related apprenticeship program or an HVAC/R
program at a technical college may perform, unsupervised, the remaining
six months of the experience requirements of this chapter;
(b) Determined to be eligible for examination under section
13(2)(a)(i) of this act and who passes all portions of that
examination, may perform, unsupervised, the remaining one thousand
hours of HVAC/R work required under this chapter for an HVAC/R mechanic
I certificate. However, all HVAC/R work performed by this person must
be within the scope of work for an HVAC/R mechanic I certificate and
this person may not supervise other trainees until they have completed
the full two thousand hours of HVAC/R work required by this chapter;
(c) Determined to be eligible for examination under section
13(2)(c)(i) of this act and who passes all portions of that
examination, may perform, unsupervised, the remaining two thousand
hours of HVAC/R work required under this chapter for an HVAC/R mechanic
III certificate. However, all HVAC/R work performed by this person
must be within the scope of work for an HVAC/R mechanic III certificate
and this person may not supervise other trainees until they have
completed the full eight thousand hours of HVAC/R work required by this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 CONTRACTOR REPORTING--AUDIT OF RECORDS.
(1) Every person who employs a trainee performing HVAC/R work shall
report to the department:
(a) The names and certificate numbers of any trainee who performed
HVAC/R work for them and the hours of HVAC/R work performed by each
trainee; and
(b) The names and certificate numbers of the appropriately
certified HVAC/R mechanics or appropriately certified specialty
mechanics who supervised the trainees identified in (a) of this
subsection.
(2) Every person who reported hours of HVAC/R work performed by
trainees under subsection (1) of this section shall attest that all of
the reported hours of HVAC/R work performed by trainees was in
compliance with the supervision ratio requirements in section 16 of
this act.
(3) The department may audit the records of a person who reported
hours of HVAC/R work performed by trainees under subsection (1) of this
section in the following circumstances: (a) Excessive hours were
reported; (b) hours were reported outside the normal course of the
HVAC/R contractor's business; (c) the type of hours reported do not
reasonably match the type of permits purchased; or (d) for other
similar circumstances in which the department demonstrates a likelihood
of excessive hours being reported. The department shall limit the audit
to records necessary to verify hours.
(4) Information obtained by the department from any person under
this section is confidential and exempt from public disclosure under
chapter 42.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 CONTINUING EDUCATION. (1) A person issued
an HVAC/R mechanic certificate or any specialty certificates under this
chapter must, prior to the renewal date on their certificate,
demonstrate satisfactory completion of twenty-four hours of continuing
education.
(2) The department, with the advice of the board, shall determine
the contents of the continuing education courses required in subsection
(1) of this section and establish the requirements for satisfactory
completion of such courses. If the department determines that a
continuing education course offered in another state is comparable to
courses offered in Washington, the department shall accept proof of
satisfactory completion of the out-of-state course as meeting the
continuing education requirement in this section.
(3) A trainee must, prior to the renewal date on their certificate,
demonstrate satisfactory completion of sixty hours of related
supplemental instruction or equivalent training courses, or courses
taken as part of an appropriately related apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW.
(4) The department, with the advice of the board, shall determine
the contents of the related supplemental instruction or equivalent
training courses, or courses taken as part of an appropriately related
apprenticeship program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW required under
subsection (3) of this section, and establish the requirements for
satisfactory completion of such courses.
(5) All hours required under this section shall be accrued
concurrently and shall not exceed sixty hours for any person in any
certificate renewal period.
(6) Hours of approved continuing education required under this
section and hours of approved continuing education required under
chapter 19.28 RCW may be accrued concurrently. However, nothing in
this subsection shall be construed to relieve any person from having to
complete any continuing education mandated by the department by rule
pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to chapter 19.28 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 RECIPROCITY. The department may enter into
a reciprocity agreement with another state whose certification
requirements are equal to the standards set under this chapter. The
reciprocity agreement shall provide for the acceptance of Washington
and the other state's certification program or its equivalent by
Washington and the other state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 SUSPENSION AND REVOCATION. (1) The
department may revoke any certificate issued under this chapter if the
department determines that the recipient: (a) Obtained the certificate
through error or fraud; (b) is incompetent to perform HVAC/R work; or
(c) committed a violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this
chapter that presents imminent danger to the public.
(2) The department shall immediately suspend the certificates of
any person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the
department of social and health services as a person who is not in
compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet
all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension,
reissuance of the certificate shall be automatic upon the department's
receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 APPLICATION OF ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE
ACT. The proceedings for denying applications, suspending or revoking
certificates, and imposing civil penalties or other remedies issued
pursuant to this chapter and any appeal from those proceedings or
review of those proceedings shall be governed by the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 LIABILITY. (1) This chapter may not be
construed to relieve from or lessen the responsibility or liability of
any person for injury or damage to person or property caused by or
resulting from any HVAC/R work performed by the person.
(2) The state of Washington and its officers, agents, and
employees may not be held liable for any acts performed pursuant to
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 HVAC/R BOARD. (1) An HVAC/R board is
established.
(2) The board shall consist of thirteen members to be appointed by
the governor with the advice of the director.
(a) Four members shall be certified HVAC/R mechanics, of which at
least one, but not more than two, shall be a certified HVAC/R mechanic
performing HVAC/R work east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.
(b) Four members shall be HVAC/R contractors, of which at least
one, but not more than two, shall be an HVAC/R contractor doing
business east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.
(c) One member shall be from the general public and be familiar
with HVAC/R work.
(d) One member shall be a building operator representing the
commercial property management industry.
(e) One member shall be from the stationary operating engineers.
(f) One member shall be from a technical college or an approved
apprenticeship training program.
(g) One member shall be a building official familiar with
enforcement of HVAC/R work.
(3) Except as provided in this subsection, the term of each member
shall be three years. The term of each initial member shall expire as
follows: (a) The terms of the first certified HVAC/R mechanic and the
first HVAC/R contractor shall expire July 1, 2009; (b) the terms of the
second certified HVAC/R mechanic, the second HVAC/R contractor, and the
public member shall expire July 1, 2010; and (c) the terms of the third
certified HVAC/R mechanic and the third certified HVAC/R contractor
shall expire July 1, 2011. To ensure that the board may continue to
act, a member whose term expires shall continue to serve until his or
her replacement is appointed. In the case of any vacancy on the board
for any reason, the governor shall appoint a new member to serve out
the term of the person whose position has become vacant.
(4) The board shall, at its first meeting, elect one of its members
to serve as chair.
(5) The board shall meet at least quarterly in accordance with a
schedule established by the board.
(6) The board shall:
(a) Conduct proceedings for denying applications, suspending or
revoking certificates, and imposing civil penalties or other remedies.
Such proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW;
(b) Review and make recommendations to adopt, amend, or repeal any
rules under this chapter. The director may not adopt, amend, or repeal
any rules until the board has conducted its review and made its
recommendations;
(c) Establish an alternative method or methods for persons to
attest for hours of HVAC/R work when applying for certificates under
this chapter, but only when all traditional methods allowing for
verification of hours of HVAC/R work have been exhausted;
(d) Approve expenditures from the plumbing and HVAC/R certificate
fund; and
(e) Advise the department on all other matters relative to this
chapter.
(7) The members of the board are entitled to be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 ADMINISTRATION. (1) The director may adopt
rules necessary for the administration of this chapter.
(2) The department shall administer this chapter in conjunction
with its administration of chapter 18.106 RCW.
(3) In the administration of this chapter, the department shall not
enter any controversy arising over work assignments with respect to the
trades involved in the construction industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 EFFECT ON OTHER LAWS. With the exception
of sections 2(3), 8(7), 13 (6) and (7), 15(9), and 18(6) of this act,
nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:
(1) Modify, amend, or supersede chapter 18.106 or 19.28 RCW;
(2) Prohibit or restrict an individual who is certified under
chapter 18.106 or 19.28 RCW from engaging in the trade in which he or
she is certified; or
(3) Regulate or include plumbing work defined in chapter 18.106 RCW
and its applicable rules or electrical work defined in chapter 19.28
RCW and its applicable rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 COMPLIANCE AGENTS. (1) The director shall
appoint compliance agents to investigate alleged or apparent violations
of this chapter. The director, or authorized compliance agent, upon
presentation of appropriate credentials, may inspect and investigate
job sites at which an HVAC/R contractor had bid or presently is working
to determine whether the HVAC/R contractor is registered and their
employees are certified and working in accordance with this chapter or
the rules adopted under this chapter or whether there is a violation of
this chapter. Upon request of the compliance agent, an HVAC/R
contractor or an employee of the HVAC/R contractor shall provide
information identifying the HVAC/R contractor and those employees
working on-site.
(2) If the employee of an unregistered HVAC/R contractor is cited
by a compliance agent, that employee is cited as the agent of the
employer, and issuance of the infraction to the employee is notice to
the unregistered HVAC/R contractor that the contractor is in violation
of this chapter. An employee who is cited by a compliance agent shall
not be liable for any of the alleged violations contained in the
citation unless the employee is also the unregistered HVAC/R contractor
or the employee is performing HVAC/R work that requires a certification
under this chapter without proper proof of the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 NOTICE OF INFRACTION. The department may
issue a notice of infraction if the department reasonably believes that
a person has committed an infraction under this chapter. A notice of
infraction issued under this section shall be personally served on the
person named in the notice by the department's compliance agents or
service can be made by certified mail directed to the person named in
the notice of infraction at the last known address as provided to the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 NOTICE OF INFRACTION FORM. The form of the
notice of infraction issued under this chapter shall include the
following:
(1) A statement that the notice represents a determination that the
infraction has been committed by the person named in the notice and
that the determination shall be final unless contested as provided in
this chapter;
(2) A statement that the infraction is a noncriminal offense for
which imprisonment shall not be imposed as a sanction;
(3) A statement of the violation that necessitated issuance of the
infraction;
(4) A statement of penalty involved if the infraction is
established;
(5) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for
responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options;
(6) A statement that at any hearing to contest the notice of
infraction the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of
the evidence, that the infraction was committed; and that the person
may subpoena witnesses, including the compliance agent of the
department who issued and served the notice of infraction;
(7) A statement that, at any hearing to contest the notice of
infraction against a person who is not properly registered or certified
as required under this chapter, the person given the infraction has the
burden of proving that the infraction did not occur;
(8) A statement that the person named on the notice of infraction
must respond to the notice in one of the ways provided in this chapter;
and
(9) A statement that the person's failure to timely select one of
the options for responding to the notice of infraction after receiving
a statement of the options provided in this chapter for responding to
the notice of infraction and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and may be punished by a fine
or imprisonment in jail.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 VIOLATIONS. A violation designated as an
infraction under this chapter shall be heard and determined by an
administrative law judge of the office of administrative hearings. If
a person desires to contest the notice of infraction, the person shall
file a notice of appeal with the department specifying the grounds of
the appeal within twenty days of service of the infraction in a manner
provided by this chapter. The administrative law judge shall conduct
hearings in these cases at locations in the county where the infraction
occurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 RESPONSE TO NOTICE OF INFRACTION. (1) A
person who is issued a notice of infraction shall respond within twenty
days of the date of issuance of the notice of infraction.
(2) If the person named in the notice of infraction does not elect
to contest the notice of infraction, then the person shall pay to the
department, by check or money order, the amount of the penalty
prescribed for the infraction. When a response that does not contest
the notice of infraction is received by the department with the
appropriate penalty, the department shall make the appropriate entry in
its records.
(3) If the person named in the notice of infraction elects to
contest the notice of infraction, the person shall respond by filing
with the department specifying the appeal to the department in the
manner specified in this chapter.
(4) If any person issued a notice of infraction fails to respond
within the prescribed response period, the person shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and prosecuted in the county where the infraction occurred.
(5) After final determination by an administrative law judge that
an infraction has been committed, a person who fails to pay a monetary
penalty within thirty days, that is not waived pursuant to this
chapter, and who fails to file an appeal shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and be prosecuted in the county where the infraction
occurred.
(6) A person who fails to pay a monetary penalty within thirty days
after exhausting appellate remedies shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
and be prosecuted in the county where the infraction occurred.
(7) If a person who is issued a notice of infraction is a person
who has failed to register or be certified as required under this
chapter, the person is subject to a monetary penalty per infraction as
provided in the schedule of penalties established by the department,
and each day the person works without becoming registered or certified
is a separate infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 30 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are
not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 EFFECTIVE DATE. This act takes effect July
1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---