BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2006 c 139 s 5, 2006 c 124 s 1, 2006 c
122 s 7, 2006 c 73 s 5, and 2005 c 436 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670,
9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or 9.94A.545, served in the
community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and
activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department
shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and
modify conditions of community custody, in addition to those imposed by
the court, based upon the risk to community safety.
(6) "Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period
of community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW
9.94A.715, as established by the commission or the legislature under
RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.
(7) "Community placement" means that period during which the
offender is subject to the conditions of community custody and/or
postrelease supervision, which begins either upon completion of the
term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release.
Community placement may consist of entirely community custody, entirely
postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.
(8) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight hundred
eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private
school.
(9) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(10) "Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other
sentence conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW
16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the court finds that any offender has
a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense, the
conditions of supervision may, subject to available resources, include
treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state
supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be
considered the same as probation by other states.
(11) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(12) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(13) "Crime against persons" means any of the following felonies or
a felony attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit any of the
following felonies:
(a) Aggravated first degree murder;
(b) Arson in the first degree;
(c) Assault in the first degree;
(d) Assault in the second degree;
(e) Assault in the third degree;
(f) Assault of a child in the first degree;
(g) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(h) Assault of a child in the third degree;
(i) Bomb threat (if against a person);
(j) Burglary in the first degree;
(k) Child molestation in the first degree;
(l) Child molestation in the second degree;
(m) Child molestation in the third degree;
(n) Communicating with a minor for immoral purposes;
(o) Counterfeiting (if a violation of RCW 9.16.035(4));
(p) Custodial assault;
(q) Domestic violence court order violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220, 26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or
74.34.145);
(r) Extortion in the first degree;
(s) Extortion in the second degree;
(t) Incest in the first degree;
(u) Incest in the second degree;
(v) Identity theft in the first degree;
(w) Identity theft in the second degree;
(x) Indecent liberties;
(y) Intimidating a juror;
(z) Intimidating a public servant;
(aa) Intimidating a witness;
(bb) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(cc) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(dd) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(ee) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(ff) Murder in the first degree;
(gg) Murder in the second degree;
(hh) Promoting a suicide attempt;
(ii) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(jj) Rape in the first degree;
(kk) Rape in the second degree;
(ll) Rape in the third degree;
(mm) Rape of a child in the first degree;
(nn) Rape of a child in the second degree;
(oo) Rape of a child in the third degree;
(pp) Riot (against a person);
(qq) Robbery in the first degree;
(rr) Robbery in the second degree;
(ss) Stalking;
(tt) Unlawful imprisonment;
(uu) Vehicular assault; or
(vv) Vehicular homicide.
(14) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(((14))) (15) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's
prior convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(((15))) (16) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing
court that equals the difference between the offender's net daily
income and the reasonable obligations that the offender has for the
support of the offender and any dependents.
(((16))) (17) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced
supervision designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and
compliance with sentence conditions, and in which the offender is
required to report daily to a specific location designated by the
department or the sentencing court.
(((17))) (18) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(((18))) (19) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states
with exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community supervision, the
number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or
dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of
confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a
determinate sentence.
(((19))) (20) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings
of an offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(((20))) (21) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a
sentencing option available to persons convicted of a felony offense
other than a violent offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for
the option under RCW 9.94A.660.
(((21))) (22) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(((22))) (23) "Earned release" means earned release from
confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(((23))) (24) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(((24))) (25) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((25))) (26) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specific period of time.
(((26))) (27) "First-time offender" means any person who has no
prior convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time
offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(((27))) (28) "Home detention" means a program of partial
confinement available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in
a private residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(((28))) (29) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money
that is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for
legal financial obligations which may include restitution to the
victim, statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as
assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal
drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the
offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for
vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a),
legal financial obligations may also include payment to a public agency
of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting in
the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(((29))) (30) "Most serious offense" means any of the following
felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.
(((30))) (31) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a
violent offense.
(((31))) (32) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(((32))) (33) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more
than one year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home
detention or work crew has been ordered by the court, in an approved
residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the balance of
the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work
release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and
home detention.
(((33))) (34) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (((33))) (34)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(((34))) (35) "Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an
offender's community placement that is not community custody.
(((35))) (36) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime
was a stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the
perpetrator established or promoted a relationship with the victim
prior to the offense and the victimization of the victim was a
significant reason the perpetrator established or promoted the
relationship; or (c) the perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any public or private school
and the victim was a student of the school under his or her authority
or supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "school" does not
include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a
coach, trainer, volunteer, or other person in authority in any
recreational activity and the victim was a participant in the activity
under his or her authority or supervision; or (iii) a pastor, elder,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any church or religious
organization, and the victim was a member or participant of the
organization under his or her authority.
(((36))) (37) "Private school" means a school regulated under
chapter 28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.
(((37))) (38) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW
28A.150.010.
(((38))) (39) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered
by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(((39))) (40) "Risk assessment" means the application of an
objective instrument supported by research and adopted by the
department for the purpose of assessing an offender's risk of
reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of the harm done by the
offender, place and circumstances of the offender related to risk, the
offender's relationship to any victim, and any information provided to
the department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not
be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(((40))) (41) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an
attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((41))) (42) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent
offense and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((42))) (43) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(((11))) (12);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.080; or
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((43))) (44) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes
for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his
or her sexual gratification.
(((44))) (45) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing
court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(((45))) (46) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length
of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime
as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining
the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(((46))) (47) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the
offender twenty-four hours before the offense.
(((47))) (48) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the
physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized
under contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(((48))) (49) "Transition training" means written and verbal
instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender
during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of
the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include
instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the
offender's period of community custody.
(((49))) (50) "Victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or
property as a direct result of the crime charged.
(((50))) (51) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(((51))) (52) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement
consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community
that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(((52))) (53) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration
program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and
lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(((53))) (54) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.411 and 2006 c 271 s 1 and 2006 c 73 s 13 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Decision not to prosecute.
STANDARD: A prosecuting attorney may decline to prosecute, even
though technically sufficient evidence to prosecute exists, in
situations where prosecution would serve no public purpose, would
defeat the underlying purpose of the law in question or would result in
decreased respect for the law.
GUIDELINE/COMMENTARY:
Examples
The following are examples of reasons not to prosecute which could
satisfy the standard.
(a) Contrary to Legislative Intent - It may be proper to decline to
charge where the application of criminal sanctions would be clearly
contrary to the intent of the legislature in enacting the particular
statute.
(b) Antiquated Statute - It may be proper to decline to charge
where the statute in question is antiquated in that:
(i) It has not been enforced for many years; and
(ii) Most members of society act as if it were no longer in
existence; and
(iii) It serves no deterrent or protective purpose in today's
society; and
(iv) The statute has not been recently reconsidered by the
legislature.
This reason is not to be construed as the basis for declining cases
because the law in question is unpopular or because it is difficult to
enforce.
(c) De Minimis Violation - It may be proper to decline to charge
where the violation of law is only technical or insubstantial and where
no public interest or deterrent purpose would be served by prosecution.
(d) Confinement on Other Charges - It may be proper to decline to
charge because the accused has been sentenced on another charge to a
lengthy period of confinement; and
(i) Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional
direct or collateral punishment;
(ii) The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is
not particularly aggravated; and
(iii) Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant
deterrent purpose.
(e) Pending Conviction on Another Charge - It may be proper to
decline to charge because the accused is facing a pending prosecution
in the same or another county; and
(i) Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional
direct or collateral punishment;
(ii) Conviction in the pending prosecution is imminent;
(iii) The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is
not particularly aggravated; and
(iv) Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant
deterrent purpose.
(f) High Disproportionate Cost of Prosecution - It may be proper to
decline to charge where the cost of locating or transporting, or the
burden on, prosecution witnesses is highly disproportionate to the
importance of prosecuting the offense in question. This reason should
be limited to minor cases and should not be relied upon in serious
cases.
(g) Improper Motives of Complainant - It may be proper to decline
charges because the motives of the complainant are improper and
prosecution would serve no public purpose, would defeat the underlying
purpose of the law in question or would result in decreased respect for
the law.
(h) Immunity - It may be proper to decline to charge where immunity
is to be given to an accused in order to prosecute another where the
accused's information or testimony will reasonably lead to the
conviction of others who are responsible for more serious criminal
conduct or who represent a greater danger to the public interest.
(i) Victim Request - It may be proper to decline to charge because
the victim requests that no criminal charges be filed and the case
involves the following crimes or situations:
(i) Assault cases where the victim has suffered little or no
injury;
(ii) Crimes against property, not involving violence, where no
major loss was suffered;
(iii) Where doing so would not jeopardize the safety of society.
Care should be taken to insure that the victim's request is freely
made and is not the product of threats or pressure by the accused.
The presence of these factors may also justify the decision to
dismiss a prosecution which has been commenced.
Notification
The prosecutor is encouraged to notify the victim, when practical,
and the law enforcement personnel, of the decision not to prosecute.
(2) Decision to prosecute.
(a) STANDARD:
Crimes against persons will be filed if sufficient admissible
evidence exists, which, when considered with the most plausible,
reasonably foreseeable defense that could be raised under the evidence,
would justify conviction by a reasonable and objective fact-finder.
With regard to offenses prohibited by RCW 9A.44.040, 9A.44.050,
9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.089, and
9A.64.020 the prosecutor should avoid prefiling agreements or
diversions intended to place the accused in a program of treatment or
counseling, so that treatment, if determined to be beneficial, can be
provided pursuant to RCW 9.94A.670.
Crimes against property/other crimes will be filed if the
admissible evidence is of such convincing force as to make it probable
that a reasonable and objective fact-finder would convict after hearing
all the admissible evidence and the most plausible defense that could
be raised.
See table below for the crimes within these categories.

CATEGORIZATION OF CRIMES FOR PROSECUTING STANDARDS

CRIMES ((AGAINST)) AFFECTING PERSONS
Aggravated Murder
1st Degree Murder
2nd Degree Murder
1st Degree Manslaughter
2nd Degree Manslaughter
1st Degree Kidnapping
2nd Degree Kidnapping
1st Degree Assault
2nd Degree Assault
3rd Degree Assault
1st Degree Assault of a Child
2nd Degree Assault of a Child
3rd Degree Assault of a Child
1st Degree Rape
2nd Degree Rape
3rd Degree Rape
1st Degree Rape of a Child
2nd Degree Rape of a Child
3rd Degree Rape of a Child
1st Degree Robbery
2nd Degree Robbery
1st Degree Arson
1st Degree Burglary
1st Degree Identity Theft
2nd Degree Identity Theft
1st Degree Extortion
2nd Degree Extortion
Indecent Liberties
Incest
Vehicular Homicide
Vehicular Assault
1st Degree Child Molestation
2nd Degree Child Molestation
3rd Degree Child Molestation
1st Degree Promoting Prostitution
Intimidating a Juror
Communication with a Minor
Intimidating a Witness
Intimidating a Public Servant
Bomb Threat (if against person)
Unlawful Imprisonment
Promoting a Suicide Attempt
Riot (if against person)
Stalking
Custodial Assault
Domestic Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050,
26.09.300, 26.10.220, 26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)
Counterfeiting (if a violation of RCW 9.16.035(4))
Felony Driving a Motor Vehicle While Under the Influence of
Intoxicating Liquor or Any Drug (RCW 46.61.502(6))
Felony Physical Control of a Motor Vehicle While Under the
Influence of Intoxicating Liquor or Any Drug (RCW 46.61.504(6))

CRIMES AGAINST PROPERTY/OTHER CRIMES
2nd Degree Arson
1st Degree Escape
2nd Degree Escape
2nd Degree Burglary
1st Degree Theft
2nd Degree Theft
1st Degree Perjury
2nd Degree Perjury
1st Degree Introducing Contraband
2nd Degree Introducing Contraband
1st Degree Possession of Stolen Property
2nd Degree Possession of Stolen Property
Bribery
Bribing a Witness
Bribe received by a Witness
Bomb Threat (if against property)
1st Degree Malicious Mischief
2nd Degree Malicious Mischief
1st Degree Reckless Burning
Taking a Motor Vehicle without Authorization
Forgery
2nd Degree Promoting Prostitution
Tampering with a Witness
Trading in Public Office
Trading in Special Influence
Receiving/Granting Unlawful Compensation
Bigamy
Eluding a Pursuing Police Vehicle
Willful Failure to Return from Furlough
Escape from Community Custody
Riot (if against property)
1st Degree Theft of Livestock
2nd Degree Theft of Livestock

ALL OTHER UNCLASSIFIED FELONIES
Selection of Charges/Degree of Charge
(i) The prosecutor should file charges which adequately describe
the nature of defendant's conduct. Other offenses may be charged only
if they are necessary to ensure that the charges:
(A) Will significantly enhance the strength of the state's case at
trial; or
(B) Will result in restitution to all victims.
(ii) The prosecutor should not overcharge to obtain a guilty plea.
Overcharging includes:
(A) Charging a higher degree;
(B) Charging additional counts.
This standard is intended to direct prosecutors to charge those
crimes which demonstrate the nature and seriousness of a defendant's
criminal conduct, but to decline to charge crimes which are not
necessary to such an indication. Crimes which do not merge as a matter
of law, but which arise from the same course of conduct, do not all
have to be charged.

(b) GUIDELINES/COMMENTARY:
(i) Police Investigation
A prosecuting attorney is dependent upon law enforcement agencies
to conduct the necessary factual investigation which must precede the
decision to prosecute. The prosecuting attorney shall ensure that a
thorough factual investigation has been conducted before a decision to
prosecute is made. In ordinary circumstances the investigation should
include the following:
(A) The interviewing of all material witnesses, together with the
obtaining of written statements whenever possible;
(B) The completion of necessary laboratory tests; and
(C) The obtaining, in accordance with constitutional requirements,
of the suspect's version of the events.
If the initial investigation is incomplete, a prosecuting attorney
should insist upon further investigation before a decision to prosecute
is made, and specify what the investigation needs to include.
(ii) Exceptions
In certain situations, a prosecuting attorney may authorize filing
of a criminal complaint before the investigation is complete if:
(A) Probable cause exists to believe the suspect is guilty; and
(B) The suspect presents a danger to the community or is likely to
flee if not apprehended; or
(C) The arrest of the suspect is necessary to complete the
investigation of the crime.
In the event that the exception to the standard is applied, the
prosecuting attorney shall obtain a commitment from the law enforcement
agency involved to complete the investigation in a timely manner. If
the subsequent investigation does not produce sufficient evidence to
meet the normal charging standard, the complaint should be dismissed.
(iii) Investigation Techniques
The prosecutor should be fully advised of the investigatory
techniques that were used in the case investigation including:
(A) Polygraph testing;
(B) Hypnosis;
(C) Electronic surveillance;
(D) Use of informants.
(iv) Pre-Filing Discussions with Defendant
Discussions with the defendant or his/her representative regarding
the selection or disposition of charges may occur prior to the filing
of charges, and potential agreements can be reached.
(v) Pre-Filing Discussions with Victim(s)
Discussions with the victim(s) or victims' representatives
regarding the selection or disposition of charges may occur before the
filing of charges. The discussions may be considered by the prosecutor
in charging and disposition decisions, and should be considered before
reaching any agreement with the defendant regarding these decisions.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.421 and 1995 c 288 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The prosecutor and the attorney for the defendant, or the defendant
when acting pro se, may engage in discussions with a view toward
reaching an agreement that, upon the entering of a plea to a charged
offense or to a lesser or related offense, the prosecutor will do any
of the following:
(1) Move for dismissal of other charges or counts;
(2) Recommend a particular sentence within the sentence range
applicable to the offense or offenses to which the offender pled
guilty;
(3) Recommend a particular sentence outside of the sentence range;
(4) Agree to file a particular charge or count;
(5) Agree not to file other charges or counts; or
(6) Make any other promise to the defendant, except that in no
instance may the prosecutor agree not to allege prior convictions.
In a case involving a crime ((against)) affecting persons as
defined in RCW 9.94A.411, the prosecutor shall make reasonable efforts
to inform the victim of the violent offense of the nature of and
reasons for the plea agreement, including all offenses the prosecutor
has agreed not to file, and ascertain any objections or comments the
victim has to the plea agreement.
The court shall not participate in any discussions under this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.431 and 1995 c 288 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a plea agreement has been reached by the prosecutor and the
defendant pursuant to RCW 9.94A.421, they shall at the time of the
defendant's plea state to the court, on the record, the nature of the
agreement and the reasons for the agreement. The prosecutor shall
inform the court on the record whether the victim or victims of all
crimes ((against)) affecting persons, as defined in RCW 9.94A.411,
covered by the plea agreement have expressed any objections to or
comments on the nature of and reasons for the plea agreement. The
court, at the time of the plea, shall determine if the agreement is
consistent with the interests of justice and with the prosecuting
standards. If the court determines it is not consistent with the
interests of justice and with the prosecuting standards, the court
shall, on the record, inform the defendant and the prosecutor that they
are not bound by the agreement and that the defendant may withdraw the
defendant's plea of guilty, if one has been made, and enter a plea of
not guilty.
(2) The sentencing judge is not bound by any recommendations
contained in an allowed plea agreement and the defendant shall be so
informed at the time of plea.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.470 and 2002 c 290 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding the current placement or listing of crimes in
categories or classifications of prosecuting standards for deciding to
prosecute under RCW 9.94A.411(2), any and all felony crimes involving
any deadly weapon special verdict under RCW 9.94A.602, any deadly
weapon enhancements under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, and any
and all felony crimes as defined in RCW 9.94A.533 (3)(f) or (4)(f), or
both, which are excluded from the deadly weapon enhancements shall all
be treated as crimes against a person and subject to the prosecuting
standards for deciding to prosecute under RCW 9.94A.411(2) as crimes
((against)) affecting persons.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.501 and 2005 c 362 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the department performs a risk assessment pursuant to RCW
9.94A.500, or to determine a person's conditions of supervision, the
risk assessment shall classify the offender or a probationer sentenced
in superior court into one of at least four risk categories.
(2) The department shall supervise every offender sentenced to a
term of community custody, community placement, or community
supervision and every misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor probationer
ordered by a superior court to probation under the supervision of the
department pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210:
(a) Whose risk assessment places that offender or probationer in
one of the two highest risk categories; or
(b) Regardless of the offender's or probationer's risk category if:
(i) The offender's or probationer's current conviction is for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW ((9.94A.411))
9.94A.030;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(ii) The offender or probationer has a prior conviction for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW ((9.94A.411))
9.94A.030;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) The conditions of the offender's community custody, community
placement, or community supervision or the probationer's supervision
include chemical dependency treatment;
(iv) The offender was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650 or 9.94A.670;
or
(v) The offender is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW
9.94A.745.
(3) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any
offender sentenced to a term of community custody, community placement,
or community supervision or any probationer unless the offender or
probationer is one for whom supervision is required under subsection
(2) of this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2010.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.94A.545 and 2006 c 128 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.650 and in subsection (2) of
this section, on all sentences of confinement for one year or less, in
which the offender is convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, a
crime against ((a person under RCW 9.94A.411)) persons as defined in
RCW 9.94A.030, or felony violation of chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW or an
attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit such a crime, the court
may impose up to one year of community custody, subject to conditions
and sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.715 and 9.94A.720. An
offender shall be on community custody as of the date of sentencing.
However, during the time for which the offender is in total or partial
confinement pursuant to the sentence or a violation of the sentence,
the period of community custody shall toll.
(2) If the offender is guilty of failure to register under RCW
9A.44.130(((10))) (11)(a), the court shall impose a term of community
custody under RCW 9.94A.715.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.94A.640 and 2006 c 73 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every offender who has been discharged under RCW 9.94A.637 may
apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of the offender's record
of conviction. If the court finds the offender meets the tests
prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the court may clear the
record of conviction by: (a) Permitting the offender to withdraw the
offender's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty; or (b) if
the offender has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, by the
court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (c) by the court
dismissing the information or indictment against the offender.
(2) An offender may not have the record of conviction cleared if:
(a) There are any criminal charges against the offender pending in any
court of this state or another state, or in any federal court; (b) the
offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; (c) the
offense was a crime against children or other persons as defined in RCW
43.43.830; (d) the offender has been convicted of a new crime in this
state, another state, or federal court since the date of the offender's
discharge under RCW 9.94A.637; (e) the offense is a class B felony and
less than ten years have passed since the date the applicant was
discharged under RCW 9.94A.637; (f) the offense was a class C felony,
other than a class C felony described in RCW 46.61.502(6) or
46.61.504(6), and less than five years have passed since the date the
applicant was discharged under RCW 9.94A.637; or (g) the offense was a
class C felony described in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6) and less
than ten years have passed since the applicant was discharged under RCW
9.94A.637.
(3) Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection
(1) of this section, the fact that the offender has been convicted of
the offense shall not be included in the offender's criminal history
for purposes of determining a sentence in any subsequent conviction,
and the offender shall be released from all penalties and disabilities
resulting from the offense. For all purposes, including responding to
questions on employment applications, an offender whose conviction has
been vacated may state that the offender has never been convicted of
that crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use of an
offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.

Sec. 9 RCW 9.94A.715 and 2006 c 130 s 2 and 2006 c 128 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department for a sex offense not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, a
violent offense, any crime against persons ((under RCW 9.94A.411(2)))
as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, or a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or
69.52 RCW, committed on or after July 1, 2000, or when a court
sentences a person to a term of confinement of one year or less for a
violation of RCW 9A.44.130(((10))) (11)(a) committed on or after June
7, 2006, the court shall in addition to the other terms of the
sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for the community
custody range established under RCW 9.94A.850 or up to the period of
earned release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2), whichever
is longer. The community custody shall begin: (a) Upon completion of
the term of confinement; (b) at such time as the offender is
transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2); or (c) with regard to
offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660, upon failure to complete or
administrative termination from the special drug offender sentencing
alternative program. Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.501, the
department shall supervise any sentence of community custody imposed
under this section.
(2)(a) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions of
community custody shall include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4).
The conditions may also include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5).
The court may also order the offender to participate in rehabilitative
programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct reasonably related to
the circumstances of the offense, the offender's risk of reoffending,
or the safety of the community, and the department shall enforce such
conditions pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(b) As part of any sentence that includes a term of community
custody imposed under this subsection, the court shall also require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department under
RCW 9.94A.720. The department shall assess the offender's risk of
reoffense and may establish and modify additional conditions of the
offender's community custody based upon the risk to community safety.
In addition, the department may require the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and
to obey all laws. The department may impose electronic monitoring as
a condition of community custody for an offender sentenced to a term of
community custody under this section pursuant to a conviction for a sex
offense. Within the resources made available by the department for
this purpose, the department shall carry out any electronic monitoring
imposed under this section using the most appropriate technology given
the individual circumstances of the offender. As used in this section,
"electronic monitoring" means the monitoring of an offender using an
electronic offender tracking system including, but not limited to, a
system using radio frequency or active or passive global positioning
system technology.
(c) The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to
those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court
imposed conditions. The department shall notify the offender in
writing of any such conditions or modifications. In setting,
modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the
department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.
(3) If an offender violates conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to this section during community custody, the
department may transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement
status and impose other available sanctions as provided in RCW
9.94A.737 and 9.94A.740.
(4) Except for terms of community custody under RCW 9.94A.670, the
department shall discharge the offender from community custody on a
date determined by the department, which the department may modify,
based on risk and performance of the offender, within the range or at
the end of the period of earned release, whichever is later.
(5) At any time prior to the completion or termination of a sex
offender's term of community custody, if the court finds that public
safety would be enhanced, the court may impose and enforce an order
extending any or all of the conditions imposed pursuant to this section
for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for the crime as it
is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a condition
extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of
the sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.631 and may be punishable as
contempt of court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040. If the court
extends a condition beyond the expiration of the term of community
custody, the department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender's compliance with the condition.
(6) Within the funds available for community custody, the
department shall determine conditions and duration of community custody
on the basis of risk to community safety, and shall supervise offenders
during community custody on the basis of risk to community safety and
conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this subsection.
(7) By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of
a condition imposed or modified by the department, an offender may
request an administrative review under rules adopted by the department.
The condition shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds
that it is not reasonably related to any of the following: (a) The
crime of conviction; (b) the offender's risk of reoffending; or (c) the
safety of the community.

Sec. 10 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2007 c 483 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, the term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned release
time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by
the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency
shall not credit the offender with earned release credits in advance of
the offender actually earning the credits. Any program established
pursuant to this section shall allow an offender to earn early release
credits for presentence incarceration. If an offender is transferred
from a county jail to the department, the administrator of a county
jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time spent
in custody at the facility and the amount of earned release time. An
offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23,
1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good time credits
or earned release time for that portion of his or her sentence that
results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In the
case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex
offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 2003,
the aggregate earned release time may not exceed ten percent of the
sentence.
(b)(i) In the case of an offender who qualifies under (b)(ii) of
this subsection, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed fifty
percent of the sentence.
(ii) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time under this subsection (1)(b) if he or
she:
(A) Is classified in one of the two lowest risk categories under
(b)(iii) of this subsection;
(B) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW ((9.94A.411))
9.94A.030;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(C) Has no prior conviction for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW ((9.94A.411))
9.94A.030;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(D) Participates in programming or activities as directed by the
offender's individual reentry plan as provided under RCW 72.09.270 to
the extent that such programming or activities are made available by
the department; and
(E) Has not committed a new felony after July 22, 2007, while under
community supervision, community placement, or community custody.
(iii) For purposes of determining an offender's eligibility under
this subsection (1)(b), the department shall perform a risk assessment
of every offender committed to a correctional facility operated by the
department who has no current or prior conviction for a sex offense, a
violent offense, a crime against persons as defined in RCW
((9.94A.411)) 9.94A.030, a felony that is domestic violence as defined
in RCW 10.99.020, a violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary),
a violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to violate,
RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with intent to
deliver methamphetamine, or a violation of, or an attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a
controlled substance to a minor). The department must classify each
assessed offender in one of four risk categories between highest and
lowest risk.
(iv) The department shall recalculate the earned release time and
reschedule the expected release dates for each qualified offender under
this subsection (1)(b).
(v) This subsection (1)(b) applies retroactively to eligible
offenders serving terms of total confinement in a state correctional
facility as of July 1, 2003.
(vi) This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to offenders convicted
after July 1, 2010.
(c) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence;
(2)(a) A person convicted of a sex offense or an offense
categorized as a serious violent offense, assault in the second degree,
vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, assault of a child in the second
degree, any crime against persons where it is determined in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed before July 1, 2000, may become
eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the department, for
transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned release time
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(b) A person convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, any
crime against persons ((under RCW 9.94A.411(2))) as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, or a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW,
committed on or after July 1, 2000, may become eligible, in accordance
with a program developed by the department, for transfer to community
custody status in lieu of earned release time pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section;
(c) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community placement or community
custody terms eligible for release to community custody status in lieu
of earned release shall provide an approved residence and living
arrangement prior to release to the community;
(d) The department may deny transfer to community custody status in
lieu of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
if the department determines an offender's release plan, including
proposed residence location and living arrangements, may violate the
conditions of the sentence or conditions of supervision, place the
offender at risk to violate the conditions of the sentence, place the
offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk to victim safety or
community safety. The department's authority under this section is
independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence or statutory
provision regarding conditions for community custody or community
placement;
(e) If the department denies transfer to community custody status
in lieu of earned early release pursuant to (d) of this subsection, the
department may transfer an offender to partial confinement in lieu of
earned early release up to three months. The three months in partial
confinement is in addition to that portion of the offender's term of
confinement that may be served in partial confinement as provided in
this section;
(f) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(4)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section;
(3) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(4)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious enough to
require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is physically incapacitated due to age or the medical condition;
and
(iii) Granting the extraordinary medical placement will result in
a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the
monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time;
(5) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(6) No more than the final six months of the offender's term of
confinement may be served in partial confinement designed to aid the
offender in finding work and reestablishing himself or herself in the
community. This is in addition to that period of earned early release
time that may be exchanged for partial confinement pursuant to
subsection (2)(e) of this section;
(7) The governor may pardon any offender;
(8) The department may release an offender from confinement any
time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section; and
(9) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an offender
sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a
mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not be released
from total confinement before the completion of the listed mandatory
minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless allowed
under RCW 9.94A.540, however persistent offenders are not eligible for
extraordinary medical placement.

Sec. 11 RCW 10.77.092 and 2004 c 157 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of determining whether a court may authorize
involuntary medication for the purpose of competency restoration
pursuant to RCW 10.77.090, a pending charge involving any one or more
of the following crimes is a serious offense per se in the context of
competency restoration:
(a) Any violent offense, sex offense, serious traffic offense,
crimes against persons, and most serious offense, as those terms are
defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) ((Any offense, except nonfelony counterfeiting offenses,
included in crimes against persons in RCW 9.94A.411;
(c))) Any offense contained in chapter 9.41 RCW (firearms and
dangerous weapons);
(((d))) (c) Any offense listed as domestic violence in RCW
10.99.020;
(((e))) (d) Any offense listed as a harassment offense in chapter
9A.46 RCW;
(((f))) (e) Any violation of chapter 69.50 RCW that is a class B
felony; or
(((g))) (f) Any city or county ordinance or statute that is
equivalent to an offense referenced in this subsection.
(2)(a) In a particular case, a court may determine that a pending
charge not otherwise defined as serious by state or federal law or by
a city or county ordinance is, nevertheless, a serious offense within
the context of competency restoration treatment when the conduct in the
charged offense falls within the standards established in (b) of this
subsection.
(b) To determine that the particular case is a serious offense
within the context of competency restoration, the court must consider
the following factors and determine that one or more of the following
factors creates a situation in which the offense is serious:
(i) The charge includes an allegation that the defendant actually
inflicted bodily or emotional harm on another person or that the
defendant created a reasonable apprehension of bodily or emotional harm
to another;
(ii) The extent of the impact of the alleged offense on the basic
human need for security of the citizens within the jurisdiction;
(iii) The number and nature of related charges pending against the
defendant;
(iv) The length of potential confinement if the defendant is
convicted; and
(v) The number of potential and actual victims or persons impacted
by the defendant's alleged acts.

Sec. 12 RCW 10.97.050 and 2005 c 421 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Conviction records may be disseminated without restriction.
(2) Any criminal history record information which pertains to an
incident that occurred within the last twelve months for which a person
is currently being processed by the criminal justice system, including
the entire period of correctional supervision extending through final
discharge from parole, when applicable, may be disseminated without
restriction with the exception of a record being disseminated in
response to a request for a conviction record under RCW 43.43.832. A
request for a conviction record under RCW 43.43.832 shall not contain
information for a person who, within the last twelve months, is
currently being processed by the criminal justice system unless it
pertains to information relating to a crime against a person as defined
in RCW ((9.94A.411)) 9.94A.030.
(3) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated by a criminal justice agency to
another criminal justice agency for any purpose associated with the
administration of criminal justice, or in connection with the
employment of the subject of the record by a criminal justice or
juvenile justice agency. A criminal justice agency may respond to any
inquiry from another criminal justice agency without any obligation to
ascertain the purpose for which the information is to be used by the
agency making the inquiry.
(4) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated by a criminal justice agency to
implement a statute, ordinance, executive order, or a court rule,
decision, or order which expressly refers to records of arrest,
charges, or allegations of criminal conduct or other nonconviction data
and authorizes or directs that it be available or accessible for a
specific purpose.
(5) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated to individuals and agencies
pursuant to a contract with a criminal justice agency to provide
services related to the administration of criminal justice. Such
contract must specifically authorize access to criminal history record
information, but need not specifically state that access to
nonconviction data is included. The agreement must limit the use of
the criminal history record information to stated purposes and insure
the confidentiality and security of the information consistent with
state law and any applicable federal statutes and regulations.
(6) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated to individuals and agencies for
the express purpose of research, evaluative, or statistical activities
pursuant to an agreement with a criminal justice agency. Such
agreement must authorize the access to nonconviction data, limit the
use of that information which identifies specific individuals to
research, evaluative, or statistical purposes, and contain provisions
giving notice to the person or organization to which the records are
disseminated that the use of information obtained therefrom and further
dissemination of such information are subject to the provisions of this
chapter and applicable federal statutes and regulations, which shall be
cited with express reference to the penalties provided for a violation
thereof.
(7) Every criminal justice agency that maintains and disseminates
criminal history record information must maintain information
pertaining to every dissemination of criminal history record
information except a dissemination to the effect that the agency has no
record concerning an individual. Information pertaining to
disseminations shall include:
(a) An indication of to whom (agency or person) criminal history
record information was disseminated;
(b) The date on which the information was disseminated;
(c) The individual to whom the information relates; and
(d) A brief description of the information disseminated.
The information pertaining to dissemination required to be
maintained shall be retained for a period of not less than one year.
(8) In addition to the other provisions in this section allowing
dissemination of criminal history record information, RCW 4.24.550
governs dissemination of information concerning offenders who commit
sex offenses as defined by RCW 9.94A.030. Criminal justice agencies,
their employees, and officials shall be immune from civil liability for
dissemination on criminal history record information concerning sex
offenders as provided in RCW 4.24.550.

Sec. 13 RCW 13.40.070 and 2003 c 53 s 98 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Complaints referred to the juvenile court alleging the
commission of an offense shall be referred directly to the prosecutor.
The prosecutor, upon receipt of a complaint, shall screen the complaint
to determine whether:
(a) The alleged facts bring the case within the jurisdiction of the
court; and
(b) On a basis of available evidence there is probable cause to
believe that the juvenile did commit the offense.
(2) If the identical alleged acts constitute an offense under both
the law of this state and an ordinance of any city or county of this
state, state law shall govern the prosecutor's screening and charging
decision for both filed and diverted cases.
(3) If the requirements of subsections (1)(a) and (b) of this
section are met, the prosecutor shall either file an information in
juvenile court or divert the case, as set forth in subsections (5),
(6), and (7) of this section. If the prosecutor finds that the
requirements of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section are not met,
the prosecutor shall maintain a record, for one year, of such decision
and the reasons therefor. In lieu of filing an information or
diverting an offense a prosecutor may file a motion to modify community
supervision where such offense constitutes a violation of community
supervision.
(4) An information shall be a plain, concise, and definite written
statement of the essential facts constituting the offense charged. It
shall be signed by the prosecuting attorney and conform to chapter
10.37 RCW.
(5) Where a case is legally sufficient, the prosecutor shall file
an information with the juvenile court if:
(a) An alleged offender is accused of a class A felony, a class B
felony, an attempt to commit a class B felony, a class C felony listed
in RCW ((9.94A.411(2))) 9.94A.030 as a crime against persons or listed
in RCW 9A.46.060 as a crime of harassment, or a class C felony that is
a violation of RCW 9.41.080 or 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii); or
(b) An alleged offender is accused of a felony and has a criminal
history of any felony, or at least two gross misdemeanors, or at least
two misdemeanors; or
(c) An alleged offender has previously been committed to the
department; or
(d) An alleged offender has been referred by a diversion unit for
prosecution or desires prosecution instead of diversion; or
(e) An alleged offender has two or more diversion agreements on the
alleged offender's criminal history; or
(f) A special allegation has been filed that the offender or an
accomplice was armed with a firearm when the offense was committed.
(6) Where a case is legally sufficient the prosecutor shall divert
the case if the alleged offense is a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
or violation and the alleged offense is the offender's first offense or
violation. If the alleged offender is charged with a related offense
that must or may be filed under subsections (5) and (7) of this
section, a case under this subsection may also be filed.
(7) Where a case is legally sufficient and falls into neither
subsection (5) nor (6) of this section, it may be filed or diverted.
In deciding whether to file or divert an offense under this section the
prosecutor shall be guided only by the length, seriousness, and recency
of the alleged offender's criminal history and the circumstances
surrounding the commission of the alleged offense.
(8) Whenever a juvenile is placed in custody or, where not placed
in custody, referred to a diversion interview, the parent or legal
guardian of the juvenile shall be notified as soon as possible
concerning the allegation made against the juvenile and the current
status of the juvenile. Where a case involves victims of crimes
against persons or victims whose property has not been recovered at the
time a juvenile is referred to a diversion unit, the victim shall be
notified of the referral and informed how to contact the unit.
(9) The responsibilities of the prosecutor under subsections (1)
through (8) of this section may be performed by a juvenile court
probation counselor for any complaint referred to the court alleging
the commission of an offense which would not be a felony if committed
by an adult, if the prosecutor has given sufficient written notice to
the juvenile court that the prosecutor will not review such complaints.
(10) The prosecutor, juvenile court probation counselor, or
diversion unit may, in exercising their authority under this section or
RCW 13.40.080, refer juveniles to mediation or victim offender
reconciliation programs. Such mediation or victim offender
reconciliation programs shall be voluntary for victims.

Sec. 14 RCW 13.40.077 and 1997 c 338 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:

RECOMMENDED PROSECUTING STANDARDS FOR CHARGING AND PLEA DISPOSITIONS

INTRODUCTION: These standards are intended solely for the guidance
of prosecutors in the state of Washington. They are not intended to,
do not, and may not be relied upon to create a right or benefit,
substantive or procedural, enforceable at law by a party in litigation
with the state.
Evidentiary sufficiency.
(1) Decision not to prosecute.
STANDARD: A prosecuting attorney may decline to prosecute, even
though technically sufficient evidence to prosecute exists, in
situations where prosecution would serve no public purpose, would
defeat the underlying purpose of the law in question, or would result
in decreased respect for the law. The decision not to prosecute or
divert shall not be influenced by the race, gender, religion, or creed
of the suspect.
GUIDELINES/COMMENTARY:
Examples
The following are examples of reasons not to prosecute which could
satisfy the standard.
(a) Contrary to Legislative Intent - It may be proper to decline to
charge where the application of criminal sanctions would be clearly
contrary to the intent of the legislature in enacting the particular
statute.
(b) Antiquated Statute - It may be proper to decline to charge
where the statute in question is antiquated in that:
(i) It has not been enforced for many years;
(ii) Most members of society act as if it were no longer in
existence;
(iii) It serves no deterrent or protective purpose in today's
society; and
(iv) The statute has not been recently reconsidered by the
legislature.
This reason is not to be construed as the basis for declining cases
because the law in question is unpopular or because it is difficult to
enforce.
(c) De Minimis Violation - It may be proper to decline to charge
where the violation of law is only technical or insubstantial and where
no public interest or deterrent purpose would be served by prosecution.
(d) Confinement on Other Charges - It may be proper to decline to
charge because the accused has been sentenced on another charge to a
lengthy period of confinement; and
(i) Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional
direct or collateral punishment;
(ii) The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is
not particularly aggravated; and
(iii) Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant
deterrent purpose.
(e) Pending Conviction on Another Charge - It may be proper to
decline to charge because the accused is facing a pending prosecution
in the same or another county; and
(i) Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional
direct or collateral punishment;
(ii) Conviction in the pending prosecution is imminent;
(iii) The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is
not particularly aggravated; and
(iv) Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant
deterrent purpose.
(f) High Disproportionate Cost of Prosecution - It may be proper to
decline to charge where the cost of locating or transporting, or the
burden on, prosecution witnesses is highly disproportionate to the
importance of prosecuting the offense in question. The reason should
be limited to minor cases and should not be relied upon in serious
cases.
(g) Improper Motives of Complainant - It may be proper to decline
charges because the motives of the complainant are improper and
prosecution would serve no public purpose, would defeat the underlying
purpose of the law in question, or would result in decreased respect
for the law.
(h) Immunity - It may be proper to decline to charge where immunity
is to be given to an accused in order to prosecute another where the
accused information or testimony will reasonably lead to the conviction
of others who are responsible for more serious criminal conduct or who
represent a greater danger to the public interest.
(i) Victim Request - It may be proper to decline to charge because
the victim requests that no criminal charges be filed and the case
involves the following crimes or situations:
(i) Assault cases where the victim has suffered little or no
injury;
(ii) Crimes against property, not involving violence, where no
major loss was suffered;
(iii) Where doing so would not jeopardize the safety of society.
Care should be taken to insure that the victim's request is freely
made and is not the product of threats or pressure by the accused.
The presence of these factors may also justify the decision to
dismiss a prosecution which has been commenced.
Notification
The prosecutor is encouraged to notify the victim, when practical,
and the law enforcement personnel, of the decision not to prosecute.
(2) Decision to prosecute.
STANDARD:
Crimes ((against)) affecting persons will be filed if sufficient
admissible evidence exists, which, when considered with the most
plausible, reasonably foreseeable defense that could be raised under
the evidence, would justify conviction by a reasonable and objective
fact-finder. With regard to offenses prohibited by RCW 9A.44.040,
9A.44.050, 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086,
9A.44.089, and 9A.64.020 the prosecutor should avoid prefiling
agreements or diversions intended to place the accused in a program of
treatment or counseling, so that treatment, if determined to be
beneficial, can be proved under RCW 13.40.160(((4))) (3).
Crimes against property/other crimes will be filed if the
admissible evidence is of such convincing force as to make it probable
that a reasonable and objective fact-finder would convict after hearing
all the admissible evidence and the most plausible defense that could
be raised.
The categorization of crimes for these charging standards shall be
the same as found in RCW 9.94A.411(2).
The decision to prosecute or use diversion shall not be influenced
by the race, gender, religion, or creed of the respondent.
(3) Selection of Charges/Degree of Charge
(a) The prosecutor should file charges which adequately describe
the nature of the respondent's conduct. Other offenses may be charged
only if they are necessary to ensure that the charges:
(i) Will significantly enhance the strength of the state's case at
trial; or
(ii) Will result in restitution to all victims.
(b) The prosecutor should not overcharge to obtain a guilty plea.
Overcharging includes:
(i) Charging a higher degree;
(ii) Charging additional counts.
This standard is intended to direct prosecutors to charge those
crimes which demonstrate the nature and seriousness of a respondent's
criminal conduct, but to decline to charge crimes which are not
necessary to such an indication. Crimes which do not merge as a matter
of law, but which arise from the same course of conduct, do not all
have to be charged.
(4) Police Investigation
A prosecuting attorney is dependent upon law enforcement agencies
to conduct the necessary factual investigation which must precede the
decision to prosecute. The prosecuting attorney shall ensure that a
thorough factual investigation has been conducted before a decision to
prosecute is made. In ordinary circumstances the investigation should
include the following:
(a) The interviewing of all material witnesses, together with the
obtaining of written statements whenever possible;
(b) The completion of necessary laboratory tests; and
(c) The obtaining, in accordance with constitutional requirements,
of the suspect's version of the events.
If the initial investigation is incomplete, a prosecuting attorney
should insist upon further investigation before a decision to prosecute
is made, and specify what the investigation needs to include.
(5) Exceptions
In certain situations, a prosecuting attorney may authorize filing
of a criminal complaint before the investigation is complete if:
(a) Probable cause exists to believe the suspect is guilty; and
(b) The suspect presents a danger to the community or is likely to
flee if not apprehended; or
(c) The arrest of the suspect is necessary to complete the
investigation of the crime.
In the event that the exception to the standard is applied, the
prosecuting attorney shall obtain a commitment from the law enforcement
agency involved to complete the investigation in a timely manner. If
the subsequent investigation does not produce sufficient evidence to
meet the normal charging standard, the complaint should be dismissed.
(6) Investigation Techniques
The prosecutor should be fully advised of the investigatory
techniques that were used in the case investigation including:
(a) Polygraph testing;
(b) Hypnosis;
(c) Electronic surveillance;
(d) Use of informants.
(7) Prefiling Discussions with Defendant
Discussions with the defendant or his or her representative
regarding the selection or disposition of charges may occur prior to
the filing of charges, and potential agreements can be reached.
(8) Plea dispositions:
STANDARD
(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
respondent will normally be expected to plead guilty to the charge or
charges which adequately describe the nature of his or her criminal
conduct or go to trial.
(b) In certain circumstances, a plea agreement with a respondent in
exchange for a plea of guilty to a charge or charges that may not fully
describe the nature of his or her criminal conduct may be necessary and
in the public interest. Such situations may include the following:
(i) Evidentiary problems which make conviction of the original
charges doubtful;
(ii) The respondent's willingness to cooperate in the investigation
or prosecution of others whose criminal conduct is more serious or
represents a greater public threat;
(iii) A request by the victim when it is not the result of pressure
from the respondent;
(iv) The discovery of facts which mitigate the seriousness of the
respondent's conduct;
(v) The correction of errors in the initial charging decision;
(vi) The respondent's history with respect to criminal activity;
(vii) The nature and seriousness of the offense or offenses
charged;
(viii) The probable effect of witnesses.
(c) No plea agreement shall be influenced by the race, gender,
religion, or creed of the respondent. This includes but is not limited
to the prosecutor's decision to utilize such disposition alternatives
as the Special Sex Offender Disposition Alternative, the Chemical
Dependency Disposition Alternative, and manifest injustice.
(9) Disposition recommendations:
STANDARD
The prosecutor may reach an agreement regarding disposition
recommendations.
The prosecutor shall not agree to withhold relevant information
from the court concerning the plea agreement.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.43.8321 and 2005 c 421 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the Washington state patrol disseminates conviction record
information in response to a request under RCW 43.43.832, it shall
clearly state that: (1) The conviction record data does not include
information on civil adjudications, administrative findings, or
disciplinary board final decisions and that all such information must
be obtained from the courts and licensing agencies; (2) the conviction
record that is being disseminated includes information for which a
person is currently being processed by the criminal justice system
relating to only crimes against a person as defined in RCW
((9.94A.411)) 9.94A.030 and that it does not include any other current
or pending charge information for which a person could be in the
current process of being processed by the criminal justice system; and
(3) an arrest is not a conviction or a finding of guilt.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.43.842 and 2007 c 387 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The secretary of social and health services and the
secretary of health shall adopt additional requirements for the
licensure or relicensure of agencies, facilities, and licensed
individuals who provide care and treatment to vulnerable adults,
including nursing pools registered under chapter 18.52C RCW. These
additional requirements shall ensure that any person associated with a
licensed agency or facility having unsupervised access with a
vulnerable adult shall not be the respondent in an active protective
order under RCW 74.34.130, nor have been: (i) Convicted of a crime
against children or other persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830, except
as provided in this section; (ii) convicted of crimes relating to
financial exploitation as defined in RCW 43.43.830, except as provided
in this section; or (iii) found in any disciplinary board final
decision to have abused a vulnerable adult under RCW 43.43.830.
(b) A person associated with a licensed agency or facility who has
unsupervised access with a vulnerable adult shall make the disclosures
specified in RCW 43.43.834(2). The person shall make the disclosures
in writing, sign, and swear to the contents under penalty of perjury.
The person shall, in the disclosures, specify all crimes against
children or other persons, all crimes relating to financial
exploitation, and all crimes relating to drugs as defined in RCW
43.43.830, committed by the person.
(2) The rules adopted under this section shall permit the licensee
to consider the criminal history of an applicant for employment in a
licensed facility when the applicant has one or more convictions for a
past offense and:
(a) The offense was simple assault, assault in the fourth degree,
or the same offense as it may be renamed, and three or more years have
passed between the most recent conviction and the date of application
for employment;
(b) The offense was prostitution, or the same offense as it may be
renamed, and three or more years have passed between the most recent
conviction and the date of application for employment;
(c) The offense was theft in the third degree, or the same offense
as it may be renamed, and three or more years have passed between the
most recent conviction and the date of application for employment;
(d) The offense was theft in the second degree, or the same offense
as it may be renamed, and five or more years have passed between the
most recent conviction and the date of application for employment;
(e) The offense was forgery, or the same offense as it may be
renamed, and five or more years have passed between the most recent
conviction and the date of application for employment.
The offenses set forth in (a) through (e) of this subsection do not
automatically disqualify an applicant from employment by a licensee.
Nothing in this section may be construed to require the employment of
any person against a licensee's judgment.
(3) In consultation with law enforcement personnel, the secretary
of social and health services and the secretary of health shall
investigate, or cause to be investigated, the conviction record and the
protection proceeding record information under this chapter of the
staff of each agency or facility under their respective jurisdictions
seeking licensure or relicensure. An individual responding to a
criminal background inquiry request from his or her employer or
potential employer shall disclose the information about his or her
criminal history under penalty of perjury. The secretaries shall use
the information solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for
licensure or relicensure. Criminal justice agencies shall provide the
secretaries such information as they may have and that the secretaries
may require for such purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The sentencing guidelines commission shall
study the definition of crimes against persons in RCW 9.94A.030. The
commission shall determine, in light of the history and purpose of the
definition and the purpose of the sentencing reform act as stated in
RCW 9.94A.010, whether there are offenses that should be added to the
definition and whether there are offenses that should be removed from
the definition. The sentencing guidelines commission shall report its
findings and any recommendations to the appropriate standing committees
of the legislature no later than December 1, 2008.

--- END ---