BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The legislative task force on
Washington state port district collaboration is established, with
members as provided in this subsection:
(i) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(ii) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate, appointed by the president of the senate;
(iii) Three members from the Washington public ports association,
with at least two members representing ports with air and sea port
operations, appointed by the governor;
(iv) One member from the freight mobility strategic investment
board, appointed by the governor;
(v) One member from county government, appointed by the Washington
state association of counties;
(vi) One member from city government, appointed by the association
of Washington cities;
(vii) One member from the association of Washington business,
appointed by the governor;
(viii) One member from the labor community, selected by the
Washington state labor council; and
(ix) One member from the environmental community, appointed by the
Washington environmental council.
(b) The task force member from the house of representatives with
the most seniority shall select a chair from among its legislative
membership.
(2) The task force shall consult with individuals from the public
and private sectors and other interested parties, as may be
appropriate, for technical advice and assistance and may ask such
individuals to establish advisory committees or work groups that report
to the task force.
(3) The efforts of the task force shall be directed at discovering
and exploring productive methods for promoting greater efficiencies for
and collaborations between Washington's port districts, districts that
often compete against each other, and other national and international
ports. The task force shall: (a) Examine the likely benefits and
disadvantages associated with collaborations between port districts;
and (b) consider how a regional port district could be structured and
governed.
(4) The task force shall use legislative facilities, and staff
support shall be provided by the house of representatives office of
program research, senate committee services, and the office of
financial management.
(5) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
house of representatives, the senate, and the office of financial
management. Task force expenditures are subject to approval by the
senate facilities and operations committee and the house of
representatives executive rules committee, or their successor
committees.
(6) The task force shall report upon its initial actions to the
governor and appropriate committees of the house of representatives and
the senate by December 1, 2008.
(7) The task force shall report its finding and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the house of
representatives and the senate by December 1, 2009.
(8) The task force expires May 1, 2010.

--- END ---