BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.305 and 1997 c 291 s 6 and 1997 c 241 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The department shall continue to issue the categories of special
plates issued by the department under the sections repealed under
section 12 (1) through (7), chapter 250, Laws of 1990. Special license
plates issued under those repealed sections before January 1, 1991, are
valid to the extent and under the conditions provided in those repealed
sections. The following conditions, limitations, or requirements apply
to certain special license plates issued after January 1, 1991:
(1) A horseless carriage plate and a plate or plates issued for
collectors' vehicles more than thirty years old, upon payment of the
initial fees required by law and the additional special license plate
fee established by the department, are valid for the life of the
vehicle for which application is approved by the department. When a
single plate is issued, it shall be displayed on the rear of the
vehicle.
(2) The department may issue special license plates denoting
amateur radio operator status only to persons having a valid official
radio operator license issued by the federal communications commission.
(3) The department shall issue one set of special license plates to
each resident of this state who has been awarded the Congressional
Medal of Honor for use on a passenger vehicle registered to that
person. The department shall issue the plate without the payment of
licensing fees and motor vehicle excise tax.
(4) The department may issue for use on only one motor vehicle
owned by the qualified applicant special license plates denoting that
the recipient of the plate is a survivor of the attack on Pearl Harbor
on December 7, 1941, to persons meeting all of the following criteria:
(a) Is a resident of this state;
(b) Was a member of the United States Armed Forces on December 7,
1941;
(c) Was on station on December 7, 1941, during the hours of 7:55
a.m. to 9:45 a.m. Hawaii time at Pearl Harbor, the island of Oahu, or
offshore at a distance not to exceed three miles;
(d) Received an honorable discharge from the United States Armed
Forces; and
(e) Is certified by a Washington state chapter of the Pearl Harbor
survivors association as satisfying the qualifications in (c) of this
subsection.
The department may issue such plates to the surviving spouse of any
deceased Pearl Harbor survivor who met the requirements of this
subsection. If the surviving spouse remarries, he or she shall return
the special plates to the department within fifteen days and apply for
regular plates. The surviving spouse must be a resident of this state.
The department shall issue these plates upon payment by the
applicant of all other license fees, but the department may not set or
charge an additional fee for these special license plates.
(5) Effective with registrations that are due or become due on or
after January 1, 2009, the department may issue for use on motor
vehicles owned by the qualified applicant special license plates
denoting that the recipient of the plate is a member of gold star
mothers to persons meeting all of the following criteria:
(a) Is a resident of this state; and
(b) Is a mother of a member of the United States armed forces
killed in combat, as certified by the Washington state department of
veterans affairs.
The department shall issue these plates upon payment by the
applicant of all other license fees, but the department may not set or
charge an additional fee for these special plates.
(6) The department shall replace, free of charge, special license
plates issued under subsections (3) ((and (4))) through (5) of this
section if they are lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or destroyed. Such
plates shall remain with the persons upon transfer or other disposition
of the vehicle for which they were initially issued, and may be used on
another vehicle registered to the recipient in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 46.16.316(1).

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.725 and 2007 c 518 s 711 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The creation of the board does not in any way preclude the
authority of the legislature to independently propose and enact special
license plate legislation.
(2) The board must review and either approve or reject special
license plate applications submitted by sponsoring organizations.
(3) Duties of the board include but are not limited to the
following:
(a) Review and approve the annual financial reports submitted by
sponsoring organizations with active special license plate series and
present those annual financial reports to the senate and house
transportation committees;
(b) Report annually to the senate and house transportation
committees on the special license plate applications that were
considered by the board;
(c) Issue approval and rejection notification letters to sponsoring
organizations, the department, the chairs of the senate and house of
representatives transportation committees, and the legislative sponsors
identified in each application. The letters must be issued within
seven days of making a determination on the status of an application;
(d) Review annually the number of plates sold for each special
license plate series created after January 1, 2003. The board may
submit a recommendation to discontinue a special plate series to the
chairs of the senate and house of representatives transportation
committees;
(e) Provide policy guidance and directions to the department
concerning the adoption of rules necessary to limit the number of
special license plates that an organization or a governmental entity
may apply for.
(4) Except as provided in this act, in order to assess the effects
and impact of the proliferation of special license plates, the
legislature declares a temporary moratorium on the issuance of any
additional plates until July 1, 2009. During this period of time, the
special license plate review board created in RCW 46.16.705 and the
department of licensing are prohibited from accepting, reviewing,
processing, or approving any applications. Additionally, no special
license plate may be enacted by the legislature during the moratorium,
unless the proposed license plate has been approved by the board before
February 15, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act is exempt from the
requirements of RCW 46.16.775.

--- END ---