BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.170 and 2006 c 263 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
The study of the Constitution of the United States, the Pledge of
Allegiance, and the Constitution of the state of Washington shall be a
condition prerequisite to graduation from the public and private high
schools of this state. The superintendent of public instruction shall
provide by rule for the implementation of this section.

--- END ---