BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is a
substantial government interest to:
(1) Balance employees' right to freedom from compelled speech with
the bargaining unit representatives' ability to collect dues and fees
for purposes germane to the collective bargaining process or to
contract administration; and
(2) Assure that bargaining representatives do not shift a
disproportionate share of the costs of collective bargaining to
dissenters, which has the effect of applying his or her money to
support compelled speech.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.760 and 2007 c 438 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) A labor organization that collects agency shop fees in
excess of a pro rata share of expenditures for purposes germane to the
collective bargaining process, contract administration, or for matters
affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of employment may not use
agency shop fees paid by an individual who is not a member of the
organization to make contributions or expenditures to influence an
election or to operate a political committee, unless affirmatively
authorized by the individual.
(((2) A labor organization does not use agency shop fees when it
uses its general treasury funds to make such contributions or
expenditures if it has sufficient revenues from sources other than
agency shop fees in its general treasury to fund such contributions or
expenditures.))

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.52.045 and 1987 c 314 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon filing with the employer the voluntary written
authorization of a bargaining unit employee under this chapter, the
employee organization which is the exclusive bargaining representative
of the bargaining unit shall have the right to have deducted from the
salary of the bargaining unit employee the periodic dues and initiation
fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or retaining
membership in the exclusive bargaining representative. Such employee
authorization shall not be irrevocable for a period of more than one
year. Such dues and fees shall be deducted from the pay of all
employees who have given authorization for such deduction, and shall be
transmitted by the employer to the employee organization or to the
depository designated by the employee organization.
(2) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions, but not a closed shop. If an agency shop or other union
security provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce any such
provision by deductions from the salary of bargaining unit employees
affected thereby and shall transmit such funds to the employee
organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization.
(3) The amount of the funds collected under a union security
provision shall not exceed a pro rata share of expenditures for
purposes germane to the collective bargaining process, contract
administration, or for matters affecting wages, hours, and other
conditions of employment. Determination of the share of the fee shall
be documented for the nonmember using historical data.
(4) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide religious
tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which such
employee is a member shall pay to a nonreligious charity or other
charitable organization an amount of money equivalent to the periodic
dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring
or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining representative.
The charity shall be agreed upon by the employee and the employee
organization to which such employee would otherwise pay the dues and
fees. The employee shall furnish written proof that such payments have
been made. If the employee and the employee organization do not reach
agreement on such matter, the commission shall designate the charitable
organization.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.76.045 and 2002 c 356 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon filing with the employer the voluntary written
authorization of a bargaining unit faculty member under this chapter,
the employee organization which is the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit shall have the right to have
deducted from the salary of the bargaining unit faculty member the
periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of
acquiring or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining
representative. Such employee authorization shall not be irrevocable
for a period of more than one year. Such dues and fees shall be
deducted from the pay of all faculty members who have given
authorization for such deduction, and shall be transmitted by the
employer to the employee organization or to the depository designated
by the employee organization.
(2) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions, but not a closed shop. If an agency shop or other union
security provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce any such
provision by deductions from the salary of bargaining unit faculty
members affected thereby and shall transmit such funds to the employee
organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization. The amount of the funds collected under a union security
provision shall not exceed a pro rata share of expenditures for
purposes germane to the collective bargaining process, contract
administration, or for matters affecting wages, hours, and other
conditions of employment. Determination of the pro rata share shall be
documented for the nonmember using historical data.
(3) A faculty member who is covered by a union security provision
and who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide religious
tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which such faculty
member is a member shall pay to a nonreligious charity or other
charitable organization an amount of money equivalent to the periodic
dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring
or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining representative.
The charity shall be agreed upon by the faculty member and the employee
organization to which such faculty member would otherwise pay the dues
and fees. The faculty member shall furnish written proof that such
payments have been made. If the faculty member and the employee
organization do not reach agreement on such matter, the dispute shall
be submitted to the commission for determination.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.59.100 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions including an agency shop, but not a union or closed shop.
If an agency shop provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce it
by deducting from the salary payments to members of the bargaining unit
the dues required of membership in the bargaining representative, or,
for nonmembers thereof, ((a fee equivalent to such dues)) an agency
shop fee. The amount of the funds collected under a union security
provision shall not exceed a pro rata share of expenditures for
purposes germane to the collective bargaining process, contract
administration, or for matters affecting wages, hours, and other
conditions of employment. Determination of the share of the fee shall
be documented for the nonmember using historical data. All union
security provisions must safeguard the right of nonassociation of
employees based on bona fide religious tenets or teachings of a church
or religious body of which such employee is a member. Such employee
shall pay an amount of money equivalent to regular dues and fees to a
nonreligious charity or to another charitable organization mutually
agreed upon by the employee affected and the bargaining representative
to which such employee would otherwise pay the dues and fees. The
employee shall furnish written proof that such payment has been made.
If the employee and the bargaining representative do not reach
agreement on such matter, the commission shall designate the charitable
organization.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.80.100 and 2002 c 354 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A collective bargaining agreement may contain a union security
provision requiring as a condition of employment the payment((, no
later than the thirtieth day following the beginning of employment or
July 1, 2004, whichever is later,)) of an agency shop fee to the
employee organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative
for the bargaining unit in which the employee is employed. The amount
of the fee shall be ((equal to the amount required to become a member
in good standing of the employee organization. Each employee
organization shall establish a procedure by which any employee so
requesting may pay a representation fee)) no greater than the part of
the membership fee that represents a pro rata share of expenditures for
purposes germane to the collective bargaining process, to contract
administration, or to pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and
other conditions of employment. Determination of the share of the fee
shall be documented for the nonmember using historical data.
(2) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide personally
held religious beliefs or tenets, or teachings of a church or religious
body of which the employee is a member, shall((, as a condition of
employment, make payments to the employee organization, for purposes
within the program of the employee organization as designated by the
employee that would be in harmony with his or her individual
conscience. The amount of the payments shall be equal to the periodic
dues and fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or
retaining membership in the employee organization minus any included
monthly premiums for insurance programs sponsored by the employee
organization. The employee shall not be a member of the employee
organization but is entitled to all the representation rights of a
member of the employee organization)) have his or her right
accommodated either by the reduction or waiver of the representation
fees, or by paying to a nonreligious charity or other charitable
organization an amount of money equivalent to the agency shop fee.
(3) Upon filing with the employer the written authorization of a
bargaining unit employee under this chapter, the employee organization
that is the exclusive bargaining representative of the bargaining unit
shall have the exclusive right to have deducted from the salary of the
employee an amount equal to the fees and dues uniformly required as a
condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the employee
organization. The fees and dues shall be deducted each pay period from
the pay of all employees who have given authorization for the deduction
and shall be transmitted by the employer as provided for by agreement
between the employer and the employee organization.
(4) Employee organizations that before July 1, 2004, were entitled
to the benefits of this section shall continue to be entitled to these
benefits.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.64.160 and 1983 c 15 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions including an agency shop, but not a union or closed shop.
If an agency shop provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce it
by deducting from the salary payments to members of the bargaining unit
the dues required of membership in the bargaining representative, or,
for nonmembers thereof, a fee equivalent to ((such dues)) a pro rata
share of expenditures for purposes germane to the collective bargaining
process, contract administration, or for matters affecting wages,
hours, and other conditions of employment. Determination of the share
of the fee shall be documented for the nonmember using historical data.
All union security provisions shall safeguard the right of
nonassociation of employees based on bona fide religious tenets or
teachings of a church or religious body of which such employee is a
member. Such employee shall pay an amount of money equivalent to
regular dues and fees to a nonreligious charity or to another
charitable organization mutually agreed upon by the employee affected
and the bargaining representative to which such employee would
otherwise pay the dues and fees. The employee shall furnish written
proof that such payment has been made. If the employee and the
bargaining representative do not reach agreement on such matter, the
commission shall designate the charitable organization.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.56.113 and 2007 c 184 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the written authorization of an individual provider, a
family child care provider, or an adult family home provider within the
bargaining unit and after the certification or recognition of the
bargaining unit's exclusive bargaining representative, the state as
payor, but not as the employer, shall, subject to subsection (3) of
this section, deduct from the payments to an individual provider, a
family child care provider, or an adult family home provider the
monthly amount of dues as certified by the secretary of the exclusive
bargaining representative and shall transmit the same to the treasurer
of the exclusive bargaining representative.
(2) If the governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of
a bargaining unit of individual providers, family child care providers,
or adult family home providers enter into a collective bargaining
agreement that:
(a) Includes a union security provision authorized in RCW
41.56.122, the state as payor, but not as the employer, shall, subject
to subsection (3) of this section, enforce the agreement by deducting
from the payments to bargaining unit members the dues required for
membership in the exclusive bargaining representative, or, for
nonmembers thereof, ((a fee equivalent to the dues)) an agency shop
fee. The amount of the funds collected under a union security
provision shall not exceed a pro rata share of expenditures for
purposes germane to the collective bargaining process, contract
administration, or for matters affecting wages, hours, and other
conditions of employment. Determination of the share of the fee shall
be documented for the nonmember using historical data; or
(b) Includes requirements for deductions of payments other than the
deduction under (a) of this subsection, the state, as payor, but not as
the employer, shall, subject to subsection (3) of this section, make
such deductions upon written authorization of the individual provider,
family child care provider, or adult family home provider.
(3)(a) The initial additional costs to the state in making
deductions from the payments to individual providers, family child care
providers, and adult family home providers under this section shall be
negotiated, agreed upon in advance, and reimbursed to the state by the
exclusive bargaining representative.
(b) The allocation of ongoing additional costs to the state in
making deductions from the payments to individual providers, family
child care providers, or adult family home providers under this section
shall be an appropriate subject of collective bargaining between the
exclusive bargaining representative and the governor unless prohibited
by another statute. If no collective bargaining agreement containing
a provision allocating the ongoing additional cost is entered into
between the exclusive bargaining representative and the governor, or if
the legislature does not approve funding for the collective bargaining
agreement as provided in RCW 74.39A.300, 41.56.028, or 41.56.029, as
applicable, the ongoing additional costs to the state in making
deductions from the payments to individual providers, family child care
providers, or adult family home providers under this section shall be
negotiated, agreed upon in advance, and reimbursed to the state by the
exclusive bargaining representative.
(4) The governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of a
bargaining unit of family child care providers may not enter into a
collective bargaining agreement that contains a union security
provision unless the agreement contains a process, to be administered
by the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit of
family child care providers, for hardship dispensation for license-exempt family child care providers who are also temporary assistance
for needy families recipients or WorkFirst participants.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.56.122 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 22 are each
amended to read as follows:
A collective bargaining agreement may:
(1) Contain union security provisions: PROVIDED, That nothing in
this section shall authorize a closed shop provision: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That agreements involving union security provisions must
safeguard the right of nonassociation of public employees based on bona
fide religious tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of
which such public employee is a member. Such public employee shall pay
an amount of money equivalent to regular union dues and initiation fee
to a nonreligious charity or to another charitable organization
mutually agreed upon by the public employee affected and the bargaining
representative to which such public employee would otherwise pay the
dues and initiation fee. The amount of the funds collected under a
union security provision shall not exceed a pro rata share of
expenditures for purposes germane to the collective bargaining process,
contract administration, or for matters affecting wages, hours, and
other conditions of employment. Determination of the share of the fee
shall be documented for the nonmember using historical data. The
public employee shall furnish written proof that such payment has been
made. If the public employee and the bargaining representative do not
reach agreement on such matter, the commission shall designate the
charitable organization. When there is a conflict between any
collective bargaining agreement reached by a public employer and a
bargaining representative on a union security provision and any
charter, ordinance, rule, or regulation adopted by the public employer
or its agents, including but not limited to, a civil service
commission, the terms of the collective bargaining agreement shall
prevail.
(2) Provide for binding arbitration of a labor dispute arising from
the application or the interpretation of the matters contained in a
collective bargaining agreement.

--- END ---