BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.0301 and 1994 c 301 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon review by any court, or appellate body, of a determination
of the valuation of property for purposes of taxation, it shall be
presumed that the determination of the public official charged with the
duty of establishing such value is correct but this presumption shall
not be a defense against any correction indicated by ((clear, cogent
and convincing evidence)) a preponderance of the evidence. The
reviewing body must weigh all of the evidence to determine whether it
has been established by a preponderance of the evidence that the public
official's determination is incorrect. The presumption that the public
official has properly performed his or her duties is not evidence and
may not be considered by any reviewing body in its deliberations. In
weighing evidence, the reviewing body shall apply the same evidentiary
standard to the testimony and documentary evidence presented by the
party seeking to rebut the presumption and the public official. No
greater relief may be granted than is justified by the evidence
produced during the hearing.
(2) This statute applies to review by any court or appellate body,
including boards of equalization and boards of tax appeal.

--- END ---