BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) through (d) of this subsection,
after the filing of a notice of an appeal under RCW 51.52.060(2), the
department, the employer, and the representatives of each shall not
have ex parte contact, to discuss the facts or issues in question in
the appeal, with any medical provider who has examined or treated the
claimant at the request of the claimant or treating medical provider,
unless written authorization for such contact is given by the claimant
or the claimant's representative. Such written authorization is only
valid if given after the date that the appeal is filed and shall expire
ninety days after it is signed.
(b) If the department, the employer, or their representatives wish
to communicate with the examining or treating medical providers and no
written authorization from the claimant or the claimant's
representative has been obtained, such communication must be:
(i) In writing, sent contemporaneously to all parties with a notice
to the provider in bold type that any response must be in writing;
(ii) In person, by telephone, or by videoconference, at a date and
time mutually agreed to by all parties, with the claimant or their
representative given the opportunity to fully participate; or
(iii) Pursuant to a properly scheduled and noted deposition.
(c) Written authorization is not required if the claimant fails to
identify or confirm the examining or treating medical provider as a
witness as required by the board.
(d) This subsection does not apply to the department while it is
investigating the claim to make a decision on whether to modify,
reverse, change, or hold in abeyance an order pursuant to RCW
51.52.060(4).
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, after
the filing of a notice of an appeal under RCW 51.52.060(2), the
claimant and the representative for the claimant, if any, shall not
have ex parte contact, to discuss the facts or issues in question in
the appeal, with any medical provider who has examined the claimant
pursuant to RCW 51.36.070, unless written authorization for such
contact is given by the department or self-insured employer or their
representative. Such written authorization is only valid if given
after the date that the appeal is filed and shall expire ninety days
after it is signed.
(b) If the claimant or the claimant's representative wishes to
communicate with a medical provider who has examined the claimant
pursuant to RCW 51.36.070 and no written authorization from the
department or self-insured employer or their representative has been
obtained, such communication must be:
(i) In writing, sent contemporaneously to all parties with a notice
to the provider in bold type that any response must be in writing;
(ii) In person, by telephone, or by videoconference, at a date and
time mutually agreed to by all parties, with the department, self-insured employer, and their representatives given the opportunity to
fully participate; or
(iii) Pursuant to a properly scheduled and noted deposition.
(c) Written authorization is not required if the department or
self-insured employer fails to identify or confirm the examining
medical provider as a witness as required by the board.
(3) This section only applies to issues set forth in a notice of
appeal under RCW 51.52.060(2).
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the
reporting requirements under RCW 51.04.050 and 51.36.060 for issues not
set forth in a notice of appeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to orders issued on or
after the effective date of this act.

--- END ---