BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A joint select committee on surface
mine regulations is established, with members as provided in this
subsection.
(i) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(ii) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(iii) In addition, the department of natural resources shall
cooperate with the joint select committee and provide information as
the chair of the joint select committee may reasonably request.
(b) The joint select committee shall choose its chair from among
its membership. The speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate shall jointly select one legislative member to
convene the initial meeting of the joint select committee.
(2) The joint select committee shall review the current surface
mining statutes, chapter 78.44 RCW, to pursue options for moving
towards a more uniform system of surface mining regulations that bases
regulatory decisions on actual environmental harm and not on the status
of the operation's ownership or the size of the operation. The joint
select committee shall give particular attention to, but not be limited
to discussing, the exemptions to the definition of the term "surface
mine" included in RCW 78.44.031(17).
(3) Staff support for the joint select committee shall be provided
by the house office of program research and senate committee services.
(4) Members of the joint select committee shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(5) The expenses of the joint select committee shall be paid
jointly by the senate and the house of representatives. Joint select
committee expenditures are subject to approval by the senate facilities
and operations committee and the house executive rules committee, or
their successor committees.
(6) The joint select committee shall report its findings and
recommendations in the form of proposed legislation to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(7) This section expires July 31, 2009.

--- END ---