BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In 2007, the legislature recognized the
importance of developing school and district leadership through a
system of research-based professional development and training. The
Washington state leadership academy is focused on the development of
principals, superintendents, and other administrators, but is not
focused on research and development for the school directors who also
oversee and lead school improvement efforts. The legislature intends
to expand the Washington state leadership academy to include school
directors.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.415.340 and 2007 c 402 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Research supports the value of quality school and school
district leadership. Effective leadership is critical to improving
student learning and transforming underperforming schools and school
districts into world-class learning centers.
(2) A public-private partnership is established to develop, pilot,
and implement the Washington state leadership academy to focus on the
development and enhancement of personal leadership characteristics and
the teaching of effective practices and skills demonstrated by school
and district administrators and school directors who are successful
managers and instructional leaders. It is the goal of the academy to
provide state-of-the-art programs and services across the state.
(3) Academy partners include the state superintendent and principal
professional associations, state school directors' association, private
nonprofit foundations, institutions of higher education with approved
educator preparation programs, the professional educator standards
board, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
educational service districts, the state school business officers'
association, and other entities identified by the partners. The
partners shall designate an independent organization to act as the
fiscal agent for the academy and shall establish a board of directors
to oversee and direct the academy's finances, services, and programs.
The academy shall be supported by a national research institution with
demonstrated expertise in educational leadership.
(4) Initial development of academy course content and activities
shall be supported by private funds. Initial tasks of the academy are
to:
(a) Finalize a comprehensive design of the academy and the
development of the curriculum frameworks for a comprehensive leadership
development program that includes coursework, practicum, mentoring, and
evaluation components;
(b) Develop curriculum for individual leadership topics, including
topics appropriate for school director leadership;
(c) Pilot the curriculum and all program components; and
(d) Modify the comprehensive design, curriculum coursework,
practicum, and mentoring programs based on the research results gained
from pilot activities.
(5) The board of directors shall report semiannually to the
superintendent of public instruction on the financial contributions
provided by foundations and other organizations to support the work of
the academy. The board of directors shall report by December 31st each
year to the superintendent of public instruction on the programs and
services provided, numbers of participants in the various academy
activities, evaluation activities regarding program and participant
outcomes, and plans for the academy's future development.
(6) The board of directors shall make recommendations for changes
in superintendent and principal preparation programs, the administrator
licensure system, and continuing education requirements.

--- END ---