BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that trails provide
tangible benefits for local communities, including access to cultural
and natural resources, outdoor recreational opportunities such as
hiking, biking, and walking, and provide health benefits for the
community through outdoor activities and physical exercise. The
legislature further finds that building new trails will enhance the
livability of communities and provide important nonmotorized
connections to growing urban areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of an eligible county may impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and must be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. The rate of tax may not exceed 0.06 percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used
in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section is
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue must perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.
(3)(a) Moneys collected under this section must only be used for
capital improvements for recreational trails. The recreational trail
must be listed as an item in the officially adopted capital facilities
element of the county's comprehensive plan for those counties planning
under RCW 36.70A.040. For those counties that do not plan under the
growth management act, the recreational trail must be listed in the
county's capital facilities plan.
(b) Moneys collected under this section may not constitute more
than fifty percent of the cost of capital improvements to recreational
trails.
(c) In eligible counties with a population between one hundred
seventy-five thousand and one million, the county must give priority to
capital improvements to recreational trails that connect urban growth
areas, including but not limited to, connecting existing recreational
trail networks or building connections in anticipation of future
recreational trails in urban growth areas.
(d) Each county collecting money under this section must deposit
the proceeds into a dedicated interest-bearing account. No later than
October 1st of each year, the county must report to the office of the
state auditor a list of new projects from the prior fiscal year,
showing that the county has used the funds for those projects
consistent with this section.
(4) No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 2008.
No tax may be collected under this section by a county more than ten
years after the date that a tax is first imposed under this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Capital improvement" means:
(i) The acquisition of sites, easements, rights-of-way necessary
for construction or improvement of a recreational trail or improvements
thereon or appurtenances thereto;
(ii) The acquisition of construction and initial equipment; or
(iii) The reconstruction, demolition, or major alteration of new or
presently owned recreational trails. "Capital improvement" does not
include planning for, studies of, designs for, maintaining, or
operating recreational trails. As used in this subsection (5),
"necessary for the construction of" does not include buffers or other
nonessential property for the recreational trail.
(b) "Eligible county" means a county with a population of less than
one million.
(c) "Recreational trail" means a public way constructed primarily
for and open to pedestrians, equestrians, or bicyclists, or any
combination thereof, other than a sidewalk constructed as part of a
city street or county road for the exclusive use of pedestrians. The
term "recreational trail" does not include a public way or widened
shoulder adjacent to a highway, street, or road unless the highway,
street, or road is used to connect a recreational trail to an urban
growth area.
(d) "Urban growth area" means those areas designated by a county
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---