BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A minor child may petition the court for visitation with his or
her minor sibling residing in a separate household. Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, this section applies to a minor
child, whether there is or was a dissolution, legal separation,
modification of a parenting plan, or other court proceeding involving
either the petitioning child or the sibling with whom visitation is
sought.
(2) This section does not apply to children who are subjects of
shelter care or dependency proceedings or otherwise in the custody of
the state under Title 13 RCW, chapter 26.44 RCW, or any other provision
of law.
(3) The minor child's parent, guardian, custodian, or other
advocate may bring a petition on behalf of the minor child.
(4) The court shall order visitation if it finds that visitation is
in the minor child's and the sibling's best interests. In making this
determination, the court shall consider the following, nonexclusive
factors:
(a) The love, affection, and strength of the relationship between
the siblings;
(b) The length and quality of the relationship between the
siblings;
(c) The relationship between each of the child's parents,
guardians, custodians, or other persons with whom the children are
residing;
(d) The nature and reason for the respondent's objection, if any,
to sibling visitation;
(e) The effect that granting visitation will have on the
relationship between the siblings and the parents or persons with whom
the siblings are residing;
(f) The residential time-sharing arrangements between the parents
and siblings;
(g) The good faith of the minor child petitioning; and
(h) Any other factor relevant to the child's best interest.
(5) The court shall not award visitation if there has been any
physical, emotional, or sexual abuse caused by either sibling to each
other, any other sibling, or any other minor child. The court shall
consider whether any person with whom either sibling resides would be
subject to limitations under RCW 26.10.160.
(6) When ordering visitation, the court shall consider how
visitation will be conducted, in light of the relationship between the
persons with whom the siblings reside, and may order visitation
arrangements that include supervised visitation or visitation between
siblings in locations other than one sibling's household.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "sibling" includes siblings
related by blood or adoption and stepsiblings.

--- END ---