BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of social and health services
shall present a feasibility study to the governor and the legislature
by November 15, 2008, examining systems to expeditiously link persons
released from confinement in state and local correctional facilities
and institutions for mental diseases to medical assistance for which
they qualify.
(1) The study shall present an analysis of the costs and benefits
associated with suspending eligibility for persons who were receiving
medical assistance at the time their confinement began, including
consideration of the changes required and resources needed to
effectively suspend medical assistance benefits in the following
manner:
(a) No medical assistance benefits would be provided to a person
while confined, except as explicitly authorized by state law.
(b) Upon the person's release from confinement, medical assistance
benefits for the person would immediately resume. No new application
would be required to effectuate resumption of medical assistance.
(c) The person would not be required to recertify eligibility for
medical assistance during the period in which he or she is confined.
(i) If the person is confined when he or she would otherwise be
required to recertify eligibility for medical assistance, the
department would allow the person to recertify eligibility before
release from confinement, or require the person to recertify
eligibility immediately after release, or at a later time established
by rule.
(ii) The study must include an assessment of the likelihood that
the federal government would approve a medicaid state plan amendment to
allow the state to receive medicaid matching funds for medical
assistance provided to a person during the period in which
recertification of eligibility is pending under (c)(i) of this
subsection.
The study must indicate a date that a system of suspension of
benefits could be implemented, in accordance with this section, if such
a system requires changes to information systems.
(2) The study shall present an analysis of the costs and benefits
associated with improving the efficiency and scope of the expedited
medical assistance reinstatement and eligibility determination process
established under RCW 74.09.555. The study must examine the costs and
benefits of:
(a) Extending expedited medical assistance reinstatement and
eligibility determination to persons other than those with mental
disorders;
(b) Making the process available to persons whether or not they
received medical assistance benefits before their confinement;
(c) Developing a system under which an application could be
approved before a person's release from confinement and held in a
suspended status until the day of the person's release.
(3) The study shall present an analysis of the costs and benefits
of providing medical and mental health evaluations to determine whether
a person is disabled for purposes of the medical assistance program
before the person's release from confinement.
(4) The study shall analyze the costs and benefits of establishing
policies and procedures to accelerate notification of the department
when a person enrolled in medical assistance is confined in a
Washington state correctional institution or Washington state
institution for mental diseases, or is released from confinement. The
policies must promote the continuity of medical assistance for such
persons, and be designed to inform persons in confinement about medical
assistance benefits.
(5) In preparing the feasibility study, the department shall
collaborate with the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs, the department of corrections, the regional support networks,
department of social and health services field offices, institutions
for mental diseases, and correctional institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---