BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Any engine coolant or antifreeze
manufactured or distributed in the state of Washington after January 1,
2010, that contains more than ten percent ethylene glycol shall contain
denatonium benzoate at a minimum of thirty parts per million and a
maximum of fifty parts per million as an aversive agent so as to render
the product unpalatable.
(2) The requirements of this section apply to manufacturers,
packagers, distributors, recyclers, or sellers of engine coolant or
antifreeze, but not to those who install engine coolant or antifreeze
for compensation.
(3) A manufacturer of a product subject to sections 1 through 3 of
this act shall maintain a record of the trade name, scientific name,
and active ingredients of any aversive used under this section. The
manufacturer shall make this information available to the public upon
request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A manufacturer, packager, distributor,
recycler, or seller of an engine coolant or antifreeze that is required
to contain an aversive agent as required by section 1 of this act shall
not be liable for any personal injury, death, property damage, damage
to the environment or a natural resource, or economic loss that results
from the inclusion of denatonium benzoate in engine coolant or
antifreeze.
(2) The limitation of liability provided in subsection (1) of this
section does not apply to a particular liability that is not caused or
is unrelated to the inclusion of denatonium benzoate in engine coolant
or antifreeze.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The requirements of sections 1 through 3 of
this act shall not apply to the sale of a motor vehicle that contains
engine coolant or antifreeze or to wholesale containers of fifty-five
gallons or more of engine coolant or antifreeze.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 19.94 RCW.

--- END ---