BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
DATA COLLECTION AND COORDINATION
Sec. 101 RCW 43.41.400 and 2007 c 401 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An education data center shall be established in the office of
financial management. The education data center shall jointly, with
the legislative ((education [evaluation])) evaluation and
accountability program committee, conduct collaborative analyses of
early learning, K-12, and higher education programs and education
issues across the P-20 system, which includes the department of early
learning, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional
educator standards board, the state board of education, the state board
for community and technical colleges, the workforce training and
education coordinating board, the higher education coordinating board,
public and private nonprofit four-year institutions of higher
education, and the employment security department. The education data
center shall conduct collaborative analyses under this section with the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and provide
data electronically to the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee, to the extent permitted by state and federal
confidentiality requirements. The education data center shall be
considered an authorized representative of the state educational
agencies in this section under applicable federal and state statutes
for purposes of accessing and compiling student record data for
research purposes.
(2) The education data center shall:
(a) Coordinate with other state education agencies to compile and
analyze education data, including data on student demographics that is
disaggregated by distinct ethnic categories within racial subgroups,
and complete P-20 research projects;
(b) Implement a common student identification number used within K-12 and higher education to track outcomes within all of higher
education and between K-12 and higher education;
(c) Collaborate with the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee and the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature in identifying the data to be compiled and analyzed to
ensure that legislative interests are served;
(((c))) (d) Track and report enrollment and outcomes either through
the public centralized higher education enrollment system or other
means that includes, but is not limited to:
(i) Application acceptance rates;
(ii) Entrance placement examination scores;
(iii) Program-specific acceptance rates;
(iv) Financial aid awards per student including loans;
(v) Freshman-to-sophomore student retention rates;
(vi) Four, five, and six-year graduation rates;
(vii) Average time to degree; and
(viii) Employment rates in general fields of study;
(((d))) (e) Assist other state educational agencies' collaborative
efforts to develop a long-range enrollment plan for higher education
including estimates to meet demographic and workforce needs; and
(((e))) (f) Provide research that focuses on student transitions
within and among the early learning, K-12, and higher education sectors
in the P-20 system.
(3) The department of early learning, superintendent of public
instruction, professional educator standards board, state board of
education, state board for community and technical colleges, workforce
training and education coordinating board, higher education
coordinating board, public four-year institutions of higher education,
and employment security department shall work with the education data
center to develop data-sharing and research agreements, consistent with
applicable security and confidentiality requirements, to facilitate the
work of the center. Private, nonprofit institutions of higher
education that provide programs of education beyond the high school
level leading at least to the baccalaureate degree and are accredited
by the Northwest association of schools and colleges or their peer
accreditation bodies may also develop data-sharing and research
agreements with the education data center, consistent with applicable
security and confidentiality requirements. The education data center
shall make data from collaborative analyses available to the education
agencies and institutions that contribute data to the education data
center to the extent allowed by federal and state security and
confidentiality requirements applicable to the data of each
contributing agency or institution.

PART 2
COST ACCOUNTING
Sec. 201 RCW 28B.76.310 and 2004 c 275 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board, in consultation with the house of representatives
and senate committees responsible for higher education, the respective
fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate, the
office of financial management, the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the state institutions of higher education,
shall develop standardized methods and protocols for measuring the
direct and indirect undergraduate and graduate educational costs for
the state universities, regional universities, and community colleges,
including but not limited to ((the costs of instruction, costs to
provide degrees in specific fields, and costs for precollege
remediation)):
(a) Cost per enrolled undergraduate and graduate student;
(b) Cost per undergraduate and graduate degree;
(c) Cost per degree by field of study;
(d) Precollege remediation costs;
(e) All financial aid and institutional aid per student;
(f) Average faculty, administrator, and classified staff salaries
including those funded by state moneys and moneys from other sources;
(g) Percentage of budget spent on faculty, administration, and
staff; and
(h) Cost per student for support services.
(2) ((By December 1, 2004, the board must propose a schedule of
regular)) Beginning December 1, 2008, and every two years thereafter,
the board shall submit cost study reports intended to meet the
information needs of the governor's office and the legislature and the
requirements of RCW 28B.76.300 ((and submit the proposed schedule)) to
the higher education and fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and the senate for their review.
(3) The institutions of higher education shall participate in the
development of cost study methods and shall provide all necessary data
in a timely fashion consistent with the board's reporting requirements
and consistent with the protocols developed.

PART 3
EFFECTIVENESS
Sec. 301 RCW 28B.76.270 and 2004 c 275 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish an accountability monitoring and
reporting system as part of a continuing effort to make meaningful and
substantial progress towards the achievement of long-term performance
goals in higher education.
(2) Based on guidelines prepared by the board, each four-year
institution and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall submit a biennial plan to achieve measurable and specific
improvements each academic year on statewide and institution-specific
performance measures. Plans shall be submitted to the board along with
the biennial budget requests from the institutions and the state board
for community and technical colleges. Performance measures established
for the community and technical colleges shall reflect the role and
mission of the colleges.
(3) The board shall approve biennial performance targets for each
four-year institution and for the community and technical college
system and shall review actual achievements annually. The state board
for community and technical colleges shall set biennial performance
targets for each college or district, where appropriate.
(4) The board shall submit a report on progress towards the
statewide goals, with recommendations for the ensuing biennium, to the
fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature along with
the board's biennial budget recommendations.
(5) The board, in collaboration with the four-year institutions and
the state board for community and technical colleges, shall
periodically review and update the accountability monitoring and
reporting system.
(6) The board shall develop measurable indicators and benchmarks
for its own performance regarding cost, quantity, ((quality,)) and
timeliness and including the performance of committees and advisory
groups convened under this chapter to accomplish such tasks as
improving transfer and articulation, improving articulation with the K-12 education system, measuring educational costs, or developing data
protocols. The board shall submit its accountability plan to the
legislature concurrently with the biennial report on institution
progress.
(7)(a) The board shall develop a consumer report card that provides
data for educational consumers to assess educational quality. The data
shall focus on the nature of the learning environment at public
institutions of higher education including, but not limited to:
(i) All data collected under RCW 43.41.400(2)(d);
(ii) Measures of student and faculty engagement including, but not
limited to, percentage of lower division classes taught by full-time
faculty, average teaching load by discipline, and class size;
(iii) Instructor qualifications;
(iv) Teaching and learning assessment practices;
(v) Faculty availability and employment status; and
(vi) Other institutional resources such as research, athletics, and
student services available.
(b) Freshman and seniors attending public baccalaureate
degree-granting institutions at least half time shall be assessed on
the scores on the collegiate learning assessment or college level
examination program tests. Freshman and senior scores shall be
included in the report card.
(c) The consumer report card shall be submitted to the higher
education and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and
senate, and made available for the public by December 15, 2009, and
every two years thereafter.

PART 4
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Part headings and captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

--- END ---