BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that machine-readable
features found on drivers' licenses and other similar government-issued
identification documents are intended to facilitate verification of
identity, not to facilitate collection of personal information to
create private databases of commercial, transactional information
associated with those individuals.
The legislature further finds that the use of machine-readable
features on government-issued identification documents for purposes
other than verification of identity, unless otherwise authorized by
law, constitutes an unreasonable infringement of privacy and is an
unfair business practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Electronically" means relating to technology having
electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or
similar capabilities.
(2) "Identification document" means any document issued by a
governmental entity containing personal information that an individual
uses to establish his or her identity as required by law.
Identification documents include drivers' licenses or identicards.
(3) "Personal information" includes any of the following: An
individual's name, address, telephone number, e-mail address, date of
birth, race, religion, ethnicity, photograph, fingerprint or other
biometric image of the individual, social security number, or any other
unique personal identifier or number assigned by state or federal
government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person or entity shall not
intentionally read or attempt to read an identification document
electronically for any purpose, unless otherwise authorized by law.
(2) This section shall not apply to the following:
(a) Reading a person's identification document in order to comply
with federal law or regulations, or state law;
(b) Reading a person's identification document in order to comply
with properly authorized civil, criminal, administrative, or regulatory
investigation or subpoena or summons by federal, state, or local
authorities;
(c) Reading a person's identification document in order to respond
to judicial process or government regulatory authorities having
jurisdiction over the person for examination, compliance, or other
purposes as authorized by law;
(d) Reading an identification document issued to a patient by
emergency services;
(e) Reading an identification document that is issued to a person
who is incarcerated in the state prison or county jail, detained in a
juvenile facility operated by the juvenile rehabilitation
administration, or to a person pursuant to court-ordered electronic
monitoring;
(f) Reading a lost identification document when the owner is
unavailable for notice, knowledge, or consent, if the reading is:
(i) Conducted by law enforcement, government personnel, or those
parties specifically authorized by law enforcement or government
personnel; and
(ii) For the limited purpose of reading a lost identification
document when the owner is unavailable for notice, knowledge, or
consent;
(g) The reading of an identification document by law enforcement
personnel who need to read a person's identification document after an
accident in which the person is unavailable for notice, knowledge, or
consent;
(h) The reading of an identification document by a person or entity
in the course of operating its own machine-readable identification
document system when the reading or collection of data is inadvertent.
(3) A violation of this section is a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---