BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
In computing tax, there may be deducted from the measure of tax,
amounts paid to or on behalf of employees as financial incentives for
physical fitness services. Employers must provide the financial
incentives to their own employees. Amounts that may be deducted under
this section include, but are not limited to, monthly dues for gym
memberships, health club memberships, fitness club memberships, or
other membership dues paid to persons engaging within this state in the
business of providing physical fitness services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---