BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No city, town, county, or district may discriminate against any
person on the basis of sex in the operation, conduct, or administration
of community athletics programs for youth or adults or in the
allocation of park and recreation facilities and resources that support
these programs. Cities, towns, counties, districts, and public school
districts shall not authorize or grant permits or other permissions to
third parties for the use of such facilities or resources for community
athletics programs if the third party's program discriminates against
any person on the basis of sex.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Community athletics program" means any athletic program that
is organized for the purposes of training for and engaging in athletic
activity and competition and that is in any way operated, conducted,
administered, supported, or enabled by a city, town, county, district,
or public school district other than those offered by the school and
created solely for the students by the school.
(b) "District" means any metropolitan park district, park and
recreation service area, or park and recreation district.
(c) "Park and recreation facilities and resources" include park
facilities, athletic fields, athletic courts, gymnasiums, recreational
rooms, restrooms, concession stands, and storage spaces; lands and
areas accessed through permitting, leasing, or other land use
arrangements, or otherwise accessed; sports and recreation equipment;
devices used to promote athletics such as scoreboards, banners, and
advertising; and the expenditure of moneys in conjunction with
athletics.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature in enacting this section
that participants shall be accorded opportunities for participation in
community athletics programs on an equal basis, both in quality and
scope, regardless of the sex of the athletes.
(4) In civil actions brought under this section or under other
applicable antidiscrimination laws alleging discrimination in community
youth athletics programs, courts shall consider the following factors,
among others, in determining whether discrimination exists:
(a) Whether the selection of community athletics programs offered
effectively accommodates the athletic interests and abilities of both
males and females;
(b) The provision of money, equipment, and supplies;
(c) Scheduling of games and practice times;
(d) Opportunities to receive coaching;
(e) Assignment and compensation of coaches and game officials;
(f) Access to lands and areas accessed through permitting, leasing,
or other land-use arrangements, or otherwise accessed;
(g) Selection of the season for a sport;
(h) Location of the games and practices;
(i) Locker rooms;
(j) Practice and competitive facilities;
(k) Publicity; and
(l) Officiation by umpires, referees, or judges who have met
training and certification standards.
(5) A court may find that a violation of a single factor listed in
subsection (4) of this section constitutes unlawful discrimination if
the resulting harms are so substantial as to deny equal participation
opportunities in community athletics programs to athletes of one sex.
(6) In making the determination under subsection (4)(a) of this
section, a court shall assess whether the community athletics program
has effectively accommodated the athletic interests and abilities of
both males and females in any one of the following ways:
(a) By showing that the community athletics program opportunities
for both males and females are provided in numbers substantially
proportionate to their respective numbers in the community;
(b) Where the members of one sex have been and continue to be
underrepresented in community athletics programs, by showing a history
and continuing practice of program expansion and allocation of
resources that are demonstrably responsive to the developing interests
and abilities of the members of that sex;
(c) Where the members of one sex are underrepresented in community
athletics programs, by demonstrating that the interests and abilities
of the members of that sex have been fully and effectively accommodated
by the present program and allocation of resources.
(7) Beginning January 1, 2018, a community athletics program may no
longer rely on subsection (6)(b) of this section to show that it has
accommodated the athletic interests and abilities of both sexes.
(8) Each city, town, county, or district operating a community
athletics program or issuing permission to a third party for the
operation of such program on its facilities shall designate at least
one employee to coordinate its efforts to comply with and carry out its
responsibilities under this section, including the investigation of any
written complaints alleging noncompliance with this section. The
employee designated under this subsection may be the same person
designated to issue permits to third-party contractors. The city,
town, county, or district operating a community athletics program shall
annually make an effort to notify its users of the name, office
address, and office telephone number of the employee or employees
appointed pursuant to this subsection, and of the rights entitled to
them under this act. Such notification shall be published on the
appropriate city, town, county, or district web site.
(9) Each city, town, county, or district operating a community
athletics program or issuing permission to a third party for the
operation of such program on its facilities shall adopt and publish
grievance procedures providing for prompt and equitable resolution of
written complaints, including complaints brought by a parent or
guardian on behalf of her or his minor child who is a participant in a
community athletics program, alleging any action that would be a
violation of this section. Public school districts issuing permission
to a third party for the operation of a community athletics program on
its facilities shall also follow the provisions of this subsection and
may modify and use existing school district policies and procedures to
the extent that is possible.
(10) This section shall not be construed to invalidate any existing
consent decree or any other settlement agreement entered into by a
city, town, county, or district to address equity in athletic programs.
(11) This section and any ordinances, regulations, or resolutions
adopted pursuant to this section by a city, town, county, district, or
public school district may be enforced against a city, town, county,
district, or public school district by a civil action for injunctive
relief or damages or both, including reasonable attorneys' fees and
costs to the prevailing party. These remedies shall be independent of
any other rights and remedies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A work group is established to study
reporting guidelines that will enable effective compliance monitoring
of community athletics programs in order to accomplish the intent of
section 1 of this act. The work group shall also study appropriate
alternate or additional remedies for violations of this section. The
chair of the house judiciary committee shall convene the work group
which shall consist of interested stakeholders, including:
Representatives from cities, towns, counties, districts, school
districts, and third-party community athletics programs that contract
to use municipal facilities and resources. The work group shall submit
a report on its findings by September 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
The antidiscrimination provisions of section 1 of this act apply to
programs and facilities operated under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.61 RCW
to read as follows:
The antidiscrimination provisions of section 1 of this act apply to
programs and facilities operated under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
The antidiscrimination provisions of section 1 of this act apply to
programs and facilities operated under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 36.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The antidiscrimination provisions of section 1 of this act apply to
programs and facilities operated under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 36.69 RCW
to read as follows:
The antidiscrimination provisions of section 1 of this act apply to
programs and facilities operated under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---