BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.475 and 2005 c 438 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the classes of employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7),
the provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.452 and 41.56.470,
41.56.480, and 41.56.490 also apply to Washington state patrol officers
appointed under RCW 43.43.020 as provided in this section, subject to
the following:
(1) Within ten working days after the first Monday in September of
every odd-numbered year, the state's bargaining representative and the
bargaining representative for the appropriate bargaining unit shall
attempt to agree on an interest arbitration panel consisting of three
members to be used if the parties are not successful in negotiating a
comprehensive collective bargaining agreement. Each party shall name
one person to serve as its arbitrator on the arbitration panel. The
two members so appointed shall meet within seven days following the
appointment of the later appointed member to attempt to choose a third
member to act as the neutral chair of the arbitration panel. Upon the
failure of the arbitrators to select a neutral chair within seven days,
the two appointed members shall use one of the two following options in
the appointment of the third member, who shall act as chair of the
panel: (a) By mutual consent, the two appointed members may jointly
request the commission to, and the commission shall, appoint a third
member within two days of such a request. Costs of each party's
appointee shall be borne by each party respectively; other costs of the
arbitration proceedings shall be borne by the commission; or (b) either
party may apply to the commission, the federal mediation and
conciliation service, or the American arbitration association to
provide a list of five qualified arbitrators from which the neutral
chair shall be chosen. Each party shall pay the fees and expenses of
its arbitrator, and the fees and expenses of the neutral chair shall be
shared equally between the parties. Immediately upon selecting an
interest arbitration panel, the parties shall cooperate to reserve
dates with the arbitration panel for potential arbitration between
August 1st and September 15th of the following even-numbered year. The
parties shall also prepare a schedule of at least five negotiation
dates for the following year, absent an agreement to the contrary. The
parties shall execute a written agreement before November 1st of each
odd-numbered year setting forth the names of the members of the
arbitration panel and the dates reserved for bargaining and
arbitration. This subsection imposes minimum obligations only and is
not intended to define or limit a party's full, good faith bargaining
obligation under other sections of this chapter.
(2) The mediator or arbitration panel may consider only matters
that are subject to bargaining under RCW 41.56.473.
(((2))) (3) The decision of an arbitration panel is not binding on
the legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the funds
necessary to implement provisions pertaining to wages and wage-related
matters of an arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, is not
binding on the state or the Washington state patrol.
(((3))) (4) In making its determination, the arbitration panel
shall be mindful of the legislative purpose enumerated in RCW 41.56.430
and, as additional standards or guidelines to aid it in reaching a
decision, shall take into consideration the following factors:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) Stipulations of the parties;
(c) Comparison of the hours and conditions of employment of
personnel involved in the proceedings with the hours and conditions of
employment of like personnel of like employers of similar size on the
west coast of the United States;
(d) Changes in any of the foregoing circumstances during the
pendency of the proceedings; and
(e) Such other factors, not confined to the foregoing, which are
normally or traditionally taken into consideration in the determination
of matters that are subject to bargaining under RCW 41.56.473.

--- END ---