BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that because of the
decision in Utter v. DSHS, 165 P.3d 399 (Wash. 2007), there is
unintended ambiguity about the authority of the secretary of the
department of social and health services under the criminal procedure
act to seek reimbursement from defendants under RCW 10.77.250 who are
committed for competency evaluation and mental health treatment under
RCW 10.77.060 and 10.77.084, and the general provision prohibiting a
criminal defendant from being charged for prosecution related costs
prior to conviction provided in RCW 10.01.160. Mental health
evaluation and treatment, and other medical treatment relate entirely
to the medically necessary care that defendants receive at state
hospitals and other facilities. The legislature intended for treatment
costs to be the responsibility of the defendant's insurers and
ultimately the defendant based on their ability to pay, and it is
permissible under chapters 10.77, 70.48, and 43.20B RCW for the state
and other governmental units to assess financial liability on
defendants who become patients and receive medical and mental health
care. The legislature further finds that it intended that a court
order staying criminal proceedings under RCW 10.77.084, and committing
a defendant to the custody of the secretary of the department of social
and health services for placement in an appropriate facility involve
costs payable by the defendant, because the commitment primarily and
directly benefits the defendant through treatment of their medical and
mental health conditions. The legislature did not intend for medical
and mental health services provided to a defendant in the custody of a
governmental unit, and the associated costs, to be costs related to the
prosecution of the defendant. Thus, if a court orders a stay of the
criminal proceeding under RCW 10.77.084 and orders commitment to the
custody of the secretary, or if at any time a defendant receives other
medical care while in custody of a governmental unit, but prior to
conviction, the costs associated with such care shall be the
responsibility of the defendant and the defendant's insurers as
provided in chapters 10.77, 70.48, and 43.20B RCW. The intent of the
legislature is to clarify this reimbursement requirement, and the
purpose of this act is to make retroactive, remedial, curative, and
technical amendments in order to resolve any ambiguity about the
legislature's intent in enacting these chapters.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.01.160 and 2007 c 367 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court may require a defendant to pay costs. Costs may be
imposed only upon a convicted defendant, except for costs imposed upon
a defendant's entry into a deferred prosecution program, costs imposed
upon a defendant for pretrial supervision, or costs imposed upon a
defendant for preparing and serving a warrant for failure to appear.
(2) Costs shall be limited to expenses specially incurred by the
state in prosecuting the defendant or in administering the deferred
prosecution program under chapter 10.05 RCW or pretrial supervision.
They cannot include expenses inherent in providing a constitutionally
guaranteed jury trial or expenditures in connection with the
maintenance and operation of government agencies that must be made by
the public irrespective of specific violations of law. Expenses
incurred for serving of warrants for failure to appear and jury fees
under RCW 10.46.190 may be included in costs the court may require a
defendant to pay. Costs for administering a deferred prosecution or
pretrial supervision may not exceed one hundred fifty dollars. Costs
for preparing and serving a warrant for failure to appear may not
exceed one hundred dollars. Costs of incarceration imposed on a
defendant convicted of a misdemeanor or a gross misdemeanor may not
exceed the actual cost of incarceration. In no case may the court
require the offender to pay more than one hundred dollars per day for
the cost of incarceration. Payment of other court-ordered financial
obligations, including all legal financial obligations and costs of
supervision take precedence over the payment of the cost of
incarceration ordered by the court. All funds received from defendants
for the cost of incarceration in the county or city jail must be
remitted for criminal justice purposes to the county or city that is
responsible for the defendant's jail costs. Costs imposed constitute
a judgment against a defendant and survive a dismissal of the
underlying action against the defendant. However, if the defendant is
acquitted on the underlying action, the costs for preparing and serving
a warrant for failure to appear do not survive the acquittal, and the
judgment that such costs would otherwise constitute shall be vacated.
(3) The court shall not order a defendant to pay costs unless the
defendant is or will be able to pay them. In determining the amount
and method of payment of costs, the court shall take account of the
financial resources of the defendant and the nature of the burden that
payment of costs will impose.
(4) A defendant who has been ordered to pay costs and who is not in
contumacious default in the payment thereof may at any time petition
the sentencing court for remission of the payment of costs or of any
unpaid portion thereof. If it appears to the satisfaction of the court
that payment of the amount due will impose manifest hardship on the
defendant or the defendant's immediate family, the court may remit all
or part of the amount due in costs, or modify the method of payment
under RCW 10.01.170.
(5) Except for direct costs relating to evaluating and reporting to
the court, prosecutor, or defense counsel regarding a defendant's
competency to stand trial as provided in RCW 10.77.060, this section
shall not apply to costs related to medical or mental health treatment
or services a defendant receives while in custody of the secretary of
the department of social and health services or other governmental
units. This section shall not prevent the secretary of the department
of social and health services or other governmental units from imposing
liability and seeking reimbursement from a defendant committed to an
appropriate facility as provided in RCW 10.77.084 while criminal
proceedings are stayed. This section shall also not prevent
governmental units from imposing liability on defendants for costs
related to providing medical or mental health treatment while the
defendant is in the governmental unit's custody. Medical or mental
health treatment and services a defendant receives at a state hospital
or other facility are not a cost of prosecution and shall be
recoverable under RCW 10.77.250 and 70.48.130, chapter 43.20B RCW, and
any other applicable statute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---