BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.320 and 2005 c 274 s 412 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following educational information is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter:
(1) Financial disclosures filed by private vocational schools under
chapters 28B.85 and 28C.10 RCW;
(2) Financial and commercial information supplied by or on behalf
of a person, firm, corporation, or entity under chapter 28B.95 RCW
relating to the purchase or sale of tuition units and contracts for the
purchase of multiple tuition units;
(3) Individually identifiable information received by the workforce
training and education coordinating board for research or evaluation
purposes; ((and))
(4) Except for public records as defined in RCW ((40.14.040))
40.14.010, any records or documents obtained by a state college,
university, library, or archive through or concerning any gift, grant,
conveyance, bequest, or devise, the terms of which restrict or regulate
public access to those records or documents; and
(5) The annual declaration of intent filed by parents under RCW
28A.200.010 for a child to receive home-based instruction.

--- END ---