BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
Except as provided in this section, school districts are prohibited
from advertising, marketing, and otherwise providing unsolicited
information about learning programs offered by the school district,
including but not limited to digital learning programs, part-time
enrollment opportunities, and other alternative learning programs, to
parents who have filed a declaration of intent to cause a child to
receive home-based instruction under RCW 28A.200.010. School districts
may respond to requests for information that are initiated by a parent.
Once, on an annual basis, school districts may send a fact sheet to
parents who have filed a declaration of intent that lists the ancillary
services available for students receiving home-based instruction, such
as counseling, psychological services, testing, remedial instruction,
speech and hearing therapy, health care services, and sports
activities. This section does not apply to general mailings or
newsletters sent by the school district to all households in the
district.

--- END ---