BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.13.450 and 2000 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 48.13.450
through 48.13.475 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agent" means a national bank, state bank, trust company, or
broker/dealer that maintains an account in its name in a clearing
corporation or that is a member of the federal reserve system and
through which a custodian participates in a clearing corporation,
including the treasury/reserve automated debt entry securities system
(TRADES) or treasury direct systems; except that with respect to
securities issued by institutions organized or existing under the laws
of a foreign country or securities used to meet the deposit
requirements pursuant to laws of a foreign country as a condition of
doing business therein, "agent" may include a corporation that is
organized or existing under the laws of a foreign country and that is
legally qualified under those laws to accept custody of securities.
(2) "Broker/dealer" means a broker or dealer as defined in RCW
62A.8-102(1)(c), that is registered with and subject to the
jurisdiction of the securities and exchange commission, maintains
membership in the securities investor protection corporation, and has
a tangible net worth equal to or greater than two hundred fifty million
dollars.
(((2))) (3) "Clearing corporation" means a ((depository))
corporation ((which maintains a book entry accounting system and which
meets the requirements of)) as defined in RCW 62A.8-102(1)(e) that is
organized for the purpose of effecting transactions in securities by
computerized book-entry, except that with respect to securities issued
by institutions organized or existing under the laws of any foreign
country or securities used to meet the deposit requirements pursuant to
the laws of a foreign country as a condition of doing business therein,
"clearing corporation" may include a corporation that is organized or
existing under the laws of any foreign country and is legally qualified
under such laws to effect transactions in securities by computerized
book-entry. "Clearing corporation" also includes treasury/reserve
automated debt entry securities system and treasury direct book-entry
securities systems established pursuant to 31 U.S.C. Sec. 3100 et seq.,
12 U.S.C. pt. 391, and 5 U.S.C. pt. 301.
(((3))) (4) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of the
state of Washington.
(((4) "Federal reserve book-entry securities system" means the
computerized systems sponsored by the United States department of the
treasury and certain agencies and instrumentalities of the United
States for holding and transferring securities of the United States
government and such agencies and instrumentalities, respectively, and
managed by the federal reserve system for participating financial
institutions.
(5) "Participating financial institution" means a depositary
financial institution such as a national bank, state bank, savings and
loan, credit union, or trust company that is:
(a) Authorized to participate in the federal reserve book-entry
system; and
(b) Licensed by the United States or the banking authorities in its
state of domicile and is regularly examined by the licensing authority.
(6) "Qualified)) (5) "Custodian" means ((either a participating
financial institution or a clearing corporation, or both. A qualified
custodian does not include a broker)):
(a) A national bank, state bank, or trust company that shall, at
all times acting as a custodian, be no less than adequately capitalized
as determined by the standards adopted by United States banking
regulators and that is regulated by either state banking laws or is a
member of the federal reserve system and that is legally qualified to
accept custody of securities; except that with respect to securities
issued by institutions organized or existing under the laws of a
foreign country, or securities used to meet the deposit requirements
pursuant to laws of a foreign country as a condition of doing business
therein, "custodian" may include a bank or trust company incorporated
or organized under the laws of a country other than the United States
that is regulated as such by that country's government or an agency
thereof that shall at all times acting as a custodian be no less than
adequately capitalized as determined by the standards adopted by the
international banking authorities and legally qualified to accept
custody of securities; or
(b) A broker/dealer.
(6) "Custodied securities" means securities held by the custodian
or its agent or in a clearing corporation, including the
treasury/reserve automated debt equity securities system (TRADES) or
treasury direct systems.
(7) "Securities" means instruments as defined in RCW 62A.8-102(1)(o).
(8) "Securities certificate" has the same meaning as in RCW
62A.8-102(1)(d).
(9) "Tangible net worth" means shareholders equity, less intangible
assets, as reported in the broker/dealer's most recent annual or
transition report pursuant to section 13 or 15(d) of the securities
exchange act of 1934 (S.E.C. Form 10-K) filed with the securities and
exchange commission.
(10) "Treasury/reserve automated debt entry securities system"
("TRADES") and "treasury direct" mean book-entry securities systems
established pursuant to 31 U.S.C. Sec. 3100 et seq., 12 U.S.C. pt. 391,
and 5 U.S.C. pt. 301, with the operation of TRADES and treasury direct
subject to 31 C.F.R. pt. 357 et seq.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.13.455 and 2000 c 221 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a domestic insurance
company may deposit or arrange for the deposit of securities held in or
purchased for its general account and its separate accounts in a
clearing corporation ((or the federal reserve book-entry securities
system)). When securities are deposited with a clearing corporation,
securities certificates representing securities of the same class of
the same issuer may be merged and held in bulk in the name of the
nominee of such clearing corporation with any other securities
deposited with such clearing corporation by any person, regardless of
the ownership of such securities, and securities certificates
representing securities of small denominations may be merged into one
or more certificates of larger denominations. The records of any
((participating financial institution)) custodian through which an
insurance company holds securities ((in the federal reserve book-entry
securities system, and the records of any custodian banks through which
an insurance company holds securities in a clearing corporation,))
shall at all times show that such securities are held for such
insurance company and for which accounts thereof. Ownership of, and
other interests in, such securities may be transferred by bookkeeping
entry on the books of such clearing corporation ((or in the federal
reserve book-entry securities system)) without((, in either case,))
physical delivery of securities certificates representing such
securities.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.13.460 and 2000 c 221 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following are the only authorized methods of holding
securities:
(1) A domestic insurance company may hold securities in definitive
certificates;
(2) A domestic insurance company may, pursuant to an agreement,
designate a ((participating financial institution or institutions as
its)) custodian through which it can transact and maintain book-entry
securities on behalf of the insurance company; or
(3) A domestic insurance company may, pursuant to an agreement,
participate in depository systems of clearing corporations directly or
through a custodian ((bank)).

Sec. 4 RCW 48.13.465 and 2000 c 221 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A domestic insurance company using the methods of holding
securities under RCW 48.13.460 (2) or (3) is required to receive a
confirmation from:
(1) The ((participating financial institution or the qualified))
custodian whenever securities are received or surrendered pursuant to
the domestic insurance company's instructions to a securities broker;
or
(2) The securities broker provided that the domestic insurance
company has given the ((participating financial institution or
qualified)) custodian and the securities broker matching instructions
authorizing the transaction, which have been confirmed by the
((participating financial institution or qualified)) custodian prior to
surrendering funds or securities to conduct the transaction.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.13.475 and 2000 c 221 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the maintenance of securities with a
((qualified)) custodian pursuant to agreement, if the commissioner:
(a) Has reasonable cause to believe that the domestic insurer:
(i) Is conducting its business and affairs in such a manner as to
threaten to render it insolvent;
(ii) Is in a hazardous condition or is conducting its business and
affairs in a manner that is hazardous to its policyholders, creditors,
or the public; or
(iii) Has committed or is committing or has engaged or is engaging
in any act that would constitute grounds for rendering it subject to
rehabilitation or liquidation proceedings; or
(b) Determines that irreparable loss and injury to the property and
business of the domestic insurer has occurred or may occur unless the
commissioner acts immediately;
then the commissioner may, without hearing, order the insurer and the
((qualified)) custodian promptly to effect the transfer of the
securities to another ((qualified)) custodian approved by the
commissioner. Upon receipt of the order, the ((qualified)) custodian
shall promptly effect the transfer of the securities. Notwithstanding
the pendency of any hearing or request for hearing, the order shall be
complied with by those persons subject to that order. Any challenge to
the validity of the order shall be made under chapter 48.04 RCW,
however, the stay of action provisions of RCW 48.04.020 do not apply.
It is the responsibility of both the insurer and the ((qualified))
custodian to oversee that compliance with the order is completed as
expeditiously as possible. Upon receipt of an order, there shall be no
trading of the securities without specific instructions from the
commissioner until the securities are received by the new ((qualified))
custodian, except to the extent trading transactions are in process on
the day the order is received by the insurer and the failure to
complete the trade may result in loss to the insurer's account.
Issuance of an order does not affect the ((qualified)) custodian's
liabilities with regard to the securities that are the subject of the
order.
(2) No person other than the insurer has standing at the hearing by
the commissioner or for any judicial review of the order.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.13.490 and 2000 c 221 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commissioner may adopt rules ((to implement and administer RCW
48.13.450 through 48.13.475)) governing the deposit by insurance
companies of securities with clearing corporations, including
establishing standards for national banks, state banks, trust
companies, and brokers/dealers to qualify as custodians for insurance
company securities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 48.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An insurance company may, by written agreement with a
custodian, provide for the custody of its securities with that
custodian. The securities that are the subject of the agreement may be
held by the custodian or its agent or in a clearing corporation.
(2) The agreement shall be in writing and shall be authorized by a
resolution of the board of directors of the insurance company or of an
authorized committee of the board. The terms of the agreement shall
comply with the following:
(a) Securities certificates held by the custodian shall be held
separate from the securities certificates of the custodian and all of
its customers;
(b) Securities held indirectly by the custodian and securities in
a clearing corporation shall be separately identified on the
custodian's official records as being owned by the insurance company.
The records shall identify which securities are held by the custodian
or by its agent and which securities are in a clearing corporation. If
the securities are in a clearing corporation, the records shall also
identify where the securities are and the name of the clearing
corporation; and if the securities are held by an agent, the records
shall also identify the name of the agent;
(c) All custodied securities that are registered shall be
registered in the name of the company or in the name of the nominee of
the company or in the name of the custodian or its nominee, or, if in
a clearing corporation, in the name of the clearing corporation or its
nominee;
(d) Custodied securities shall be held subject to the instructions
of the insurance company and shall be withdrawable upon the demand of
the insurance company, except custodied securities used to meet the
deposit requirements;
(e) The custodian shall be required to send or cause to be sent to
the insurance company a confirmation of all transfers of custodied
securities to or from the account of the insurance company.
Confirmation of all transfers shall be provided to the insurance
company in hard copy or electronic format. In addition, the custodian
shall be required to furnish, no less than monthly, the insurance
company with reports of various holdings of custodied securities at
times and containing information reasonably requested by the insurance
company. The custodian's trust committee's annual reports of its
review of the insurer trust accounts shall also be provided to the
insurer. Reports and verifications may be transmitted in electronic or
paper format;
(f) During the course of the custodian's regular business hours, an
officer or employee of the insurance company, an independent accountant
selected by the insurance company, and a representative of an
appropriate regulatory body shall be entitled to examine, on the
premise of the custodian, the custodian's records relating to the
custodied securities, but only upon furnishing the custodian with
written instructions to that effect from an appropriate officer of the
insurance company;
(g) The custodian and its agents shall be required to send to the
insurance company:
(i) All reports that they receive from a clearing corporation on
their respective systems of internal accounting control; and
(ii) Reports prepared by outside auditors on the custodians or its
agents internal accounting control of custodied securities that the
insurance company may reasonably request;
(h) The custodian shall maintain records sufficient to determine
and verify information relating to custodied securities that may be
reported in the insurance company's annual statement and supporting
schedules and information required in an audit of the financial
statements of the insurance company;
(i) The custodian shall provide, upon written request from an
appropriate officer of the insurance company, the appropriate
affidavits;
(j) A national bank, state bank, or trust company shall secure and
maintain insurance protection in an adequate amount covering the bank's
or trust company's duties and activities as custodian for the insurer's
assets, and shall state in the custody agreement that the protection is
in compliance with the requirements of the custodian's banking
regulator. A broker/dealer shall secure and maintain insurance
protection for each insurance company's custodied securities in excess
of that provided by the securities investor protection corporation in
an amount equal to or greater than the market value of each respective
insurance company's custodied securities. The commissioner may
determine whether the type of insurance is appropriate and whether the
amount of coverage is adequate;
(k) The custodian shall be obligated to indemnify the insurance
company for any loss of custodied securities occasioned by the
negligence or dishonesty of the custodian's officers or employees or
agents, or burglary, robbery, holdup, theft, or mysterious
disappearance, including loss by damage or destruction;
(l) In the event that there is a loss of custodied securities for
which the custodian shall be obligated to indemnify the insurance
company as provided in (k) of this subsection, the custodian shall
promptly replace the securities of the value thereof and the value of
any loss of rights or privileges resulting from the loss of securities;
(m) The custodian will not be liable for a failure to take an
action required under the agreement in the event and to the extent that
the taking of the action is prevented or delayed by war (whether
declared or not, including existing wars), revolution, insurrection,
riot, civil commotion, accident, fire, explosion, labor stoppage and
strikes, laws, regulations, orders, or other acts of any governmental
authority, which are beyond its reasonable control;
(n) In the event that the custodian gains entry in a clearing
corporation through an agent, there shall be an agreement between the
custodian and the agent under which the agent shall be subject to the
same liability for loss of custodied securities as the custodian.
However, if the agent is subject to regulation under the laws of a
jurisdiction that are different from the laws of the jurisdiction that
regulates the custodian, the commissioner may accept a standard of
liability applicable to the agent that is different from the standard
of liability applicable to the custodian;
(o) The custodian shall provide written notification to the office
of the insurance commissioner if the custodial agreement with the
insurer has been terminated or if one hundred percent of the account
assets in any one custody account have been withdrawn. This
notification shall be remitted to the commissioner within three
business days of the withdrawal of one hundred percent of the account
assets.

--- END ---