BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.421 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of part E of this chapter is to determine nursing
facility medicaid payment rates that, in the aggregate for all
participating nursing facilities, are in accordance with the biennial
appropriations act.
(2)(a) The department shall use the nursing facility medicaid
payment rate methodologies described in this chapter to determine
initial component rate allocations for each medicaid nursing facility.
(b) The initial component rate allocations shall be subject to
adjustment as provided in this section in order to assure that the
statewide average payment rate to nursing facilities is less than or
equal to the statewide average payment rate specified in the biennial
appropriations act.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as creating a legal
right or entitlement to any payment that (a) has not been adjusted
under this section or (b) would cause the statewide average payment
rate to exceed the statewide average payment rate specified in the
biennial appropriations act.
(4)(a) The statewide average payment rate for any state fiscal year
under the nursing facility payment system, weighted by patient days,
shall not exceed the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility
payment rate identified for that fiscal year in the biennial
appropriations act.
(b) If the department determines that the weighted average nursing
facility payment rate calculated in accordance with this chapter is
likely to exceed the weighted average nursing facility payment rate
identified in the biennial appropriations act, then the department
shall adjust all nursing facility payment rates proportional to the
amount by which the weighted average rate allocations would otherwise
exceed the budgeted rate amount. Any such adjustments for the current
fiscal year shall only be made prospectively, not retrospectively, and
shall be applied proportionately to each component rate allocation for
each facility.
(c) If any final order or final judgment, including a final order
or final judgment resulting from an adjudicative proceeding or judicial
review permitted by chapter 34.05 RCW, affects a nursing facility's
payment rate for a prior fiscal year or years, the department shall
retrospectively adjust payment rates for such fiscal year or years to
the extent necessary to comply with this section. The department shall
consider the payment rates for all nursing facilities for such fiscal
year or years in determining whether the statewide weighted average
payment rate for such fiscal year or years would be exceeded as a
result of the final order or final judgment. However, in making
retrospective adjustments to comply with this subsection, the
department shall adjust the payment rate or rates for the fiscal year
or years in question of only the nursing facility or facilities
affected by the final order or final judgment.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.431 and 2007 c 508 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations shall be facility-specific and shall have seven components:
Direct care, therapy care, support services, operations, property,
financing allowance, and variable return. The department shall
establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing
facility in this state.
(2) Component rate allocations in therapy care, support services,
variable return, operations, property, and financing allowance for
essential community providers as defined in this chapter shall be based
upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed
beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use. For all
facilities other than essential community providers, effective July 1,
2001, component rate allocations in direct care, therapy care, support
services, and variable return((, operations, property, and financing
allowance)) shall ((continue to)) be based upon a minimum facility
occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds. For all facilities
other than essential community providers, effective July 1, 2002, the
component rate allocations in operations, property, and financing
allowance shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of ninety
percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in
use. For all facilities, effective July 1, 2006, the component rate
allocation in direct care shall be based upon actual facility
occupancy. The median cost limits used to set component rate
allocations shall be based on the applicable minimum occupancy
percentage. In determining each facility's therapy care component rate
allocation under RCW 74.46.511, the department shall apply the
applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the
array of facilities' adjusted therapy costs per adjusted resident day.
In determining each facility's support services component rate
allocation under RCW 74.46.515(3), the department shall apply the
applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the
array of facilities' adjusted support services costs per adjusted
resident day. In determining each facility's operations component rate
allocation under RCW 74.46.521(3), the department shall apply the
minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the array of
facilities' adjusted general operations costs per adjusted resident
day.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, direct care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2006, direct care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report
data from 2003 will be used for July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
direct care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from
2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009, direct care
component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009, the direct care
component rate allocation shall be rebased biennially, and thereafter
for each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, using the adjusted cost
report data for the calendar year two years immediately preceding the
rate rebase period, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar year
2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, and so forth.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1996 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(c) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1999 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(d) Direct care component rate allocations based on 2003 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 2006, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(e) Direct care component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2005, therapy care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report
data from 1999 will continue to be used for July 1, 2005, through June
30, 2007, therapy care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost
report data from 2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2009, therapy care component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009,
and thereafter for each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, the
therapy care component rate allocation shall be cost rebased
biennially, using the adjusted cost report data for the calendar year
two years immediately preceding the rate rebase period, so that
adjusted cost report data for calendar year 2007 is used for July 1,
2009, through June 30, 2011, and so forth.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October
1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July
1, 2001, through June 30, 2005, support services component rate
allocations. Adjusted cost report data from 1999 will continue to be
used for July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007, support services
component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from 2005 will
be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009, support services
component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009, and thereafter for
each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, the support services
component rate allocation shall be cost rebased biennially, using the
adjusted cost report data for the calendar year two years immediately
preceding the rate rebase period, so that adjusted cost report data for
calendar year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, and
so forth.
(b) Support services component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, operations component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2006, operations component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data
from 2003 will be used for July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
operations component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from
2005 will be used for July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009, operations
component rate allocations. Effective July 1, 2009, and thereafter for
each odd-numbered year beginning July 1st, the operations component
rate allocation shall be cost rebased biennially, using the adjusted
cost report data for the calendar year two years immediately preceding
the rate rebase period, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar
year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, and so
forth.
(b) Operations component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act. A different economic
trends and conditions adjustment factor or factors may be defined in
the biennial appropriations act for facilities whose operations
component rate is set equal to their adjusted June 30, 2006, rate, as
provided in RCW 74.46.521(4).
(8) For July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, a facility's
property and return on investment component rates shall be the
facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on investment component
rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999,
a facility's property and return on investment component rates shall be
rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.
(9) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(10) Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum
wage of the greater of the state minimum wage or the federal minimum
wage.
(11) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: The need to prorate inflation for
partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing
facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded
new bed capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of
ownership of the nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or
converting beds back into service, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(12) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(13) Effective July 1, 2001, medicaid rates shall continue to be
revised downward in all components, in accordance with department
rules, for facilities converting banked beds to active service under
chapter 70.38 RCW, by using the facility's increased licensed bed
capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting. However,
for facilities other than essential community providers which bank beds
under chapter 70.38 RCW, after May 25, 2001, medicaid rates shall be
revised upward, in accordance with department rules, in direct care,
therapy care, support services, and variable return components only, by
using the facility's decreased licensed bed capacity to recalculate
minimum occupancy for rate setting, but no upward revision shall be
made to operations, property, or financing allowance component rates.
The direct care component rate allocation shall be adjusted, without
using the minimum occupancy assumption, for facilities that convert
banked beds to active service, under chapter 70.38 RCW, beginning on
July 1, 2006.
(14) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of
need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have
a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and
(b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to
be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate
allocation.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.46.511 and 2007 c 508 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The therapy care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of medicaid one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified
therapist as defined in this chapter, including therapy supplies and
therapy consultation, for one day for one medicaid resident of a
nursing facility. The therapy care component rate allocation for
October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, shall be based on adjusted
therapy costs and days from calendar year 1996. The therapy component
rate allocation for July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2007, shall be based
on adjusted therapy costs and days from calendar year 1999. Effective
July 1, 2007, the therapy care component rate allocation shall be based
on adjusted therapy costs and days as described in RCW 74.46.431(5).
The therapy care component rate shall be adjusted for economic trends
and conditions as specified in RCW 74.46.431(5), and shall be
determined in accordance with this section. In determining each
facility's therapy care component rate allocation, the department shall
apply the applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before
creating the array of facilities' adjusted therapy care costs per
adjusted resident day.
(2) In rebasing, as provided in RCW 74.46.431(5)(a), the department
shall take from the cost reports of facilities the following reported
information:
(a) Direct one-on-one therapy charges for all residents by payer
including charges for supplies;
(b) The total units or modules of therapy care for all residents by
type of therapy provided, for example, speech or physical. A unit or
module of therapy care is considered to be fifteen minutes of one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified therapist or support personnel; and
(c) Therapy consulting expenses for all residents.
(3) The department shall determine for all residents the total cost
per unit of therapy for each type of therapy by dividing the total
adjusted one-on-one therapy expense for each type by the total units
provided for that therapy type.
(4) The department shall divide medicaid nursing facilities in this
state into two peer groups:
(a) Those facilities located within urban counties; and
(b) Those located within nonurban counties.
The department shall array the facilities in each peer group from
highest to lowest based on their total cost per unit of therapy for
each therapy type. The department shall determine the median total
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type and add ten percent of
median total cost per unit of therapy. The cost per unit of therapy
for each therapy type at a nursing facility shall be the lesser of its
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type or the median total cost
per unit plus ten percent for each therapy type for its peer group.
(5) The department shall calculate each nursing facility's therapy
care component rate allocation as follows:
(a) To determine the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy
type, the allowable cost per unit of therapy for each type of therapy
shall be multiplied by the total therapy units for each type of
therapy;
(b) The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense shall be
calculated taking the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy
type times the medicaid percent of total therapy charges for each
therapy type;
(c) The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense for each
therapy type shall be divided by total adjusted medicaid days to arrive
at the medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each
therapy type;
(d) The medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each
therapy type shall be multiplied by total adjusted patient days for all
residents to calculate the total allowable one-on-one therapy expense.
The lesser of the total allowable therapy consultant expense for the
therapy type or a reasonable percentage of allowable therapy consultant
expense for each therapy type, as established in rule by the
department, shall be added to the total allowable one-on-one therapy
expense to determine the allowable therapy cost for each therapy type;
(e) The allowable therapy cost for each therapy type shall be added
together, the sum of which shall be the total allowable therapy expense
for the nursing facility;
(f) The total allowable therapy expense will be divided by the
greater of adjusted total patient days from the cost report on which
the therapy expenses were reported, or patient days at eighty-five
percent occupancy of licensed beds. The outcome shall be the nursing
facility's therapy care component rate allocation.
(6) The therapy care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) The therapy care component rate shall be suspended for medicaid
residents in qualified nursing facilities designated by the department
who are receiving therapy paid by the department outside the facility
daily rate under RCW 74.46.508(2).

Sec. 4 RCW 74.46.515 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 12 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The support services component rate allocation corresponds to
the provision of food, food preparation, dietary, housekeeping, and
laundry services for one resident for one day.
(2) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine each
medicaid nursing facility's support services component rate allocation
using cost report data specified by RCW 74.46.431(6).
(3) To determine each facility's support services component rate
allocation, the department shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted support services costs per adjusted
resident day, as determined by dividing each facility's total allowable
support services costs by its adjusted resident days for the same
report period, increased if necessary to a minimum occupancy provided
by RCW 74.46.431(2), for each facility from facilities' cost reports
from the applicable report year, for facilities located within urban
counties, and for those located within nonurban counties and determine
the median adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's support services component rate at the
lower of the facility's per resident day adjusted support services
costs from the applicable cost report period or the adjusted median per
resident day support services cost for that facility's peer group,
either urban counties or nonurban counties, plus ten percent; and
(c) Adjust each facility's support services component rate for
economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(6).
(4) The support services component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The legislature clarifies the enactment of
chapter 8, Laws of 2001 1st sp. sess. and intends this act be curative,
remedial, and retrospectively applicable to July 1, 1998.

--- END ---