BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.180 and 2006 c 212 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this chapter, any city,
county, or other political subdivision of this state, or any state
agency, may regulate the operation of nonhighway vehicles on public
lands, waters, and other properties under its jurisdiction, and on
streets, roads, or highways within its boundaries by adopting
regulations or ordinances of its governing body, provided such
regulations are not less stringent than the provisions of this chapter.
((However,)) The legislative body of a city ((with a population of less
than three thousand persons)) may, by ordinance, designate a street or
highway within its boundaries to be suitable for use by off-road
vehicles. The legislative body of a county may, by ordinance,
designate a road or highway within its boundaries to be suitable for
use by off-road vehicles ((if the road or highway is a direct
connection between a city with a population of less than three thousand
persons and an off-road vehicle recreation facility)).

--- END ---