BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any retired firefighter married to a spouse ineligible for
survivor benefits under RCW 41.18.040, 41.18.080, and 41.18.100 may
choose an actuarially equivalent benefit adopted by the board that pays
the retired firefighter a reduced retirement allowance, and upon death
such portion of the retired firefighter's reduced retirement allowance
as designated by the retired firefighter shall be continued throughout
the life of the spouse.
(2) A retired firefighter who married a spouse ineligible for
survivor benefits under RCW 41.18.040, 41.18.080, and 41.18.100 prior
to the effective date of this section has one year after the effective
date of this section to designate their spouse as a survivor
beneficiary.
(3) The benefit provided to a child survivor beneficiary under RCW
41.18.040, 41.18.080, and 41.18.100 shall not be affected or reduced by
the retired firefighter's selection of the actuarially reduced spousal
survivor benefit provided by this section, and shall be equivalent to
the amount payable as if the choice under subsection (1) of this
section was not made.
(4)(a) Any retired firefighter who chose to receive a reduced
retirement allowance under subsection (1) of this section is entitled
to receive a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of
this subsection if:
(i) The retiree's survivor spouse designated in subsection (1) of
this section predeceases the retiree; and
(ii) The retiree provides to the board proper proof of the
designated beneficiary's death.
(b) The retirement allowance payable to the retiree from the
beginning of the month following the date of the beneficiary's death
shall be the current monthly amount payable as if the selection under
subsection (1) of this section was not made.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.18.080 and 2007 c 218 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any firefighter who has completed his or her probationary period
and has been permanently appointed, and sustains a disability not in
the performance of his or her duty which renders him or her unable to
continue his or her service, may request to be retired by filing a
written request with his or her retirement board within sixty days from
the date of his or her disability. The board may, upon such request
being filed, consult such medical advice as it deems fit and proper.
If the board finds the firefighter capable of performing his or her
duties, it may refuse to recommend retirement and order the firefighter
back to duty. If no request for retirement has been received after the
expiration of sixty days from the date of his or her disability, the
board may recommend retirement of the firefighter. The board shall
give the firefighter a thirty-day written notice of its recommendation,
and he or she shall be retired upon expiration of said notice. Upon
retirement he or she shall receive a pension equal to fifty percent of
his or her basic salary. For a period of ninety days following such
disability the firefighter shall receive an allowance from the fund
equal to his or her basic salary. He or she shall during said ninety
days be provided with such medical, hospital, and nursing care as the
board deems proper. No funds shall be expended for such disability if
the board determines that the firefighter was gainfully employed or
engaged for compensation in other than fire department duty when the
disability occurred, or if such disability was the result of
dissipation or abuse. Whenever any firefighter shall die as a result
of a disability sustained not in the line of duty, his widow or her
widower shall receive a monthly pension equal to one-third of his or
her basic salary ((until remarried)); if such widow or widower has
dependent upon her or him for support a child or children of such
deceased firefighter, he or she shall receive an additional pension as
follows: One child, one-eighth of the deceased's basic salary; two
children, one-seventh; three or more children, one-sixth. If there be
no widow or widower, monthly payments equal to one-third of the
deceased firefighter's basic salary shall be made to his or her child
or children. The widow or widower may elect at any time in writing to
receive a cash settlement, and if the board after hearing finds it
financially beneficial to the pension fund, he or she may receive the
sum of five thousand dollars cash in lieu of all future monthly pension
payments, and other benefits, including benefits to any child and/or
children.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.18.100 and 2007 c 218 s 51 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the event a firefighter is killed in the performance of duty, or
in the event a firefighter retired on account of service connected
disability shall die from any cause, his widow or her widower shall
receive a monthly pension under one of the following applicable
provisions: (1) If a firefighter is killed in the line of duty his
widow or her widower shall receive a monthly pension equal to fifty
percent of his or her basic salary at the time of his or her death; (2)
if a firefighter who has retired on account of a service connected
disability dies, his widow or her widower shall receive a monthly
pension equal to the amount of the monthly pension such retired
firefighter was receiving at the time of his or her death. If she or
he at any time so elects in writing and the board after hearing finds
it to be financially beneficial to the pension fund, he or she may
receive in lieu of all future monthly pension and other benefits,
including benefits to child or children, the sum of five thousand
dollars in cash. If there be no widow or widower at the time of such
firefighter's death or upon the widow's or widower's death the monthly
pension benefits ((hereinabove)) provided for under this section shall
be paid to and divided among his or her child or children share and
share alike, until they reach the age of eighteen or are married,
whichever occurs first. ((The widow's or widower's monthly pension
benefit, including increased benefits to his or her children shall
cease if and when he or she remarries: PROVIDED, That)) No pension
payable under the provisions of this section shall be less than that
specified under RCW 41.18.200.

--- END ---