BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A member of plan 2 who was a member of the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 while employed as an enforcement officer for
the department of fish and wildlife has the option to make an election
no later than June 30, 2013, filed in writing with the department of
retirement systems, to transfer service credit previously earned as an
enforcement officer in the public employees' retirement system plan 2
to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system
plan 2. Service credit that a member elects to transfer from the
public employees' retirement system to the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' retirement system under this section shall be
transferred no earlier than June 30, 2013, and only after the member
completes payment as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) A member who elects to transfer service credit under
subsection (1) of this section shall make the payments required by this
subsection prior to having service credit earned as an enforcement
officer with the department of fish and wildlife under the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 transferred to the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2.
(b) A member who elects to transfer service credit under this
subsection shall pay, for the applicable period of service, the
difference between the contributions the employee paid to the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 and the contributions that would
have been paid by the employee had the employee been a member of the
law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2,
plus interest on this difference as determined by the director. This
payment must be made no later than June 30, 2013, and must be made
prior to retirement.
(c) No later than June 30, 2014, the department of fish and
wildlife shall pay an amount sufficient to ensure that the contribution
level to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system will not increase due to this transfer. Payments made prior to
June 30, 2014, are authorized as determined by the department and
coordinated with the state actuary.
(d) Upon completion of the payment required in (b) of this
subsection, the department shall transfer from the public employees'
retirement system to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system plan 2: (i) All of the employee's applicable
accumulated contributions plus interest and all of the applicable
employer contributions plus interest; and (ii) all applicable months of
service, as defined in RCW 41.26.030(14)(b), credited to the employee
under this chapter for service as an enforcement officer with the
department of fish and wildlife as though that service was rendered as
a member of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system plan 2.
(e) If a member who elected to transfer pursuant to this section
dies or retires for disability prior to five years from their election
date, the member's benefit is calculated as follows:
(i) All of the applicable service credit, accumulated
contributions, and interest is transferred to the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 and used in the
calculation of a benefit.
(ii) If a member's obligation under (b) of this subsection has not
been paid in full at the time of death or disability retirement, the
member, or in the case of death the surviving spouse or eligible minor
children, have the following options:
(A) Pay the bill in full;
(B) If a continuing monthly benefit is chosen, have the benefit
actuarially reduced to reflect the amount of the unpaid obligation
under (b) of this subsection; or
(C) Continue to make payment against the obligation under (b) of
this subsection, provided that payment in full is made no later than
five years from the member's original election date.
(f) Upon transfer of service credit, contributions, and interest
under this subsection, the employee is permanently excluded from
membership in the public employees' retirement system for all service
related to time served as an enforcement officer with the department of
fish and wildlife under the public employees' retirement system plan 2.

--- END ---