BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Under qualifications, terms, conditions, benefits, and
continuity of care requirements set by the board, retired or disabled
school employees and retired or disabled state employees who are
receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40
RCW as of January 1, 2001, and their dependents, may enroll in medical
and dental plans under the authority, provided they apply no later than
the end of the open enrollment period for the plan year beginning
January 1, 2011.
(2) Retired or disabled school employees and retired or disabled
state employees and their dependents shall be responsible for payment
of rates developed by the authority, and shall include any amounts
necessary for administration in accordance with this chapter. Premium
rates charged to retired or disabled school employees and retired or
disabled state employees and their dependents shall be based on the
experience of the community-rated risk pool established under RCW
41.05.022 and shall be reduced by the amount of the subsidy provided
under RCW 41.05.085.
(3) The authority may establish rules to implement the enrollment
opportunity under this section.
(4) Enrollment shall be processed on a first-come, first-enrolled
basis, subject to an enrollment cap reflecting twenty-five percent of
the eligible medicare retirees, as specified in the state operating
budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

--- END ---