BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.045 and 2007 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department in its discretion may grant a temporary permit
to operate a vehicle for which application for registration has been
made, where such application is accompanied by the proper fee pending
action upon said application by the department.
(2) The department may authorize vehicle dealers properly licensed
pursuant to chapter 46.70 RCW to issue temporary permits to operate
vehicles under such rules and regulations as the department deems
appropriate.
(3) The fee for each temporary permit application distributed to an
authorized vehicle dealer shall be fifteen dollars, five dollars of
which shall be credited to the payment of registration fees at the time
application for registration is made. The remainder shall be deposited
to the state patrol highway account.
(4) The payment of the registration fees to an authorized dealer is
considered payment to the state of Washington.
(5) By July 1, 2009, the department shall provide access to a
secure system that allows temporary permits issued by vehicle dealers
properly licensed pursuant to chapter 46.70 RCW to be generated and
printed on demand. By July 1, 2011, all such permits must be generated
using the designated system.

--- END ---