BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.22.620 and 2002 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, the term "public works" means as
defined in RCW 39.04.010.
(2) A first-class city may have public works performed by contract
pursuant to public notice and call for competitive bids. ((As limited
by subsection (3) of this section, a first-class city may have public
works performed by city employees in any annual or biennial budget
period equal to a dollar value not exceeding ten percent of the public
works construction budget, including any amount in a supplemental
public works construction budget, over the budget period. The amount
of public works that a first class city has a county perform for it
under RCW 35.77.020 shall be included within this ten percent
limitation.
If a first-class city has public works performed by public
employees in any budget period that are in excess of this ten percent
limitation, the amount in excess of the permitted amount shall be
reduced from the otherwise permitted amount of public works that may be
performed by public employees for that city in its next budget period.
Twenty percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to that city
shall be withheld if two years after the year in which the excess
amount of work occurred, the city has failed to so reduce the amount of
public works that it has performed by public employees. The amount so
withheld shall be distributed to the city when it has demonstrated in
its reports to the state auditor that the amount of public works it has
performed by public employees has been so reduced.
Whenever a first-class city has had public works performed in any
budget period up to the maximum permitted amount for that budget
period, all remaining public works within that budget period shall be
done by contract pursuant to public notice and call for competitive
bids.
The state auditor shall report to the state treasurer any
first-class city that exceeds this amount and the extent to which the
city has or has not reduced the amount of public works it has performed
by public employees in subsequent years.))
(3) ((In addition to the percentage limitation provided in
subsection (2) of this section,)) A first-class city ((with a
population in excess of one hundred fifty thousand)) shall not have
public employees perform a public works project in excess of
((seventy)) one hundred fifty thousand dollars((, or ninety thousand
dollars after January 1, 2010, if more than a single craft or trade is
involved with the public works project, or a public works project in
excess of thirty-five thousand dollars, or forty-five thousand dollars
after January 1, 2010, if only a single craft or trade is involved with
the public works project or the public works project is street
signalization or street lighting. In addition to the percentage
limitation provided in subsection (2) of this section, a first-class
city with a population of one hundred fifty thousand or less shall not
have public employees perform a public works project in excess of fifty
thousand dollars, or sixty-five thousand dollars after January 1, 2010,
if more than one craft or trade is involved with the public works
project, or a public works project in excess of thirty thousand
dollars, or forty thousand dollars after January 1, 2010, if only a
single craft or trade is involved with the public works project or the
public works project is street signalization or street lighting.)) A
public works project means a complete project. The restriction((s)) in
this subsection ((do)) does not permit the division of the project into
units of work or classes of work to avoid the restriction on work that
may be performed by day labor on a single project.
(4) In addition to the accounting and record-keeping requirements
contained in RCW 39.04.070, every first-class city annually shall
prepare a report for the state auditor indicating the total public
works construction budget and supplemental public works construction
budget for that year, and the total construction costs of public works
performed by public employees for that year((, and the amount of public
works that is performed by public employees above or below ten percent
of the total construction budget)). However, if a city budgets on a
biennial basis, this annual report shall indicate the amount of public
works that is performed by public employees within the current biennial
period that is above or below ten percent of the total biennial
construction budget.
Each first-class city with a population of one hundred fifty
thousand or less shall use the form required by RCW 43.09.205 to
account and record costs of public works in excess of five thousand
dollars that are not let by contract.
(5) The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs
of materials, supplies, equipment, and labor on the construction of
that project. The value of the public works budget shall be the value
of all the separate public works projects within the budget.
(6) The competitive bidding requirements of this section may be
waived by the city legislative authority pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if
an exemption contained within that section applies to the work or
contract.
(7) In lieu of the procedures of subsection((s (2) and)) (6) of
this section, a first-class city may let contracts using the small
works roster process in RCW 39.04.155.
Whenever possible, the city shall invite at least one proposal from
a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this
section.
(8) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by city
employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.
(9) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as
defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A
RCW.
(10) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any first-class city
from allowing for preferential purchase of products made from recycled
materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.23.352 and 2002 c 94 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any second-class city or any town may construct any public
works, as defined in RCW 39.04.010, by contract or day labor without
calling for bids therefor whenever the estimated cost of the work or
improvement, including cost of materials, supplies and equipment will
not exceed the sum of ((forty-five)) one hundred fifty thousand
dollars((, or sixty thousand dollars after January 1, 2010, if more
than one craft or trade is involved with the public works, or thirty
thousand dollars, or forty thousand dollars after January 1, 2010, if
a single craft or trade is involved with the public works or the public
works project is street signalization or street lighting)). A public
works project means a complete project. The restriction((s)) in this
subsection ((do)) does not permit the division of the project into
units of work or classes of work to avoid the restriction on work that
may be performed by day labor on a single project.
Whenever the cost of the public work or improvement, including
materials, supplies and equipment, will exceed these figures, the same
shall be done by contract. All such contracts shall be let at public
bidding upon publication of notice calling for sealed bids upon the
work. The notice shall be published in the official newspaper, or a
newspaper of general circulation most likely to bring responsive bids,
at least thirteen days prior to the last date upon which bids will be
received. The notice shall generally state the nature of the work to
be done that plans and specifications therefor shall then be on file in
the city or town hall for public inspections, and require that bids be
sealed and filed with the council or commission within the time
specified therein. Each bid shall be accompanied by a bid proposal
deposit in the form of a cashier's check, postal money order, or surety
bond to the council or commission for a sum of not less than five
percent of the amount of the bid, and no bid shall be considered unless
accompanied by such bid proposal deposit. The council or commission of
the city or town shall let the contract to the lowest responsible
bidder or shall have power by resolution to reject any or all bids and
to make further calls for bids in the same manner as the original call.
When the contract is let then all bid proposal deposits shall be
returned to the bidders except that of the successful bidder which
shall be retained until a contract is entered into and a bond to
perform the work furnished, with surety satisfactory to the council or
commission, in accordance with RCW 39.08.030. If the bidder fails to
enter into the contract in accordance with his or her bid and furnish
a bond within ten days from the date at which he or she is notified
that he or she is the successful bidder, the check or postal money
order and the amount thereof shall be forfeited to the council or
commission or the council or commission shall recover the amount of the
surety bond. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a
contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or
subsequent call for bids is made for the project.
If no bid is received on the first call the council or commission
may readvertise and make a second call, or may enter into a contract
without any further call or may purchase the supplies, material or
equipment and perform the work or improvement by day labor.
(2) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by city
or town employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) In lieu of the procedures of subsection (1) of this section, a
second-class city or a town may let contracts using the small works
roster process provided in RCW 39.04.155.
Whenever possible, the city or town shall invite at least one
proposal from a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise
qualify under this section.
(4) The form required by RCW 43.09.205 shall be to account and
record costs of public works in excess of five thousand dollars that
are not let by contract.
(5) The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs
of the materials, equipment, supplies, and labor on that construction
project.
(6) Any purchase of supplies, material, or equipment, except for
public work or improvement, where the cost thereof exceeds seven
thousand five hundred dollars shall be made upon call for bids.
(7) Bids shall be called annually and at a time and in the manner
prescribed by ordinance for the publication in a newspaper of general
circulation in the city or town of all notices or newspaper
publications required by law. The contract shall be awarded to the
lowest responsible bidder.
(8) For advertisement and formal sealed bidding to be dispensed
with as to purchases with an estimated value of fifteen thousand
dollars or less, the council or commission must authorize by
resolution, use of the uniform procedure provided in RCW 39.04.190.
(9) The city or town legislative authority may waive the
competitive bidding requirements of this section pursuant to RCW
39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the
purchase or public work.
(10) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as
defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A
RCW.
(11) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any second class city
or any town from allowing for preferential purchase of products made
from recycled materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.32.250 and 2000 c 138 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
No contract for public works may be entered into by the county
legislative authority or by any elected or appointed officer of the
county until after bids have been submitted to the county upon
specifications therefor. Such specifications shall be in writing and
shall be filed with the clerk of the county legislative authority for
public inspection. An advertisement shall be published in the county
official newspaper stating the time and place where bids will be
opened, the time after which bids will not be received, the character
of the work to be done, the materials and equipment to be furnished,
and that specifications therefor may be seen at the office of the clerk
of the county legislative authority. An advertisement shall also be
published in a legal newspaper of general circulation in or as near as
possible to that part of the county in which such work is to be done.
If the county official newspaper is a newspaper of general circulation
covering at least forty percent of the residences in that part of the
county in which such public works are to be done, then the publication
of an advertisement of the applicable specifications in the county
official newspaper shall be sufficient. Such advertisements shall be
published at least once at least thirteen days prior to the last date
upon which bids will be received. The bids shall be in writing, shall
be filed with the clerk, shall be opened and read in public at the time
and place named therefor in the advertisements, and after being opened,
shall be filed for public inspection. No bid may be considered for
public work unless it is accompanied by a bid deposit in the form of a
surety bond, postal money order, cash, cashier's check, or certified
check in an amount equal to five percent of the amount of the bid
proposed. The contract for the public work shall be awarded to the
lowest responsible bidder. Any or all bids may be rejected for good
cause. The county legislative authority shall require from the
successful bidder for such public work a contractor's bond in the
amount and with the conditions imposed by law. If the bidder to whom
the contract is awarded fails to enter into the contract and furnish
the contractor's bond as required within ten days after notice of the
award, exclusive of the day of notice, the amount of the bid deposit
shall be forfeited to the county and the contract awarded to the next
lowest and best bidder. A low bidder who claims error and fails to
enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if
a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project. The bid
deposit of all unsuccessful bidders shall be returned after the
contract is awarded and the required contractor's bond given by the
successful bidder is accepted by the county legislative authority. In
the letting of any contract for public works involving less than
((ten)) seventy-five thousand dollars, advertisement and competitive
bidding may be dispensed with on order of the county legislative
authority. Immediately after the award is made, the bid quotations
obtained shall be recorded and open to public inspection and shall be
available by telephone inquiry.
As an alternative to requirements under this section, a county may
let contracts using the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155.
This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as
defined in RCW 39.35A.020(((3))) (4), that are negotiated under chapter
39.35A RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 52.14.110 and 2001 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Insofar as practicable, purchases and any public works by the
district shall be based on competitive bids. A formal sealed bid
procedure shall be used as standard procedure for purchases and
contracts for purchases executed by the board of commissioners. Formal
sealed bidding shall not be required for:
(1) The purchase of any materials, supplies, or equipment if the
cost will not exceed the sum of ten thousand dollars. However,
whenever the estimated cost does not exceed fifty thousand dollars, the
commissioners may by resolution use the process provided in RCW
39.04.190 to award contracts;
(2) Contracting for work to be done involving the construction or
improvement of a fire station or other buildings where the estimated
cost will not exceed the sum of ((two thousand)) seventy-five
((hundred)) thousand dollars, which includes the costs of labor,
material, and equipment;
(3) Contracts using the small works roster process under RCW
39.04.155; and
(4) Any contract for purchases or public work pursuant to RCW
39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the
purchase or public work.

Sec. 5 RCW 57.08.050 and 2003 c 145 s 1 and 2003 c 60 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in excess of
((ten)) seventy-five thousand dollars, shall be let by contract and
competitive bidding. Before awarding any such contract the board of
commissioners shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general
circulation where the district is located at least once thirteen days
before the last date upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed
proposals for such work, plans and specifications which must at the
time of publication of such notice be on file in the office of the
board of commissioners subject to the public inspection. The notice
shall state generally the work to be done and shall call for proposals
for doing the same to be sealed and filed with the board of
commissioners on or before the day and hour named therein.
Each bid shall be accompanied by a certified or cashier's check or
postal money order payable to the order of the county treasurer for a
sum not less than five percent of the amount of the bid, or accompanied
by a bid bond in an amount not less than five percent of the bid with
a corporate surety licensed to do business in the state, conditioned
that the bidder will pay the district as liquidated damages the amount
specified in the bond, unless the bidder enters into a contract in
accordance with the bidder's bid, and no bid shall be considered unless
accompanied by such check, cash or bid bond. At the time and place
named such bids shall be publicly opened and read and the board of
commissioners shall proceed to canvass the bids and may let such
contract to the lowest responsible bidder upon plans and specifications
on file or to the best bidder submitting the bidder's own plans and
specifications. The board of commissioners may reject all bids for
good cause and readvertise and in such case all checks, cash or bid
bonds shall be returned to the bidders. If the contract is let, then
all checks, cash, or bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders, except
that of the successful bidder, which shall be retained until a contract
shall be entered into for doing the work, and a bond to perform such
work furnished with sureties satisfactory to the board of commissioners
in the full amount of the contract price between the bidder and the
commission in accordance with the bid. If the bidder fails to enter
into the contract in accordance with the bid and furnish the bond
within ten days from the date at which the bidder is notified that the
bidder is the successful bidder, the check, cash, or bid bonds and the
amount thereof shall be forfeited to the district. If the bidder fails
to enter into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and the
board of commissioners deems it necessary to take legal action to
collect on any bid bond required by this section, then the district
shall be entitled to collect from the bidder any legal expenses,
including reasonable attorneys' fees occasioned thereby. A low bidder
who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from
bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is
made for the project.
(2) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (1) of this
section, a water-sewer district may let contracts using the small works
roster process under RCW 39.04.155.
(3) Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an
estimated cost in excess of ten thousand dollars, shall be by contract.
Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an estimated
cost of less than fifty thousand dollars shall be made using the
process provided in RCW 39.04.190. Any purchase of materials,
supplies, or equipment with an estimated cost of fifty thousand dollars
or more shall be made by competitive bidding following the procedure
for letting contracts for projects under subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) As an alternative to requirements under subsection (3) of this
section, a water-sewer district may let contracts for purchase of
materials, supplies, or equipment with the suppliers designated on
current state agency, county, city, or town purchasing rosters for the
materials, supplies, or equipment, when the roster has been established
in accordance with the competitive bidding law for purchases applicable
to the state agency, county, city, or town. The price and terms for
purchases shall be as described on the applicable roster.
(5) The board may waive the competitive bidding requirements of
this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within
that section applies to the purchase or public work.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.44.140 and 2002 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All materials purchased and work ordered, the estimated cost of
which is in excess of ((fifty)) seventy-five thousand dollars, shall be
by contract. Before awarding any such contract, the commission shall
publish a notice at least thirteen days before the last date upon which
bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for such work. The
plans and specifications must at the time of the publication of such
notice be on file at the office of the public hospital district,
subject to public inspection: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the commission
may at the same time, and as part of the same notice, invite tenders
for the work or materials upon plans and specifications to be submitted
by bidders. The notice shall state generally the work to be done, and
shall call for proposals for doing the same, to be sealed and filed
with the commission on or before the day and hour named therein. Each
bid shall be accompanied by bid proposal security in the form of a
certified check, cashier's check, postal money order, or surety bond
made payable to the order of the commission, for a sum not less than
five percent of the amount of the bid, and no bid shall be considered
unless accompanied by such bid proposal security. At the time and
place named, such bids shall be publicly opened and read, and the
commission shall proceed to canvass the bids, and may let such contract
to the lowest responsible bidder upon plans and specifications on file,
or to the best bidder submitting his or her own plans and
specifications: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no contract shall be let in
excess of the estimated cost of the materials or work, or if, in the
opinion of the commission, all bids are unsatisfactory, they may reject
all of them and readvertise, and in such case all bid proposal security
shall be returned to the bidders. If the contract is let, then all bid
proposal security shall be returned to the bidders, except that of the
successful bidder, which is retained until a contract shall be entered
into for the purchase of such materials for doing such work, and a bond
to perform such work furnished, with sureties satisfactory to the
commission, in an amount to be fixed by the commission, not less than
twenty-five percent of contract price in any case, between the bidder
and commission, in accordance with the bid. If such bidder fails to
enter into the contract in accordance with the bid and furnish such
bond within ten days from the date at which the bidder is notified that
he or she is the successful bidder, the bid proposal security and the
amount thereof shall be forfeited to the public hospital district. A
low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is
prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent
call for bids is made for the project.
(2) As an alternative to the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, a public hospital district may let contracts using the small
works roster process under RCW 39.04.155.
(3) Any purchases with an estimated cost of up to ((fifteen))
seventy-five thousand dollars may be made using the process provided in
RCW 39.04.190.
(4) The commission may waive the competitive bidding requirements
of this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained
within that section applies to the purchase or public work.

--- END ---