BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.08.040 and 2007 c 348 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) A district may improve its lands by dredging, filling,
bulkheading, providing waterways or otherwise developing such lands for
industrial and commercial purposes. A district may also acquire,
construct, install, improve, and operate sewer and water utilities to
serve its own property and other property owners under terms,
conditions, and rates to be fixed and approved by the port commission.
A district may also acquire, by purchase, construction, lease, or in
any other manner, and may maintain and operate other facilities for the
control or elimination of air, water, or other pollution, including,
but not limited to, facilities for the treatment and/or disposal of
industrial wastes, and may make such facilities available to others
under terms, conditions and rates to be fixed and approved by the port
commission. Such conditions and rates shall be sufficient to reimburse
the port for all costs, including reasonable amortization of capital
outlays caused by or incidental to providing such other pollution
control facilities. However, no part of such costs of providing any
pollution control facility to others shall be paid out of any tax
revenues of the port ((and)).
(b) No port shall enter into an agreement or contract to provide
sewer and/or water utilities or pollution control facilities if
substantially similar utilities or facilities are available from
another source (or sources) which is able and willing to provide such
utilities or facilities on a reasonable and nondiscriminatory basis
unless such other source (or sources) consents thereto.
(c) No port in a county with a population exceeding one million
five hundred thousand shall acquire, construct, install, improve, and
operate sewer and/or water utilities or pollution control facilities to
serve its own property and other property owners if (i) substantially
similar utilities or facilities are available from another source (or
sources) which is able and willing to provide such utilities or
facilities on a reasonable and nondiscriminatory basis, or (ii) the
property to be served is located within an area in which the water or
sewer utility is planned to be made available under an effective
comprehensive plan of another county, city, town, water-sewer district,
or public utility district, or (iii) the property to be served is
located within the present and future service area boundaries of
another public water system included in a coordinated water system
under chapter 70.116 RCW, unless such other source (or sources), public
agency, or public water system consents thereto.
(2) In the event that a port elects to make such other pollution
control facilities available to others, it shall do so by lease, lease
purchase agreement, or other agreement binding such user to pay for the
use of said facilities for the full term of the revenue bonds issued by
the port for the acquisition of said facilities, and said payments
shall at least fully reimburse the port for all principal and interest
paid by it on said bonds and for all operating or other costs, if any,
incurred by the port in connection with said facilities. However,
where there is more than one user of any such facilities, each user
shall be responsible for its pro rata share of such costs and payment
of principal and interest. Any port intending to provide pollution
control facilities to others shall first survey the port district to
ascertain the potential users of such facilities and the extent of
their needs. The port shall conduct a public hearing upon the proposal
and shall give each potential user an opportunity to participate in the
use of such facilities upon equal terms and conditions.
(3) "Pollution control facility," as used in this section and RCW
53.08.041, does not include air quality improvement equipment that
provides emission reductions for engines, vehicles, and vessels.

--- END ---