BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that port terminal
infrastructure has traditionally been financed through taxpayer-funded
public investments. However, the legislature further finds that
alternative port terminal financing arrangements that utilize private
investments are becoming more common.
The legislature further recognizes that some proposed port terminal
projects in Washington state are never developed because public
financing is not feasible. The legislature believes that if private
financing was available, some of the proposed projects would move
forward bringing new jobs and industries to Washington state.
The purpose of this act is to encourage private investment in the
construction of port terminal facilities with tax incentives to local
governments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The port terminal private investment pilot program is
created in the department of community, trade, and economic
development. The purpose of the pilot program is to authorize and
evaluate the use of tax incentives to local governments as a means of
encouraging private investment in port terminal construction.
(b) The department of community, trade, and economic development
may approve a maximum of two projects under this pilot program.
(2) Subject to the requirements of this section, the estimated
taxes collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW on the sale or use
of tangible personal property and labor and services used in the
construction of a qualified port terminal, less any credits allowed for
local governments, shall be distributed to a county or city within
which a qualified port terminal is located.
(3) To receive distributions under this section, the city or county
must:
(a) Submit an application to the department of community, trade,
and economic development prior to the initiation of construction of the
port terminal. The application shall be in a form and manner required
by the department of community, trade, and economic development, but
must include information that verifies that: (i) The construction of
the port terminal is reasonably estimated to exceed one hundred fifty
million dollars; (ii) an agreement has been entered into committing
that the construction project will pay wages on its construction at the
prevailing wage rates determined by the department of labor and
industries pursuant to chapter 39.12 RCW; (iii) the qualified port
terminal would be adding new longshoremen jobs to the state of
Washington; and (iv) the date construction of the port terminal is
expected to be completed. The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall rule on the application within forty-five
days;
(b) Submit an expenditure plan to the department of community,
trade, and economic development within one hundred twenty days of the
submittal of the application under (a) of this subsection. The plan
must be developed in consultation with any port authorities, tribal
governments, or other local governments in close proximity to the
proposed project as well as private entities involved with the
qualified port terminal's development and operation. The plan must
specify the use of funds distributed under this section, subject to (c)
of this subsection. The department of community, trade, and economic
development shall notify the city or county of any deficiencies in the
expenditure plan within ninety days of the plan's submittal;
(c) Use any distributions under this section exclusively for public
infrastructure needs related to the qualified port terminal including,
but not limited to: Street and road construction necessary to access
and service the new terminal; rail construction necessary to access and
service the new terminal; water and sewer system construction;
construction of facilities for emergency services; construction of
storm water and drainage management systems; and environmental impact
mitigation.
(4) The department of revenue shall distribute funds under this
section annually at no cost to the city or county receiving such funds.
Funds shall be distributed to a city or county by July 1st of each
year, beginning in the state fiscal year following the fiscal year in
which initiation of construction of the port terminal begins. The
department of revenue may not distribute funds under this section for
construction occurring after the date of completion specified in
subsection (3)(a)(iv) of this section has elapsed; however, the
department of revenue, in consultation with the department of
community, trade, and economic development, may extend the date of
completion for good cause shown.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Port terminal" means a facility for cargo related maritime
activities.
(b) "Qualified port terminal" means a port terminal that:
(i) Is constructed after the effective date of this section;
(ii) Is reasonably estimated to cost over one hundred fifty million
dollars to construct;
(iii) Enters into an agreement that wages will be paid on its
construction at the prevailing wage rates determined by the department
of labor and industries pursuant to chapter 39.12 RCW; and
(iv) Will be adding new longshoremen jobs to the state of
Washington.
(6) By January 1, 2011, the departments of revenue and community,
trade, and economic development must jointly provide their findings and
recommendations on the pilot program to the governor and appropriate
committees of the legislature. The report must include:
(a) The amount and uses of proceeds distributed under subsection
(4) of this section;
(b) The number, types, salary, and wages of jobs created due to the
port terminal construction;
(c) The effect of the port terminal construction on revenues to the
state and local governments;
(d) Private and public investment leveraged as a result of the tax
incentives offered to local government;
(e) An analysis of any other benefits or barriers recognized as a
result of the pilot program; and
(f) Recommendations for future programs related to encouraging
private investment in the construction of port terminal facilities with
tax incentives to local governments.
(7) The port terminal private investment pilot program shall
terminate June 30, 2011.

--- END ---