BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.101.010 and 2003 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Area" means a tourism promotion area.
(2) "Legislative authority" means:
(a) The legislative authority of any county with a population
greater than forty thousand but less than one million, or of any city
or town within such a county, including unclassified cities or towns
operating under special charters; or
(b) The legislative authority of any city or town within a county
with a population of one million or more, including unclassified cities
or towns operating under special charters, that has been selected
according to an interlocal agreement entered into by three or more
cities or towns pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW to establish a tourism
promotion area that includes within its boundaries portions of each
city's or town's jurisdiction.
(3) "Lodging business" means a person that furnishes lodging
taxable by the state under chapter 82.08 RCW that has forty or more
lodging units.
(4) "Tourism promotion" means activities and expenditures designed
to increase tourism and convention business, including but not limited
to advertising, publicizing, or otherwise distributing information for
the purpose of attracting and welcoming tourists, and operating tourism
destination marketing organizations.

--- END ---