BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Starting no later than 2009, and at least once every three
years thereafter, port districts located in a county of one million or
more residents shall apply to the Washington state quality award, or
similar organization, for an independent assessment of its quality
management, accountability, and performance system. The assessment
shall evaluate the effectiveness of all elements of its management,
accountability, and performance system, including: Leadership,
strategic planning, customer focus, analysis and information, employee
performance management, and process improvement. The purpose of the
assessment is to recognize best practice and identify improvement
opportunities.
(2) The application, assessment, and action plan must be posted on
the port district's web site. The action plan must include how each
improvement opportunity will be accomplished.

--- END ---