BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.405.300 and 1990 c 33 s 395 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the event it is determined that there is probable cause or
causes for a teacher, principal, supervisor, superintendent, or other
certificated employee, holding a position as such with the school
district, hereinafter referred to as "employee", to be discharged or
otherwise adversely affected in his or her contract status, such
employee shall be notified in writing of that decision, which
notification shall specify the probable cause or causes for such
action. Such determinations of probable cause for certificated
employees, other than the superintendent, shall be made by the
superintendent. Such notices shall be served upon that employee
personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of
the notice at the house of his or her usual abode with some person of
suitable age and discretion then resident therein. Every such employee
so notified, at his or her request made in writing and filed with the
president, chair of the board or secretary of the board of directors of
the district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be
granted opportunity for a hearing pursuant to RCW 28A.405.310 to
determine whether or not there is sufficient cause or causes for his or
her discharge or other adverse action against his or her contract
status.
Upon service of a notification of probable cause or causes for
discharge, and until and unless the hearing officer's final decision is
in favor of the employee, the employee shall not continue to be paid or
compensated. If the employee requests a hearing to determine whether
or not there is sufficient cause or causes for the employee's
discharge, the district shall, pending a final decision of the hearing
officer, deposit into an escrow account money sufficient to compensate
the employee for back pay if the final decision is in favor of the
employee.
In the event any such notice or opportunity for hearing is not
timely given, or in the event cause for discharge or other adverse
action is not established by a preponderance of the evidence at the
hearing, such employee shall not be discharged or otherwise adversely
affected in his or her contract status for the causes stated in the
original notice for the duration of his or her contract.
If such employee does not request a hearing as provided herein,
such employee may be discharged or otherwise adversely affected as
provided in the notice served upon the employee.
Transfer to a subordinate certificated position as that procedure
is set forth in RCW 28A.405.230 shall not be construed as a discharge
or other adverse action against contract status for the purposes of
this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.405.310 and 1990 c 33 s 396 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any employee receiving a notice of probable cause for discharge
or adverse effect in contract status pursuant to RCW 28A.405.300, or
any employee, with the exception of provisional employees as defined in
RCW 28A.405.220, receiving a notice of probable cause for nonrenewal of
contract pursuant to RCW 28A.405.210, shall be granted the opportunity
for a hearing pursuant to this section.
(2) In any request for a hearing pursuant to RCW 28A.405.300 or
28A.405.210, the employee may request either an open or closed hearing.
The hearing shall be open or closed as requested by the employee, but
if the employee fails to make such a request, the hearing officer may
determine whether the hearing shall be open or closed.
(3) The employee may engage counsel who shall be entitled to
represent the employee at the prehearing conference held pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section and at all subsequent proceedings
pursuant to this section. At the hearing provided for by this section,
the employee may produce such witnesses as he or she may desire.
(4) In the event that an employee requests a hearing pursuant to
RCW 28A.405.300 or 28A.405.210, a hearing officer shall be appointed in
the following manner: Within fifteen days following the receipt of any
such request the board of directors of the district or its designee and
the employee or employee's designee shall each appoint one nominee.
The two nominees shall jointly appoint a hearing officer who shall be
a member in good standing of the Washington state bar association or a
person adhering to the arbitration standards established by the public
employment relations commission and listed on its current roster of
arbitrators. Should said nominees fail to agree as to who should be
appointed as the hearing officer, either the board of directors or the
employee, upon appropriate notice to the other party, may apply to the
presiding judge of the superior court for the county in which the
district is located for the appointment of such hearing officer,
whereupon such presiding judge shall have the duty to appoint a hearing
officer who shall, in the judgment of such presiding judge, be
qualified to fairly and impartially discharge his or her duties.
Nothing herein shall preclude the board of directors and the employee
from stipulating as to the identity of the hearing officer in which
event the foregoing procedures for the selection of the hearing officer
shall be inapplicable. The district shall pay all fees and expenses of
any hearing officer selected pursuant to this subsection.
(5) Within five days following the selection of a hearing officer
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the hearing officer shall
schedule a prehearing conference to be held within such five day
period, unless the board of directors and employee agree on another
date convenient with the hearing officer. The employee shall be given
written notice of the date, time, and place of such prehearing
conference at least three days prior to the date established for such
conference.
(6) The hearing officer shall preside at any prehearing conference
scheduled pursuant to subsection (5) of this section and in connection
therewith shall:
(a) Issue such subpoenas or subpoenas duces tecum as either party
may request at that time or thereafter; and
(b) Authorize the taking of prehearing depositions at the request
of either party at that time or thereafter; and
(c) Provide for such additional methods of discovery as may be
authorized by the civil rules applicable in the superior courts of the
state of Washington; and
(d) Establish the date for the commencement of the hearing, to be
within ten days following the date of the prehearing conference, unless
the employee requests a continuance, in which event the hearing officer
shall give due consideration to such request.
(7) The hearing officer shall preside at any hearing and in
connection therewith shall:
(a) Make rulings as to the admissibility of evidence pursuant to
the rules of evidence applicable in the superior court of the state of
Washington.
(b) Make other appropriate rulings of law and procedure.
(c) Within ten days following the conclusion of the hearing
transmit in writing to the board and to the employee, findings of fact
and conclusions of law and final decision. If the final decision is in
favor of the employee, the employee shall be:
(i) Restored to his or her employment position;
(ii) Compensated for back pay if any; and ((shall be))
(iii) Awarded reasonable attorneys' fees.
(8) Any final decision by the hearing officer to nonrenew the
employment contract of the employee, or to discharge the employee, or
to take other action adverse to the employee's contract status, as the
case may be, shall be based solely upon the cause or causes specified
in the notice of probable cause to the employee and shall be
established by a preponderance of the evidence at the hearing to be
sufficient cause or causes for such action.
(9) All subpoenas and prehearing discovery orders shall be
enforceable by and subject to the contempt and other equity powers of
the superior court of the county in which the school district is
located upon petition of any aggrieved party.
(10) A complete record shall be made of the hearing and all orders
and rulings of the hearing officer and school board.

--- END ---