BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.30.010 and 1989 c 353 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is a privilege granted by the state to operate a motor vehicle
upon the highways of this state. The legislature recognizes the threat
that uninsured drivers are to the people of the state. In order to
alleviate the threat posed by uninsured drivers it is the intent of the
legislature to require that all persons driving vehicles registered in
this state satisfy the financial responsibility requirements of this
chapter and to provide a process for restricting uninsured drivers from
operating vehicles. By enactment of this chapter it is not the intent
of the legislature to modify, amend, or invalidate existing insurance
contract terms, conditions, limitations, or exclusions or to preclude
insurance companies from using similar terms, conditions, limitations,
or exclusions in future contracts.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.30.020 and 2003 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No person may operate a motor vehicle subject to
registration under chapter 46.16 RCW in this state unless the person is
insured under a motor vehicle liability policy with liability limits of
at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090, is self-insured as
provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a certificate of deposit in
conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a liability bond of at
least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. Written proof of
financial responsibility for motor vehicle operation must be provided
on the request of a law enforcement officer in the format specified
under RCW 46.30.030.
(b)(i) If a person cancels or is terminated from his or her motor
vehicle liability policy, he or she must notify the department at least
ten days prior to the cancellation or within ten days after the
termination unless the person renews or replaces the motor vehicle
liability policy within ten days of canceling or being terminated.
(ii) If an insurance carrier has terminated a person's motor
vehicle liability policy, the insurance carrier must notify the
department within ten days of the termination unless the insurance
carrier has reason to believe the person has replaced the motor vehicle
liability policy within ten days of the termination.
(iii) If the person has notified the department of a cancellation
or termination of the person's motor vehicle policy, the person must
provide proof of motor vehicle insurance to the department once the
person renews or replaces his or her motor vehicle liability policy.
(c) A person who drives a motor vehicle that is required to be
registered in another state that requires drivers and owners of
vehicles in that state to maintain insurance or financial
responsibility shall, when requested by a law enforcement officer,
provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance as is
required by the laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.
(((c))) (d) When asked to do so by a law enforcement officer,
failure to display an insurance identification card as specified under
RCW 46.30.030 creates a presumption that the person does not have motor
vehicle insurance.
(((d))) (e) Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance is
a traffic infraction and is subject to penalties as set by the supreme
court under RCW 46.63.110 or community restitution.
(f) When a law enforcement officer has reasonable cause to believe
that a driver does not have motor vehicle insurance, the officer may,
under RCW 46.55.113, immobilize the vehicle. "Immobilize the vehicle"
means the impounding of a vehicle or immobilizing of a vehicle by the
use of any device, wheel clamp, object, car boot, or other mechanism,
whether attached to the vehicle or not, that prevents a person from
freely moving the vehicle.
(2)(a) If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this
section appears in person before the court or a violations bureau and
provides written evidence that at the time the person was cited, he or
she was in compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of
subsection (1) of this section, the citation shall be dismissed and the
court or violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of
twenty-five dollars at the time of dismissal. In lieu of personal
appearance, a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this
section may, before the date scheduled for the person's appearance
before the court or violations bureau, submit by mail to the court or
violations bureau written evidence that at the time the person was
cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in which case the
citation shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court or
violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of twenty-five
dollars at the time of dismissal.
(b) If the vehicle the person was driving has been immobilized
under subsection (1)(f) of this section, the court shall, subject to
RCW 46.55.120, assess reasonable costs for the immobilization of the
vehicle and the release of the vehicle, whether or not the person,
subsequent to the impoundment, produces written evidence that at the
time the person was cited or at the time of immobilization, he or she
was in compliance with this section.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not govern:
(a) The operation of a motor vehicle registered under RCW
46.16.305(1), governed by RCW 46.16.020, or registered with the
Washington utilities and transportation commission as common or
contract carriers; or
(b) The operation of a motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a
motor-driven cycle as defined in RCW 46.04.332, or a moped as defined
in RCW 46.04.304.
(4) RCW 46.29.490 shall not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle
liability policies required by this chapter but only those certified
for the purposes stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When the department is notified that a person's motor vehicle
liability policy has been canceled or terminated and the person is
required to have a motor vehicle liability policy, the department shall
suspend all driving privileges of the person. A suspension under this
section takes effect pursuant to RCW 46.20.245 and remains in effect
until the person provides the department with proof of motor vehicle
insurance or proof of financial responsibility. A suspension under
this section does not take effect if, prior to the effective date of
the suspension, the department receives proof that the person has motor
vehicle insurance or proof of financial responsibility.
(2) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.30 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to any penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110, a person
who receives a traffic infraction for a violation of RCW 46.30.020(1)
shall be assessed an additional one thousand dollars if the person has
a previous traffic infraction for a violation of RCW 46.30.020(1).
Revenue from this assessment shall be forwarded to the state treasurer
for deposit into the general fund.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.55.113 and 2007 c 242 s 1 and 2007 c 86 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the driver of a vehicle is arrested for a violation of
RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.20.342, or 46.20.345, or whenever the
driver of a vehicle is cited for a violation of RCW 46.30.020, the
vehicle is subject to summary impoundment, pursuant to the terms and
conditions of an applicable local ordinance or state agency rule at the
direction of a law enforcement officer.
(2) In addition, a police officer may take custody of a vehicle, at
his or her discretion, and provide for its prompt removal to a place of
safety under any of the following circumstances:
(a) Whenever a police officer finds a vehicle standing upon the
roadway in violation of any of the provisions of RCW 46.61.560, the
officer may provide for the removal of the vehicle or require the
driver or other person in charge of the vehicle to move the vehicle to
a position off the roadway;
(b) Whenever a police officer finds a vehicle unattended upon a
highway where the vehicle constitutes an obstruction to traffic or
jeopardizes public safety;
(c) Whenever a police officer finds an unattended vehicle at the
scene of an accident or when the driver of a vehicle involved in an
accident is physically or mentally incapable of deciding upon steps to
be taken to protect his or her property;
(d) Whenever the driver of a vehicle is arrested and taken into
custody by a police officer;
(e) Whenever a police officer discovers a vehicle that the officer
determines to be a stolen vehicle;
(f) Whenever a vehicle without a special license plate, placard, or
decal indicating that the vehicle is being used to transport a person
with disabilities under RCW 46.16.381 is parked in a stall or space
clearly and conspicuously marked under RCW 46.61.581 which space is
provided on private property without charge or on public property;
(g) Upon determining that a person is operating a motor vehicle
without a valid and, if required, a specially endorsed driver's license
((or)), with a license that has been expired for ninety days or more,
or without motor vehicle insurance as required under RCW 46.30.020;
(h) When a vehicle is illegally occupying a truck, commercial
loading zone, restricted parking zone, bus, loading, hooded-meter,
taxi, street construction or maintenance, or other similar zone where,
by order of the director of transportation or chiefs of police or fire
or their designees, parking is limited to designated classes of
vehicles or is prohibited during certain hours, on designated days or
at all times, if the zone has been established with signage for at
least twenty-four hours and where the vehicle is interfering with the
proper and intended use of the zone. Signage must give notice to the
public that a vehicle will be removed if illegally parked in the zone;
(i) When a vehicle with an expired registration of more than
forty-five days is parked on a public street.
(3) When an arrest is made for a violation of RCW 46.20.342, if the
vehicle is a commercial vehicle and the driver of the vehicle is not
the owner of the vehicle, before the summary impoundment directed under
subsection (1) of this section, the police officer shall attempt in a
reasonable and timely manner to contact the owner of the vehicle and
may release the vehicle to the owner if the owner is reasonably
available, as long as the owner was not in the vehicle at the time of
the stop and arrest and the owner has not received a prior release
under this subsection or RCW 46.55.120(1)(a)(ii).
(4) Nothing in this section may derogate from the powers of police
officers under the common law. For the purposes of this section, a
place of safety may include the business location of a registered tow
truck operator.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.55.120 and 2004 c 250 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Vehicles or other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department that are impounded by registered tow truck
operators pursuant to RCW 46.55.080, 46.55.085, 46.55.113, or 9A.88.140
may be redeemed only under the following circumstances:
(a) Only the legal owner, the registered owner, a person authorized
in writing by the registered owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person
who is determined and verified by the operator to have the permission
of the registered owner of the vehicle or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, or one who has
purchased a vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled
with the department from the registered owner who produces proof of
ownership or written authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may
redeem an impounded vehicle or items of personal property registered or
titled with the department. In addition, a vehicle impounded because
the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c) or 46.30.020 shall
not be released until a person eligible to redeem it under this
subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (e) of this subsection,
including paying all towing, removal, and storage fees, notwithstanding
the fact that the hold was ordered by a government agency. If the
department's records show that the operator has been convicted of a
violation of RCW 46.20.342 or a similar local ordinance within the past
five years, the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the
written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. A
vehicle impounded because the operator is arrested for a violation of
RCW 46.20.342 may be released only pursuant to a written order from the
agency that ordered the vehicle impounded or from the court having
jurisdiction. An agency may issue a written order to release pursuant
to a provision of an applicable state agency rule or local ordinance
authorizing release on the basis of the following:
(i) Economic or personal hardship to the spouse of the operator,
taking into consideration public safety factors, including the
operator's criminal history and driving record; or
(ii) The owner of the vehicle was not the driver, the owner did not
know that the driver's license was suspended or revoked, or that the
owner had motor vehicle insurance, and the owner has not received a
prior release under this subsection or RCW 46.55.113(3).
In order to avoid discriminatory application, other than for the
reasons for release set forth in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, an
agency shall, under a provision of an applicable state agency rule or
local ordinance, deny release in all other circumstances without
discretion.
If a vehicle is impounded because the operator is in violation of
RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b), the vehicle may be held for up to thirty
days at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded. However, if the department's records show that the operator
has been convicted of a violation of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b) or a
similar local ordinance within the past five years, the vehicle may be
held at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded for up to sixty days, and for up to ninety days if the
operator has two or more such prior offenses. If a vehicle is
impounded because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW
46.20.342, the vehicle may not be released until a person eligible to
redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements of
(e) of this subsection, including paying all towing, removal, and
storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a
government agency.
(b) If the vehicle is directed to be held for a suspended license
impound, a person who desires to redeem the vehicle at the end of the
period of impound shall within five days of the impound at the request
of the tow truck operator pay a security deposit to the tow truck
operator of not more than one-half of the applicable impound storage
rate for each day of the proposed suspended license impound. The tow
truck operator shall credit this amount against the final bill for
removal, towing, and storage upon redemption. The tow truck operator
may accept other sufficient security in lieu of the security deposit.
If the person desiring to redeem the vehicle does not pay the security
deposit or provide other security acceptable to the tow truck operator,
the tow truck operator may process and sell at auction the vehicle as
an abandoned vehicle within the normal time limits set out in RCW
46.55.130(1). The security deposit required by this section may be
paid and must be accepted at any time up to twenty-four hours before
the beginning of the auction to sell the vehicle as abandoned. The
registered owner is not eligible to purchase the vehicle at the
auction, and the tow truck operator shall sell the vehicle to the
highest bidder who is not the registered owner.
(c) Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a rental car business
may immediately redeem a rental vehicle it owns by payment of the costs
of removal, towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held
for a suspended license impound.
(d) Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer
or lender with a perfected security interest in the vehicle may redeem
or lawfully repossess a vehicle immediately by payment of the costs of
removal, towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held
for a suspended license impound. A motor vehicle dealer or lender with
a perfected security interest in the vehicle may not knowingly and
intentionally engage in collusion with a registered owner to repossess
and then return or resell a vehicle to the registered owner in an
attempt to avoid a suspended license impound. However, this provision
does not preclude a vehicle dealer or a lender with a perfected
security interest in the vehicle from repossessing the vehicle and then
selling, leasing, or otherwise disposing of it in accordance with
chapter 62A.9A RCW, including providing redemption rights to the debtor
under RCW 62A.9A-623. If the debtor is the registered owner of the
vehicle, the debtor's right to redeem the vehicle under chapter 62A.9A
RCW is conditioned upon the debtor obtaining and providing proof from
the impounding authority or court having jurisdiction that any fines,
penalties, and forfeitures owed by the registered owner, as a result of
the suspended license impound, have been paid, and proof of the payment
must be tendered to the vehicle dealer or lender at the time the debtor
tenders all other obligations required to redeem the vehicle. Vehicle
dealers or lenders are not liable for damages if they rely in good
faith on an order from the impounding agency or a court in releasing a
vehicle held under a suspended license impound.
(e) The vehicle or other item of personal property registered or
titled with the department shall be released upon the presentation to
any person having custody of the vehicle of commercially reasonable
tender sufficient to cover the costs of towing, storage, or other
services rendered during the course of towing, removing, impounding, or
storing any such vehicle, with credit being given for the amount of any
security deposit paid under (b) of this subsection. In addition, if a
vehicle is impounded because the operator was arrested for a violation
of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.20.345, or cited for a violation of RCW
46.30.020, and was being operated by the registered owner when it was
impounded under local ordinance or agency rule, it must not be released
to any person until the registered owner establishes with the agency
that ordered the vehicle impounded or the court having jurisdiction
that any penalties, fines, or forfeitures owed by him or her have been
satisfied. Registered tow truck operators are not liable for damages
if they rely in good faith on an order from the impounding agency or a
court in releasing a vehicle held under a suspended license impound.
Commercially reasonable tender shall include, without limitation, cash,
major bank credit cards issued by financial institutions, or personal
checks drawn on Washington state branches of financial institutions if
accompanied by two pieces of valid identification, one of which may be
required by the operator to have a photograph. If the towing firm
cannot determine through the customer's bank or a check verification
service that the presented check would be paid by the bank or
guaranteed by the service, the towing firm may refuse to accept the
check. Any person who stops payment on a personal check or credit
card, or does not make restitution within ten days from the date a
check becomes insufficient due to lack of funds, to a towing firm that
has provided a service pursuant to this section or in any other manner
defrauds the towing firm in connection with services rendered pursuant
to this section shall be liable for damages in the amount of twice the
towing and storage fees, plus costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(2)(a) The registered tow truck operator shall give to each person
who seeks to redeem an impounded vehicle, or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department, written notice of the right
of redemption and opportunity for a hearing, which notice shall be
accompanied by a form to be used for requesting a hearing, the name of
the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy of the towing
and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall maintain
a record evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such
notification was provided.
(b) Any person seeking to redeem an impounded vehicle under this
section has a right to a hearing in the district or municipal court for
the jurisdiction in which the vehicle was impounded to contest the
validity of the impoundment or the amount of towing and storage
charges. The district court has jurisdiction to determine the issues
involving all impoundments including those authorized by the state or
its agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine the
issues involving impoundments authorized by agents of the municipality.
Any request for a hearing shall be made in writing on the form provided
for that purpose and must be received by the appropriate court within
ten days of the date the opportunity was provided for in subsection
(2)(a) of this section and more than five days before the date of the
auction. At the time of the filing of the hearing request, the
petitioner shall pay to the court clerk a filing fee in the same amount
required for the filing of a suit in district court. If the hearing
request is not received by the court within the ten-day period, the
right to a hearing is waived and the registered owner is liable for any
towing, storage, or other impoundment charges permitted under this
chapter. Upon receipt of a timely hearing request, the court shall
proceed to hear and determine the validity of the impoundment.
(3)(a) The court, within five days after the request for a hearing,
shall notify the registered tow truck operator, the person requesting
the hearing if not the owner, the registered and legal owners of the
vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, and the person or agency authorizing the impound in
writing of the hearing date and time.
(b) At the hearing, the person or persons requesting the hearing
may produce any relevant evidence to show that the impoundment, towing,
or storage fees charged were not proper. The court may consider a
written report made under oath by the officer who authorized the
impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal appearance at the
hearing.
(c) At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine
whether the impoundment was proper, whether the towing or storage fees
charged were in compliance with the posted rates, and who is
responsible for payment of the fees. The court may not adjust fees or
charges that are in compliance with the posted or contracted rates.
(d) If the impoundment is found proper, the impoundment, towing,
and storage fees as permitted under this chapter together with court
costs shall be assessed against the person or persons requesting the
hearing, unless the operator did not have a signed and valid
impoundment authorization from a private property owner or an
authorized agent.
(e) If the impoundment is determined to be in violation of this
chapter, then the registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other
item of personal property registered or titled with the department
shall bear no impoundment, towing, or storage fees, and any security
shall be returned or discharged as appropriate, and the person or
agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any towing,
storage, or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The
court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered tow truck
operator against the person or agency authorizing the impound for the
impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid. In addition, the court
shall enter judgment in favor of the registered and legal owners of the
vehicle, or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, for the amount of the filing fee required by law for
the impound hearing petition as well as reasonable damages for loss of
the use of the vehicle during the time the same was impounded against
the person or agency authorizing the impound. However, if an
impoundment arising from an alleged violation of RCW 46.20.342 or
46.20.345 is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the
law enforcement officer directing the impoundment and the government
employing the officer are not liable for damages if the officer relied
in good faith and without gross negligence on the records of the
department in ascertaining that the operator of the vehicle had a
suspended or revoked driver's license. If an impoundment arising from
an alleged violation of RCW 46.30.020 is determined to be in violation
of this chapter, the law enforcement officer directing the impoundment
and the government employing the officer are not liable for damages if
the officer acted in good faith and without gross negligence in
ascertaining that the operator of the vehicle did not have motor
vehicle insurance. If any judgment entered is not paid within fifteen
days of notice in writing of its entry, the court shall award
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs against the defendant in any
action to enforce the judgment. Notice of entry of judgment may be
made by registered or certified mail, and proof of mailing may be made
by affidavit of the party mailing the notice. Notice of the entry of
the judgment shall read essentially as follows:

TO: . . . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you in the
. . . . . . Court located at . . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled . . . . . ., Case No.
. . . . YOU ARE FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs
will be awarded against you under RCW . . . if the judgment is
not paid within 15 days of the date of this notice.

DATED this . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . .

Signature . . . . . . . . . .
Typed name and address
of party mailing notice

(4) Any impounded abandoned vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department that is not redeemed within
fifteen days of mailing of the notice of custody and sale as required
by RCW 46.55.110(3) shall be sold at public auction in accordance with
all the provisions and subject to all the conditions of RCW 46.55.130.
A vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled with the
department may be redeemed at any time before the start of the auction
upon payment of the applicable towing and storage fees.

--- END ---