BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Subject to funding provided specifically for
the purposes of this section, the state board for community and
technical colleges, in consultation with the exclusive bargaining
representative of individual providers under RCW 74.39A.270, shall
allocate capital grants on a competitive basis to up to four community
college pilot sites for the delivery of training and workforce
development services for long-term care workers required under chapter
74.39A RCW. Moneys must be used to renovate or expand existing
community college facilities, or to acquire land and facilities in
close proximity to a community college campus, to accommodate programs
that provide home and community-like long-term care settings, including
the installation of durable medical equipment such as assistive
devices, lifts, and remote technologies. Community colleges eligible
to participate in the pilot program must be located in a county with a
population of two hundred thousand or more. Priority consideration
must be given to community college applicants: (a) With existing
allied health care programs; and (b) that can demonstrate tangible
commitments to the project by business or other community partners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of two million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2009, from the state building construction account to the
state board for community and technical colleges for the purposes of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of four hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the state board for
community and technical colleges for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---