BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.365 and 1999 c 401 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall conduct a sufficient number of audits and
field investigations so as to provide a statistically valid finding
regarding the degree of compliance with the provisions of this chapter
by all required filers. Any documents, records, reports, computer
files, papers, or materials provided to the commission for use in
conducting audits and investigations must be returned to the candidate,
campaign, or political committee from which they were received within
one week of the commission's completion of an audit or field
investigation.
(2) The commission shall audit the books of account of any
candidate, campaign, or political committee that has made a request.
The request for an audit must be made at least thirty days prior to
closing the accounts and thereby closing the campaign. The audit must
be completed within six months of the request. If no audit findings
are made, the candidate, campaign, or political committee is exempt
from any citizen action pursuant to RCW 42.17.400. For a candidate,
campaign, or political committee that has spent and received less than
fifty thousand dollars, the audit shall be conducted at no cost. For
a candidate, campaign, or political committee that has spent and
received more than fifty thousand dollars, the audit shall be conducted
at a cost of one hundred dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.400 and 2007 c 455 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The attorney general and the prosecuting authorities of
political subdivisions of this state may bring civil actions in the
name of the state for any appropriate civil remedy, including but not
limited to the special remedies provided in RCW 42.17.390.
(2) The attorney general and the prosecuting authorities of
political subdivisions of this state may investigate or cause to be
investigated the activities of any person who there is reason to
believe is or has been acting in violation of this chapter, and may
require any such person or any other person reasonably believed to have
information concerning the activities of such person to appear at a
time and place designated in the county in which such person resides or
is found, to give such information under oath and to produce all
accounts, bills, receipts, books, paper and documents which may be
relevant or material to any investigation authorized under this
chapter.
(3) When the attorney general or the prosecuting authority of any
political subdivision of this state requires the attendance of any
person to obtain such information or the production of the accounts,
bills, receipts, books, papers, and documents which may be relevant or
material to any investigation authorized under this chapter, he shall
issue an order setting forth the time when and the place where
attendance is required and shall cause the same to be delivered to or
sent by registered mail to the person at least fourteen days before the
date fixed for attendance. Such order shall have the same force and
effect as a subpoena, shall be effective statewide, and, upon
application of the attorney general or said prosecuting authority,
obedience to the order may be enforced by any superior court judge in
the county where the person receiving it resides or is found, in the
same manner as though the order were a subpoena. The court, after
hearing, for good cause, and upon application of any person aggrieved
by the order, shall have the right to alter, amend, revise, suspend, or
postpone all or any part of its provisions. In any case where the
order is not enforced by the court according to its terms, the reasons
for the court's actions shall be clearly stated in writing, and such
action shall be subject to review by the appellate courts by certiorari
or other appropriate proceeding.
(4) Any person who has notified the attorney general and the
prosecuting attorney in the county in which the violation occurred in
writing that there is reason to believe that some provision of this
chapter is being or has been violated may himself bring in the name of
the state any of the actions (hereinafter referred to as a citizen's
action) authorized under this chapter.
(a) This citizen action may be brought only if:
(i) The attorney general and the prosecuting attorney have failed
to commence an action hereunder within forty-five days after such
notice;
(ii) Such person has thereafter further notified the attorney
general and prosecuting attorney that said person will commence a
citizen's action within ten days upon their failure so to do;
(iii) The attorney general and the prosecuting attorney have in
fact failed to bring such action within ten days of receipt of said
second notice; and
(iv) The citizen's action is filed within two years after the date
when the alleged violation occurred.
(b) If the person who brings the citizen's action prevails, the
judgment awarded shall escheat to the state, but he shall be entitled
to be reimbursed by the state of Washington for costs and attorney's
fees he has incurred: PROVIDED, That in the case of a citizen's action
which is dismissed and which the court also finds was brought without
reasonable cause, the court may order the person commencing the action
to pay all costs of trial and reasonable attorney's fees incurred by
the defendant.
(c) No citizen action may be brought against any candidate,
campaign, or political committee if that candidate, campaign, or
political committee has requested an audit under RCW 42.17.365(2) and
the audit has produced no findings.
(5) In any action brought under this section, the court may award
to the state all costs of investigation and trial, including a
reasonable attorney's fee to be fixed by the court. If the violation
is found to have been intentional, the amount of the judgment, which
shall for this purpose include the costs, may be trebled as punitive
damages. If damages or trebled damages are awarded in such an action
brought against a lobbyist, the judgment may be awarded against the
lobbyist, and the lobbyist's employer or employers joined as
defendants, jointly, severally, or both. If the defendant prevails, he
shall be awarded all costs of trial, and may be awarded a reasonable
attorney's fee to be fixed by the court to be paid by the state of
Washington.

--- END ---