BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In 2005, the legislature created the caring
for Washington individuals with autism task force. The task force was
directed to study and make recommendations to the legislature regarding
the growing incidence of autism and ways to improve the delivery and
coordination of autism services in the state. One of the essential
first step recommendations made in the final report was to screen all
Washington children before the age of three and establish a minimum of
one trained autism technical assistance specialist in each of the nine
educational service districts in order to provide support to teachers
and staff.
The legislature recognizes that there is an urgent need to begin
providing system-wide improvements to help provide services to children
with autism and their parents as well as to all children with learning
disabilities and their teachers. The legislature also recognizes that
the earlier a child can be identified with a disability the more
effective the interventions can be. It is therefore the intent of the
legislature to begin the process of building a statewide system of
screening, identification and diagnosis that is available to children
before enrolling in K-12 educational system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A pilot program for implementing a statewide system of
screening, identification, and diagnosis of learning disabilities
including autism spectrum disorder is established. The program shall
be administered by the participating educational service districts.
Each educational service district shall at a minimum:
(a) Provide screening and diagnostic services for children under
the age of three;
(b) Engage in community outreach activities to inform parents of
the availability and value of early diagnosis and intervention;
(c) Coordinate and work in partnership with currently available
services and service providers; and
(d) Work in conjunction with and provide technical assistance to
public schools, day care programs, and community agencies in the
region.
(2) In establishing this program, the legislature shall start with
two pilot programs in two separate educational service districts. One
pilot shall be in eastern Washington and one shall be in western
Washington.
(a) One of the pilot sites shall be an educational service district
with an exemplary special education cooperative that has a history of
coordinated community involvement and is already providing services
such as those listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section for children
with autism and other learning disabilities.
(b) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, the pilot educational service district established under
subsection (2)(a) of this section shall also provide technical
assistance to the second pilot site in developing its program.
(3) The two pilot sites shall work together to submit a single
report to the legislature by December 2010, on how to best expand the
program to all nine educational service districts, including the
staffing levels needed to provide adequate services and any recommended
changes to the program requirements.

--- END ---