BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.130 and 2006 c 215 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No elective official nor any employee of his (([or her])) or
her office nor any person appointed to or employed by any public office
or agency may use or authorize the use of any of the facilities of a
public office or agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of
assisting a campaign for election of any person to any office or for
the promotion of or opposition to any ballot proposition. Knowing
acquiescence by a person with authority to direct, control, or
influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using
public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation
of this section. Facilities of a public office or agency include, but
are not limited to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and
equipment, use of employees of the office or agency during working
hours, vehicles, office space, publications of the office or agency,
and clientele lists of persons served by the office or agency.
However, this does not apply to the following activities:
(((1))) (a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an
elected legislative body or by an elected board, council, or commission
of a special purpose district including, but not limited to, fire
districts, public hospital districts, library districts, park
districts, port districts, public utility districts, school districts,
sewer districts, and water districts, to express a collective decision,
or to actually vote upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or
ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot proposition so long as
(((a))) (i) any required notice of the meeting includes the title and
number of the ballot proposition, and (((b))) (ii) members of the
legislative body, members of the board, council, or commission of the
special purpose district, or members of the public are afforded an
approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an opposing view;
(((2))) (b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry; and
(((3))) (c) Activities which are part of the normal and regular
conduct of the office or agency.
(2) A violation of this section by an elected official shall be
considered malfeasance of office and, therefore, subject to recall
action.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.52.520 and 1994 c 154 s 222 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it is
grounds for disciplinary action. A violation of RCW 42.52.180 by the
head of an agency or a state employee who is exempt from civil service
is cause for dismissal.
(2) The procedures for any such action shall correspond to those
applicable for disciplinary action for employee misconduct generally;
for those state officers and state employees not specifically exempted
in chapter 41.06 RCW, the rules set forth in chapter 41.06 RCW shall
apply. Any action against the state officer or state employee shall be
subject to judicial review to the extent provided by law for
disciplinary action for misconduct of state officers and state
employees of the same category and grade.

--- END ---