BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 73.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within funds appropriated for this purpose, the department of
veterans affairs shall pay each combat veteran a service bonus in the
amount of three thousand five hundred dollars for each deployment.
(2) As used in this section, "combat veteran" means a person who:
(a) Served or is serving in any branch of the armed forces of the
United States in the following conflicts: Operation Enduring Freedom,
Persian Gulf, or Operation Iraqi Freedom; and
(b) Can show proof of receiving one of the following: (i) The
global war on terrorism expeditionary medal; (ii) award of hostile fire
pay; or (iii) a leave and earning statement listing hostile fire pay.
(3) The veteran must show proof that Washington state is his or her
home of record.
(4) If the veteran is no longer serving in the military, he or she
must have been honorably separated or discharged in order to receive
the bonus.
(5) A person who has already received extra compensation or other
benefits based upon claimed residence at the time of entry into such
active service from any other state or territory is not entitled to
compensation under this section.
(6) If the veteran is deceased, payment shall be made to his or her
beneficiary.
(7) No claim for payment under this section is subject to
garnishment, attachment, levy, or execution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of . . . . dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of veterans
affairs for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---