BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.086 and 2006 c 337 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In lieu of the license tab fees provided in RCW 46.16.0621, private
use single-axle trailers of two thousand pounds scale weight or less
may be licensed upon the payment of a license fee in the sum of fifteen
dollars, but only if the trailer is operated upon public highways. The
license fee must be collected ((annually)) every three years for each
registration ((year)) period or fraction of a registration ((year))
period. This reduced license fee applies only to trailers operated for
personal use of the owners, and not trailers held for rental to the
public or used in any commercial or business endeavor. The proceeds
from the fees collected under this section shall be distributed in
accordance with RCW 46.68.035(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---