BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An identity theft unit is created in the Washington state
patrol, which shall be under the direction of the chief of the
Washington state patrol.
(2) The identity theft unit shall investigate all identity theft
cases and any identity theft case that may be in relation to, but is
not limited to, theft, forgery, cyber crimes, fraud, or criminal
impersonation.
(3) The identity theft unit shall study and develop a plan for an
effective statewide unit for identity theft to be funded in the 2009-2011 biennium. The identity theft unit shall report its findings and
recommendations to the legislature by December 31, 2008.
(4) The identity theft unit shall be organized at the discretion of
the chief of the Washington state patrol.
(5) The identity theft unit shall be comprised of a total of four
state patrol officers dedicated to work identity theft cases.
(6) The identity theft unit shall assist local jurisdictions in the
investigation of identity theft crimes under subsection (2) of this
section that cross existing jurisdictional lines or that require
specialized technical skills.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of three hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the Washington
state patrol for purposes of implementing this act.

--- END ---