BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
After certification of an election, any registered voter is
authorized to review duplicated ballots. In order to review the
ballots, a written request must be made to the county auditor within
thirty days of the certification of election. The ballots may not be
removed from the county office and may not be copied. The review must
be done in the presence of at least two county employees designated by
the county auditor. The review must be conducted and completed within
ninety days of the request. The duplicated ballots may not be
destroyed until the review is complete or ninety days has elapsed. Any
person requesting a review under this section shall reimburse the
county all expenses related to the review.

--- END ---