BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.590 and 2007 c 457 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities and The Evergreen State College,
and the boards of trustees of each community and technical college
district, in collaboration with affiliated bookstores and student and
faculty representatives, shall adopt rules requiring that:
(a) Affiliated bookstores:
(i) Provide students the option of purchasing materials that are
unbundled when possible, disclose to faculty and staff the costs to
students of purchasing materials, and disclose publicly how new
editions vary from previous editions;
(ii) Actively promote and publicize book buy-back programs; ((and))
(iii) Disclose retail costs for course materials on a per course
basis to faculty and staff and make this information publicly
available; and
(iv) Disclose information to students on required course materials
including but not limited to title, authors, edition, price, and
International Standard Book Number (ISBN) at least four weeks before
the start of the class for which the materials are required. The chief
academic officer may waive the disclosure requirement provided in this
subsection (1)(a)(iv), on a case by case basis, provided that students
can reliably expect that nearly all information regarding course
materials is available four weeks before the start of the class for
which the materials are required.
(b) Faculty and staff members consider the least costly practices
in assigning course materials, such as adopting the least expensive
edition available when educational content is comparable as determined
by the faculty and working closely with publishers and local bookstores
to create bundles and packages if they deliver cost savings to
students.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Materials" means any supplies or texts required or recommended
by faculty or staff for a given course.
(b) "Bundled" means a group of objects joined together by packaging
or required to be purchased as an indivisible unit.

--- END ---