BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Dependency proceedings are complicated and
have significant impacts on a child's life. Although guardians ad
litem and court-appointed special advocates are appointed to represent
a child's best interests in dependency proceedings, they have different
skills than attorneys. Attorneys for children age twelve and over in
dependency proceedings can help explain legal proceedings to the child,
form confidential relationships with the child, and assist the child in
understanding what services are available to the child upon aging out
of care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The dependent youth representation pilot
program is established to promote adequate and effective legal
representation for children age twelve and over in dependency
proceedings. The pilot program shall be administered by the University
of Washington school of law, children and youth advocacy clinic.
(1) The children and youth advocacy clinic shall select at least
two counties for the pilot program. The counties selected shall be
determined by whether the county:
(a) Has a strong parents' representation project;
(b) Has a strong court-appointed special advocate or guardian ad
litem program to represent children age twelve and over; and
(c) Lacks a strong system appointing attorneys to represent the
stated interests of dependent children age twelve and over.
(2) The children and youth advocacy clinic shall administer funding
to the selected counties and shall establish a pilot program in which:
(a) All children age twelve and over who are the subject of a
dependency proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW are appointed an
attorney. For those children whose dependency is filed after the
establishment of the pilot program, attorneys are appointed prior to
the first hearing in the child's dependency case;
(b) Attorneys are highly trained in dependency matters;
(c) Attorneys may not maintain a caseload larger than eighty
ongoing cases;
(d) Judges and commissioners receive training on dependency matters
and on how an attorney for the child affects the dynamics of the
dependency proceedings;
(e) Guardians ad litem and court-appointed special advocates
receive training on the different, but complementary roles of attorneys
and guardians ad litem/court appointed special advocates and how the
"best interest" standard differs from the "stated interest" standard;
and
(f) Existing legal training offered within the county and state is
coordinated.
(3) The children and youth advocacy clinic shall measure the
performance and outcomes of the pilot program related to the health and
well-being of the child in dependency, including whether there is:
(a) An increase in monthly private and individual face-to-face
visits between the caseworker and the child;
(b) An increase in regular visits between siblings placed apart and
between children and parents;
(c) An increase in completed mental health and educational
screenings and assessments within the required time of a child entering
dependency;
(d) An increase in shared planning meetings occurring within the
required time of the child entering dependency;
(e) An increase in completion of screenings, assessments, and
treatment addressing the child's health care and other needs within the
required times and at regular intervals during the child's dependency;
(f) An increase in timely enrollment in school if the child was
removed from his or her school of origin because of change in
placement; and
(g) A decrease in the median number of days that the child was on
runaway status.
(4) The children and youth advocacy clinic shall measure the
performance and outcomes of the pilot program related to the attorney's
activities, including:
(a) The amount of time that passed between when the child entered
care and when the attorney was assigned the case;
(b) Whether the attorney's presence increased the involvement of
children in their court proceedings; and
(c) Whether the attorney's efforts increased the number, and
appropriateness, of services ordered for and completed by the child.
(5) The children and youth advocacy clinic shall issue a
preliminary report to the legislature by December 31, 2008, and shall
issue a final report and include findings, by September 30, 2009.

--- END ---