BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.135.220 and 2005 c 155 s 709 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the responsibility of the department ((shall)) to
designate the areas of state-owned aquatic lands that are available for
geoduck harvesting by licensed geoduck harvesters in accordance with
this chapter ((79.90 RCW)).
(2) For the state's management of the geoduck fishery, it is the
primary responsibility of the department of fish and wildlife to:
(a) Identify commercial geoduck tracks;
(b) Conduct geoduck fishery assessments and recovery and mortality
rate studies;
(c) Set the total allowable catch limits for the harvest of
wildstock geoducks from state-owned aquatic lands.

--- END ---