BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.30.340 and 2007 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person in this state has the right to choose any glass repair
facility for the repair of a loss relating to motor vehicle glass.
(2) At the time information regarding any automobile glass repair
or replacement facility is discussed, an insurer or its third-party
administrator ((that owns in whole or in part an automobile glass
repair facility)) that is processing a claim limited only to auto glass
shall:
(a) Verbally inform the person making the claim of loss, of the
right provided under subsection (1) of this section((, at the time
information regarding the automobile glass repair or replacement
facilities is provided; and));
(b) Verbally inform the person making the claim of loss that the
third-party administrator is an entity separate from the insurer that
has a financial arrangement to process automobile glass claims on the
insurer's behalf; and
(c) Prior to making a recommendation, verbally ask the person
making a claim for a loss if that person has chosen an automobile glass
repair or replacement facility.
(i) If a facility is indicated by the person, the insurer or its
third-party administrator shall not recommend an automobile glass
repair or replacement facility owned in whole or in part by the insurer
or its third-party administrator as an alternative to the person's
stated choice.
(ii) If a facility is not indicated by the person and if the
insurer or its third-party administrator owns in whole or in part the
facility that is being recommended, the person making the claim must be
provided with (A) a notice with the same content as the notice in
subsection (3) of this section, and (B) a choice of automobile glass
repair or replacement facilities that includes being provided a list of
automobile glass repair or replacement facilities that are comparable
and in reasonable proximity to the person.
(3) An insurer or its third-party administrator that owns an
interest in an automobile glass repair or replacement facility shall
post the following notice in each of its repair facilities:

"THIS AUTOMOBILE GLASS REPAIR OR REPLACEMENT FACILITY IS OWNED IN
WHOLE OR IN PART BY (NAME OF INSURER OR INSURER'S THIRD-PARTY
ADMINISTRATOR). YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED THAT YOU ARE ENTITLED UNDER
WASHINGTON LAW TO SEEK REPAIRS AT ANY AUTOMOBILE GLASS REPAIR OR
REPLACEMENT FACILITY OF YOUR CHOICE."

The notice must be posted, in not less than eighteen point font,
prominently in a location in which it is likely to be seen and read by
a customer. ((If the automobile glass repair or replacement facility
is mobile, the notice must be given to the person making the claim
verbally by the insurer or its third-party administrator prior to
commencement of the repair or replacement.))
(4) A person making a claim of loss whose motor vehicle is repaired
at an automotive glass repair or replacement facility subject to the
notice requirements of this section may file a complaint with the
office of the insurance commissioner.
(5) This section does not create a private right or cause of action
to or on behalf of any person.

--- END ---