BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In an effort to increase the personal and
social independence and fulfillment of persons with developmental
disabilities, consistent with state policy as expressed in RCW
71A.10.015, the legislature finds that persons who are eligible to
receive supported living services should be allowed to hire and fire
their own independent supported living providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall work with
the advisory council, as described in subsection (2) of this section,
to develop and establish a self-directed option within the existing
supported living program that:
(a) Allows clients receiving supported living services to hire,
fire, and direct the work of their independent supported living
providers;
(b) Provides clients receiving supported living services with
adequate support to be able to assist in self-direction of services,
including recruiting, hiring, firing, and directing independent
supported living providers;
(c) Gives control over selection of independent supported living
providers to clients receiving supported living services and to their
circles of support, as defined in this section;
(d) Provides that independent supported living providers in this
program would be considered independent contractors and could
collectively bargain with the state over wages and benefits and that
the independent supported living providers would be paid directly by
the state;
(e) Provides that any increase in an independent supported living
provider's wages and benefits won through collective bargaining will
not reduce a client's allocated hours of support as determined under
the program; and
(f) Provides that the department of social and health services will
provide services to fifty clients who choose to participate in the
self-directed option of the supported living program under medicaid
waivers. Of these fifty clients, twenty-five clients will be served
under the core waiver, and twenty-five clients will be served under the
basic plus waiver. If the department is unable to provide services for
these fifty clients under the existing waivers, the department must
complete a waiver amendment application to increase the total number of
clients served by the waivers to accommodate these additional fifty
clients.
(2) In its development of the self-directed option within the
supported living program as described in subsection (1) of this
section, the department of social and health services shall establish
and collaborate with an advisory council which shall include the
following:
(a) A representative of the Washington developmental disabilities
council to be designated by the director of the organization;
(b) A representative of the arc of Washington state to be
designated by the director of the organization;
(c) A client receiving supported living services to be named by the
department of social and health services;
(d) A family member of a client receiving supported living services
to be named by the department of social and health services;
(e) A representative of a labor or employee organization which
represents at least twenty thousand home and community-based long-term
care workers, the representative to be designated by the principal
officer of the labor or employee organization; and
(f) A representative of the department of social and health
services aging and adult services administration to be designated by
the assistant secretary of the department of social and health
services.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Independent supported living provider" means a person who
provides residential services under the self-directed option of the
supported living program.
(b) "Circles of support" includes family members, friends, and
other interested persons who control decisions regarding the selection
of direct support workers to work with the client.
(4) The department of social and health services shall establish
the self-directed option described in subsection (2) of this section by
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---