BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
tangible personal property if the gross proceeds of sales are donated
to a nonprofit organization, as defined in RCW 82.04.3651. A person
taking the exemption under this section must keep records necessary for
the department to verify eligibility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of tangible
personal property if the consideration paid by the person to acquire
the property is donated to a nonprofit organization, as defined in RCW
82.04.3651.

--- END ---