BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.560 and 1991 c 319 s 408 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Outside of incorporated cities and towns no person may stop,
park, or leave standing any vehicle, whether attended or unattended,
upon the roadway.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section and RCW 46.61.570 and 46.61.575
do not apply to the driver of any vehicle that is disabled in such
manner and to such extent that it is impossible to avoid stopping and
temporarily leaving the vehicle in such position. The driver shall
nonetheless arrange for the prompt removal of the vehicle as required
by RCW 46.61.590.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the driver of
a public transit vehicle who temporarily stops the vehicle upon the
roadway for the purpose of and while actually engaged in receiving or
discharging passengers at a marked transit vehicle stop zone approved
by the state department of transportation or a county upon highways
under their respective jurisdictions. However, the driver of a vehicle
that is used for public transportation purposes, including such
vehicles operated by nonprofit organizations, may stop upon the roadway
momentarily to receive or discharge passengers at an unmarked stop
zone. The driver of a vehicle that is used for public transportation
purposes, including such vehicles operated by nonprofit organizations,
may not stop on a state highway at an unmarked stop zone if the posted
speed limit is forty miles per hour or more.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section and RCW 46.61.570 and 46.61.575
do not apply to the driver of a solid waste collection company or
recycling company vehicle who temporarily stops the vehicle as close as
practical to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder of the roadway
or right edge of the roadway if no shoulder exists for the purpose of
and while actually engaged in the collection of solid waste or
recyclables, or both, under chapters 81.77, 35.21, and 35A.21 RCW or by
contract under RCW ((36.58.030 [36.58.040])) 36.58.040.

--- END ---