BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall provide coverage for lead blood level
assessments under this chapter for any eligible children younger than
twenty-one years old in accordance with early and periodic screening
and diagnostic treatment services as defined in section 1905 of Title
XIX of the federal social security act and its implementing regulations
and guidelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---