BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In the 2006-07 school year, more than eighty
thousand students in grades kindergarten through twelve were English
language learners in the transitional bilingual program. An unknown
number of these students understand the academic content of mathematics
and science at their grade level, but struggle with the language and
vocabulary, and consequently are not able to demonstrate their
knowledge on the Washington assessment of student learning. Other
students simply struggle with some of the language on reading and
writing assessments, even though they have learned the necessary
academic aspects of these subjects. The 2006 legislature directed the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to examine the
feasibility of translating the mathematics assessment into other
languages. As a result, the legislature finds that steps are needed to
make the state's academic assessments more accessible for English
language learner students. More than twenty-six other states provide
test-specific glossaries with their assessments to assist these
students. Research has found that, when properly constructed,
glossaries do not affect the validity of the assessment. The report
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction recommends
development of appropriate glossaries for the Washington assessment of
student learning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop customized English language glossaries for the reading,
writing, mathematics, and science content areas of the Washington
assessment of student learning for each grade level in which the
assessment is administered and update the glossaries each year as
necessary. The purpose of the glossaries is to provide assistance to
English language learners and other students in understanding
nonacademic terms in the assessment without affecting the validity of
the assessment as a measure of a student's understanding of the
academic content. The office shall make any glossaries that are
developed available to schools, school districts, individuals, and
community groups by posting the glossaries on its web site.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
accept and review bilingual translations of any glossaries developed
under this section from community-based organizations or individuals
with expertise in the language of translation. The office may edit the
translations as necessary to ensure accuracy and preserve the validity
of the assessment. The office shall make any accepted translated
glossaries available to schools and school districts by posting the
translated glossaries on its web site.

--- END ---