BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The legislature finds
that the state has a compelling interest in promoting the well-being of
all children, particularly those vulnerable children who come to the
attention of the child welfare system. The legislature also finds that
Washington's child welfare system historically has focused primarily on
safety and permanency for children. The legislature further finds
that, despite this focus, the child welfare system has not consistently
achieved these goals on behalf of children served.
The legislature also finds that the current challenges facing the
state's child welfare system are varied and complex. Informed and
thoughtful reforms in policies, programs, and practices are needed to
more effectively and consistently promote safety, permanency, and well-being for children served by the child welfare system. The legislature
further finds that the necessary systemic changes to the state's child
welfare system will best be achieved through the visibility of a
department that embraces a focus on child well-being as a core outcome
of child welfare services. Absent the heightened focus of department
leadership and attention, it is unlikely the desired changes in child
welfare outcomes can be fully articulated and achieved.
The legislature intends to create a panel for the purpose of
implementing a plan to create a new department that will: (1) Operate
with an expanded mission to include prevention and early intervention
for child abuse and neglect; (2) support the delivery of an array of
research-based and developmentally targeted services for vulnerable
children and families; (3) broaden the focus of measurable child
welfare outcomes to include child well-being; and (4) use meaningful
data and current best evidence to periodically evaluate and refine its
policies, programs, and practices to better support families in meeting
the needs of their children. The legislature intends the department to
be designed as a new configuration and synthesis of functions from the
department of social and health services and other state agencies that
promote and support child safety, permanency, and well-being.
The primary purpose of the panel created in this chapter is to
provide specific recommendations and assistance to the legislature for
implementation of a new department to promote the safety, permanency,
and well-being of children. The legislature further intends, that in
accordance with section 6 of this act, legislative staff shall use the
recommendations of the panel to create proposed legislation necessary
to implement the department. The legislature further intends that the
new department be implemented and operational by July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Children's administration" means the children's administration
of the department of social and health services.
(2) "Department" means the new department that will be created
following implementation of the transition plan.
(3) "Research-based" means the intentional and judicious use of the
current best evidence to shape and support decisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 LEGISLATIVE AUTHORIZATION. (1) The
legislature hereby authorizes creation of a design panel to develop a
plan to create a department to be fully implemented no later than July
1, 2012. The department shall operate with budget autonomy, including
reinvestment authority for unspent allocations, and shall be directed
by an experienced and successful leader with expertise in child
protection and child welfare programs and services.
(2) The department shall be structured to achieve:
(a) A heightened focus on assessing and promoting child well-being
in the development and delivery of child welfare programs and services;
(b) Greater effectiveness in preventing and responding early to
child maltreatment through the use of evidence and research-based
practices;
(c) Qualitative change in social work practice and service delivery
that is supported by policy-based resource allocations;
(d) Improvements in organizational structure for the delivery,
coordination, and contracting of child welfare services;
(e) A more stable balance between state control of children's
services and local flexibility to deliver effective services that
respond to community needs and enhance community strengths; and
(f) Development of more collaborative partnerships with public and
private entities focused on meeting a common core set of visible,
cohesive, and consistent child-oriented performance measures.
(3)(a) Following full implementation of the design panel's plan,
the functions identified by the panel shall be performed by the
department.
(b) The panel shall not require exempt employees of the children's
administration to be automatically transferred to the new department
but the employees shall be eligible to apply for positions within the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 DESIGN PANEL PURPOSE AND MEMBERSHIP. (1) A
design panel is established for the purpose of creating a transition
plan and fiscal projection to achieve the purposes and legislative
intent in this chapter.
(2) The design panel shall be comprised of seven independent
experts with extensive backgrounds in child welfare, child protection,
child development, mental health, and related fields. Panel members
may include, but are not limited to, persons with master's or higher
degrees from accredited institutions of higher education who have
practical, supervisory, or leadership experience in relevant areas;
persons who have expertise in federal financing; and researchers in
relevant areas, specifically in child welfare reform.
(3) Appointment of design panel members shall be the shared
responsibility of the governor and the legislature. Panel members
shall not be members of the legislature. The governor shall appoint
three members, the speaker of the house of representatives shall
appoint two members, and the president of the senate shall appoint two
members. The governor and the legislature shall coordinate the
appointment of experts to the panel such that the optimum array of
available expertise is represented on the panel. Both the governor and
the legislature may recommend specific individuals for consideration of
appointment to the panel. The recommendations shall contain a short
concise statement indicating the individual's relevant expertise and
availability to serve. Appointment of panel members shall be completed
not later than June 1, 2008.
(4) Staff support to the design panel shall be provided by the
Daniel J. Evans school of public affairs at the University of
Washington.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 DESIGN PANEL PROCESSES. (1) The design
panel shall create the transition plan and develop the fiscal
projection by consensus, with the aim of delivering to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature a cohesive roadmap for
implementing the new department by July 1, 2012.
(2) The transition plan shall consist of the timeline and sequence
of steps by which the functions and resources identified by the design
panel to achieve the purposes intended by the legislature must be
either transferred to the department from other departments or
implemented anew within the department, or both.
(3) The fiscal projection shall consist of the projected or
anticipated cost of implementing the transition plan and the projected
or anticipated costs of operating the department at a level consistent
with the reforms intended by the legislature and specified by the
design panel.
(4) In developing the transition plan and fiscal projection, the
design panel shall:
(a) Use the best available data and research-based decision making
to the greatest extent possible;
(b) Examine existing state and federal funding streams for
consolidation as a possible means of achieving efficiencies of
government or leveraging funding to attract additional child welfare
resources, or both; and
(c) Examine existing federal funding streams for possible
consolidation or collaboration.
(5) The design panel shall vigorously seek input from the public
including, but not limited to, the following stakeholder groups:
(a) Community-based providers serving children and families,
including mental and behavioral health providers;
(b) Children, including adolescents;
(c) Caregivers, including birth parents, adoptive parents, foster
parents, guardians, and kinship and fictive kinship caregivers;
(d) Educators and paraeducators, including early childhood
educators;
(e) Child-placing agencies;
(f) Foster parent associations and organizations representing
foster parents including, but not limited to, any union representing
foster parents;
(g) Foundations and other nonprofit entities that provide funding
for services to enhance or promote child safety, permanency, and well-being.
(6) In addition to actively seeking input from the public, the
design panel also shall use in-depth, targeted consultations to garner
expertise from the following sources:
(a) The office of the family and children's ombudsman;
(b) The children's trust, or council on children and families;
(c) Employees from the children's administration, including current
and former licensed social workers, caseworkers, managers, and research
staff;
(d) The legislature;
(e) Public health agencies;
(f) Law enforcement agencies;
(g) Juvenile and family courts;
(h) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(i) The department of early learning;
(j) The family policy council;
(k) Tribal governments;
(l) The Braam oversight panel;
(m) Representatives from the office of the attorney general;
(n) The northwest institute for children and families;
(o) The harborview center for sexual assault and traumatic stress;
(p) Partners for our children;
(q) The Washington state institute for public policy;
(r) The joint legislative audit and review committee; and
(s) Child welfare experts, including leaders from other state or
county-based programs who have achieved reforms in relevant areas, or
both.
(7) To further inform its discussions, findings, and
recommendations, the design panel shall use relevant information from
the following resources:
(a) The children's administration workload study released November
2007;
(b) Performance monitoring reports and compliance plans relating to
legal settlements to which the state or a state agency is a party;
(c) The analysis and recommended remediation plan regarding racial
disproportionality and disparity in child welfare required by chapter
465, Laws of 2007;
(d) The recommendations regarding coordination and consolidation of
home visitation services required by chapter 466, Laws of 2007;
(e) Findings, recommendations, and reports from Washington's mental
health transformation project; and
(f) Such other resources as the design panel finds pertinent to its
work.
(8) To support development of the transition plan and the fiscal
projection, the design panel may form subcommittees and is authorized
to consult with or contract with experts, including experts from other
states and experts in federal financing or organizational management
structures, or both.
(9) This section expires July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 DESIGN PANEL--TRANSITION PLAN--FISCAL
PROJECTION. (1) Based upon relevant research, input from the public,
and in-depth consultations, the design panel shall incorporate into the
transition plan research-based policy reforms and performance measures
that:
(a) Promote and are focused on child safety, permanency, and well-being;
(b) Are consistent with federal funding requirements and the terms
of relevant legal settlements to which the state is a party; and
(c) Reflect the logical applications of the principles in RCW
74.14C.005 and the standards for services to children and families
established in RCW 74.14A.020.
(2) The design panel must address at least the following in its
deliberations and shall recommend in the transition plan:
(a) The degree to which the new department should be primarily a
regulatory agency versus a direct service provider;
(b) The degree of privatization or contracting out that is
recommended for the delivery of child protection and child welfare
services;
(c) One or more means of increasing administrative efficiencies;
(d) A process for expanding the mission of the department to
include prevention, early intervention, and treatment for child abuse
and neglect;
(e) Whether administration of children's mental health should be
transferred to the agency;
(f) Which functions and programs from the department of social and
health services, including the children's administration, and other
agencies should be incorporated into the new department;
(g) One or more processes for achieving a more appropriate and
efficient use of child welfare personnel and resources; and
(h) Performance outcome measures that will result in more relevant
child welfare policies.
(3) The transition plan and fiscal projection shall be developed
such that the new agency will be organized to achieve:
(a) Improved intraorganizational and extraorganizational
relationships;
(b) A new balance of central versus local control; and
(c) Stronger interagency relationships promoting a culture of
respect.
(4) The design panel shall make recommendations for changes to
state statutes to implement its findings.
(5) The transition plan shall reflect best practices in the
delivery of child protection and child welfare services and shall
identify relevant child-oriented performance measures, with an emphasis
on:
(a) Promoting and enhancing child well-being, including improving
child safety and improving foster care outcomes;
(b) Enhancing the preparation, training, and screening for agency
employment and leadership; and
(c) Increasing the recruitment and retention of qualified
caseworkers, social workers, supervisors, and administrators.
(6) The fiscal projection required under this section is intended
to inform legislative funding discussions and decisions regarding the
expenditure of state and federal resources.
(7) The design panel shall submit a preliminary report to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature not later than
September 1, 2009. The final transition plan and the fiscal projection
shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the legislature not later than July 1, 2010.
(8) Legislative staff shall develop proposed legislation necessary
to implement the department, based on the recommendations of the design
panel, by December 1, 2010.
(9) The design panel shall recommend criteria for appointment of
the interim director by September 1, 2009. Criteria for appointment of
the director shall be incorporated into the transition plan. In
developing criteria for appointment of the interim director and the
director, the design panel shall seek to describe the ideal set of
skills and qualifications for leading the department. The criteria
shall include extensive child welfare experience.
(10) This section expires July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 APPOINTMENT OF INTERIM DIRECTOR AND
DIRECTOR. (1) No later than September 1, 2010, the governor shall
appoint an interim director for the purpose of leading and directing
implementation of the transition plan, including any revisions made to
the plan subsequent to delivery.
(2) No later than July 1, 2012, the governor shall appoint a
director for the purpose of leading the department following full
implementation of the transition plan.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 4 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---