BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
regular property tax levy for each taxing district other than the state
may be set at the amount which would be allowed otherwise under this
chapter if the regular property tax levy for the district for taxes due
in prior years beginning with 1986 had been set at the full amount
allowed under this chapter including any levy authorized under RCW
52.16.160 that would have been imposed but for the limitation in RCW
52.18.065, applicable upon imposition of the benefit charge under
chapter 52.18 RCW.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a port
district with an assessed value in excess of two hundred billion
dollars or more on January 1st of the year in which the levy is set.
(3) The purpose of subsection (1) of this section is to remove the
incentive for a taxing district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum
level permitted under this chapter, and to protect the future levy
capacity of a taxing district that reduces its tax levy below the level
that it otherwise could impose under this chapter, by removing the
adverse consequences to future levy capacities resulting from such levy
reductions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies retroactively to all banked
levy capacity existing before the effective date of this act as well as
prospectively.

--- END ---