BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a convenient,
safe, secure, and environmentally sound product stewardship program for
the collection, transportation, and disposal of unwanted drugs from
residential sources may help to avoid accidental poisonings, decrease
illegitimate access to drugs that can lead to abuse, and protect our
surface and groundwater. The legislature further finds that producers
of those drugs are the best entity to manage and finance the product
stewardship program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the Washington state board of pharmacy.
(2) "Covered product" means all legend and nonlegend drugs,
including both brand name and generic drugs.
(3) "Drug wholesalers" means businesses that sell or distribute for
resale drugs to any entity other than the consumer.
(4) "Drugs" means:
(a) Articles recognized in the official United States
pharmacopoeia, the official national formulary, the official
homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement of
the formulary or those pharmacopoeias;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or other animals;
(c) Substances, other than food, intended to affect the structure
or any function of the body of humans or other animals; or
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any substances
specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, but not including
medical devices or their component parts or accessories.
(5) "Entity" means a person other than a natural person.
(6) "Generic drug" means a drug that is chemically identical or
bioequivalent to a brand name drug in dosage form, safety, strength,
route of administration, quality, performance characteristics, and
intended use. However, inactive ingredients may vary.
(7) "Legend" or "prescription" drugs means any drugs that are
required by any applicable federal or state law or regulation to be
dispensed on prescription only or are restricted to use by
practitioners only.
(8) "Nonlegend" or "nonprescription" drugs means any drugs that may
be lawfully sold without a prescription.
(9) "Person" means a firm, sole proprietorship, corporation,
limited liability company, general partnership, limited partnership,
limited liability partnership, association, cooperative, or other
entity of any kind or nature.
(10) "Plan" means a product stewardship plan required under this
chapter that describes the operation of a product stewardship program.
(11) "Producer" means the person who:
(a) Has legal ownership of the brand, brand name, or cobrand of the
covered product or manufactures a generic covered product sold in or
into Washington state;
(b) Imports a covered product that meets the definition under (a)
of this subsection and that producer has no physical presence in the
United States; or
(c) Sells at wholesale or retail a covered product and does not
have legal ownership of the brand, and elects to fulfill the
responsibilities of the producer for that product.
(12) "Product stewardship program" means a program for the
collection, transportation, and either recycling or disposal, or both,
of unwanted products that is financed as well as managed or provided by
the producers of those products.
(13) "Residential sources" includes single and multiple family
residences, and locations where household drugs are unused, unwanted,
disposed, or abandoned, such as hospice services, nursing homes,
boarding homes, schools, foster care, day care, and other locations
where either people or their pet animals, or both, reside on a
temporary or permanent basis. This does not include airport security,
drug seizures by law enforcement, pharmacy waste, business waste, or
any other source identified by the department of ecology as a
nonresidential or business source.
(14) "Stewardship organization" means a person appointed by a
producer to act as an agent on behalf of the producer to administer a
product stewardship program.
(15) "Unwanted product" means any covered product that its owner no
longer wants or that has been abandoned, discarded, or is intended to
be discarded by the owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Every producer of covered products sold
in or into the state must participate in a product stewardship program
for unwanted products from residential sources by January 1, 2010.
(2) Every producer must:
(a) Operate, either individually or collectively with other
producers, a product stewardship program approved by the board; or
(b) Enter into an agreement with a stewardship organization to
operate, on the producer's behalf, a product stewardship program
approved by the board.
(3) Producers must pay all the administrative costs and operational
costs associated with their product stewardship program, including the
cost of the collection, transportation, and disposal of the unwanted
products that are collected from residential sources and the recycling
or disposal, or both, of its packaging.
(4) Product stewardship programs must be provided without charging
any fee at the time of sale of the covered product or at the time the
unwanted products from residential sources are delivered or collected
for disposal.
(5) A producer required to establish a product stewardship program
or stewardship organization who has entered into an agreement to
operate a product stewardship program on a producer's behalf, must
operate the product stewardship program in accordance with:
(a) The product stewardship plan as approved by the board;
(b) This chapter and other applicable statutes; and
(c) Any rules that may be adopted to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A producer or group of producers who
operates or wishes to operate a product stewardship program, or a
stewardship organization that operates or wishes to operate a product
stewardship program on a producer's behalf, must submit a plan to the
board that includes the following:
(a) Contact information, including:
(i) The individual and the entity submitting the plan; and
(ii) A list of all producers participating in the product
stewardship program and their contact information;
(b) Performance goals, including:
(i) Recovery goals for the first, second, and third years of the
product stewardship program, expressed as pounds per capita, and an
explanation of how the recovery goals have been set to recover a
significant percentage of unwanted product from residential sources
relative to the quantity of product that may be available for disposal;
and
(ii) If packaging delivered into the program along with unwanted
product is separated from the unwanted product prior to disposal of the
unwanted product, how the proposed product stewardship program will
maximize the recycling of that packaging;
(c) Design improvements, including how the formulation, prescribing
practices, packaging, and distribution of covered products and their
packaging might be improved to reduce waste, reduce toxicity, and
reduce environmental impacts;
(d) A collection system, including:
(i) The location of collection sites used by the product
stewardship program;
(ii) How unwanted products from residential sources will be
collected in all counties in the state and in all cities with
populations of greater than ten thousand; and
(iii) How the collection program is convenient and adequate to
serve the needs of residents in both urban and rural areas;
(e) A handling and disposal system, including:
(i) The location, permit status, and record of any penalties,
violations, or regulatory orders received in the previous five years by
the hazardous waste disposal facilities used by the product stewardship
program;
(ii) A third-party audit of each disposal facility used by the
product stewardship program, including documented compliance with all
relevant local, state, national, and international laws;
(iii) The policies and procedures to be followed by persons
transporting or disposing, or both, unwanted products from residential
sources collected pursuant to the product stewardship program,
including how compliance with relevant local, state, national, and
international laws will be ensured; and
(iv) How the collected products will be tracked through to final
disposal and how safety and security will be maintained;
(f) A description of the public education effort and communications
strategy as required in section 14 (1) and (2) of this act; and
(g) How the product stewardship program addresses the requirements
in section 17 of this act.
(2) If the board is satisfied that a proposed product stewardship
plan complies with this chapter and any rules adopted to implement this
chapter, the board shall approve the product stewardship plan.
(3) A plan submitted to the board must be available to the general
public through the internet. Information within a plan that is deemed
by the board as potentially creating a security risk may not be posted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Every product stewardship program, wherever
located, must be licensed by the board in accordance with section 17 of
this act before engaging in the collection of unwanted drugs from
residential sources from or within this state. Such a license may not
be granted prior to approval of the product stewardship plan by the
board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) All plans must be submitted to the board
by January 1, 2009. Each plan submitted must include information, in
addition to the plan itself, that readily identifies through a table or
similar means how the requirements of this chapter and any rules
adopted to implement this chapter have been met in relation to the
content of the plan.
(2) The board shall review each plan and the accompanying
information as described in subsection (1) of this section in
consultation with the department of ecology.
(3) Within ninety days after receipt of a plan, the board shall
determine whether the plan complies with this chapter. If the plan is
approved, the board shall send a letter of approval. If a plan is
rejected, the board shall provide the applicant with the reasons for
rejecting the plan. If an applicant wishes to submit a revised plan,
the revised plan must be submitted within sixty days after receipt of
the letter of disapproval.
(4) Plans must be updated and submitted to the board for review at
least every four years.
(5) After January 1, 2009, each new producer and each producer new
to Washington state shall submit a plan to the board or join an
approved plan prior to initiating sales in or into this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A person operating a product stewardship
program may not make any substantive changes to the program without
amending its plan and obtaining the board's prior written approval of
the proposed changes, except as described in subsections (2) and (3) of
this section.
(2) Additions and changes to collection locations for unwanted
products from residential sources may be made without the board's prior
written approval. The product stewardship program must inform the
board of such an addition or change fifteen days prior to it occurring,
and if there is no objection by the board, the change may occur.
(3) Additional producers may participate in an approved product
stewardship program without the board's prior written approval. The
product stewardship program must inform the board of such an addition
within fifteen days of it occurring.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) If the board determines that a product
stewardship program is not being operated in accordance with the
requirements of this chapter and rules adopted to implement this
chapter, or if the board determines that there is an imminent danger to
the public, the board may:
(a) Amend the approval of the plan by clarifying terms or
conditions to ensure full implementation of the plan; or
(b) Suspend or cancel the approval of the plan.
(2) At least thirty days prior to amending, suspending, or
canceling an approval pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the
board shall inform the person operating the product stewardship program
of the action and provide them an opportunity to respond. The board
may extend this time frame on a case-by-case basis.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if the board
determines that it is necessary in order to protect the public from
imminent danger, the board may immediately amend, suspend, or cancel an
approval without giving the person operating the product stewardship
program an opportunity to be heard, but the board shall give that
person an opportunity to be heard through proceedings consistent with
the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, within fifteen
days after the date on which the board takes any of those actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) For the purposes of this section,
"reporting period" means the period commencing January 1st and ending
December 31st of the same calendar year.
(2) On or before June 30, 2011, and in each subsequent year, every
person operating a product stewardship program must prepare and submit
to the board a written annual report describing the activities of the
product stewardship program during the previous reporting period,
including:
(a) A list of producers participating in the product stewardship
program;
(b) The amount, by weight, of unwanted products collected from
residential sources through collection services in each county,
including documentation verifying collection and disposal of that
material;
(c) The collection services provided in each county and in all
cities with populations of greater than ten thousand, including the
location of each collection service;
(d) The disposal facility or facilities used and facility location
or locations, and the weight of unwanted products collected from
residential sources disposed at each facility;
(e) If packaging is separated from the unwanted product prior to
the disposal of the unwanted product, the amount and percentage of
packaging recycled and the name and location of the material recovery
facility to which it is delivered;
(f) At least every two years, documentation and summary results of
the third-party audits conducted on each disposal facility that is
used;
(g) Penalties, violations, or regulatory orders received during the
reporting period, if any, by each disposal facility that is used;
(h) Whether policies and procedures for transporting and disposing
unwanted products, as established in the plan, were followed during the
reporting period, and a description of noncompliance with those
policies and procedures, if any;
(i) Whether any safety or security problems occurred during
collection, transportation, or disposal of unwanted products during the
reporting period, and, if so, what changes will be made to policies,
procedures, or tracking mechanisms to improve safety and security in
the future;
(j) A description of the public education effort and communication
strategy implemented during the reporting period;
(k) A description of steps taken, if any, to improve the
formulation, prescribing practices, packaging, and distribution of
covered products and its packaging to reduce waste and reduce toxicity;
(l) A description of research, if any, regarding disposal
techniques that provide superior protection to human health and the
environment beyond that provided by current hazardous waste disposal
techniques;
(m) How the product stewardship program attained the performance
standards and recovery rates established in the program plan or set by
the board, and if the program did not attain those performance
standards and recovery rates, what actions it will take during the next
reporting period to do so;
(n) How the product stewardship program complied with any other
elements detailed in the plan approved by the board; and
(o) Any other information that the board may reasonably require.
(3) All reports submitted to the board must be made available to
the department of ecology for review.
(4) A report submitted to the board must be made available to the
general public through the internet. Information within a report that
is deemed by the board as potentially creating a security risk may not
be posted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Except as described in subsection (3)
of this section, each product stewardship program must dispose of all
unwanted products from residential sources at a hazardous waste
facility but otherwise retains all other generator exemptions for
household hazardous waste. Such a hazardous waste facility must be:
(a) Permitted with interim or final status under the Washington
dangerous waste rules;
(b) Authorized to manage hazardous waste by another state with a
hazardous waste program approved by the United States environmental
protection agency; or
(c) Authorized under interim status or permitted by the United
States environmental protection agency.
(2) Producers and stewardship organizations are encouraged to
invest in research to find disposal technologies that provide superior
protection to human health and the environment beyond that provided by
current hazardous waste disposal technologies.
(3)(a) Product stewardship programs may petition the department of
ecology for approval to use final disposal technologies that provide
superior environmental and human health protection than provided by
current hazardous waste disposal technologies for drugs, if and when
those technologies are proven and available. The proposed technology
must provide equivalent protection in each, and superior protection in
one or more, of the following areas:
(i) Monitoring of any emissions or waste;
(ii) Worker health and safety;
(iii) Air, water, or land emissions contributing to persistent,
bioaccumulative, and toxic pollution; and
(iv) Overall impact to the environment and human health.
(b) The department of ecology must inform the board of its
determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Producers who are participating in an
approved product stewardship program must be listed on the board's web
site. The board must list producers who have been identified as
noncompliant on the board's web site.
(2) Drug wholesalers must check the board's web site to determine
if producers of products they are wholesaling in or into the state are
in compliance with this chapter. If the drug wholesaler is unsure of
the status of the producer or believes the producer is not in
compliance with this chapter, the drug wholesaler shall contact the
board to determine the producer's status.
(3) The board shall send a written warning and a copy of the
requirements of this chapter to a producer who is not a part of an
approved product stewardship program and whose covered product is being
sold in or into the state. The board shall also send written
notification to a drug wholesaler known to be selling such a product in
or into the state.
(4) Producers who are not participating in an approved product
stewardship program and whose covered products continue to be sold into
the state sixty days after receipt of the written warning, and drug
wholesalers who sell products from producers who are not participating
in an approved product stewardship program sixty days after receipt of
the written warning, must pay a fine of ten thousand dollars per day of
noncompliance, beginning sixty days after receipt of the written
warning. The board is authorized to waive or reduce the fine if the
producer becomes compliant, to protect public health, or for any other
reasons the board determines to be justified.
(5) The board shall send a written warning under this chapter to a
producer who operates a product stewardship program, or a person who
operates a product stewardship program on a producer's behalf, who
fails to submit a plan, plan revision, or annual report as required in
this chapter. The written warning must include compliance requirements
and notification that the compliance requirements must be met within
sixty days. If the compliance requirements are not met within sixty
days, the producer or other person who operates a product stewardship
program on the producer's behalf must be assessed a ten thousand dollar
penalty.
(6) A violation of this chapter is a misdemeanor, and each calendar
day of operation is deemed a separate offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The board and the department of ecology
are authorized to adopt any rules necessary to enact, implement,
administer, and enforce this chapter.
(a) If rules are found to be necessary, the board and the
department of ecology are each authorized to require the producer or
group of producers or a stewardship organization to develop and pay all
costs of developing draft rules for submittal to the board or the
department of ecology that may be used by the agencies if found to be
suitable as a starting point for development of official rules.
(b) If requested to develop draft rules, the producer or group of
producers or stewardship organization must convene a diverse
stakeholder group to review and provide input for draft rule
development in meetings open to the public. Recommendations made under
draft rules must include the rationale that supports the
recommendations.
(c) The board and the department of ecology may use any draft rules
that are submitted as they deem appropriate to facilitate development
of official rules.
(2) By June 2012, the board shall establish mandated performance
standards and recovery rates for the fourth and subsequent program
years and must establish a fine system for those producers and product
stewardship programs that do not attain the mandated standards and
rates.
(a) By December 2011, the producer or group of producers or a
stewardship organization must develop and pay all costs for developing
a report for submittal to the board that recommends and explains the
rationale for recommended performance standards, recovery rates, and a
fine system for nonattainment of mandated standards and rates for the
fourth and subsequent program years.
(b) The producer or group of producers or stewardship organization
must convene a diverse stakeholder group to review and advise regarding
the development of the report in meetings open to the public.
(c) The board may use the report as it deems appropriate to
facilitate establishment of performance standards, recovery rates, and
a fine system.
(3) By December 31, 2013, the board shall report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature concerning the status of the product
stewardship program and recommend legislative action or modification to
the rules, if necessary.
(4) The department of ecology, or its designee, is authorized to
inspect, audit, or review the audits of disposal facilities that are
utilized to fulfill the requirements of a product stewardship program.
(5) The board shall invite comments once a year from health care
facilities, health care practitioners, pharmacists, local governments,
and citizens to report their satisfaction with the services provided by
a product stewardship program. This information must be used by the
board in reviewing plan updates and revisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The pharmaceutical product stewardship
programs account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
fines and penalties collected under section 11 of this act must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the administration of this chapter. Only the board may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) A product stewardship program must
promote the use of the program and the proper disposal of drugs so that
collection options are widely understood by customers, pharmacists,
retailers of covered products, and health care practitioners including
doctors and other prescribers.
(2) A product stewardship program must establish a toll-free
telephone number and web site where collection options will be
publicized and prepare educational and outreach materials describing
where and how to return unwanted drugs to the product stewardship
program. These materials must be provided to pharmacies, health care
facilities, and other interested parties.
(3) Health care practitioners, health care facilities, pharmacists,
drug wholesalers, drug retailers, waste companies, local and state
agencies, charity organizations, and others are encouraged to promote
the proper disposal of drugs and use of product stewardship programs.
(4) Pharmacies must provide information to consumers describing
where and how to return unwanted drugs to a product stewardship program
by providing a toll-free telephone number and web site established by
the product stewardship programs and educational materials provided by
product stewardship programs.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.64.165 and 1995 c 319 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall have the power to refuse, suspend, or revoke the
license of any manufacturer, wholesaler, pharmacy, shopkeeper,
itinerant vendor, peddler, poison distributor, health care entity,
((or)) precursor chemical distributor, pharmaceutical product
stewardship program, or any other board licensed entity upon proof
that:
(1) The license was procured through fraud, misrepresentation, or
deceit;
(2) The licensee has violated or has permitted any employee to
violate any of the laws of this state or the United States relating to
drugs, controlled substances, cosmetics, or nonprescription drugs, or
has violated any of the rules and regulations of the board of pharmacy
or has been convicted of a felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon a finding, after hearing, that a producer, as the term
"producer" is defined in section 2 of this act, or a license holder or
licensed entity, or any person in the employ of the licensee has
violated the laws of this chapter, this state, or the United States
relating to drugs, controlled substances, cosmetics, or nonprescription
drugs, or has violated any of the rules of the board of pharmacy, or
has been convicted of a felony, after the time of licensing, the board
has the power to impose a fine of ten thousand dollars per violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
wishing to operate a pharmaceutical product stewardship program must
apply for a no fee license of location from the board that entitles the
producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization to operate a
pharmaceutical product stewardship program for the collection,
transportation, and disposal of unwanted legend and nonlegend drugs
from consumers or residential sources and not business entities, for
the purpose of disposing of the collected drugs in compliance with the
laws and rules of this state and the United States.
(2) The producer, group of producers, or stewardship organization
may operate the pharmaceutical product stewardship program that
accomplishes activities listed in subsection (1) of this section upon
presentation of evidence as required and accepted by the board to
demonstrate competence and knowledge to operate the product stewardship
program. The board shall consider the past history of the applicant,
the firm officers, and employees when considering the application. A
finding of any drug offense is presumptive reason for denial of the
license by the board.
(3) Such a license may not be granted prior to approval of the
product stewardship plan by the board.
(4) The board shall require as part of the license application:
(a) Written operating policies and procedures meeting board
guidelines;
(b) Procedures for periodically conducting background checks for
firm officers and employees; and
(c) A specific written description of the business activities and
limitations of practice.
(5) Licenses obtained under this section only allow for the
collection and disposal of drugs.
(6) The license activity is limited to the specific activity and
limits as approved by the board application.
(7) The respective license is for a specified period ending on the
date to be determined by the secretary, and at the specified location.
Each owner shall, at the time of license renewal, file with the
department on an application provided by the board a declaration of
ownership and location. The declaration of ownership and location is
deemed presumptive evidence of ownership of the place of business
mentioned in the declaration of ownership and location. It is the duty
of the owner to immediately notify the department of any change of
location and ownership and to keep the license of location or the
renewal thereof properly exhibited in the place of business. Failure
to comply with this section is a misdemeanor, and each day in
noncompliance is deemed a separate offense.
(8) The board is authorized to establish licensing requirements for
additional entities and activities that the board finds necessary to
implement this chapter and chapter 70.-- RCW (sections 1 through 14 and
19 through 21 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 14 and 19 through 21 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 This act must be liberally construed to
carry out its purposes and objectives.

--- END ---