BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.04.010 and 1979 c 73 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter may be known and cited as the "((displaced homemaker))
life transitions act."

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.04.020 and 2004 c 275 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that homemakers are an unrecognized part of
the workforce who make an invaluable contribution to the strength,
durability, and ((purpose)) economic vitality of our state.
The legislature further finds that there is an increasing number of
persons in this state who, having ((fulfilled a)) performed the role as
homemaker, ((find themselves "displaced" in their middle years
through)) must transition into the workforce due to divorce, death of
a spouse or domestic partner, or disability or reduced earning
capability of the spouse((, or other loss of family income of a
spouse)) or domestic partner who was the primary family wage earner.
As a consequence, ((displaced)) transitioning homemakers are very often
left with little or no income; they are ineligible for categorical
welfare assistance; they are subject to the highest rate of
unemployment of any sector of the workforce; they face continuing
discrimination in employment because of their age ((and)) or lack of
recent paid work experience; they are ineligible for unemployment
insurance because they have been engaged in unpaid labor in the home;
they are ineligible for social security benefits because they are too
young, and many never qualify because they have been divorced from the
family wage earner; and they may have lost beneficiaries' rights under
employer's pension and health plans through divorce or death of
spouse((; and they are often unacceptable to private health insurance
plans because of their age)).
It is the purpose of this chapter to establish guidelines under
which the state board for community and technical colleges shall
contract to establish multipurpose ((service centers and)) programs to
provide necessary training opportunities, counseling, and services for
((displaced)) transitioning homemakers so that they may enjoy the
independence and economic security vital to a productive life.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.04.030 and 2004 c 275 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the state board for community and technical
colleges.
(2) (("Center" means a multipurpose service center for displaced
homemakers as described in RCW 28B.04.040.
(3))) "Program" means ((those)) life transitions multipurpose
programs described in RCW ((28B.04.050 which provide)) 28B.04.040
providing direct((,)) outreach, ((and)) information and ((training
services)) referral, and intensive instructional programs, which serve
the needs of ((displaced)) transitioning homemakers.
(((4) "Displaced)) (3) "Transitioning homemaker" means an
individual who:
(a) Has worked in the home for ((ten)) five or more years providing
unsalaried household services for family members on a full-time basis;
and
(b) Is not gainfully employed;
(c) Needs assistance in securing employment; and
(d) Has been dependent on the income of another family member but
is no longer supported by that income, ((or)) has been dependent on the
income of another family member but needs to secure employment because
of reduced earning capability of the primary family wage earner, has
been dependent on federal assistance but is no longer eligible for that
assistance, or is supported as the parent of minor children by public
assistance or spousal support but whose children are within two years
of reaching their majority.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.04.040 and 1985 c 370 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board, in consultation with state and local governmental
agencies, community groups, and local and national organizations
concerned with ((displaced)) transitioning homemakers, shall receive
applications and may contract with public or private nonprofit
organizations to establish multipurpose ((service centers)) programs
for ((displaced)) transitioning homemakers. In determining sites and
administering agencies or organizations for the ((centers)) programs,
the board shall consider the experience and capabilities of the public
or private nonprofit organizations making application to provide
services ((to)) as a ((center)) program.
(2) The board shall issue ((rules)) policies and procedures
prescribing the standards to be met by each ((center)) program in
accordance with the policies set forth in this chapter. Continuing
funds for the maintenance of each ((center)) contract shall be
contingent upon the determination by the board that the ((center))
multipurpose program is in compliance with the contractual conditions
and with the ((rules)) policies and procedures prescribed by the board.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.04.050 and 1985 c 370 s 39 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each ((center)) program contracted for under this chapter shall
include or provide information and referral to the following services:
(a) Job counseling services which shall:
(i) Be specifically designed for ((displaced)) transitioning
homemakers;
(ii) Counsel ((displaced)) transitioning homemakers with respect to
appropriate job opportunities; and
(iii) Take into account and build upon the skills and experience of
a homemaker and emphasize job readiness as well as skill development;
(b) Job training and job placement services which shall:
(i) Emphasize short-term training programs and programs which
expand upon homemaking skills and volunteer experience and which lead
to gainful employment;
(ii) Develop, through cooperation with state and local government
agencies and private employers, model training and placement programs
for jobs in the public and private sectors;
(iii) Assist ((displaced)) transitioning homemakers in gaining
admission to existing public and private job training programs and
opportunities, including vocational education and apprenticeship
training programs; and
(iv) Assist in identifying community needs and creating new jobs in
the public and private sectors;
(c) Health counseling services, including referral to existing
health programs, with respect to:
(i) General principles of preventative health care;
(ii) Health care consumer education, particularly in the selection
of physicians and health care services, including, but not limited to,
health maintenance organizations and health insurance;
(iii) Family health care and nutrition;
(iv) Alcohol and drug abuse; and
(v) Other related health care matters;
(d) Financial management services which provide information and
assistance with respect to insurance, taxes, estate and probate
problems, mortgages, loans, and other related financial matters;
(e) Educational services, including:
(i) Outreach and information about courses offering credit through
secondary or postsecondary education programs, and other re-entry
programs, including bilingual programming where appropriate; and
(ii) Information about such other programs as are determined to be
of interest and benefit to ((displaced)) transitioning homemakers by
the board;
(f) Legal counseling and referral services; and
(g) Outreach and information services with respect to federal and
state employment, education, health, public assistance, and
unemployment assistance programs which the board determines would be of
interest and benefit to ((displaced)) transitioning homemakers.
(2) The staff positions of each multipurpose ((center)) program
contracted for in accordance with RCW 28B.04.040, including
supervisory, technical, and administrative positions, shall, to the
maximum extent possible, be filled by ((displaced)) transitioning
homemakers.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.04.060 and 1985 c 370 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board may contract, where appropriate, with public or private
nonprofit groups or organizations serving the needs of ((displaced))
transitioning homemakers for programs designed to:
(1) Provide direct services to ((displaced)) transitioning
homemakers, including job counseling, job training and placement,
health counseling, financial management, educational counseling, legal
counseling, and referral services as described in RCW 28B.04.050;
(2) Provide statewide outreach and information services for
((displaced)) transitioning homemakers; and
(3) Provide training opportunities for persons serving the needs of
((displaced)) transitioning homemakers, including those persons in
areas not directly served by programs ((and centers)) established under
this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.04.080 and 2004 c 275 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall consult and cooperate with the department of
social and health services; the higher education coordinating board;
((the superintendent of public instruction;)) the workforce training
and education coordinating board; the employment security department;
the department of labor and industries; sponsoring agencies under the
federal ((comprehensive employment and training act (87 Stat. 839; 29
U.S.C. Sec. 801 et seq.),)) workforce investment act; and any other
persons or agencies as the board deems appropriate to facilitate the
coordination of ((centers)) programs established under this chapter
with existing programs of a similar nature.
(2) Annually on July 1st, each agency listed in subsection (1) of
this section shall submit a description of each service or program
under its jurisdiction which would support the programs ((and centers))
established by this chapter and the funds available for such support.
(3) The board shall serve as a clearinghouse for ((displaced))
transitioning homemaker information and resources and shall compile and
disseminate statewide information to the ((centers)) programs, related
agencies, and interested persons upon request.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.04.085 and 2004 c 275 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The executive coordinator of the board shall establish an
advisory committee, to be known as the ((displaced homemaker)) life
transitions program advisory committee.
(2) The advisory committee shall be advisory to the executive
coordinator and staff of the board.
(3) Committee membership shall not exceed twenty-two persons and
shall be geographically and generally representative of the state. At
least one member of the advisory committee shall either be or recently
have been a ((displaced)) transitioning homemaker.
(4) Functions of the advisory committee shall be:
(a) To provide advice on all aspects of administration of the
((displaced homemaker)) life transitions program, including content of
program rules, guidelines, and application procedures;
(b) To assist in coordination of activities under the ((displaced
homemaker)) life transitions program with related activities of other
state and federal agencies, with particular emphasis on facilitation of
coordinated funding.

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.04.100 and 1979 c 73 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Thirty percent of the funding for the ((centers and)) programs
under this chapter shall be provided by the organization administering
the ((center or)) program. Contributions in-kind, whether materials
and supplies, physical facilities, or personal services, may be
considered as all or part of the funding provided by the organization.

Sec. 10 RCW 28B.04.110 and 1985 c 370 s 43 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board may, in carrying out this chapter, accept, use, and
dispose of contributions of money, services, and property: PROVIDED,
That funds generated within individual ((centers)) multipurpose
programs may be retained and utilized by those ((centers)) programs.
All moneys received by the board or any employee thereof pursuant to
this section shall be deposited in a depository approved by the state
treasurer. Disbursements of such funds shall be on authorization of
the board or a duly authorized representative thereof. In order to
maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control such funds shall
be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation
shall be required to permit expenditure of such funds.

Sec. 11 RCW 28B.04.120 and 1979 c 73 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person in this state, on the ground of ((sex, age,)) race,
creed, color, ((religion,)) national origin, families with children,
sex, marital status, sexual orientation, age, honorably discharged
veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical ((handicap)) disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a person with a disability, shall be excluded from
participating in, be denied the benefits of, or be subjected to
discrimination under, any program or activity funded in whole or in
part with funds made available under this chapter.

--- END ---