BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory committee" means the driving instructors' advisory
committee as created in RCW 46.82.300.
(2) "Approved curriculum" means a department-approved driver
improvement course curriculum that has demonstrated effectiveness in
reducing crashes or citations, or both.
(3) "Classroom" means a space dedicated to and used by a driver
improvement instructor for the instruction of students. With prior
department approval, driver improvement classrooms may be at the
primary place of business or may be located within alternative
facilities, such as a public or private library, school, community
college, college, university, hotel, business training facility, or
other department-approved facility. A driver improvement school may
use multiple classroom locations to teach a driver improvement course
if each location is approved by the school and the department and bears
the same name and has the same ownership as the parent school.
(4) "Classroom instruction" means that portion of a driver
improvement course that is characterized by classroom-based student
instruction conducted by or under the direct supervision of a licensed
instructor or licensed instructors.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department.
(6) "Driver improvement course" means a course of instruction in
traffic safety education approved and licensed by the department that
consists of classroom or internet instruction regarding improving the
habits and attitudes of drivers as documented by the approved
curriculum.
(7) "Driver improvement course curriculum" means a course of
instruction intended to improve a driver's knowledge, perceptions, and
attitudes about driving.
(8) "Driver improvement school" means a business engaged in giving
instruction by classroom or internet delivery to educate drivers and
improve driving behavior.
(9) "Fraudulent practices" means any conduct or representation on
the part of a driver improvement school owner or instructor including:
(a) Inducing anyone to believe, or to give the impression, that
credit for attendance in a driver improvement course for the purpose of
obtaining an insurance discount or deferral of a citation under RCW
46.63.070 will automatically occur;
(b) Operation of a driver improvement school without a license,
providing instruction without an instructor's license, not verifying
student identity prior to all classroom courses presented, misleading
or false statements on applications for a driver improvement school
license or instructor's license or on any required records or
supporting documentation;
(c) Failing to fully document and maintain all required driver
improvement school records of instruction, school operation, and
instructor training;
(d) Issuing a driver improvement course certificate without
requiring completion of the necessary instruction as mandated by the
department.
(10) "Instructor" means any person employed by or otherwise
associated with a driver improvement school to instruct any student in
a classroom or internet course of instruction to improve driver habits,
attitudes, and behavior.
(11) "Owner" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, or other person or group that holds a substantial interest
in a driver improvement school.
(12) "Person" means any individual, firm, corporation, partnership,
or association.
(13) "Place of business" means a designated location at which the
business of a driver improvement school is transacted and its records
are kept.
(14) "Student" means any person enrolled in a driver improvement
course.
(15) "Substantial interest holder" means a person who has actual or
potential influence over the management or operation of any driver
improvement school. Evidence of substantial interest includes, but is
not limited to, one or more of the following:
(a) Directly or indirectly owning, operating, managing, or
controlling a driver improvement school or any part of a driver
improvement school;
(b) Directly or indirectly profiting from or assuming liability for
debts of a driver improvement school;
(c) Is an officer or director of a driver improvement school;
(d) Owning ten percent or more of any class of stock in a privately
or closely held corporate driver improvement school, or five percent or
more of any class of stock in a publicly traded corporate driver
improvement school;
(e) Furnishing ten percent or more of the capital, whether in cash,
goods, or services, for the operation of a driver improvement school
during any calendar year; or
(f) Directly or indirectly receiving a salary, commission,
royalties, or other form of compensation from the activity in which a
driver improvement school is or seeks to be engaged.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Chapter 18.235 RCW governs unlicensed
practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of
licensees under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The director administers and enforces
the law pertaining to driver improvement schools as set forth in this
chapter.
(2) The director may adopt and enforce reasonable rules consistent
with and necessary to carry out this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A person shall not engage in the
business of conducting a driver improvement school without a license
issued by the director for that purpose. The school's license must be
displayed before the school may:
(a) Schedule, enroll, or engage any students in a course of
instruction;
(b) Begin to offer any courses to the public; or
(c) Issue a completion certificate to an enrolled student.
(2) An application for a driver improvement school license must be
filed with the director, containing information prescribed by the
director, including a uniform business identifier number. Before an
application for a driver improvement school license is approved, the
business practices, facilities, records, and insurance of the proposed
school must be inspected and reviewed by authorized representatives of
the director. If an application is approved by the director, the
applicant shall be granted a license valid for a period of one year
from the date of issuance.
(3) Subject to the department's inspection of the business, the
director shall issue a license certificate to each licensee that must
be conspicuously displayed in the place of business of the licensee.
If the director has not received a renewal application on or before the
date a license expires, the license will be void requiring a new
application as provided for in this chapter.
(4) The person who has been issued a driver improvement school
license must notify the director in writing within ten business days
after any change is made to the officers, directors, or location of the
place of business of the school.
(5) A change involving the ownership of a driver improvement school
requires a new license application.
(a) The owner relinquishing the business must notify the director
in writing within ten business days.
(b) The new owner must submit an application for transfer of the
school's license to the director within ten business days.
(c) Upon receipt of the required notification and the application
for license transfer, the director shall permit continuance of the
business for a period not to exceed sixty days from the date of
transfer pending approval of the new application for a school license.
(d) The transferred license remains subject to suspension,
revocation, or denial in accordance with sections 9 and 10 of this act.
(6) Evidence of liability insurance coverage must be filed with the
director prior to the issuance or renewal of a school license, and must
meet the following standards:
(a) Coverage must be provided by a company authorized to do
business in Washington state;
(b) General liability coverage must be in the amount of not less
than one million dollars;
(c) The required coverage must be maintained in full force and
effect for the term of the school license;
(d) Changes in insurance coverage due to cancellation or expiration
require notification of the director and proof of continuing coverage
within ten working days following any change; and
(e) Coverage must be issued in the name of the school and identify
the covered locations.
(7) The driver improvement school demonstrates evidence of
financial stability by providing to the department a surety bond in the
amount of one hundred thousand dollars, which must be filed with the
director prior to the issuance or renewal of a school license, and must
meet the following standards:
(a) Coverage must be provided by a company authorized to do
business in Washington state;
(b) The surety bond must be maintained in full force and effect for
the term of the school license; and
(c) The surety bond must be issued in the name of the school and
identify the covered locations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A person affiliated with a driver
improvement school shall not give classroom instruction without a
license issued by the director for that purpose. An application for an
original or renewal instructor's license must be filed with the
director, containing information as prescribed by this chapter and by
the director. An application for a renewal instructor's license must
be accompanied by proof of the applicant's continuing professional
development that meets the standards adopted by the director. If the
applicant satisfactorily meets the application requirements and the
examination requirements as prescribed in section 7 of this act, the
applicant shall be granted a license valid for a period of one year
from the date of issuance. An instructor shall take a requalification
examination every five years.
(2) The director shall issue a license certificate to each
qualified applicant.
(a) An employing driver improvement school must conspicuously
display an instructor's license at its established place of business.
(b) Unless revoked, canceled, or denied by the director, the
license must remain the property of the licensee in the event of
termination of employment or employment by another driver improvement
school.
(c) If the director has not received a renewal application on or
before the date a license expires, the license shall be voided
requiring a new application as provided for in this chapter, including
examination.
(d) If revoked, canceled, or denied by the director, the license
must be surrendered to the department within ten days following the
effective date of such action.
(3) Each licensee must be provided with a wallet-size
identification card by the director at the time the license is issued,
which must be carried on the instructor's person at all times while
engaged in instructing.
(4) A person who has been issued an instructor's license shall
notify the director in writing within ten days of any change of
employment or termination of employment, providing the name and address
of the new driver improvement school that will employ the instructor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Instructors, owners, and other persons
affiliated with a driver improvement school who have contact with
students are required to have a background check through the Washington
state patrol criminal identification system and through the federal
bureau of investigation. The background check also includes a
fingerprint check using a fingerprint card. Persons covered by this
section must have their background rechecked as prescribed under this
subsection every five years.
(2) In addition to the background check required under subsection
(1) of this section, persons covered by this section must have a
background check through the Washington criminal identification system
at the time of application for any renewal license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The application for an instructor's
license must document the applicant's fitness, knowledge, skills, and
abilities to teach the classroom components of a driver improvement
course in a driver improvement school.
(2) An applicant is eligible to apply for an original instructor's
certificate if the applicant possesses and meets the following
qualifications and conditions:
(a) Has been licensed to drive for five or more years and possesses
a current and valid Washington driver's license or is a resident of a
jurisdiction immediately adjacent to Washington state and possesses a
current and valid license issued by the jurisdiction, and does not have
on his or her driving record any of the violations or penalties set
forth in (a) (i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection. The director may
examine the driving record of the applicant from the department and
from other jurisdictions, and from these records determine if the
applicant has had:
(i) Not more than one moving traffic violation within the preceding
twelve months or more than two moving traffic violations in the
preceding twenty-four months;
(ii) No alcohol-related traffic violation or incident within the
preceding seven years; and
(iii) No driver's license suspension, cancellation, revocation, or
denial within the preceding five years;
(b) Is a high school graduate or the equivalent and is at least
twenty-one years of age;
(c) Has completed an acceptable application on a form prescribed by
the director;
(d) Has satisfactorily completed a course of instruction in the
improvement of drivers acceptable to the director that is at least
sixteen hours in length; and
(e) Has successfully completed an instructor's examination as
prepared by the advisory committee, which consists of a knowledge test.
The examination determines:
(i) The applicant's knowledge of driving laws and rules; and
(ii) The applicant's ability to impart this knowledge and ability
to others.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 In case of the loss, mutilation, or
destruction of a driver improvement school license certificate or an
instructor's license certificate, the director shall issue a duplicate
of the certificate upon proof of the facts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The director may suspend, revoke, deny, or
refuse to renew an instructor's license or a driver improvement school
license, or impose such other disciplinary action authorized under RCW
18.235.110, upon a determination that the applicant, licensee, or owner
has engaged in unprofessional conduct as described under RCW 18.235.130
or upon a determination that:
(1) The licensee has made a false statement or concealed any
material fact in connection with the application or license renewal;
(2) The applicant, licensee, owner, or any person directly or
indirectly interested in the driver improvement school's business has
been convicted of a felony, or any crime involving violence,
dishonesty, deceit, indecency, degeneracy, or moral turpitude;
(3) The applicant, licensee, owner, or any person directly or
indirectly interested in the driver improvement school's business
previously held a driver improvement school license that was revoked,
suspended, or refused renewal by the director;
(4) The applicant, licensee, or owner does not have an established
place of business as required in this chapter;
(5) The applicant or licensee has failed to require all persons
with financial interest in the driver improvement school to be
signatories to the application;
(6) The applicant, licensee, or owner has committed fraud, induced
another to commit fraud, or engaged in fraudulent practices in relation
to the business conducted under the license, or has induced another to
resort to fraud in relation to securing for himself, herself, or
another a license to drive a motor vehicle;
(7) The applicant, licensee, or owner has engaged in conduct that
could endanger the educational welfare or personal safety of students
or others;
(8) A licensed instructor does not possess and meet the
qualifications and conditions set out in section 7(2)(a) of this act;
or
(9) The applicant, licensee, or owner failed to satisfy or fails to
satisfy the other conditions stated in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The license of any driver improvement
school or instructor may be suspended, revoked, denied, or refused
renewal, or such other disciplinary action authorized under RCW
18.235.110 may be imposed, for failure to comply with the business
practices specified in this section.
(1) A driver improvement school or instructor shall not utilize any
types of advertising without using the full legal name of the school
and identifying itself as a driver improvement school.
(2) A driver improvement school shall have an established place of
business owned, rented, or leased by the school and regularly occupied
and used exclusively for the administration of the business and storage
of required school, instructor, and student records. The established
place of business of a driver improvement school must be located in a
district that is zoned for business or commercial purposes. The office
should be staffed during normal business hours.
(a) The established place of business, branch office, or classroom
or advertised address of any driver improvement school shall not
consist of or include a house trailer, residence, tent, temporary
stand, temporary address, bus, telephone answering service if such
service is the sole means of contacting the driver improvement school,
a room or rooms in a hotel or rooming house or apartment house, or
premises occupied by a single or multiple-unit dwelling house.
(b) A driver improvement school may lease classroom space within a
public or private school that is recognized and regulated by the office
of the superintendent of public instruction to conduct student
instruction as approved by the director. However, such use of public
or private classroom space does not alleviate the driver improvement
school from securing and maintaining an established place of business
or from using its own classroom on a regular basis as required under
this chapter.
(c) This subsection does not limit the authority of local
governments to grant conditional use permits or variances from zoning
ordinances.
(3) Each driver improvement school shall maintain its student,
instructor, and operating records at its established place of business.
(a) Student records must include the student's name, address, and
telephone number, date of enrollment and all dates of instruction, the
driver's license number, the type of course attended, the total number
of hours of instruction, and the name and signature of the instructor
or instructors.
(b) Instructor records must include the instructor's license
number, the date of hire, the dates and duration of an instructor's
training including initial certification as an instructor and
continuing education, an abstract of the driving record for the
instructor obtained within the past year, and a list of the locations
where the instructor is providing student instruction.
(c) Student and instructor records must be maintained for five
years following the completion of the instruction. All records must be
made available for inspection upon the request of the department.
(d) Upon a transfer or sale of school ownership, the school records
must be transferred to and become the property and responsibility of
the new owner.
(4) Each driver improvement school shall, at its established place
of business, display, in a place where it can be seen by all clients,
a copy of the required minimum curriculum furnished by the department
and a copy of the school's own curriculum. Copies of the required
minimum curriculum criteria are to be provided to driver improvement
schools and instructors by the director.
(5) Driver improvement schools and instructors shall submit to
periodic inspections of their business practices, facilities, records,
and insurance by authorized representatives of the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Upon notification of suspension,
revocation, denial, or refusal to renew a license under this chapter,
a driver improvement school or instructor has the right to appeal the
action being taken. An appeal may be made to the director, who shall
cause a hearing to be held in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
Filing an appeal stays the action pending the hearing and the
director's decision. Upon conclusion of the hearing, the director
shall issue a decision on the appeal.
(1) A license may, however, be temporarily suspended by the
director without notice pending any prosecution, investigation, or
hearing where such emergency action is warranted. A licensee or
applicant entitled to a hearing must be given due notice of the
suspension.
(2) The sending of a notice of a hearing by registered mail to the
last known address of a licensee or applicant in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW is deemed due notice.
(3) The director or the director's authorized representative shall
preside over the hearing and may subpoena witnesses, administer oaths
to witnesses, take testimony of any person, and cause depositions to be
taken. A subpoena issued under the authority of this section must be
served in the same manner as a subpoena issued by a court of record.
Witnesses subpoenaed under this section and persons other than officers
or employees of the department are entitled to the same fees and
mileage as are allowed in civil actions in courts of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Any action or decision of the director may,
after a hearing is held as provided in this chapter, be appealed by the
party aggrieved to the superior court of the county in which the place
of business is located or where the aggrieved person resides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A violation of this chapter is a
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This chapter does not apply to or affect in
any manner courses of instruction offered in high schools, vocational-technical schools, colleges, or universities, and is not applicable to
instructors in any such high schools, vocational-technical schools,
colleges, or universities, as long as such course or courses are
conducted by such schools in a like manner to other regular courses.
If such course is conducted by any commercial school as identified in
this section on a contractual basis, the school and instructors must
qualify under this chapter. This chapter also does not apply to or
affect in any manner courses of instruction offered through a court of
law, and is not applicable to instructors in any such court, as long as
such course or courses are conducted solely by and for the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) The advisory committee shall consult
with the department in the development and maintenance of a basic
minimum required curriculum and the department shall furnish to each
qualifying applicant for an instructor's license or a driver
improvement school license a copy of the curriculum.
(2) In addition to information on the safe, lawful, and responsible
operation of motor vehicles on the state's highways, the basic minimum
required curriculum must include information on:
(a) Intermediate driver's license issuance, passenger and driving
restrictions and sanctions for violating these restrictions, and the
effect of traffic violations and collisions on driving privileges;
(b) The effects of alcohol and drug use on motor vehicle operators,
including information on drug and alcohol-related traffic injury and
mortality rates in the state of Washington and the current penalties
for driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol; and
(c) Motorcycle awareness, approved by the director, to ensure that
new operators of motor vehicles have been instructed in the importance
of safely sharing the road with motorcyclists.
(3) If the director is presented with acceptable proof that any
licensed instructor or driver improvement school is not showing proper
diligence in teaching the basic minimum curriculum as required, the
instructor or school must appear before the advisory committee and show
cause why the license of the instructor or school should not be revoked
for such negligence. If the committee does not accept such reasons
that may be offered, the director may revoke the license of the
instructor or school, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Instructional material used in driver
improvement schools must include information on the proper use of the
left-hand lane by motor vehicles on multilane highways and information
on bicyclists' and pedestrians' rights and responsibilities and
suggested riding procedures in common traffic situations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

Sec. 18 RCW 46.82.300 and 2006 c 219 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall be assisted in the duties and
responsibilities of this chapter by the driver instructors' advisory
committee, consisting of ((five)) seven members. Members of the
advisory committee shall be appointed by the director for two-year
terms and shall consist of a representative of the driver training
schools, a representative of the driving instructors (who shall not be
from the same driver training school as the driver training school
member), a representative of the driver improvement schools, a
representative of the driving improvement instructors (who shall not be
from the same driver improvement school as the driver improvement
school member), a representative of the superintendent of public
instruction, a representative of the department of licensing, and a
representative from the Washington state traffic safety commission.
Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060. A member who is receiving a salary from the
state shall not receive compensation other than travel expenses
incurred in such service.
(2) The advisory committee shall meet at least semiannually and
shall have additional meetings as may be called by the director. The
director or the director's representative shall attend all meetings of
the advisory committee and shall serve as chairman.
(3) Duties of the advisory committee shall be to:
(a) Advise and confer with the director or the director's
representative on matters pertaining to the establishment of rules
necessary to carry out this chapter;
(b) Review and update when necessary a curriculum consisting of a
list of items of knowledge and the processes of driving a motor vehicle
specifying the minimum requirements adjudged necessary in teaching a
proper and adequate course of driver education;
(c) Review and update when necessary curriculum guidelines
consisting of a list of items of knowledge and the processes of
improved driving of a motor vehicle specifying the minimum requirements
adjudged necessary in teaching a proper and adequate course of driver
improvement;
(d) Review and update instructor certification standards to be
consistent with RCW 46.82.330 and take into consideration those
standards required to be met by traffic safety education teachers under
RCW 28A.220.020(3); ((and
(d))) (e) Review and update instructor certification standards to
be consistent with section 7 of this act and take into consideration
those standards required to be met by traffic safety education teachers
under RCW 28A.220.020(3);
(f) Prepare the examination for a driver instructor's certificate
and review examination results at least once each calendar year for the
purpose of updating and revising examination standards; and
(g) Prepare the examination for a driver improvement instructor's
certificate and review examination results at least once each calendar
year for the purpose of updating and revising examination standards.

Sec. 19 RCW 46.63.020 and 2005 c 431 s 2, 2005 c 323 s 3, and
2005 c 183 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(2) RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(3) RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(4) RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of ownership and
registration and markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed
or declared a total loss;
(6) RCW 46.16.010 relating to the nonpayment of taxes and fees by
failure to register a vehicle and falsifying residency when registering
a motor vehicle;
(7) RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(8) RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(9) RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or
license plate for disabled persons' parking;
(10) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's
license;
(11) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a
driver's license or instruction permit;
(12) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of
a driver's license;
(13) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked
license or status;
(14) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;
(15) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational or temporary restricted driver's license;
(16) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without
an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that
the device is required;
(17) RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another person to start a
vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device;
(18) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;
(19) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;
(20) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(21) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(22) RCW 46.37.650 relating to the sale, resale, distribution, or
installation of a previously deployed air bag;
(23) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot
vehicles;
(24) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous
articles;
(25) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(26) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(27) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen,
and appraisers;
(28) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving
record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer, and an
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(29) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a
registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(30) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck
operators;
(31) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers,
flaggers, or firefighters;
(32) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or
cooperate with an officer;
(33) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(34) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police
vehicles;
(35) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(36) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(37) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one
driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(38) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;
(39) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(40) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;
(41) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway
workers;
(42) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;
(43) RCW 46.61.655(7) (a) and (b) relating to failure to secure a
load;
(44) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an unattended
vehicle with the motor running;
(45) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle fuel;
(46) RCW 46.37.671 through 46.37.675 relating to signal preemption
devices;
(47) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or attempt
to cancel a traffic citation;
(48) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding, abetting,
coercing, and committing crimes;
(49) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic offenders;
(50) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to obtain a
refund;
(51) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle business
practices, except where that chapter provides for the assessment of
monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(52) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of passengers
in for hire vehicles;
(53) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier insurance;
(54) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine without a
vehicle certificate;
(55) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a limousine
carrier;
(56) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(57) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training schools;
(58) Chapter 46.-- RCW (as created in section 21 of this act)
relating to driver improvement schools;
(59) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a cab card,
letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued under chapter
46.87 RCW;
(((59))) (60) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an
unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The department of licensing shall prepare
and submit a report to the transportation committees of the legislature
by November 1, 2008, listing proposed revisions to this act, including
revisions addressing appropriate fees to be charged for department
functions required under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 1 through 17 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus transportation appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---