BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.34.010 and 1993 c 429 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter applies to all condominiums created within this
state after July 1, 1990. RCW 64.34.040 (separate titles and
taxation), RCW 64.34.050 (applicability of local ordinances,
regulations, and building codes), RCW 64.34.060 (condemnation), RCW
64.34.208 (construction and validity of declaration and bylaws), RCW
64.34.268 (1) through (7) and (10) (termination of condominium), RCW
64.34.212 (description of units), RCW 64.34.304(1)(a) through (f) and
(k) through (r) (powers of unit owners' association), RCW 64.34.308(1)
(board of directors and officers), RCW 64.34.340 (voting—proxies), RCW
64.34.344 (tort and contract liability), RCW 64.34.354 (notification on
sale of unit), RCW 64.34.360(3) (common expenses—assessments), RCW
64.34.364 (lien for assessments), RCW 64.34.372 (association records),
RCW 64.34.425 (resales of units), RCW 64.34.455 (effect of violation on
rights of action; attorney's fees), and RCW 64.34.020 (definitions) to
the extent necessary in construing any of those sections, apply to all
condominiums created in this state before July 1, 1990; but those
sections apply only with respect to events and circumstances occurring
after July 1, 1990, and do not invalidate or supersede existing,
inconsistent provisions of the declaration, bylaws, or survey maps or
plans of those condominiums.
(2) The provisions of chapter 64.32 RCW do not apply to
condominiums created after July 1, 1990, and do not invalidate any
amendment to the declaration, bylaws, and survey maps and plans of any
condominium created before July 1, 1990, if the amendment would be
permitted by this chapter. The amendment must be adopted in conformity
with the procedures and requirements specified by those instruments and
by chapter 64.32 RCW. If the amendment grants to any person any
rights, powers, or privileges permitted by this chapter which are not
otherwise provided for in the declaration or chapter 64.32 RCW, all
correlative obligations, liabilities, and restrictions in this chapter
also apply to that person.
(3) This chapter does not apply to condominiums or units located
outside this state.
(4) RCW 64.34.400 (applicability—waiver), RCW 64.34.405 (liability
for public offering statement requirements), RCW 64.34.410 (public
offering statement—general provisions), RCW 64.34.415 (public offering
statement—conversion condominiums), RCW 64.34.420 (purchaser's right to
cancel), RCW 64.34.430 (escrow of deposits), RCW 64.34.440 (conversion
condominiums—notice—tenants), and RCW 64.34.455 (effect of violations
on rights of action—attorney's fees) apply with respect to all sales of
units pursuant to purchase agreements entered into after July 1, 1990,
in condominiums created before July 1, 1990, in which as of July 1,
1990, the declarant or an affiliate of the declarant owns or had the
right to create at least ten units constituting at least twenty percent
of the units in the condominium.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.32.150 and 1963 c 156 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All of the apartment owners may remove a property from the
provisions of this chapter by an instrument to that effect duly
recorded: PROVIDED, That the mortgagees and holders of all liens
affecting any of the apartments consent thereto or agree, in either
case by instrument duly recorded, that their mortgages and liens be
transferred to the percentage of the undivided interest of the
apartment owner in the property as hereinafter provided;
(2) Upon removal of the property from the provisions of this
chapter, the property shall be deemed to be owned in common by the
apartment owners. The undivided interest in the property owned in
common which shall appertain to each apartment owner shall be the
percentage of the undivided interest previously owned by such owners in
the common areas and facilities.
(3) Subject to RCW 64.34.010 (1) and (2) and the rights of
mortgagees and the holders of all liens affecting any of the
apartments, the apartment owners may remove a property from the
provisions of this chapter and terminate the condominium in the manner
set forth in RCW 64.34.268 (1) through (7) and (10), in which event all
of the provisions of RCW 64.34.268 (1) through (7) and (10) shall apply
to such removal in lieu of subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 64.32.010 and 1987 c 383 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Apartment" means a part of the property intended for any type
of independent use, including one or more rooms or spaces located on
one or more floors (or part or parts thereof) in a building, or if not
in a building, a separately delineated place of storage or moorage of
a boat, plane, or motor vehicle, regardless of whether it is destined
for a residence, an office, storage or moorage of a boat, plane, or
motor vehicle, the operation of any industry or business, or for any
other use not prohibited by law, and which has a direct exit to a
public street or highway, or to a common area leading to such street or
highway. The boundaries of an apartment located in a building are the
interior surfaces of the perimeter walls, floors, ceilings, windows and
doors thereof, and the apartment includes both the portions of the
building so described and the air space so encompassed. If the
apartment is a separately delineated place of storage or moorage of a
boat, plane, or motor vehicle the boundaries are those specified in the
declaration. In interpreting declarations, deeds, and plans, the
existing physical boundaries of the apartment as originally constructed
or as reconstructed in substantial accordance with the original plans
thereof shall be conclusively presumed to be its boundaries rather than
the metes and bounds expressed or depicted in the declaration, deed or
plan, regardless of settling or lateral movement of the building and
regardless of minor variance between boundaries shown in the
declaration, deed, or plan and those of apartments in the building.
(2) "Apartment owner" means the person or persons owning an
apartment, as herein defined, in fee simple absolute or qualified, by
way of leasehold or by way of a periodic estate, or in any other manner
in which real property may be owned, leased or possessed in this state,
together with an undivided interest in a like estate of the common
areas and facilities in the percentage specified and established in the
declaration as duly recorded or as it may be lawfully amended.
(3) "Apartment number" means the number, letter, or combination
thereof, designating the apartment in the declaration as duly recorded
or as it may be lawfully amended.
(4) "Association of apartment owners" means all of the apartment
owners acting as a group in accordance with the bylaws and with the
declaration as it is duly recorded or as they may be lawfully amended.
(5) "Building" means a building, containing two or more apartments,
or two or more buildings each containing one or more apartments, and
comprising a part of the property.
(6) "Common areas and facilities", unless otherwise provided in the
declaration as duly recorded or as it may be lawfully amended,
includes:
(a) The land on which the building is located;
(b) The foundations, columns, girders, beams, supports, main walls,
roofs, halls, corridors, lobbys, stairs, stairways, fire escapes, and
entrances and exits of the building;
(c) The basements, yards, gardens, parking areas and storage
spaces;
(d) The premises for the lodging of janitors or persons in charge
of the property;
(e) The installations of central services such as power, light,
gas, hot and cold water, heating, refrigeration, air conditioning and
incinerating;
(f) The elevators, tanks, pumps, motors, fans, compressors, ducts
and in general all apparatus and installations existing for common use;
(g) Such community and commercial facilities as may be provided for
in the declaration as duly recorded or as it may be lawfully amended;
(h) All other parts of the property necessary or convenient to its
existence, maintenance and safety, or normally in common use.
(7) "Common expenses" include:
(a) All sums lawfully assessed against the apartment owners by the
association of apartment owners;
(b) Expenses of administration, maintenance, repair, or replacement
of the common areas and facilities;
(c) Expenses agreed upon as common expenses by the association of
apartment owners;
(d) Expenses declared common expenses by the provisions of this
chapter, or by the declaration as it is duly recorded, or by the
bylaws, or as they may be lawfully amended.
(8) "Common profits" means the balance of all income, rents,
profits and revenues from the common areas and facilities remaining
after the deduction of the common expenses.
(9) "Declaration" means the instrument by which the property is
submitted to provisions of this chapter, as hereinafter provided, and
as it may be, from time to time, lawfully amended.
(10) "Land" means the material of the earth, whatever may be the
ingredients of which it is composed, whether soil, rock, or other
substance, whether or not submerged, and includes free or occupied
space for an indefinite distance upwards as well as downwards, subject
to limitations upon the use of airspace imposed, and rights in the use
of the airspace granted, by the laws of this state or of the United
States.
(11) "Limited common areas and facilities" includes those common
areas and facilities designated in the declaration, as it is duly
recorded or as it may be lawfully amended, as reserved for use of
certain apartment or apartments to the exclusion of the other
apartments.
(12) "Majority" or "majority of apartment owners" means the
apartment owners with fifty-one percent or more of the votes in
accordance with the percentages assigned in the declaration, as duly
recorded or as it may be lawfully amended, to the apartments for voting
purposes.
(13) "Person" includes any individual, corporation, partnership,
association, trustee, or other legal entity.
(14) "Property" means the land, the building, all improvements and
structures thereon, all owned in fee simple absolute or qualified, by
way of leasehold or by way of a periodic estate, or in any other manner
in which real property may be owned, leased or possessed in this state,
and all easements, rights and appurtenances belonging thereto, none of
which shall be considered as a security or security interest, and all
articles of personalty intended for use in connection therewith, which
have been or are intended to be submitted to the provisions of this
chapter.
(15) "Percent of the apartment owners" means the apartment owners
with the stated percent or more of the votes in accordance with the
percentages assigned in the declaration, as duly recorded or as it may
be lawfully amended, to the apartments for voting purposes.

--- END ---