BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that high school
students need to graduate with the skills necessary to be successful in
college and work. The state graduation requirements help to ensure
that Washington high school graduates have the basic skills to be
competitive in a global economy. Under education reform started in
1993, time was to be the variable, obtaining the skills was to be the
constant. Therefore, students who need additional time to gain the
academic skills needed for college and the workplace should have the
opportunities they need to reach high academic achievement, even if
that takes more than the standard four years of high school.
One such group of students is English language learners. The
legislature finds that there are about seventy-seven thousand students
in Washington who are English language learners and of those more than
twelve thousand are in high school. The legislature finds that many
English language learners entering this country at high school need
additional time and support to achieve academic proficiency in English
and meet graduation requirements.

PART I
EXTENDED LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The extended learning opportunities program is created for
eligible eleventh and twelfth grade students who are not on track to
meet local or state graduation requirements. The program shall provide
early notification of graduation status, information on education
opportunities, and incentives for new district programs.
(2) Schools shall notify eligible students and their parents or
legal guardians about the status of their progress on state and local
graduation requirements, the alternative assessment opportunities
available to students under RCW 28A.655.061 and 28A.655.065, and
regarding continued instructional services identified in section 102 of
this act. Information provided to students must include:
(a) Any credit deficiencies;
(b) Whether they have completed other graduation requirements
established by the state board of education or the legislature;
(c) If the student is in a transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(d) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students including, but not limited to, informing students
of the option to continue to receive instructional services after grade
twelve or until the age of twenty-one. This may include:
(i) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements;
(ii) Available programs offered through skill centers, community or
technical colleges, or other public or private institutions.
(3) Notification of information in subsection (2) of this section
shall occur twice for students not on track to meet state and local
graduation requirements. The first notification shall take place in
the spring of the eleventh grade year and then, if necessary, the
spring of the twelfth grade year. Schools may notify students and
their parents or guardians through school conferences, written
notification, or in the student learning plan identified under RCW
28A.655.061. Schools serving English language learners and their
parents shall translate information in the primary language of the
family to the extent feasible. Notifications shall begin with the
graduating class of 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Districts shall make available to students in grade twelve who
have failed to meet one or more local or state graduation requirements
the option of continuing enrollment in the school district in
accordance with RCW 28A.225.160. Districts are authorized to use basic
education program funding to provide instruction to eligible students
under RCW 28A.150.220(3).
(2) Instructional services can occur during the regular school day,
evenings, on weekends, or at a time and location deemed appropriate by
the school district in order to meet the needs of these students.
Instructional services can include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(a) Individual or small group instruction;
(b) Instruction in English language arts and/or mathematics that
eligible students need to pass all or part of the Washington assessment
of student learning;
(c) Attendance in high school or alternative school classes;
(d) Inclusion in remediation programs;
(e) Language development instruction for English language learners;
and/or
(f) Online curriculum and instructional support.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, to the
extent that funding is appropriated, shall create a planning grant
program for school districts, educational service districts, and others
that want to expand the availability of programs designed specifically
for these students. Grants shall only be used for planning and start-up costs associated with services to eligible students. Applicants
with a significant population of English language learners shall be
given priority.

PART II
INSTRUCTIONAL SUPPORT FOR ENGLISH LANGUAGE LEARNERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the secondary
integrated basic education and skills training (I-BEST) pilot project
is created to integrate career and technical instruction, core academic
and basic skills, and English as a second language, for secondary
school students. The objective of the pilot project is to determine
whether and how a successful community and technical college
instructional model can be adapted and implemented at a secondary
school level.
(2) The goal of secondary I-BEST is to enable and motivate
secondary students who are struggling with language and academic skills
to earn a high school diploma and be prepared for workforce entry or
further education and training in a career and technical field. Under
the pilot project, academic, career and technical, and English-as-a
second-language teachers shall provide instruction through team and
coteaching. Course content shall be integrated across the three
domains of career and technical, academic, and language.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate pilot project grants to high schools or skill centers on a
competitive basis. Grants are for a three-year period. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall work with the state
board for community and technical colleges, grant recipients, and the
Washington State University social and economic sciences research
center to design and implement an evaluation of the pilot project that
includes comparisons of gains in achievement for students in the
project compared to other similar students. A report on the pilot
project and results of the evaluation shall be submitted to the
governor and the education and fiscal committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2010.
(4) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
provide technical assistance and advice to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the pilot project regarding
best practices for I-BEST, including program design, professional
development, assessment, and evaluation. The state board shall also
designate one or more community or technical colleges with exemplary
postsecondary I-BEST programs to serve as mentors for the pilot
project.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Since more than sixty percent of English language learners are
Spanish speakers but very few teachers in Washington state are
bilingual, the legislature wishes to expand access to online curriculum
support in Spanish. Students, especially twelfth grade students who
have not met state graduation requirements, needing additional academic
support can access this online curriculum.
(2) If funding is provided for this purpose, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with Yakima school
district to expand the consejo nacional educativa para la vida y el
trabajo (CONEVyT) online instructional program, developed by the
Mexican education department, to other school districts. Services to
districts shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Training for teachers on how to use CONEVyT to support
classroom instruction; and
(b) Technical assistance on accessing the CONEVyT portal and the
features available on the web site.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, if
funded, shall assemble a work group of curriculum and Spanish language
experts to review courses offered through CONEVyT and those courses to
state standards. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall make the results of the standards alignment available
to school districts by July 2009.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, if
funded, shall contract for a third party review of the effectiveness of
the CONEVyT program. The program review shall be submitted to
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 28A.180
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that educators are faced with the complex
responsibility of educating an increasing population of English
language learners who speak a wide variety of languages and dialects
and may come with varying levels of formal schooling. These educators
struggle to provide meaningful instruction that helps students meet
high content standards while acquiring English. Therefore the
legislature finds that educators need professional development focused
on effective strategies for English language instruction.
(2) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a professional
development plan for English language instruction using the findings
identified by the Northwest regional educational laboratory field study
report required in RCW 28A.630.058.
(3) The professional development plan for English language
instruction shall identify:
(a) Foundational competencies for development of academic English
skills in English language learner students that all teachers should
acquire in initial teacher preparation programs;
(b) Components of a professional development program that build
classroom teacher competence for developing academic English skills in
English language learner students; and
(c) Job-embedded practices that connect the English language
learner teacher and classroom teachers to coordinate instruction to
support the work of the student.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall complete the
plan in subsection (2) of this section by December 1, 2009.

PART III
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---