BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 As a graduation requirement, the culminating
project is intended to provide students with a unique opportunity to
evidence the totality of their educational experience through an
individualized learning experience of their choosing. While the
culminating project is intended to show that the student met the
essential academic learning standards, it also provides a venue for the
student to explore areas of personal interest, develop leadership
skills, and understand how the learning standards connect with future
career opportunities.
The legislature supports the integration of natural science,
wildlife, and environmental education programs into the common school
curriculum as a way to better engage students and to set the stage for
life-long learning. It is the intent of the legislature to strengthen
that integration by creating a program that allows students to satisfy
the culminating project through participation in high-quality, hands-on
environmental or ecological projects that link state academic standards
with real-world learning experiences. These projects will begin
preparing students to be the next generation of leaders with the
skills, knowledge, and dispositions to effectively and creatively
address the challenges and opportunities of the twenty-first century.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.310
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The sustainable environment culminating project grant program
is created to establish an organized regional approach to providing
environmentally related culminating projects for students that connect
school academics with natural resource career possibilities. Grant
funds provided for the purpose of supporting environmentally related
culminating projects shall be disbursed through a competitive grant
process administered through the educational service districts that
receive an appropriation in the budget. Educational service districts
may accept funds from other public and private sources which may be
pooled and disbursed through the competitive grant process.
(2) Educational service districts receiving funding shall award the
grant funds to a nonprofit organization or tribal education department
that has proven experience with delivering applied learning
opportunities to students in the area of environmental education,
including but not limited to areas of interest such as ocean policy,
biodiversity, Puget Sound clean-up, environmental restoration, and
climate change. Educational service districts may pool grant funds and
award a single grant to a single nonprofit organization or tribal
education department that will work with individual school districts.
(3) The grant recipients shall be required to provide assistance to
school districts through instructional resources and support,
professional development and equipment sharing, and by providing sample
curricula and project ideas. The nonprofit organizations or tribal
education departments shall assist school districts in developing
culminating projects for students that:
(a) Allow students to demonstrate their knowledge and skills in
relationship to the essential academic learning standards and to do so
through integration of reading, writing, communication, mathematics,
science, social studies, the arts, and health/fitness and in a real-world, hands-on context;
(b) Provide a forum, both virtual and in-person, that allows
students to be involved with and interact with scientists,
policymakers, and local community leaders during the development and
completion of the culminating project. A community mentoring component
shall be included in the program to provide support to students;
(c) Promote leadership skills;
(d) Are designed to improve student learning and promote a sense of
personal responsibility through hands-on, technology-assisted science
and community research in the field. The project shall require the
student to use scientific protocols to share data and compare findings
with others and learn firsthand the impacts that people have on the
environment; and
(e) Help students learn about responsible stewardship and careers
in sustainable design.
(4) By December 2009, the nonprofit organizations or tribal
education departments receiving grants under this section shall report
to the educational service districts and the legislature the number of
students served by the program, the types and number of culminating
projects completed, and the feedback on the program from students,
school administrators, and teachers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of funds, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall work with the grant
recipients as provided in section 2 of this act to implement a
statewide online project database in which students can find project
opportunities through connections with community-based and agency
resources and where students can post their own projects and continue
or build on the work of other student projects. This database shall be
housed and managed by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.

--- END ---