BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The purposes and goals of victim impact panels are to:
(a) Help offenders understand the impact of their crimes on
victims, their families and friends, and the community;
(b) Provide victims with a structured, positive outlet to share
their personal experiences and to educate offenders, professionals in
the justice system, and others about the physical, emotional, and
financial consequences of crime; and
(c) Build a partnership among victim service providers and justice
agencies that can raise the individual and community awareness of the
short-term and long-term impacts of crime.
(2) To fulfill the goals of victim impact panels and to meet any
probationary requirements or other sentencing conditions of a superior,
district, or municipal court, each court administration or the
equivalent shall develop and maintain a registry of qualified victim
impact panels. To be listed among a superior, district, or municipal
court's registry, the victim impact panel must meet the following
minimum standards:
(a)(i) The victim impact panel must be offered by a nonprofit
corporation, agency, entity, or other organization within the county
that is not associated primarily with providing alcohol, chemical
dependency, or domestic violence perpetrators' treatment to offenders;
(ii) If no such nonprofit corporation, agency, entity, or other
organization is available in the county, the victim impact panel may be
offered by a corporation, agency, entity, or other organization
associated primarily with alcohol, chemical dependency, or domestic
violence perpetrators' treatment provided that any fees or proceeds
charged by the corporation, agency, entity, or other organization for
the victim impact panel is donated to victims' services programs within
that county, less the actual cost of facilitating the victim impact
panel;
(b) The victim impact panel shall charge all persons required to
attend a reasonable fee to attend and participate;
(c) The victim impact panel shall have a clearly stated mission or
purpose of personalizing the impact and effects of driving under the
influence or domestic violence, whichever is applicable, on victims and
family members;
(d) The victim impact panel shall maintain attendance records for
at least five years;
(e) The victim impact panel shall have a designated facilitator who
is responsible for the enforcement of these minimum standards and who
is responsible for maintaining appropriate records and communication
with the referring courts and probationary departments regarding
attendance or nonattendance;
(f) The victim impact panel shall have a "no admittance" policy for
anyone under the influence of alcohol or drugs, or whose actions or
behavior are otherwise inappropriate. The victim impact panel may
institute additional admission requirements; and
(g) The victim impact panel shall have policies and procedures to
recruit, screen, train, and provide feedback and ongoing support to the
panelists. The panel shall take reasonable steps to verify the
authenticity of each panelist's story.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.5152 and 2006 c 73 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to penalties that may be imposed under RCW 46.61.5055,
the court may require a person who is convicted of a nonfelony
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or who enters a deferred
prosecution program under RCW 10.05.020 based on a nonfelony violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, to attend an educational program
focusing on the emotional, physical, and financial suffering of victims
who were injured by persons convicted of driving while under the
influence of intoxicants. The educational program must meet the
minimum standards established in section 1 of this act.

--- END ---