BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.83.030 and 2001 c 168 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Property that is involved in a transaction or attempted
transaction in violation of RCW 9A.83.020, or that is a proceed((s))
traceable to or derived from specified unlawful activity or a violation
of RCW 9A.83.020 ((are)) is subject to seizure and forfeiture. A law
enforcement agency, the attorney general, or a county prosecuting
attorney may file a civil action for the forfeiture of ((proceeds)) the
property, or forfeiture may be commenced by seizure of the property as
provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section. Unless otherwise
provided for under this section, no property rights exist in ((these
proceeds)) the property. All right, title, and interest in the
((proceeds)) property shall vest in the governmental entity of which
the seizing or suing law enforcement agency is a part upon commission
of the act or omission giving rise to forfeiture under this section.
(2) Real or personal property subject to forfeiture under this
chapter may be seized by any law enforcement officer of this state upon
process issued by a superior court that has jurisdiction over the
property. Any agency seizing real property shall file a lis pendens
concerning the property. Real property seized under this section shall
not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until ninety days after
seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered, whichever is
later. Real property seized under this section may be transferred or
conveyed to any person or entity who acquires title by foreclosure or
deed in lieu of foreclosure of a security interest. Seizure of
personal property without process may be made if:
(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search
warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant
issued pursuant to RCW 69.50.502; ((or))
(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior
judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture
proceeding based upon this chapter; or
(c) The law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that
the property is forfeitable pursuant to this section, and an exception
to the federal and state constitutional search warrant requirements
would apply.
(3) A seizure under subsection (2) of this section commences
proceedings for forfeiture. The law enforcement agency under whose
authority the seizure was made shall cause notice of the seizure and
intended forfeiture of the seized ((proceeds)) property to be served
within fifteen days after the seizure on the owner of the property
seized and the person in charge thereof and any person who has a known
right or interest therein, including a community property interest.
Service of notice of seizure of real property shall be made according
to the rules of civil procedure. However, the state may not obtain a
default judgment with respect to real property against a party who is
served by substituted service absent an affidavit stating that a good
faith effort has been made to ascertain if the defaulted party is
incarcerated within the state, and that there is no present basis to
believe that the party is incarcerated within the state. Notice of
seizure in the case of property subject to a security interest that has
been perfected by filing a financing statement in accordance with
chapter 62A.9A RCW, or a certificate of title, shall be made by service
upon the secured party or the secured party's assignee at the address
shown on the financing statement or the certificate of title. The
notice of seizure in other cases may be served by any method authorized
by law or court rule including but not limited to service by certified
mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail is complete upon
mailing within the fifteen-day period after the seizure.
(4) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
the property within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of
personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the
property seized shall be deemed forfeited. The community property
interest in real property of a person whose spouse committed a
violation giving rise to seizure of the real property may not be
forfeited if the person did not participate in the violation.
(5) If a person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
property within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of personal
property and ninety days in the case of real property, the person or
persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to
the claim or right. The provisions of RCW 69.50.505(((e))) (5) shall
apply to any such hearing. The seizing law enforcement agency shall
promptly return property to the claimant upon the direction of the
administrative law judge or court. A forfeiture proceeding removed to
a court of competent jurisdiction under this subsection shall be
conducted under the civil rules governing that court.
(6)(a) With respect to a property interest owned at the time of the
conduct giving rise to the forfeiture, the interest of an owner cannot
be forfeited under this section by reason of any act or omission
established by a preponderance of the evidence by the owner to have
been committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent.
(b) With respect to a property interest acquired after the conduct
giving rise to the forfeiture has taken place, the interest of an owner
cannot be forfeited under this section if the owner establishes by a
preponderance of the evidence that, at the time the owner acquired the
interest in the property, the owner was a bona fide purchaser or a
seller of goods or services for value and did not know and was
reasonably without cause to believe that the property was subject to
forfeiture.
(c) A forfeiture of property encumbered by a security interest is
subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party
proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the security interest is
a bona fide security interest and the secured party, at the time the
security interest was created, did not know of the acts or omissions
that are the basis of the forfeiture.
(7) In any proceeding to forfeit property under this title, where
the claimant substantially prevails, the claimant is entitled to
reasonable attorneys' fees reasonably incurred by the claimant. In
addition, in a court hearing between two or more claimants to the
property involved, the prevailing party is entitled to a judgment for
costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(8) Orders for the forfeiture of real property shall be entered by
the superior court, subject to court rules. Such an order shall be
filed by the seizing agency in the county auditor's records in the
county in which the real property is located.
(9) All property forfeited shall be used first to pay restitution
to any person damaged by any specified unlawful activity or violation
of RCW 9A.83.020 that is the basis of the forfeiture. If there is a
criminal restitution order in favor of a person entitled to restitution
under this subsection, the forfeiture proceeds payable to that person
shall be paid through the registry of the court that entered the
criminal restitution order.
(10) Disposition of any remaining forfeited property shall be made
in the manner provided for in RCW 69.50.505 (((h))) (8) through (((j)
and (n))) (10), except that restitution paid under subsection (9) of
this section shall be deducted in determining the net proceeds of
forfeited property, and property and proceeds of forfeiture retained by
the seizing or suing law enforcement agency shall be used exclusively
for the expansion and improvement of law enforcement activity in
general.

--- END ---