BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that restoration of
rights for individuals who have satisfied every other obligation of
their sentence best serves to reintegrate them into society, even if a
no-contact order exists. Therefore, the legislature further finds
clarification of the existing statute is desirable to provide clarity
to the courts that a certificate of discharge shall be issued, while
the no-contact order remains in effect, once other obligations are
completed.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.637 and 2007 c 171 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When an offender has completed all requirements of the
sentence, including any and all legal financial obligations, and while
under the custody and supervision of the department, the secretary or
the secretary's designee shall notify the sentencing court, which shall
discharge the offender and provide the offender with a certificate of
discharge by issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by
mailing the certificate to the offender's last known address.
(b)(i) When an offender has reached the end of his or her
supervision with the department and has completed all the requirements
of the sentence except his or her legal financial obligations, the
secretary's designee shall provide the county clerk with a notice that
the offender has completed all nonfinancial requirements of the
sentence.
(ii) When the department has provided the county clerk with notice
that an offender has completed all the requirements of the sentence and
the offender subsequently satisfies all legal financial obligations
under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the sentencing court,
including the notice from the department, which shall discharge the
offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the
certificate to the offender's last known address.
(c) When an offender who is subject to requirements of the sentence
in addition to the payment of legal financial obligations either is not
subject to supervision by the department or does not complete the
requirements while under supervision of the department, it is the
offender's responsibility to provide the court with verification of the
completion of the sentence conditions other than the payment of legal
financial obligations. When the offender satisfies all legal financial
obligations under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the
sentencing court that the legal financial obligations have been
satisfied. When the court has received both notification from the
clerk and adequate verification from the offender that the sentence
requirements have been completed, the court shall discharge the
offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the
certificate to the offender's last known address.
(2) Issuance of a certificate of discharge under this section shall
not affect, nor be prevented by, an order that excludes or prohibits
the offender from having contact with a specified person or business,
or coming within a set distance of any specified location, that was
contained in the judgment and sentence.
(3) Every signed certificate and order of discharge shall be filed
with the county clerk of the sentencing county. In addition, the court
shall send to the department a copy of every signed certificate and
order of discharge for offender sentences under the authority of the
department. The county clerk shall enter into a database maintained by
the administrator for the courts the names of all felons who have been
issued certificates of discharge, the date of discharge, and the date
of conviction and offense.
(((3))) (4) An offender who is not convicted of a violent offense
or a sex offense and is sentenced to a term involving community
supervision may be considered for a discharge of sentence by the
sentencing court prior to the completion of community supervision,
provided that the offender has completed at least one-half of the term
of community supervision and has met all other sentence requirements.
(((4))) (5) Except as provided in subsection (((5))) (6) of this
section, the discharge shall have the effect of restoring all civil
rights lost by operation of law upon conviction, and the certificate of
discharge shall so state. Nothing in this section prohibits the use of
an offender's prior record for purposes of determining sentences for
later offenses as provided in this chapter. Nothing in this section
affects or prevents use of the offender's prior conviction in a later
criminal prosecution either as an element of an offense or for
impeachment purposes. A certificate of discharge is not based on a
finding of rehabilitation.
(((5))) (6) Unless otherwise ordered by the sentencing court, a
certificate of discharge shall not terminate the offender's obligation
to comply with an order ((issued under chapter 10.99 RCW)) that
excludes or prohibits the offender from having contact with a specified
person or coming within a set distance of any specified location that
was contained in the judgment and sentence. An offender who violates
such an order after a certificate of discharge has been issued shall be
subject to prosecution according to the chapter under which the order
was originally issued.
(((6))) (7) Upon release from custody, the offender may apply to
the department for counseling and help in adjusting to the community.
This voluntary help may be provided for up to one year following the
release from custody.

--- END ---