BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.260.110 and 2007 c 269 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice of a dental assistant in the discharge of official
duties by dental assistants in the United States federal services on
federal reservations, including but not limited to the armed services,
coast guard, public health service, veterans' bureau, or bureau of
Indian affairs; ((or))
(2) Expanded function dental auxiliary education and training
programs approved by the commission and the practice as an expanded
function dental auxiliary by students in expanded function dental
auxiliary education and training programs approved by the commission,
when acting under the direction and supervision of persons licensed
under chapter 18.29 or 18.32 RCW; or
(3) Dental assistant education and training programs approved by
the secretary and the practice of dental assisting by students in
dental assistant education and training programs approved by the
secretary, when acting under the direction and supervision of persons
registered or licensed under this chapter or chapter 18.29 or 18.32
RCW.

--- END ---