BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.080 and 2005 c 273 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A special meeting may be called at any time by the presiding
officer of the governing body of a public agency or by a majority of
the members of the governing body by delivering written notice
personally, by mail, by fax, or by electronic mail to each member of
the governing body; ((and)) by posting a notice on the agency's web
site, if any, and in an area open to the public at the agency's main
administrative office; by delivering written notice to each local
newspaper of general circulation; and by delivering notice to each
local radio or television station which has on file with the governing
body a written request to be notified of such special meeting or of all
special meetings. Such notice must be delivered personally, by mail,
by fax, or by electronic mail at least twenty-four hours before the
time of such meeting as specified in the notice. The call and notice
shall specify the time and place of the special meeting and the
business to be transacted. Final disposition shall not be taken on any
other matter at such meetings by the governing body. Such written
notice may be dispensed with as to any member who at or prior to the
time the meeting convenes files with the clerk or secretary of the
governing body a written waiver of notice. Such waiver may be given by
telegram, by fax, or electronic mail. Such written notice may also be
dispensed with as to any member who is actually present at the meeting
at the time it convenes. The notices provided in this section may be
dispensed with in the event a special meeting is called to deal with an
emergency involving injury or damage to persons or property or the
likelihood of such injury or damage, when time requirements of such
notice would make notice impractical and increase the likelihood of
such injury or damage.

--- END ---