BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.36 RCW
to read as follows:
Neither the state, the agency, nor the director may restrict,
limit, or infringe upon the personal or private property rights of
individuals, corporations, or other entities whether they choose to
participate or not in premise registration or animal identification
programs.

--- END ---