BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Corporate headquarters" means a facility or facilities where
corporate staff employees are physically employed, and where the
majority of the company's management services are handled either on a
regional or a national basis. Company management services may include:
Accounts receivable and payable, accounting, data processing,
distribution management, employee benefit plan, financial and
securities accounting, information technology, insurance, legal,
merchandising, payroll, personnel, purchasing procurement, planning,
reporting and compliance, research and development, tax, treasury, or
other headquarters-related services.
(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(4) "Eligible area" means a designated community empowerment zone
approved under RCW 43.31C.020.
(5)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project in
a qualified building or buildings in an eligible area, as defined in
subsection (4) of this section, which will have employment at the
qualified building or buildings of at least five hundred employees in
qualified employment positions, each of whom must earn for the year
reported at least the average annual wage for the state for that year
as determined by the employment security department.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building or buildings is not
eligible for a deferral unless:
(i) The underlying ownership of the building or buildings vests
exclusively in the same person; or
(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under section 2 of this act; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(6) "Investment project" means a capital investment of at least
fifty million dollars in a qualified building or buildings including
tangible personal property and fixtures that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of such buildings during the course of their
construction, and including labor and services rendered in the
planning, installation, and construction of the project.
(7) "Operationally complete" means a date no later than one year
from the date the project is issued an occupancy permit by the local
permit issuing authority.
(8) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(9) "Qualified building or buildings" means construction of a new
structure or structures to be used for corporate headquarters. If a
building is used partly for corporate headquarters and partly for other
purposes, the applicable tax deferral is determined by apportionment of
the costs of construction under rules adopted by the department.
(10) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed in the eligible investment project during the entire
tax year. The term "entire tax year" means a full-time position that
is filled for a period of twelve consecutive months. The term "full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred fifty-five
hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours a year.
(11) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Application for deferral of taxes under
this chapter can be made at any time prior to completion of
construction of a qualified building or buildings, but tax liability
incurred prior to the department's receipt of an application may not be
deferred. The application must be made to the department in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The application must contain
information regarding the location of the investment project, the
applicant's average employment in the state for the prior year,
estimated or actual new employment related to the project, estimated or
actual wages of employees related to the project, estimated or actual
costs, time schedules for completion and operation, and other
information required by the department. The department must rule on
the application within sixty days.
(2)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) Applicants for deferral of taxes under this chapter must agree
to complete an annual survey. If the economic benefits of the deferral
are passed to a lessee as provided in section 1(5) of this act, the
lessee must agree to complete the annual survey and the applicant is
not required to complete the annual survey. The survey is due by March
31st of the year following the calendar year in which the investment
project is certified by the department as having been operationally
complete and the seven succeeding calendar years. The survey must
include the amount of tax deferred. The survey must also include the
following information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax deferral taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on the amount of tax
deferral taken is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(3) The department must use the information to study the tax
deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department must
report to the legislature by December 1, 2014, and December 1, 2018.
The reports must measure the effect of the program on job creation, the
number of jobs created for Washington residents, company growth, the
introduction of new products, the diversification of the state's
economy, growth in research and development investment, the movement of
firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and
such other factors as the department selects. If fewer than three
deferrals are granted under this chapter, the department may not report
statistical information.
(4) Applications for deferral of taxes under this section may not
be made after December 31, 2020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department must issue a sales and
use tax deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes
due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible
investment project meeting the requirements of this chapter.
(2) No certificate may be issued for an investment project that has
already received a deferral under chapter 82.60 or 82.63 RCW or this
chapter, except that an investment project for qualified research and
development that has already received a deferral may also receive an
additional deferral certificate for adapting the investment project for
use in pilot scale manufacturing.
(3) The department must keep a running total of all deferrals
granted under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.
(4) The number of eligible investment projects for which the
benefits of this chapter will be allowed is limited to two per
biennium. The department must approve deferral certificates for
completed applications on a first in-time basis. During any biennium,
only one deferral certificate may be issued per community empowerment
zone.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.63.030 and 2004 c 2 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for
state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment project.
(2) No certificate may be issued for an investment project that has
already received a deferral under chapter 82.60 ((or 82.61)) RCW or
this chapter, except that an investment project for qualified research
and development that has already received a deferral may also receive
an additional deferral certificate for adapting the investment project
for use in pilot scale manufacturing.
(3) This section shall expire January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, taxes deferred under this chapter need not be repaid.
(2)(a) If, on the basis of the survey under section 2 of this act
or other information, the department finds that an investment project
is no longer an "eligible investment project" under section 1 of this
act at any time during the calendar year in which the investment
project is certified by the department as having been operationally
completed, or at any time during any of the seven succeeding calendar
years, a portion of deferred taxes are immediately due according to the
following schedule:

Year in which use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2 87.5%

3 75%

4 62.5%

5 50%

6 37.5%

7 25%

8 12.5%

(b) If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under section 2 of this act by the date due, twelve and
one-half percent of the deferred tax is immediately due. If the
economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
section 1(5) of this act, the lessee is responsible for payment to the
extent the lessee has received the economic benefit.
(c) If an investment project is meeting the requirement of section
1(5) of this act at any time during the calendar year in which the
investment project is certified as having been operationally complete
and the recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual survey
due under section 2 of this act, the portion of deferred taxes
immediately due is the amount on the schedule in (a) of this
subsection. If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a
lessee as provided in section 1(5) of this act, the lessee is
responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the
economic benefit.
(3) The department must assess interest at the rate provided for
delinquent taxes, but not penalties, retroactively to the date of
deferral. The debt for deferred taxes will not be extinguished by
insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership
does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is transferred, subject
to the successor meeting the eligibility requirements of this chapter,
for the remaining periods of the deferral.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The qualified employment positions must be
filled by the end of the calendar year following the year in which the
project is certified as operationally complete. If a recipient does
not meet the requirements for qualified employment positions by the end
of the second calendar year following the year in which the project is
certified as operationally complete, all deferred taxes are immediately
due.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.32.590 and 2006 c 354 s 17, 2006 c 300 s 10, 2006
c 177 s 8, 2006 c 112 s 7, and 2006 c 84 s 7 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey or annual report under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.5351,
82.32.650, 82.32.635, 82.32.640, 82.32.630, 82.32.610, section 2 of
this act, or 82.74.040 by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall extend the
time for filing the survey or report. Such extension shall be for a
period of thirty days from the date the department issues its written
notification to the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under
this section. The department may grant additional extensions as it
deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey or annual report by the due date was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department
shall be guided by rules adopted by the department for the waiver or
cancellation of penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of
any tax was due to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.32.600 and 2007 c 54 s 23 and 2007 c 54 s 22 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file annual surveys or annual reports under
RCW 82.04.4452 or 82.32.5351, 82.32.610, 82.32.630, 82.32.635,
82.32.640, section 2 of this act, or 82.74.040 must electronically file
with the department all surveys, reports, returns, and any other forms
or information the department requires in an electronic format as
provided or approved by the department. As used in this section,
"returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) Any survey, report, return, or any other form or information
required to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of
this section is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 3, 5, and 6 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---