BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.40.300 and 2005 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, in no case may a
juvenile offender be committed by the juvenile court to the department
of social and health services for placement in a juvenile correctional
institution beyond the juvenile offender's twenty-first birthday. A
juvenile may be under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court or the
authority of the department of social and health services beyond the
juvenile's eighteenth birthday only if:
(a) Prior to the juvenile's eighteenth birthday:
(((a) Proceedings are pending seeking the adjudication of a
juvenile offense and the court by written order setting forth its
reasons extends jurisdiction of juvenile court over the juvenile beyond
his or her eighteenth birthday;
(b))) (i) The juvenile has been found guilty after a fact finding
or after a plea of guilty and an automatic extension is necessary to
allow for the imposition of disposition;
(((c))) (ii) Disposition has been held and an automatic extension
is necessary to allow for the execution and enforcement of the court's
order of disposition. If an order of disposition imposes commitment to
the department, then jurisdiction is automatically extended to include
a period of up to twelve months of parole, in no case extending beyond
the offender's twenty-first birthday; or
(((d))) (iii) While proceedings are pending in a case in which
jurisdiction has been transferred to the adult criminal court pursuant
to RCW 13.04.030, the juvenile turns eighteen years of age and is
subsequently found not guilty of the charge for which he or she was
transferred, or is convicted in the adult criminal court of a lesser
included offense, and an automatic extension is necessary to impose the
disposition as required by RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(v)(E); or
(b) Prior to the juvenile's twenty-first birthday, proceedings are
pending seeking the adjudication of a juvenile offense and the court by
written order setting forth its reasons extends jurisdiction of the
juvenile court over the juvenile beyond his or her eighteenth birthday.
(i) If jurisdiction is extended under this subsection (1)(b)
because proceedings are pending prior to the juvenile's eighteenth
birthday, the juvenile may not be committed by the juvenile court to
the department of social and health services for placement in a
juvenile correctional institution beyond his or her twenty-first
birthday.
(ii) If jurisdiction is extended under this subsection (1)(b)
because proceedings are pending on or after the juvenile's eighteenth
birthday, but prior to the juvenile's twenty-first birthday, the
juvenile offender may not be committed by the juvenile court for
placement in a correctional institution beyond his or her twenty-fourth
birthday. Such a juvenile offender shall serve any term of confinement
imposed under this chapter in a correctional institution operated by,
or under contract with, the department of corrections.
(2) If the juvenile court previously has extended jurisdiction
beyond the juvenile offender's eighteenth birthday and that period of
extension has not expired, the court may further extend jurisdiction by
written order setting forth its reasons.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section, in no
event may the juvenile court have authority to extend jurisdiction over
any juvenile offender beyond the juvenile offender's twenty-first
birthday except for the purpose of enforcing an order of restitution or
penalty assessment.
(4) Notwithstanding any extension of jurisdiction over a person
pursuant to this section, the juvenile court has no jurisdiction over
any offenses alleged to have been committed by a person eighteen years
of age or older.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.40.0357 and 2007 c 199 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

JUVENILE
DISPOSITION
OFFENSE
CATEGORY DESCRIPTION (RCW CITATION) JUVENILE DISPOSITION
CATEGORY FOR
ATTEMPT, BAILJUMP,
CONSPIRACY, OR
SOLICITATION

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090(2) (a) and
(c)) E

E Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090(2)(b)) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus with
Intent to Commit Arson (9.40.105) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)
B+

Assault and Other Crimes Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary (9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Mineral Trespass (78.44.330) C

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol
(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug
(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug
with Intent to Sell (69.41.030(2)(a)) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug
(69.41.030(2)(b)) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or
Flunitrazepam Sale (69.50.401(2) (a) or
(b)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic Sale (69.50.401(2)(c)) C

E Possession of Marihuana <40 grams
(69.50.4014) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled
Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit
(69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or
Flunitrazepam Counterfeit Substances
(69.50.4011(2) (a) or (b)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit Substances
(69.50.4011(2) (c), (d), or (e)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance
(69.50.4013) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance
(69.50.4012)
C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm (9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by Minor (<18)
(9.41.040(2)(a)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon
(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use of
Weapon (9.41.270)
E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)
D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)
C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(b)) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(a)) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure (Victim <14)
(9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over)
(9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock 1 and 2 (9A.56.080 and
9A.56.083) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)) D

D Identity Theft 2 (9.35.020(3)) E

D Improperly Obtaining Financial Information
(9.35.010) E

B Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (9A.56.068) C

B Possession of Stolen Property 1
(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2
(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3
(9A.56.170) E

B Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
1 (9A.56.070) C

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
2 (9A.56.075) D

B Theft of a Motor Vehicle (9A.56.065) C

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License (46.20.005) E

B+ Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502 and 46.61.504) E

B+ Felony Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502(6)) B

B+ Felony Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (46.61.504(6)) B

Other

B Animal Cruelty 1 (16.52.205) C

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls
(9.61.230) E

A Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
A Felony B+

B Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
B Felony C

C Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
C Felony D

D Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Gross
Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation of Order of Restitution,
Community Supervision, or Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses
and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks
confinement
2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks
confinement
3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month
period - 12 weeks confinement

2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order,
it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may
select sentencing option A, B, C, D, or RCW 13.40.167.

OPTION A
JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID
STANDARD RANGE

A+
180 WEEKS TO AGE 24 YEARS (JUVENILE COURT
JURISDICTION EXTENDED BECAUSE
PROCEEDINGS PENDING ON OR AFTER JUVENILE'S
EIGHTEENTH BIRTHDAY)

180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS (ALL OTHER CASES)

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

EXCEPT

30-40

WEEKS FOR

15-17

YEAR OLDS

Current B+ 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

Offense WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL 52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) 15-36 WEEKS WEEKS

C+ LS

15-36 WEEKS

C LS 15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions:

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Restitution

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4
or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of
confinement.
(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category.
The current offense category is determined by the offense of
adjudication.
(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior
adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior
felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation,
misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4
point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.
(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined
by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications
and the row defined by the current offense category.
(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense.
(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an
offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall
not include confinement.

OR

OPTION B
SUSPENDED DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

(1) If the offender is subject to a standard range disposition
involving confinement by the department, the court may impose the
standard range and suspend the disposition on condition that the
offender comply with one or more local sanctions and any educational or
treatment requirement. The treatment programs provided to the offender
must be research-based best practice programs as identified by the
Washington state institute for public policy or the joint legislative
audit and review committee.
(2) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition,
the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke
the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.
(3) An offender is ineligible for the suspended disposition option
under this section if the offender is:
(a) Adjudicated of an A+ offense;
(b) Fourteen years of age or older and is adjudicated of one or
more of the following offenses:
(i) A class A offense, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation
to commit a class A offense;
(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060); or
(iii) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021), extortion in
the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120), kidnapping in the second degree (RCW
9A.40.030), robbery in the second degree (RCW 9A.56.210), residential
burglary (RCW 9A.52.025), burglary in the second degree (RCW
9A.52.030), drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045), vehicular homicide (RCW
46.61.520), hit and run death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a)), intimidating a
witness (RCW 9A.72.110), violation of the uniform controlled substances
act (RCW 69.50.401 (2)(a) and (b)), or manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070),
when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon another or
when during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the offense the
respondent was armed with a deadly weapon;
(c) Ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm violation under
RCW 13.40.193; or
(d) Adjudicated of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

OR

OPTION C
CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition
of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not
committed an A- or B+ offense, the court may impose a disposition under
RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION D
MANIFEST INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under option A, B, or C
would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a
disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

--- END ---