BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that past global,
national, and regional energy market conditions and policy assumptions
that promoted a limited state government approach to the securing of
energy resources no longer exists and that state government, in
conjunction with the private sector, must take an active and
constructive role in securing energy resources.
(2) The legislature finds that energy market uncertainties threaten
to significantly undermine our state economy and citizen's prosperity
and that state government must be in the forefront of developing an
effective response to these uncertainties.
(3) The legislature finds that the state's energy security will be
improved by developing new electrical generation and transmission
facilities, by securing transportation fuel supplies, and by promoting
greater use of distributed generation.
(4) The legislature further finds a need to redefine and streamline
the state's role in energy-related regulatory and permitting functions
to better drive development and implementation of state energy policies
and investments that secure necessary energy resources for the state
and its citizens.
(5) To carry out this function, the legislature intends to
establish the Washington state department of energy.
(6) Additionally, the legislature intends to transfer certain
existing energy regulatory functions to the department to streamline
the process of securing new energy resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council.
(2) "Department" means the Washington state department of energy.
(3) "Director" means the director of the Washington state
department of energy.
(4) "Division" means the energy policy division of the department
of community, trade, and economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 There is created a department of state
government to be known as the Washington state department of energy.
The department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it
under this chapter and such other powers and duties as may be
authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The executive head and appointing authority
of the department is the director. The director shall be appointed by
the governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall serve at the
pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a salary to be
fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040. If a vacancy
occurs in the position while the senate is not in session, the governor
shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of the
senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 It is the intent of the legislature wherever
possible to place the internal affairs of the department under the
control of the director in order that the director may institute
therein the flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its business
that changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever
the director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the
director has complete charge and supervisory powers over the
department. The director may create such administrative structures as
the director considers appropriate, except as otherwise specified by
law. The director may employ such assistants and personnel as
necessary for the general administration of the department. This
employment shall be in accordance with the state civil service law,
chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department shall be subdivided into
three divisions, including the division of energy policy, energy
facility site evaluation, and energy resources procurement. Except as
otherwise specified or as federal requirements may otherwise require,
these divisions must be established and organized in accordance with
plans to be prepared by the director and approved by the governor. In
preparing such plans, the director shall endeavor to promote efficient
public management, to improve programs, and to take full advantage of
the economies, both fiscal and administrative, to be gained from the
consolidation of functions and agencies under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The director shall appoint a deputy
director, a department personnel director, and such assistant directors
as may be needed to administer the department. The deputy director
shall have charge and general supervision of the department in the
absence or disability of the director and, in case of a vacancy in the
office of director, shall continue in charge of the department until a
successor is appointed and qualified, or until the governor appoints an
acting director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Any power or duty vested in or transferred
to the director by law or executive order may be delegated by the
director to the deputy director or to any other assistant or
subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the official
acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The director may appoint such advisory
committees or councils as may be required by any federal legislation as
a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the department. The
director may also appoint statewide committees or councils on such
subject matters as are or come within the department's
responsibilities. The statewide committees and councils shall have
representation from both major political parties and shall have
substantial consumer representation. The committees or councils shall
be constituted as required by federal law or as the director may
determine. The members of the committees or councils shall hold office
as follows: One-third to serve one year; one-third to serve two years;
and one-third to serve three years. Upon expiration of the original
terms, subsequent appointments shall be for three years except in the
case of a vacancy, in which event appointment shall be only for the
remainder of the unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs. No
member may serve more than two consecutive terms.
Members of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid
their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 In furtherance of the policy of the state
to cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under
the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as may become necessary
to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted,
unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal
funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the department
that may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be
interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to comply with
federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the
various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the
state, or to any departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part
is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the department to the director, the
director's personal secretary, the deputy director, all division
directors and assistant directors, and one confidential secretary for
each of these officers.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.17.010 and 2007 c 341 s 46 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be departments of the state government which shall be
known as (1) the department of social and health services, (2) the
department of ecology, (3) the department of labor and industries, (4)
the department of agriculture, (5) the department of fish and wildlife,
(6) the department of transportation, (7) the department of licensing,
(8) the department of general administration, (9) the department of
community, trade, and economic development, (10) the department of
veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the department
of retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, (14) the
department of health, (15) the department of financial institutions,
(16) the department of archaeology and historic preservation, (17) the
department of early learning, ((and)) (18) the Puget Sound partnership,
and (19) the department of energy, which shall be charged with the
execution, enforcement, and administration of such laws, and invested
with such powers and required to perform such duties, as the
legislature may provide.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.17.020 and 2007 c 341 s 47 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of community,
trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans affairs,
(11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, (14) the secretary of health, (15)
the director of financial institutions, (16) the director of the
department of archaeology and historic preservation, (17) the director
of early learning, ((and)) (18) the executive director of the Puget
Sound partnership, and (19) the director of energy.
Such officers, except the director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold
office at the pleasure of the governor. The director of fish and
wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as
prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 14 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2007 c 341 s 48, 2007 c 241 s 2, and
2007 c 15 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
community, trade, and economic development, the secretary of
corrections, the director of early learning, the director of ecology,
the commissioner of employment security, the chair of the energy
facility site evaluation council, the secretary of the state finance
committee, the director of financial management, the director of fish
and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest practices appeals
board, the director of the gambling commission, the director of general
administration, the secretary of health, the administrator of the
Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary of the
health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher
education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse
racing commission, the executive secretary of the human rights
commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence
review board, the director of the department of information services,
the executive director of the state investment board, the director of
labor and industries, the director of licensing, the director of the
lottery commission, the director of the office of minority and women's
business enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the
director of personnel, the executive director of the public disclosure
commission, the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the
director of the recreation and conservation office, the director of
retirement systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social
and health services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the
executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of
transportation, the secretary of the utilities and transportation
commission, the director of veterans affairs, the president of each of
the regional and state universities and the president of The Evergreen
State College, and each district and each campus president of each
state community college, and the director of energy;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State
College board of trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices
appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, life
sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, Washington health
care facilities authority, each member of the Washington health
services commission, higher education coordinating board, higher
education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing
finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence
review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information
services board, ((recreation and conservation funding board,)) state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics
board, liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight
board, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines ((hearing[s]))
hearings board, public employees' benefits board, recreation and
conservation funding board, salmon recovery funding board, board of tax
appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of
regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington state
maritime commission, Washington personnel resources board, Washington
public power supply system executive board, Washington State University
board of regents, Western Washington University board of trustees, and
fish and wildlife commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The department shall contract with the
Washington State University energy extension to provide research
services as deemed necessary by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the department of community, trade, and economic development pertaining
to chapters 43.21F, 43.21G, and 19.29A RCW and RCW 43.330.904 are
transferred to the department. All references to the director or the
department of community, trade, and economic development in the Revised
Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the
department when referring to the functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
community, trade, and economic development pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of
the department. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of
community, trade, and economic development in carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the
department. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection
with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to
the department.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of community, trade,
and economic development for carrying out the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the department.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of community, trade, and
economic development engaged in performing the powers, functions, and
duties transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the
department. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the
state civil service law, are assigned to the department to perform
their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
community, trade, and economic development pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by
the department. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in
full force and shall be performed by the department.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of community, trade, and economic development shall not
affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of
this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) The energy facility site evaluation
council is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are
hereby transferred to the department. All references to the chair of
the energy facility site evaluation council or the energy facility site
evaluation council in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed
to mean the director or the department.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the energy facility
site evaluation council shall be delivered to the custody of the
department. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed by the energy facility site
evaluation council shall be made available to the department. All
funds, credits, or other assets held by the energy facility site
evaluation council shall be assigned to the department.
(b) Any appropriations made to the energy facility site evaluation
council shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred
and credited to the department.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the energy facility site evaluation council
are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department. All employees
classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are
assigned to the department to perform their usual duties upon the same
terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action
that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and
rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the energy facility
site evaluation council shall be continued and acted upon by the
department. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in
full force and shall be performed by the department.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the energy facility site evaluation council shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

Sec. 18 RCW 80.70.010 and 2004 c 224 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" has the meaning provided in RCW 80.50.020 and
includes an applicant for a permit for a fossil-fueled thermal electric
generation facility subject to RCW 70.94.152 and 80.70.020(1) (b) or
(d).
(2) "Authority" means any air pollution control agency whose
jurisdictional boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of one or
more counties.
(3) "Carbon credit" means a verified reduction in carbon dioxide or
carbon dioxide equivalents that is registered with a state, national,
or international trading authority or exchange that has been recognized
by the council.
(4) "Carbon dioxide equivalents" means a metric measure used to
compare the emissions from various greenhouse gases based upon their
global warming potential.
(5) "Cogeneration credit" means the carbon dioxide emissions that
the council, department, or authority, as appropriate, estimates would
be produced on an annual basis by a stand-alone industrial and
commercial facility equivalent in operating characteristics and output
to the industrial or commercial heating or cooling process component of
the cogeneration plant.
(6) "Cogeneration plant" means a fossil-fueled thermal power plant
in which the heat or steam is also used for industrial or commercial
heating or cooling purposes and that meets federal energy regulatory
commission standards for qualifying facilities under the public utility
regulatory policies act of 1978.
(7) "Commercial operation" means the date that the first
electricity produced by a facility is delivered for commercial sale to
the power grid.
(8) "Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council
created by RCW 80.50.030.
(9) "Department" means the department of ((ecology)) energy.
(10) "Fossil fuel" means natural gas, petroleum, coal, or any form
of solid, liquid, or gaseous fuel derived from such material to produce
heat for the generation of electricity.
(11) "Mitigation plan" means a proposal that includes the process
or means to achieve carbon dioxide mitigation through use of mitigation
projects or carbon credits.
(12) "Mitigation project" means one or more of the following:
(a) Projects or actions that are implemented by the certificate
holder or order of approval holder, directly or through its agent, or
by an independent qualified organization to mitigate the emission of
carbon dioxide produced by the fossil-fueled thermal electric
generation facility. This term includes but is not limited to the use
of, energy efficiency measures, clean and efficient transportation
measures, qualified alternative energy resources, demand side
management of electricity consumption, and carbon sequestration
programs;
(b) Direct application of combined heat and power (cogeneration);
(c) Verified carbon credits traded on a recognized trading
authority or exchange; or
(d) Enforceable and permanent reductions in carbon dioxide or
carbon dioxide equivalents through process change, equipment shutdown,
or other activities under the control of the applicant and approved as
part of a carbon dioxide mitigation plan.
(13) "Order of approval" means an order issued under RCW 70.94.152
with respect to a fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facility
subject to RCW 80.70.020(1) (b) or (d).
(14) "Permanent" means that emission reductions used to offset
emission increases are assured for the life of the corresponding
increase, whether unlimited or limited in duration.
(15) "Qualified alternative energy resource" has the same meaning
as in RCW 19.29A.090.
(16) "Station generating capability" means the maximum load a
generator can sustain over a given period of time without exceeding
design limits, and measured using maximum continuous electric
generation capacity, less net auxiliary load, at average ambient
temperature and barometric pressure.
(17) "Total carbon dioxide emissions" means:
(a) For a fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facility
described under RCW 80.70.020(1) (a) and (b), the amount of carbon
dioxide emitted over a thirty-year period based on the manufacturer's
or designer's guaranteed total net station generating capability, new
equipment heat rate, an assumed sixty percent capacity factor for
facilities under the council's jurisdiction or sixty percent of the
operational limitations on facilities subject to an order of approval,
and taking into account any enforceable limitations on operational
hours or fuel types and use; and
(b) For a fossil-fueled thermal electric generation facility
described under RCW 80.70.020(1) (c) and (d), the amount of carbon
dioxide emitted over a thirty-year period based on the proposed
increase in the amount of electrical output of the facility that
exceeds the station generation capability of the facility prior to the
applicant applying for certification or an order of approval pursuant
to RCW 80.70.020(1) (c) and (d), new equipment heat rate, an assumed
sixty percent capacity factor for facilities under the council's
jurisdiction or sixty percent of the operational limitations on
facilities subject to an order of approval, and taking into account any
enforceable limitations on operational hours or fuel types and use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 1 through 10 and 15 through 17 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---