BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.92.090 and 1999 c 247 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A commission on ((pesticide registration)) integrated pest
management is established. The commission shall be composed of twelve
voting members appointed by the governor as follows:
(a) Eight members from the following segments of the state's
agricultural industry as nominated by a statewide private agricultural
association or agricultural commodity commission formed under Title 15
RCW: (i) The tree fruit industry; (ii) hop growers; (iii) potato
growers; (iv) wheat growers; (v) vegetable and seed growers; (vi) berry
growers; (vii) wine grape growers; and (viii) the nursery and landscape
industry. Although members are appointed from various segments of the
agriculture industry, they are appointed to represent and advance the
interests of the industry as a whole.
(b) One member from each of the following: (i) Forest protection
industry; (ii) food processors; (iii) agricultural chemical industry;
and (iv) professional pesticide applicators. One member shall be
appointed for each such segment of the industry and shall be nominated
by a statewide, private association of that segment of the industry.
The representative of the agricultural chemical industry shall be
involved in the manufacture of agricultural crop protection products.
The following shall be ex officio, nonvoting members of the
commission: The coordinator of the interregional project number four
at Washington State University; the director of the department of
ecology or the director's designee; the director of the department of
agriculture or the director's designee; the director of the department
of labor and industries or the director's designee; and the secretary
of the department of health or the secretary's designee.
(2) Each voting member of the commission shall serve a term of
three years. However, the first appointments in the first year shall
be made by the governor for one, two, and three-year terms so that, in
subsequent years, approximately one-third of the voting members shall
be appointed each year. The governor shall assign the initial one,
two, and three-year terms to members by lot. A vacancy shall be filled
by appointment for the unexpired term in the same manner provided for
an appointment to the full term. No member of the commission may be
removed by the governor during his or her term of office unless for
cause of incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in
office. Each member of the commission shall receive travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for attending meetings of
the commission and for performing special duties, in the way of
official commission business, specifically assigned to the person by
the commission. The voting members of the commission serve without
compensation from the state other than such travel expenses.
(3) Nominations for the initial appointments to the commission
under subsection (1) of this section shall be submitted by September 1,
1995. The governor shall make initial appointments to the commission
by October 15, 1995.
(4) The commission shall elect a chair from among its voting
members each calendar year. After its original organizational meeting,
the commission shall meet at the call of the chair. A majority of the
voting members of the commission constitutes a quorum and an official
action of the commission may be taken by a majority vote of the quorum.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.92.095 and 1999 c 247 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This subsection applies to the use of state appropriations made
to or legislatively intended for the commission on ((pesticide
registration)) integrated pest management and to any other moneys
appropriated by the state and received by the commission on ((pesticide
registration)) integrated pest management:
(a) The moneys may not be expended without the express approval of
the commission on ((pesticide registration)) integrated pest
management;
(b) The moneys may be used for: (i) Evaluations, studies, or
investigations approved by the commission on ((pesticide registration))
integrated pest management regarding the registration or reregistration
of pesticides for minor crops or minor uses or regarding the
availability of pesticides for emergency uses. These evaluations,
studies, or investigations may be conducted by the food and
environmental quality laboratory or may be secured by the commission
from other qualified laboratories, researchers, or contractors by
contract, which contracts may include, but are not limited to, those
purchasing the use of proprietary information; (ii) evaluations,
studies, or investigations approved by the commission regarding
research, implementation, and demonstration of any aspect of integrated
pest management and pesticide resistance management programs; (iii) the
tracking system described in RCW 15.92.060; and (iv) the support of the
commission on ((pesticide registration)) integrated pest management and
its activities; and
(c) Not less than twenty-five percent of such moneys shall be
dedicated to studies or investigations concerning the registration or
use of pesticides for crops that are not among the top twenty
agricultural commodities in production value produced in the state, as
determined annually by the Washington agricultural statistics service.
(2) The commission on ((pesticide registration)) integrated pest
management shall establish priorities to guide it in approving the use
of moneys for evaluations, studies, and investigations under this
section. Each biennium, the commission shall prepare a contingency
plan for providing funding for laboratory studies or investigations
that are necessary to pesticide registrations or related processes that
will address emergency conditions for agricultural crops that are not
generally predicted at the beginning of the biennium.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.92.100 and 1999 c 247 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission on ((pesticide registration)) integrated pest
management shall:
(1) Provide guidance to the food and environmental quality
laboratory established in RCW 15.92.050 regarding the laboratory's
studies, investigations, and evaluations concerning the registration of
pesticides for use in this state for minor crops and minor uses and
concerning the availability of pesticides for emergency uses;
(2) Encourage agricultural organizations to assist in providing
funding, in-kind services, or materials for laboratory studies and
investigations concerning the registration of pesticides and research,
implementation, and demonstration of any aspect of integrated pest
management and pesticide resistance management programs for minor crops
and minor uses that would benefit the organizations;
(3) Provide guidance to the laboratory regarding a program for:
Tracking the availability of effective pesticides for minor crops,
minor uses, and emergency uses; providing this information to
organizations of agricultural producers; and maintaining close contact
between the laboratory, the department of agriculture, and
organizations of agricultural producers regarding the need for research
to support the registration of pesticides for minor crops and minor
uses and the availability of pesticides for emergency uses;
(4) Ensure that the activities of the commission and the laboratory
are coordinated with the activities of other laboratories in the
Pacific Northwest, the United States department of agriculture, and the
United States environmental protection agency to maximize the
effectiveness of regional efforts to assist in the registration of
pesticides for minor crops and minor uses and in providing for the
availability of pesticides for emergency uses for the region and the
state; and
(5) Ensure that prior to approving any residue study that there is
written confirmation of registrant support and willingness or ability
to add the given minor crop to its label including any restrictions or
guidelines the registrant intends to impose.

Sec. 4 RCW 15.92.110 and 1995 c 390 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission on ((pesticide registration)) integrated pest
management, and Washington State University on behalf of the
commission, may receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public
or private sources as may be used from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the commission and expend the
same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts,
grants, or endowments.

--- END ---