BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that the
state board for community and technical colleges allocate state funding
for community and technical colleges in a method that is both equitable
and efficient. The legislature intends to develop a new community and
technical college funding formula that results in improved, equitable
allocation of resources across the community and technical college
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall assess the current methodology and funding formula used
by the state board for community and technical colleges to distribute
state funding to community and technical colleges. The assessment
shall include but not be limited to:
(a) A review of the current and prior state board for community and
technical colleges funding formula and identification of pros and cons
of each;
(b) An analysis of state funding per budgeted full-time equivalent
employee by college, college district, and the community and technical
college system, taking into account impacts of:
(i) New and ongoing enrollment funding;
(ii) Contract programs;
(iii) Running start, worker retraining, adult basic education, and
other state-supported programs; and
(iv) Faculty and staff salaries and compensation;
(c) An analysis of differences in historical funding levels by
college and college district over the past ten years; and
(d) An analysis of comparable funding formulas for community and
technical college systems in comparable states.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall analyze
the advantages and disadvantages of alternatives to the current funding
formula. In doing so, the committee shall identify criteria for
comparing alternatives, which at a minimum shall take into
consideration the guiding principles of the state board for community
and technical colleges and the following priorities:
(a) The independence of base budget allocations from the autonomous
actions of each college;
(b) Predictability from one year to the next;
(c) How understandable alternatives are; and
(d) Equity among colleges.
(3) The final report shall be submitted to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(4) The state board for community and technical colleges, the
office of financial management, the higher education coordinating
board, and legislative staff shall cooperate with the joint legislative
audit and review committee as it gathers data, conducts analyses, and
assesses alternatives.

--- END ---