BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4289 and 2003 c 168 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to amounts derived as compensation for
services rendered to patients or from sales of drugs for human use
pursuant to a prescription furnished as an integral part of services
rendered to patients by a kidney dialysis facility operated as a
nonprofit corporation, a nonprofit hospice agency licensed under
chapter 70.127 RCW((, and nursing homes)) and homes for unwed mothers
operated as religious or charitable organizations, but only if no part
of the net earnings received by such an institution inures directly or
indirectly, to any person other than the institution entitled to
deduction hereunder. "Prescription" and "drug" have the same meaning
as in RCW 82.08.0281.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to nursing homes operated as religious
or charitable organizations, if both of the following conditions are
met:
(1) The ratio of medicaid patient days to total patient days at the
nursing home was at or above fifty percent according to the most recent
annual nursing home cost report data collected by the department of
social and health services; and
(2) No part of the net earnings received by the religious or
charitable organization inures directly or indirectly, to any person
other than the organization entitled to the exemption under this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.36.040 and 2001 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The real and personal property used by nonprofit (a) ((day))
family child care ((centers)) licensees as defined pursuant to RCW
74.15.020; (b) free public libraries; (c) orphanages and orphan
asylums; (d) ((homes for the sick or infirm; (e))) hospitals for the
sick; and (((f))) (e) outpatient dialysis facilities, which are used
for the purposes of such organizations shall be exempt from taxation((:
PROVIDED, That)). The benefit of the exemption inures to the user.
(2) The real and personal property used by nonprofit nursing homes,
which are used for the purposes of such organizations, are exempt from
taxation, but only if:
(a) The ratio of medicaid patient days to total patient days at the
nursing home was at, or above, fifty percent according to the most
recent annual nursing home cost report data collected by the department
of social and health services; and
(b) The benefit of the exemption inures to the user.
(3) The real and personal property leased to and used by a
hospital, owned and operated by a public hospital district established
under chapter 70.44 RCW, for hospital purposes is exempt from taxation.
The benefit of the exemption must inure to the user.
(((3))) (4) To be exempt under this section, the property must be
used exclusively for the purposes for which exemption is granted,
except as provided in RCW 84.36.805.

--- END ---