BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, on average,
students have made tremendous progress in meeting the state's academic
standards in reading and writing. Approximately eighty-five percent of
the students in the class of 2008 who are on track to graduate have
successfully met the state standard on the reading and writing content
areas of the Washington assessment of student learning or an approved
alternative assessment. On further review, however, the legislature
finds significant disparities and inequities in achievement for
subgroups of students. Fewer than thirty percent of American Indian,
Black, Hispanic, or low-income students in the class of 2008 who are on
track to graduate have met the state standard in both reading and
writing. This level of achievement for significant populations of the
state's students does not permit a statewide imposition of a graduation
requirement in reading and writing for the class of 2008. If, however,
a local school district can demonstrate a de minimus level of disparity
in achievement among groups of students, school district boards of
directors should have the local option to adopt a school district
graduation requirement expecting students to meet the state standard in
reading and writing. The legislature reaffirms its belief that the
education system and students will be ready for statewide graduation
requirements in all subject areas of the Washington assessment of
student learning for the graduating class of 2013.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2006 c 114 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except those
equivalencies established by local high schools or school districts
under RCW 28A.230.097.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) Except as provided in RCW 28A.655.0611, the certificate of
academic achievement requirements under RCW 28A.655.061 or the
certificate of individual achievement requirements under RCW
28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high school but
are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of
education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board. The
state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements for students
enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and technical
education programs, particularly those programs that lead to a
certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized. The
purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in these
programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of academic
achievement, complete the program and earn the program's certificate or
credential, and complete other state and local graduation requirements.
((The board shall reports [report] its findings and recommendations for
additional flexibility in graduation requirements, if necessary, to the
legislature by December 1, 2007.))
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.0611 and 2007 c 354 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008 and through no
later than the graduating class of 2012, students may graduate from
high school without earning a certificate of academic achievement or a
certificate of individual achievement if they:
(a) Have not successfully met the ((mathematics)) state standard on
the high school Washington assessment of student learning, an approved
objective alternative assessment, or an alternate assessment developed
for eligible special education students in one or more of the content
areas required under RCW 28A.655.061 or 28A.155.045 to earn a
certificate;
(b) ((Have successfully met the state standard in the other content
areas required for a certificate under RCW 28A.655.061 or 28A.155.045;
(c))) Have met all other state and school district graduation
requirements; ((and
(d))) (c) Continue to take the assessment in the content area or
areas where they did not meet the state standard at least once annually
until graduation; and
(d)(i) For the graduating class of 2008, successfully earn one
additional high school ((mathematics)) credit or career and technical
course equivalent in mathematics for students who have not met the
state standard in mathematics and one additional high school credit or
career and technical course equivalent in English language arts for
students who have not met the state standard in reading or writing,
including courses offered at skill centers, after the student's
eleventh grade year intended to increase the student's ((mathematics))
proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the ((mathematics)) standards
assessed on the high school Washington assessment of student learning
((and continue to take the appropriate mathematics assessment at least
once annually until graduation)); and
(ii) For the remaining graduating classes under this section,
successfully earn two additional ((mathematics)) credits or career and
technical course equivalent in mathematics for students who have not
met the state standard in mathematics and two additional high school
credits or career and technical course equivalent in English language
arts for students who have not met the state standard in reading or
writing, including courses offered at skill centers, after the
student's tenth grade year intended to increase the student's
((mathematics)) proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the
((mathematics)) standards assessed on the high school Washington
assessment of student learning ((and continue to take the appropriate
mathematics assessment at least once annually until graduation)).
(2) The state board of education may adopt a rule that ends the
application of this section as it applies to requiring students to meet
the state standard in mathematics with a graduating class before the
graduating class of 2012, if the state board of education adopts the
rule by September 1st of the freshman school year of the graduating
class to which the provisions of this section no longer apply. The
state board of education's authority under this section does not alter
the requirement that any change in performance standards for the tenth
grade assessment must comply with RCW 28A.305.130.
(3)(a) A school district board of directors may adopt a local
school district graduation requirement that students must meet the
state standard in reading on the high school Washington assessment of
student learning or an approved objective alternative assessment if,
based on the district's high school assessment results for the prior
year, there is less than a five percentage point gap between the
percent of students in the subgroup with the highest percent of
students who met the state standard in reading and the percent of
students in any other subgroup who met the state standard in reading.
(b) A school district board of directors may adopt a local school
district graduation requirement that students must meet the state
standard in writing on the high school Washington assessment of student
learning or an approved objective alternative assessment if, based on
the district's high school assessment results for the prior year, there
is less than a five percentage point gap between the percent of
students in the subgroup with the highest percent of students who met
the state standard in writing and the percent of students in any other
subgroup who met the state standard in writing.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "subgroup of students"
means White, Asian/Pacific Islander, American Indian, Hispanic, Black,
low-income, and special education students.
(4) This section expires August 31, 2013.

--- END ---