BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of farm machinery and
equipment by or through an auctioneer if the auctioneer took possession
of the machinery and equipment from an eligible farmer and the farmer
provided the auctioneer with an exemption certificate under RCW
82.08.855. An auctioneer must keep records necessary for the
department to verify eligibility under this section.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Agricultural products" and "eligible farmer" have the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.855.
(b) "Farm machinery and equipment" means machinery and equipment
used primarily for growing, raising, or producing agricultural
products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of farm
machinery and equipment acquired by or through an auctioneer if the
auctioneer took possession of the machinery and equipment from an
eligible farmer and the farmer provided the auctioneer with an
exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.855.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

--- END ---