BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.176.010 and 2004 c 237 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state of
Washington to assist in the creation and expansion of innovative small
commercial enterprises that produce marketable goods and services
through the employment of Washington residents, the use of technology,
and the application of best management practices. This policy is to be
implemented through the use of small business incubators.
(2) The purpose of small business incubators is to provide
comprehensive business assistance to start-up and early-stage firms in
order to improve their chances of growing into healthy, sustainable
companies. The legislature finds that companies that graduate from
incubators create jobs, revitalize neighborhoods, and commercialize new
technologies, thus strengthening local and regional economies.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.176.020 and 2004 c 237 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Business incubator" means a facility ((that offers:
(a) Space for start-up and expanding firms;
(b) The shared use of equipment and work areas;
(c) Daily management support services essential to high-quality
commercial operations; and
(d) Technical assistance)) or program that provides, on an on-going
basis, business-related training, services, and technical assistance to
businesses that are less than five years old and have ten or fewer
employees at the time of admission to the facility or program.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Economically distressed or disadvantaged area" means: (a) A
county that has an unemployment rate that is twenty percent above the
state average for the immediately previous three years; or (b) an area
that the department determines to be a low-income community, using as
guidance the low-income community designations under the community
development financial institutions fund's new markets tax credit
program of the United States department of the treasury.
(4) "Qualified small business incubator" means an incubator that
is:
(a)(i) Designated as a nonprofit organization under section
501(c)(3) or section 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code, or (ii)
consists of a partnership between a designated nonprofit organization
under section 501(c)(3) or section 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue
code and a government or quasi-government agency;
(b) Focused on developing small businesses in an economically
distressed or disadvantaged area; ((and))
(c) Structured around a sound business plan; and
(d) Certified under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.176 RCW
to read as follows:
CERTIFICATION. (1) The department must develop a certification
program for small business incubators. At a minimum, the program must
require that: (a) An incubator meets the statutory definition of a
small business incubator in RCW 43.176.020; and (b) the incubator work
with each client business to develop a graduation plan at the time the
business is admitted to the facility or program, and that the
graduation plan be reviewed and updated annually. The department must
develop additional criteria for certification and when developing such
criteria will consult with the Washington association of small business
incubators and the national business incubator association.
(2) In order to qualify for any funding from the department, a
business incubator must at a minimum be certified under this section.
(3) Certification must be renewed every five years.
(4) Failure to meet the annual reporting requirements under section
5 of this act automatically revokes a small business incubator's
certification under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.176 RCW
to read as follows:
ACCOUNTABILITY. All certified small business incubators are
required annually to collect data for each client business. The
collection of data must continue for at least five years after the
client business stops receiving services from the certified small
business incubator or the client business moves out the certified small
business incubator facility. Client and certified small business
incubator data must be submitted to the department by March 31st
annually and include:
(1) Identification of the incubator's sponsors and the amount and
source of their contributions;
(2) The number of current clients of the certified small business
incubator;
(3) The industry and type of business for each client and graduate
business;
(4) The total number of graduates of the certified small business
incubator since its founding;
(5) The number of graduate firms still in business or that have
been merged or acquired;
(6) The number of people currently employed full time by client and
graduate firms;
(7) The number of people currently employed part time by client and
graduate firms;
(8) Current monthly salaries and wages paid by client and graduate
firms;
(9) Gross revenues for the most recent full year for client and
graduate firms;
(10) The dollar amount of debt capital raised in the most recent
year by client and graduate firms;
(11) The dollar amount of equity capital raised in the most recent
year by client and graduate firms;
(12) The dollar amount of grant funds raised in the most recent
full year by client and graduate firms;
(13) The total number of new jobs created in the last year by
client and graduate firms;
(14) The percent of jobs created by client and graduate firms above
the county minimum wage;
(15) The percent of graduates still in business;
(16) The number of graduates in the last three years;
(17) The income of certified small business incubator clients;
(18) The amount of taxes paid by small business incubator clients;
and
(19) The number of small business incubator clients owned by
minorities or women.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.176 RCW
to read as follows:
REPORTING. Utilizing the data collected under section 4 of this
act, the department is required to submit a biennial report to the
legislature and the Washington economic development commission by
September 1st of each even-numbered year, beginning in 2010, regarding
the performance of certified small business incubators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Captions used in sections 3 through 5 of
this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---