BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Upon the release of each proposed omnibus appropriations act
and final enacted budget, the legislative evaluation and accountability
committee shall prepare and cause to be posted on a publicly accessible
web site a presentation consisting of potential examples of the types
and levels of educational programs and services supported by funding
provided in the proposed or enacted omnibus appropriations act under
specified allocations for the support of common schools.
(2) The purpose of the presentation created in subsection (1) of
this section is to make transparent to the public, using categories and
terms that are readily understood, examples of the type and level of
educational programs and services supported by funding appropriated in
the omnibus appropriations act under specified programs for support of
the common schools. Such transparency promotes better public
understanding of the state resources provided to support the common
schools. The information in the presentation is for illustrative
purposes only. It is not intended, nor is it to be construed, to
represent how state allocations are actually used by individual school
districts, nor how school districts are expected or required to expend
state allocations.
(3) Each legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee presentation prepared under this section shall provide
estimates for the following items, based on the level of state funding
appropriated in the budget bill for which the document is prepared and
for the school year immediately following the legislative session in
which the bill is considered:
(a) For the general apportionment program:
(i) Estimated state-funded class size in elementary, middle, and
high school grade spans;
(ii) Average state-funded teacher salary, total teacher
compensation, administrator salary, and classified staff salary;
(iii) Estimated number of state-funded staff of various
classifications in a hypothetical average-sized school; and
(iv) Estimated amount per pupil for nonemployee-related costs,
including a breakdown of the per pupil amount by selected major
categories of expenditure;
(b) For the learning assistance program, the transitional bilingual
program, and the highly capable student program: Estimated hours of
additional instruction per week in each program;
(c) For the special education excess cost allocation: Estimated
amount per eligible student;
(d) For the promoting academic success program: Estimated hours of
remediation for various types of students, hours of teacher planning
time, and class size; and
(e) For the student achievement fund: Estimated amount per pupil
in each category of use of the funds under RCW 28A.505.210 and
estimated staffing or additional instructional time supported by the
funds in a hypothetical average-sized school.
(4) Each document shall also contain a brief narrative description
of how the estimates provided under subsection (3) of this section were
calculated and the major assumptions behind the calculations.
Estimates may be developed using documented expenditure patterns of
school districts, best practices, or other sources of information.

--- END ---