BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The legislature finds that green
building, also called "sustainable" or "high-performance" building, has
significant environmental benefits. Buildings consume thirty-six
percent of the energy used in the United States, more than factories
and automobiles, and they generate thirty percent of the nation's
greenhouse gas emissions. The construction of commercial, residential,
or institutional buildings using energy-efficient techniques and
environmentally sustainable products also connects to the state's
climate change goals.
(b) The legislature further finds that standards for green building
provide an effective framework for green building practices. Some
techniques have been shown to reduce building energy costs by twenty to
fifty percent and water usage by at least fifty percent outdoors and
thirty percent indoors. It is in the interest of the state to
encourage the best green building practices through targeted incentives
and policies.
(c) The legislature intends to establish a connection between green
construction and the need for local governments to adopt "green" land
use provisions, permitting standards, and building codes that allow
green building, in order to achieve the most effective climate change
policies.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall conduct a study to determine the potential feasibility and
effectiveness of providing tax incentives to encourage green building
in commercial and residential buildings. The department of revenue
shall provide any tax-related data necessary for the department of
community, trade, and economic development to perform the study.
(3) In conducting the study, the department of community, trade,
and economic development shall:
(a) Identify existing tax incentives with the primary purpose of
encouraging green building;
(b) Propose tax incentives that would encourage green building,
with special emphasis on sales and use tax exemptions on green building
construction activities and business and occupation tax incentives for
contractors or architects that build or design green buildings;
(c) Provide an estimate on the fiscal cost for each tax incentive
identified under (b) of this subsection;
(d) Provide an estimate of cost savings and emission reductions for
the estimated number of buildings that would qualify for a tax
incentive identified under (b) of this subsection;
(e) Recommend other tax policy changes that would encourage green
building;
(f) Evaluate whether tax incentives should target communities that
encourage green building; and
(g) Evaluate current trends in green building and whether tax
incentives would support these trends.
(4) The department of community, trade, and economic development
may include any other information in the study that it deems necessary
for the legislative evaluation of potential tax incentives to encourage
green building.
(5) By December 1, 2008, the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall report its findings and recommendations to
the appropriate committees of the legislature.

--- END ---