BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.88.045 and 2001 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Alleged incapacitated individuals shall have the right to be
represented by willing counsel of their choosing at any stage in
guardianship proceedings. The court shall provide counsel to represent
any alleged incapacitated person at public expense when either: (i)
The individual is unable to afford counsel, or (ii) the expense of
counsel would result in substantial hardship to the individual, or
(iii) the individual does not have practical access to funds with which
to pay counsel. If the individual can afford counsel but lacks
practical access to funds, the court shall provide counsel and may
impose a reimbursement requirement as part of a final order. When, in
the opinion of the court, the rights and interests of an alleged or
adjudicated incapacitated person cannot otherwise be adequately
protected and represented, the court on its own motion shall appoint an
attorney at any time to represent such person. Counsel shall be
provided as soon as practicable after a petition is filed and long
enough before any final hearing to allow adequate time for consultation
and preparation. Absent a convincing showing in the record to the
contrary, a period of less than three weeks shall be presumed by a
reviewing court to be inadequate time for consultation and preparation.
(b) Counsel for an alleged incapacitated individual shall act as an
advocate for the client and shall not substitute counsel's own judgment
for that of the client on the subject of what may be in the client's
best interests. Counsel's role shall be distinct from that of the
guardian ad litem, who is expected to promote the best interest of the
alleged incapacitated individual, rather than the alleged incapacitated
individual's expressed preferences.
(c) If an alleged incapacitated person is represented by counsel
and does not communicate with counsel, counsel may ask the court for
leave to withdraw for that reason. If satisfied, after affording the
alleged incapacitated person an opportunity for a hearing, that the
request is justified, the court may grant the request and allow the
case to proceed with the alleged incapacitated person unrepresented.
(2) During the pendency of any guardianship, any attorney
purporting to represent a person alleged or adjudicated to be
incapacitated shall petition to be appointed to represent the
incapacitated or alleged incapacitated person. Fees for representation
described in this section shall be subject to approval by the court
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 11.92.180.
(3)(a) The alleged incapacitated person is further entitled to
testify and present evidence and, upon request, entitled to a jury
trial on the issues of his or her alleged incapacity. The standard of
proof to be applied in a contested case, whether before a jury or the
court, shall be that of clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.
(b) Family members of the alleged incapacitated person shall be
allowed to testify and present evidence at any hearing on the petition
to establish guardianship. For the purposes of this subsection (3)(b),
"family members" means the alleged incapacitated person's spouse,
parent, adult child, or other adult with whom the alleged incapacitated
person is residing and has a significant relationship.
(4) In all proceedings for appointment of a guardian or limited
guardian, the court must be presented with a written report from a
physician licensed to practice under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW,
psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, or advanced registered
nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, selected by the
guardian ad litem. If the alleged incapacitated person opposes the
health care professional selected by the guardian ad litem to prepare
the medical report, then the guardian ad litem shall use the health
care professional selected by the alleged incapacitated person. The
guardian ad litem may also obtain a supplemental examination. The
physician, psychologist, or advanced registered nurse practitioner
shall have personally examined and interviewed the alleged
incapacitated person within thirty days of preparation of the report to
the court and shall have expertise in the type of disorder or
incapacity the alleged incapacitated person is believed to have. The
report shall contain the following information and shall be set forth
in substantially the following format:
(a) The name and address of the examining physician, psychologist,
or advanced registered nurse practitioner;
(b) The education and experience of the physician, psychologist, or
advanced registered nurse practitioner pertinent to the case;
(c) The dates of examinations of the alleged incapacitated person;
(d) A summary of the relevant medical, functional, neurological, or
mental health history of the alleged incapacitated person as known to
the examining physician, psychologist, or advanced registered nurse
practitioner;
(e) The findings of the examining physician, psychologist, or
advanced registered nurse practitioner as to the condition of the
alleged incapacitated person;
(f) Current medications;
(g) The effect of current medications on the alleged incapacitated
person's ability to understand or participate in guardianship
proceedings;
(h) Opinions on the specific assistance the alleged incapacitated
person needs;
(i) Identification of persons with whom the physician,
psychologist, or advanced registered nurse practitioner has met or
spoken regarding the alleged incapacitated person.
The court shall not enter an order appointing a guardian or limited
guardian until a medical or mental status report meeting the above
requirements is filed.
The requirement of filing a medical report is waived if the basis
of the guardianship is minority.
(5) During the pendency of an action to establish a guardianship,
a petitioner or any person may move for temporary relief under chapter
7.40 RCW, to protect the alleged incapacitated person from abuse,
neglect, abandonment, or exploitation, as those terms are defined in
RCW 74.34.020, or to address any other emergency needs of the alleged
incapacitated person. Any alternative arrangement executed before
filing the petition for guardianship shall remain effective unless the
court grants the relief requested under chapter 7.40 RCW, or unless,
following notice and a hearing at which all parties directly affected
by the arrangement are present, the court finds that the alternative
arrangement should not remain effective.

--- END ---