BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND INTENT. (1) The legislature
recognizes that although many regions of the state are thriving, there
are still distressed communities throughout rural and urban Washington
where capital investments in community services initiatives could
create vibrant local business districts and prosperous neighborhoods.
(2) The legislature also recognizes that nonprofit organizations
provide a variety of community services that serve the needs of the
citizens of Washington, including many services implemented under
contract with state agencies. The legislature also finds that the
efficiency and quality of these services may be enhanced by the
provision of safe, reliable, and sound facilities, and that, in certain
cases, it may be appropriate for the state to assist in the development
of these facilities.
(3) The legislature finds that providing these capital investments
is critical for the economic health of local distressed communities,
helps build strong relationships with the state, and expands life
opportunities for underserved, low-income populations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout RCW 43.63A.125, this section, and sections 3
and 5 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Distressed community" means: (a) A county that has an
unemployment rate that is twenty percent above the state average for
the immediately previous three years; (b) an area within a county that
the department determines to be a low-income community, using as
guidance the low-income community designations under the community
development financial institutions fund's new markets tax credit
program of the United States department of the treasury; or (c) a
school district in which at least fifty percent of local elementary
students receive free and reduced-price meals.
(3) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization that is tax
exempt, or not required to apply for an exemption, under section
501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as
amended.
(4) "Technical assistance" means professional services provided
under contract to nonprofit organizations for feasibility studies,
planning, and project management related to acquiring, constructing, or
rehabilitating nonresidential community services facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 BUILDING COMMUNITIES FUND ACCOUNT CREATED.
The building communities fund account is created in the state treasury.
The account shall consist of legislative appropriations and gifts,
grants, or endowments from other sources as permitted by law. Moneys
in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for capital and technical assistance
grants as provided in RCW 43.63A.125.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.63A.125 and 2006 c 371 s 233 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish ((a competitive process to
solicit proposals for and prioritize projects that assist nonprofit
organizations in)) the building communities fund program. Under the
program, capital and technical assistance grants may be made to
nonprofit organizations for acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating
facilities used for the delivery of nonresidential ((social)) community
services, including social service centers and multipurpose community
centers, including those serving a distinct or ethnic population. Such
facilities must be located in a distressed community or serve a
substantial number of low-income or disadvantaged persons.
(2) The department shall establish a competitive process to
solicit, evaluate, and prioritize applications for the ((assistance))
building communities fund program as follows:
(a) The department shall conduct a statewide solicitation of
project applications from ((local governments,)) nonprofit
organizations((, and other entities, as determined by the department)).
(b) The department shall evaluate and rank applications in
consultation with a citizen advisory committee using objective
criteria. ((At a minimum,)) Applicants must demonstrate that the
((requested assistance)) proposed project:
(i) Will increase the range, efficiency, or quality of the
((social)) services ((it provides)) provided to citizens;
(ii) Will be located in a distressed community or will serve a
substantial number of low-income or disadvantaged persons;
(iii) Meets at least one of the following objectives:
(A) To provide social services;
(B) To encourage small business startups or sustainability, expand
employment opportunities for community residents, or increase the
employability of community residents; or
(C) To offer educational and recreational opportunities separate
from the public education system;
(iv) Reflects a long-term vision for the development of the
community, shared by residents, businesses, leaders, and partners;
(v) Requires state funding to accomplish a discrete, usable phase
of the project;
(vi) Is ready to proceed and will make timely use of the funds;
(vii) Is sponsored by one or more entities that have the
organizational and financial capacity to fulfill the terms of the grant
agreement and to maintain the project into the future;
(viii) Fills an unmet need for community services;
(ix) Will achieve its stated objectives; and
(x) Is a community priority as shown through tangible commitments
of existing or future assets made to the project by community
residents, leaders, businesses, and government partners.
(c) The evaluation and ranking process shall also include an
examination of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects.
((Grant assistance under this section shall not exceed twenty-five
percent of the total cost of the project.)) The department shall
require a nonstate match for grant assistance under this section. The
nonstate portion of the total project cost may include cash, the value
of real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project,
and in-kind contributions. The required match shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the total cost of the project, and the exact percentage
shall be determined by the department based upon its review of both the
project and the applicant's relevant assets.
(((b))) (d) The department may not:
(i) Set a monetary limit to funding requests; or
(ii) Require that state funds be the last to be spent on a project.
(3)(a) The department shall submit a ((prioritized)) ranked list of
recommended projects annually to the governor and the legislature in
the department's ((biennial)) capital budget requests beginning with
the ((2001-2003)) 2009-2011 biennium and thereafter. ((For the 1999-2001 biennium, the department shall conduct a solicitation and ranking
process, as described in (a) of this subsection, for projects to be
funded by appropriations provided for this program in the 1999-2001
capital budget.)) The list shall include a description of each
project, its total cost, the amount of requested state funding, and the
amount of recommended state funding((, and documentation of nonstate
funds to be used for the project)).
(b) The total amount of recommended state capital funding for
projects on ((a biennial)) the annual ranked project list shall be
determined by the capital budget beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium
and thereafter, and shall not exceed ((ten million dollars)) forty
percent of the total amount appropriated for the building communities
fund program. In addition, if cash funds have been appropriated, up to
three million dollars may be used for technical assistance grants.
((Except for the 1999-2001 biennium,)) The department shall not sign
contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section
until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects.
(((c))) (4) The department shall also submit to the legislature an
unranked list of the remaining eligible projects for which applications
were received. The list must include a description of each project,
its total cost, and the amount of state funding requested. The
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature shall use this list to
determine, in the legislature's sole discretion, any additional
building communities fund projects that may receive funding in the
capital budget. The total amount of state capital funding available
for all projects on the annual unranked list shall be determined by the
capital budget beginning with the 2009-2011 biennium and thereafter,
and shall not exceed sixty percent of the total amount appropriated for
the building communities fund program.
(5) In addition to the ranked and the unranked lists, the
department shall submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature all application materials it received and all working
papers it developed during its evaluation process.
(6) After the legislature has approved a specific list of projects
in law, the department shall develop and manage appropriate contracts
with the selected applicants; monitor project expenditures and grantee
performance; report project and contract information; and exercise due
diligence and other contract management responsibilities as required.
(7) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the
department shall include provisions which require that capital
improvements shall be held by the grantee for a specified period of
time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities shall
be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found
to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee
shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant
plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington
general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 ACCOUNTABILITY. (1) The department shall
develop accountability and reporting standards for grant recipients.
At a minimum, the department shall use the criteria listed in RCW
43.63A.125(2)(b) to evaluate the progress of each grant recipient.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2011, the department shall submit an
annual report to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
including:
(a) A list of projects currently under contract with the department
under the building communities fund program; a description of each
project, its total cost, the amount of state funding awarded and
expended to date, the project status, the number of low-income people
served, and the extent to which the project has met the criteria in RCW
43.63A.125(2)(b); and
(b) Recommendations, if any, for policy and programmatic changes to
the building communities fund program to better achieve program
objectives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2, 3, and 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.63A RCW.

--- END ---