BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to make the ethical and moral
standards, culture, and conduct of all elected, senior leadership and
staff of the legislature the highest in the nation. In addition, the
legislature intends to make the public confidence in the processes and
the leadership of the legislature the highest in the nation. With this
work, the legislature and the legislative staff will be recognized as
state and national leaders in ethics and integrity.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.52.320 and 1994 c 154 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative ethics board shall enforce this chapter and
rules adopted under it with respect to members and employees of the
legislature.
(2) The legislative ethics board shall:
(a) Develop educational materials and training with regard to
legislative ethics for legislators and legislative employees;
(b) Issue advisory opinions;
(c) Adopt rules or policies governing the conduct of business by
the board, and adopt rules defining working hours for purposes of RCW
42.52.180 and where otherwise authorized under chapter 154, Laws of
1994;
(d) Investigate, hear, and determine complaints by any person or on
its own motion;
(e) Impose sanctions including reprimands and monetary penalties;
(f) Recommend suspension or removal to the appropriate legislative
entity, or recommend prosecution to the appropriate authority; ((and))
(g) Establish criteria regarding the levels of civil penalties
appropriate for different types of violations of this chapter and rules
adopted under it;
(h) Develop a legislative plan to provide overall direction and
accountability for legislators and staff;
(i) Coordinate and work with the executive ethics board and the
commission on judicial conduct;
(j) Assess and evaluate the house of representatives' and the
senate's ethical culture through employee and stakeholder surveys and
publish an annual report that shall be made public; and
(k) Solicit outside evaluations, studies, and recommendations for
improvements from academics, nonprofit organizations, the public
disclosure commission, and other entities with expertise in ethics,
integrity, and the public sector.
(3) The board may:
(a) Issue subpoenas for the attendance and testimony of witnesses
and the production of documentary evidence relating to any matter under
examination by the board or involved in any hearing;
(b) Administer oaths and affirmations;
(c) Examine witnesses; and
(d) Receive evidence.
(4) Subject to RCW 42.52.540, the board has jurisdiction over any
alleged violation that occurred before January 1, 1995, and that was
within the jurisdiction of any of the boards established under chapter
44.60 RCW. The board's jurisdiction with respect to any such alleged
violation shall be based on the statutes and rules in effect at
(([the])) the time of the violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
All legislators and legislative staff must attend annual ethics and
integrity training. Failure to fulfill this annual obligation will
cause the forfeiture of all compensation related to the legislator's or
legislative staff's office or employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The house of representatives and the senate must develop an
annual ethics and integrity plan for legislators and staff. The plan
must be updated annually, be made available to the public, and:
(a) Include project management, targets, and timelines;
(b) Integrate with other accountability, ethics, and integrity
programs;
(c) Identify national and international best practices and superior
results;
(d) Identify opportunities for improvement and barriers to success;
(e) Develop public-private partnerships where appropriate; and
(f) Provide recommendations for improving applicable statutes and
existing programs and results.
(2) In addition, the house of representatives and the senate must
each create an independent advisory committee of employees and citizens
to help develop and update the plan created in subsection (1) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning January 1, 2009, and every four years thereafter, the
joint legislative audit and review committee must audit the legislative
ethics board and the house of representatives' and the senate's ethics
and integrity programs.

--- END ---