BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that student interest
and participation in online learning continues to grow. At the same
time, the legislature, business community, and public are encouraging
additional programs for high school students to earn college credits.
Fortunately for students attending schools in rural areas, the two
trends can be combined to provide learning opportunities that are both
rigorous and accessible, and in some cases available free to the
student. In 2006-07, more than four thousand five hundred students
were able to take an online college course through the running start
program, which the community and technical college system makes
accessible statewide through its WashingtonOnline consortium. A more
concerted effort is needed to make schools and students aware of these
opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
compile information about online learning programs for high school
students to earn college credit and place the information on its web
site. Examples of information to be compiled and placed on the web
site include links to purveyors of online learning programs,
comparisons among various types of programs regarding costs or awarding
of credit, advantages and disadvantages of online learning programs,
and other general assistance and guidance for students, teachers, and
counselors in selecting and considering online learning programs. The
office shall use the expertise of the digital learning commons and
WashingtonOnline to provide assistance and suggest resources.
(2) High schools shall ensure that teachers and counselors have
information about online learning programs for high school students to
earn college credit and are able to assist parents and students in
accessing the information. High schools shall ensure that parents and
students have opportunities to learn about online learning programs
under this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, online learning programs for
high school students to earn college credit include such programs as
the running start program under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400,
the digital learning commons, University of Washington extension,
WashingtonOnline, and other programs and providers that meet
qualifications under current laws and rules to offer courses that high
schools may accept for credit toward graduation requirements or that
offer courses generally accepted for credit by public institutions of
higher education in Washington.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.600.320 and 1994 c 205 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
A school district shall provide general information about the
program to all pupils in grades ten, eleven, and twelve and the parents
and guardians of those pupils, including information about the
opportunity to enroll in the program through online courses available
at community and technical colleges and other state institutions of
higher education. To assist the district in planning, a pupil shall
inform the district of the pupil's intent to enroll in courses at an
institution of higher education for credit. Students are responsible
for applying for admission to the institution of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---