BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.67.310 and 1965 c 7 s 35.67.310 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Every city or town may permit connections with any of its
sewers, either directly or indirectly, from property beyond its
limits((, upon such)). In order to do so, the city or town must adopt
an ordinance describing the terms((,)) and conditions ((and payments as
may be prescribed by ordinance, which may be required by the city or
town)) to be ((evidenced by a written agreement)) included in the
contract between the city or town and the property owner ((of the
property to be served by the connecting sewer)) requesting such
service.
(b) The ordinance required under (a) of this subsection must
sufficiently describe the contractual provisions so as to provide
reasonable notice to property owners of the terms and conditions under
which the city or town will contract for the connection of sewer
services beyond its limits.
(c) A city or town extending sewer services to a property within
its urban growth area but outside its geographical limits may include
as a condition of such contract, a requirement that the property owner
develop the property receiving service consistent with the city's
development regulations, building code, and comprehensive plan.
(2) As authorized under this section, the extension of a sewer
system beyond the limits of a city or town must be consistent with
growth management act requirements under chapter 36.70A RCW and other
statutory requirements relating to sewer system development and
operation. Such extensions may be subject to review by a boundary
review board in accordance with chapter 36.93 RCW.
(3) A sewer system connection contract is a "development agreement"
under RCW 36.70B.170 and may only be adopted by ordinance or resolution
after a public hearing as required under RCW 36.70B.200.
(4) A sewer connection contract must be recorded against the
property as required by RCW 36.70B.190.
(5) If ((any such agreement)) a sewer connection contract is made
and filed with the county auditor of the county in which said property
is located, it shall constitute a covenant running with the land and
the agreements and covenants therein shall be binding on the owner and
all persons subsequently acquiring any right, title, or interest in or
to said property.
(6) If the terms and conditions of the ordinance or of the
((agreement)) contract are not kept and performed, or the payments
made, as required, the city or town may disconnect the sewer and for
that purpose may at any time enter upon any public street or road or
upon said property.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.92.200 and 1965 c 7 s 35.92.200 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) A city or town may enter into a firm contract with any
outside municipality, community, corporation, or person, for furnishing
them with water without regard to whether said water shall be
considered as surplus or not and regardless of the source from which
such water is obtained((, which contract may fix the terms upon which
the outside distribution systems will be installed and the rates at
which and the manner in which payment shall be made for the water
supplied or for the service rendered)). In order to do so, the city or
town shall adopt an ordinance describing the conditions under which the
city or town will provide such water service.
(b) An ordinance enacted by a city or town authorizing the issuance
of contracts for the provision of water services under (a) of this
subsection must sufficiently describe the contractual provisions so as
to provide reasonable notice of the terms and conditions under which
the city or town will contract for the provision of water services
beyond its limits.
(c) A city or town extending water services to a property within
its urban growth area but outside its geographical limits may include
as a condition of such contract a requirement that the property owner
develop the property receiving service consistent with the city's
development regulations, building code, and comprehensive plan.
(2) As authorized under this section, the extension of water
facilities beyond the limits of a city or town must be consistent with
growth management act requirements under chapter 36.70A RCW and other
statutory requirements relating to water system development and
operation. Such extensions may be subject to review by a boundary
review board in accordance with chapter 36.93 RCW.
(3) A water system connection contract is a "development agreement"
under RCW 36.70B.170 and may only be adopted by ordinance or resolution
after a public hearing as required under RCW 36.70B.200.
(4) A water system connection contract must be recorded against the
property as required by RCW 36.70B.190.
(5) If a water connection contract is made and filed with the
county auditor of the county in which said property is located, it
shall constitute a covenant running with the land and the agreements
and covenants therein shall be binding on the owner and all persons
subsequently acquiring any right, title, or interest in or to said
property.
(6) If the terms and conditions of the water services ordinance or
contract are not kept and performed, or the payments made, as required,
the city or town may disconnect the water system and for that purpose
may at any time enter upon any public street or road or upon said
property.

--- END ---