BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.280 and 1999 c 167 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to carry onto, or to possess on,
public or private elementary or secondary school premises, school-provided transportation, or areas of facilities while being used
exclusively by public or private schools:
(a) Any firearm;
(b) Any ((other dangerous weapon as defined in RCW 9.41.250))
device designed for suppressing the noise of any firearm;
(c) Any device commonly known as "nun-chu-ka sticks", consisting of
two or more lengths of wood, metal, plastic, or similar substance
connected with wire, rope, or other means;
(d) Any device, commonly known as "throwing stars", which are
multi-pointed, metal objects designed to embed upon impact from any
aspect; ((or))
(e) Any air gun, including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to
propel a BB, pellet, or other projectile by the discharge of compressed
air, carbon dioxide, or other gas;
(f) A blackjack, slung shot, sand club, billy club, or metal
knuckles;
(g) Any stun gun or other object, instrument, or device that, when
applied to a person or animal, is designed to administer an
incapacitating electric shock, charge, or impulse, including but not
limited to, a projectile stun gun, which projects wired probes that are
attached to the device that emit an electrical charge;
(h) Any explosive or any weapon containing poisonous or injurious
gases; or
(i) Any dirk, dagger, spring blade knife, knife having a blade that
is automatically released by a spring mechanism or other mechanical
device, or knife having a blade that opens, or falls, or is ejected
into position by the force of gravity, or by an outward, downward, or
centrifugal thrust or movement.
(2) It is unlawful for a person on public or private elementary or
secondary school premises, school-provided transportation, or areas of
facilities while being used exclusively by public or private schools,
to possess and use, attempt to use, threaten to use, or intend to use,
any object, implement, or instrument that has the capacity to inflict
death or substantial bodily harm when the use, attempt, threat, or
intent is of a nature likely to inflict death or substantial bodily
harm.
(((2))) (3) Any ((such)) person violating subsection (1) or (2) of
this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor, except as provided in
(a) of this subsection.
(a) Any person violating subsection (1)(a) of this section is
guilty of a class C felony, except that a student who was otherwise
legally in possession of an unloaded firearm secured within a locked
vehicle, and who possessed the firearm with no intent to use it or
threaten to use it, or intent to cause or threaten to cause alarm with
it, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(b) In addition, if any person is convicted of a violation of
subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person shall have his or her
concealed pistol license, if any, revoked for a period of three years.
Anyone convicted under this subsection is prohibited from applying for
a concealed pistol license for a period of three years. The court
shall send notice of the revocation to the department of licensing, and
the city, town, or county which issued the license.
(c) Any violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section by
elementary or secondary school students constitutes grounds for
expulsion from the state's public schools in accordance with RCW
28A.600.420. Any other violation by elementary or secondary school
students may constitute grounds for expulsion from the state's public
schools in accordance with RCW 28A.600.010. Within one business day of
any allegation or indication of a violation of subsection (1)(a) of
this section, an appropriate school authority shall promptly notify law
enforcement and the student's parent or guardian regarding ((any)) the
allegation or indication of such violation. Law enforcement shall
forward this notification to the prosecuting attorney.
(d) Upon the arrest of a person at least twelve years of age and
not more than twenty-one years of age for violating subsection (1)(a)
of this section, the person shall be detained or confined in a juvenile
or adult facility for up to seventy-two hours. The person shall not be
released within the seventy-two hours until after the person has been
examined and evaluated by the ((county-))designated mental health
professional unless the court in its discretion releases the person
sooner after a determination regarding probable cause or on probation
bond or bail.
Within twenty-four hours of the arrest, the arresting law
enforcement agency shall refer the person to the ((county-))designated
mental health professional for examination and evaluation under chapter
71.05 or 71.34 RCW and inform a parent or guardian of the person of the
arrest, detention, and examination. The ((county-))designated mental
health professional shall examine and evaluate the person subject to
the provisions of chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW. The examination shall
occur at the facility in which the person is detained or confined. If
the person has been released on probation, bond, or bail, the
examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.
The ((county-))designated mental health professional may determine
whether to refer the person to the ((county-))designated chemical
dependency specialist for examination and evaluation in accordance with
chapter 70.96A RCW. The ((county-))designated chemical dependency
specialist shall examine the person subject to the provisions of
chapter 70.96A RCW. The examination shall occur at the facility in
which the person is detained or confined. If the person has been
released on probation, bond, or bail, the examination shall occur
wherever is appropriate.
Upon completion of any examination by the ((county-))designated
mental health professional or the ((county-))designated chemical
dependency specialist, the results of the examination shall be sent to
the court, and the court shall consider those results in making any
determination about the person.
The ((county-))designated mental health professional and
((county-))designated chemical dependency specialist shall, to the
extent permitted by law, notify a parent or guardian of the person that
an examination and evaluation has taken place and the results of the
examination. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the delivery of
additional, appropriate mental health examinations to the person while
the person is detained or confined.
If the ((county-))designated mental health professional determines
it is appropriate, the ((county-))designated mental health professional
may refer the person to the local regional support network for follow-up services or the department of social and health services or other
community providers for other services to the family and individual.
(((3))) (4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Any student or employee of a private military academy when on
the property of the academy;
(b) Any person engaged in military, law enforcement, or school
district security activities;
(c) Any person who is involved in a convention, showing,
demonstration, lecture, or firearms safety course authorized by school
authorities in which the firearms of collectors or instructors are
handled or displayed;
(d) Any person while the person is participating in a firearms or
air gun competition approved by the school or school district;
(e) Any person in possession of a pistol who has been issued a
license under RCW 9.41.070, or is exempt from the licensing requirement
by RCW 9.41.060, while picking up or dropping off a student;
(f) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age legally in
possession of a firearm or ((dangerous)) other weapon specified in
subsection (1) of this section that is secured within an attended
vehicle or concealed from view within a locked unattended vehicle while
conducting legitimate business at the school;
(g) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age who is in lawful
possession of an unloaded firearm, secured in a vehicle while
conducting legitimate business at the school; or
(h) Any law enforcement officer of the federal, state, or local
government agency.
(((4))) (5) Subsection((s)) (1)(c) and (d) of this section ((do))
does not apply to any person who possesses nun-chu-ka sticks, throwing
stars, or other dangerous weapons to be used in martial arts classes
authorized to be conducted on the school premises.
(((5))) (6) Except as provided in subsection (((3))) (4)(b), (c),
(((f),)) and (h) of this section, firearms are not permitted in a
public or private school building.
(((6))) (7) "GUN-FREE ZONE" signs shall be posted around school
facilities giving warning of the prohibition of the possession of
firearms on school grounds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The superintendent of public instruction
shall convene a multistakeholder school threat assessment work group to
develop, by September 1, 2009, a model policy and programmatic guidance
on threat assessment and threat management in schools. The model
policy's purpose is to provide school personnel and community safety
agencies with best practice policies and procedures that should be
followed to address assessment and intervention methods associated with
a student's act or threat of violence or harm, or a student's use,
attempted use, threatened use, or intent to use a weapon on school
grounds. The model policy shall:
(a) Be consistent with the elements of RCW 28A.320.128 and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction's model policy
addressing requirements for notification of threats of violence or harm
adopted under RCW 28A.320.128;
(b) Address the definition of threat assessment in the context of
a student's act or threat of violence or harm, or a student's use,
attempted use, threatened use, or intent to use a weapon on school
grounds;
(c) Define the range of best practice interventions that should be
pursued if a student involved in an act or threat of violence or harm
to self, others, or property, or the use, attempted use, threatened
use, or intent to use a weapon on school grounds, is either released to
the community while expelled or suspended, or returned to the school
environment; and
(d) Address the purpose of a school threat assessment, guidelines
for school threat management plans, governance of the threat assessment
process, including the responsibilities of the convening agency, the
boundaries of information shared between multiple agencies, membership
of threat assessment committees, and liability issues for those
involved in the process.
(2) The multistakeholder school threat assessment work group should
consist of representatives from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the association of Washington school principals,
the Washington association of school administrators, the Washington
school directors association, the Washington state safe school advisory
committee, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs,
the Washington state emergency management division, school employee
unions, school risk managers, special education professionals, the
mental health division of the department of social and health services,
the juvenile court administrators association, and other appropriate
community safety agencies and organizations as determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(3) By September 1, 2010, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction will facilitate quarterly trainings to school
districts on the implementation of the model school threat assessment
policy and programmatic guidance to provide school personnel and
community safety agencies with the recommended best practice policies
and procedures. This training will address the assessment and
intervention methods associated with a student's act or threat of
violence or harm, or a student's use, attempted use, threatened use, or
intent to use a weapon on school grounds.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide the
following reports to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate:
(a) By September 15, 2009, a report on the components of the model
policy adopted under subsection (1) of this section;
(b) By January 15, 2011, a report on the implementation of the
quarterly trainings required under subsection (3) of this section; and
(c) By November 15, 2011, a report on the compliance of school
districts in adopting the policy on threat assessment and threat
management required under section 3 of this act.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
implement this section within existing funds.
(6) This section expires December 31, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
By September 1, 2011, each school district board of directors shall
adopt a policy on threat assessment and threat management in schools
that addresses how schools will provide for the safety of all
individuals involved in or affected by threats of violence or harm, or
the use, attempted use, threatened use, or intent to use a firearm or
other weapon prohibited under RCW 9.41.280. The school district's
threat assessment and threat management policy must address the issues
identified in section 2(1) of this act. In developing its policy on
threat assessment and threat management, the school district shall
consider the model policy and guidance on threat assessment and threat
management developed by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction under section 2 of this act.

--- END ---