BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the home inspector licensing board.
(2) "Classroom instruction or classroom education" means training
in observing and identifying defects in structural components,
foundations, roof coverings, insulation and ventilation, exterior and
interior components; wood destroying organisms; and plumbing, heating,
cooling, and electrical systems. "Classroom instruction or classroom
education" includes online or video training.
(3) "Client" means an individual or individuals who contract for a
home inspection.
(4) "Component" means a readily accessible and observable aspect of
a system, such as a floor or wall, but not individual pieces such as
boards or nails where many pieces make up a system.
(5) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(7) "Home inspection" means a visual analysis for the purposes of
providing a professional opinion of the condition of a building and its
attached carports and attached garages, any reasonably accessible
installed components and the operation of the building systems,
including the controls normally operated by the owner, for the
following components of a residential building of four units or less:
Heating system, electrical system, cooling system, plumbing system,
structural components, foundation, roof covering, exterior and interior
components, and site aspects as they affect the building.
(8) "Home inspection report" means a written report prepared and
issued after a home inspection.
(9) "Home inspector" means any person licensed as a home inspector
and who engages in the business of performing home inspections and
writing home inspection reports.
(10) "Readily or reasonably accessible" means areas typically and
routinely visible by normal access.
(11) "Residential buildings" includes newly built or previously
owned homes, condominium units, townhomes, or manufactured homes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 HOME INSPECTION REPORTS. (1) A home
inspector shall include the following information in a home inspection
report:
(a) Those systems and components inspected which, in the
professional opinion of the inspector, are significantly deficient or
near the end of its service life;
(b) A reason why, if not self-evident, the system or component is
significantly deficient or near the end of its service life;
(c) Whether or not there is damage from wood destroying organisms
or conducive conditions leading to the development or establishment of
the organism; and
(d) Any systems and components designated for inspection in the
standards of practice developed by the board.
(2) A licensed home inspector shall provide a written report of the
home inspection to each person for whom the inspector performs a home
inspection within seven calendar days from the date of the inspection.
(3) A licensed home inspector shall not, from the time of the
inspection until one year from the date of the report, perform any work
other than home inspection-related consultation on the home upon which
he or she has performed a home inspection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 GENERAL EXCLUSIONS FROM A HOME INSPECTION.
(1) The home inspector is not required to determine the following:
(a) The condition of systems or components that are not readily
accessible;
(b) The remaining life of any system or component;
(c) The strength, adequacy, effectiveness, or efficiency of any
system or component;
(d) The cause of any condition or deficiency;
(e) The methods, materials, or costs of corrections;
(f) Future conditions including, but not limited to, failure of
systems and components;
(g) The suitability of the property for any specialized use;
(h) Compliance with regulatory requirements;
(i) The market value of the property or its marketability; and
(j) The presence of environmental hazards including, but not
limited to, toxins, carcinogens, noise, and contaminants in soil,
water, and air.
(2) Home inspectors are not required to enter the following:
(a) Any area that will likely be dangerous to the inspector or
other persons or damage the property or its systems or components; or
(b) The underfloor crawl spaces or attics that are not readily
accessible; however, substructure crawl spaces must be inspected when
accessible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 THIRD-PARTY EXCLUSIONS. The home inspection
and report are performed and prepared for the sole, confidential, and
exclusive use and possession of the client and are nontransferable.
The inspector shall hold no responsibility for use or misinterpretation
by third parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 LICENSURE. Beginning September 1, 2009, a
person shall not engage in or conduct, or advertise or hold himself or
herself out as engaging in or conducting, the business of or acting in
the capacity of a home inspector within this state without first
obtaining a license as provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSURE. In order to
become licensed as a home inspector, an applicant must submit the
following to the department:
(1) An application on a form developed by the department;
(2) The fee in an amount set by the department and approved by the
board;
(3) Identification proving that the applicant is at least eighteen
years of age;
(4) Proof that the applicant possesses at least a high school
diploma or its equivalent;
(5) Proof of a minimum of one hundred twenty hours of classroom
instruction as approved by the board;
(6) Proof of having completed a minimum of forty hours of
supervised field training as approved by the board;
(7) Evidence of successful passage of the written exam as outlined
in section 8 of this act; and
(8) Proof of having passed the Washington state department of
agriculture's pest inspection exam.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 APPLICATION FOR LICENSING. An application
for licensing must be filed with the director and must contain
statements made under oath demonstrating the applicant's
qualifications. The director with the board's approval may require any
information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need to
determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for licensing. The
application fee for initial licensing shall be determined by the
director as provided in RCW 43.24.086. The application, together with
the fee, must be submitted to the department prior to the application
deadline established by the director. If the director finds the
applicant ineligible for licensing, the director shall retain the
application fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 WRITTEN EXAMS. (1) Applicants must provide
proof of successfully passing a nationally recognized, psychometrically
evaluated, home inspectors' exam. The examination shall be designed to
test competence in home inspection practice, as determined by
recognized role definition methodology and developed and administered
in a manner consistent with the American educational research
association's standards for educational and psychological testing; the
equal employment opportunity commission's uniform guidelines for
employee selection procedures; the civil rights act of 1991; the
Americans with disabilities act of 1990; and similar applicable
standards.
(2) A separate examination module will be developed to test
applicants on the specific Washington state laws, adopted standard of
practice, and code of ethics. Examinations of applicants for this exam
module must be held at times and places as determined by the board with
the director's approval. A candidate failing this examination may
apply for reexamination. Subsequent examinations must be granted upon
payment of a fee.
(3) To qualify to take the Washington standards exam, an applicant
must:
(a) Provide the board and the department with acceptable
documentation that the applicant has passed a board-approved home
inspection course of at least one hundred twenty hours of classroom
education;
(b) Provide the board and the department with acceptable
documentation that the applicant has completed a minimum of forty hours
of supervised field training as approved by the board;
(c) Provide the board and the department with acceptable
documentation that the applicant has successfully passed a nationally
recognized, psychometrically evaluated, home inspectors' exam.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 GRANDFATHERING. At the time that licensing
takes effect, any person who has been actively engaged in the business
of conducting home inspections and has been licensed as a structural
pest inspector by the state department of agriculture for at least two
years and who has conducted at least one hundred complete fee-paid home
inspections may apply to the board for initial licensure without
meeting the examination or instruction requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 LICENSE LENGTH AND RENEWAL. (1) Licenses
are issued for a term of two years and expire on the last day of the
month the license was issued. Licenses must be in a form prescribed by
the board and approved by the director. Licenses that are not renewed
are considered to be expired and any home inspection activity which
would require a license to perform which occurs after the expiration of
the license is a violation of this chapter.
(2) Any person who receives an initial license under section 9 of
this act must, upon renewal of his or her license, provide the board
and the department with acceptable documentation that the applicant has
successfully passed a nationally recognized, psychometrically
evaluated, home inspectors' exam, and the Washington standards exam.
(3) Any licensee who fails to timely renew his or her license may
renew his or her license only upon payment of renewal and late fees as
set by the director. A licensee who fails to renew his or her license
within six months from the date it expires is considered to have
forfeited his or her rights to renew the license and can only be
licensed by filing an application as an initial applicant and meeting
all the requirements of an initial applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 ADVERTISING. The term "licensed home
inspector" along with the license number of the inspector must appear
on all advertising, correspondence, and documents incidental to a home
inspection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS. (1) As
a condition of renewal, a licensed home inspector shall present
satisfactory evidence to the board of having completed the continuing
education requirements provided for in this section.
(2) Each applicant for license renewal shall complete at least
thirty hours of instruction every two years in courses approved by the
board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RECIPROCITY. The director may, upon
application and payment of a fee determined by the director as provided
in RCW 43.24.086, issue a license and certificate without examination
as a home inspector issued by the proper authority of any state,
territory, or possession of the United States if the applicant's
qualifications as evaluated by the board meet the requirements of this
chapter and the rules adopted by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 EXEMPTIONS FROM HOME INSPECTOR LICENSING.
The following persons shall be exempt from the licensing requirements
outlined in this chapter:
(1) Persons licensed by the state as professional engineers when
acting within the scope of their license;
(2) Persons licensed by the state as architects when acting within
the scope of their license;
(3) Persons licensed by the state or any political subdivision as
electricians when acting within the scope of their license;
(4) Persons licensed by the state or any political subdivision as
plumbers when acting within the scope of their license;
(5) Persons licensed by the state or any political subdivision as
heating and air conditioning technicians when acting within the scope
of their license;
(6) Persons licensed by the state as real estate brokers or real
estate sales persons when acting within the scope of their license;
(7) Persons licensed by the state as real estate appraisers,
certified general appraisers, or residential real estate appraisers
when acting within the scope of their license;
(8) Persons licensed by the state as pest control operators or
structural pest inspectors when acting within the scope of their
license;
(9) Persons regulated by the state as insurance adjusters when
acting within the scope of their profession;
(10) Persons who are employed as code enforcement officials by the
state or any political subdivision when acting within the scope of
their employment by such governmental entity;
(11) Persons licensed by the state or any political subdivision as
contractors when acting within the scope of their license;
(12) Persons who perform warranty evaluations of components,
systems, or appliances within resale residential buildings for the
purpose of issuance of a home warranty agreement, provided that the
warranty evaluation report includes a statement that the warranty
evaluation performed is not a home inspection and does not meet the
standards of a home inspection under Washington law. No home warranty
company shall refer to a warranty evaluation as a home inspection in
any written materials provided by the home warranty company.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 EXEMPTION FROM STRUCTURAL PEST INSPECTOR
LICENSING. Any person licensed by the Washington state department of
licensing as a home inspector under the conditions outlined in this
chapter shall be exempt from the license requirements of RCW 15.58.205.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 HOME INSPECTOR LICENSING BOARD. (1) The
state home inspector licensing board is created. The board consists of
seven members appointed by the director, who shall advise the director
concerning the administration of this chapter. Of the appointments to
this board, six shall be actively engaged as home inspectors
immediately prior to their appointment to the board, and one shall be
a member of the general public with no family or business connection
with the home inspector business or practice.
(2) A home inspector must have the following qualifications to be
appointed to the board:
(a) Engaged as a home inspector in the state of Washington for five
years;
(b) Licensed as a home inspector under this chapter; and
(c) Performed one thousand home inspections in the state of
Washington.
(3) Members of the board are appointed for three-year terms. Terms
must be staggered so that no more than two appointments are scheduled
to be made in any calendar year. Members hold office until the
expiration of the terms for which they were appointed. The director
may remove a board member for just cause. The director may appoint a
new member to fill a vacancy on the board for the remainder of the
unexpired term. All board members are limited to two consecutive
terms.
(4) Each board member is entitled to compensation for each day
spent conducting official business and to reimbursement for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.240, 43.03.050, and 43.03.060.
(5) The board will be established prior to the licensure start
date; therefore, the director will establish the criteria for the
initial appointments to the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 DIRECTOR'S AUTHORITY. The director has the
following authority:
(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind rules approved by the board as
deemed necessary to carry out the licensing requirements;
(2) To adopt fees as provided in RCW 43.24.086;
(3) To administer licensing examinations approved by the board and
to adopt or recognize examinations prepared by other organizations as
approved by the board; and
(4) To adopt standards of professional conduct, practice, and
ethics as approved by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 BOARD'S AUTHORITY. The board has the
following authority:
(1) To establish rules, including board organization and assignment
of terms, and meeting frequency and timing, for adoption by the
director;
(2) To establish the minimum qualifications for licensing
applicants as provided in this chapter;
(3) To approve the method of administration of examinations
required by the criteria outlined in this chapter or by rule as
established by the director;
(4) To approve the content of or recognition of examinations
prepared by other organizations for adoption by the director;
(5) To set the time and place of examinations with the approval of
the director; and
(6) To establish and review standards of professional conduct,
practice, and ethics for adoption by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 HOME INSPECTORS AS CORPORATIONS PROHIBITED.
A license as a home inspector may not be issued to a corporation,
limited liability company, partnership, firm, or group. However, this
section does not prevent a licensed home inspector from rendering home
inspections for or on behalf of a corporation, limited liability
company, partnership, firm, or group, when the home inspection report
is performed, prepared, and signed by a licensed home inspector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 HOME INSPECTOR'S ACCOUNT. The home
inspector's account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts from fines and fees collected under this chapter must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only to carry out the duties required for the operation and enforcement
of this chapter. Only the director may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT. In addition to the
unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the following
conduct, acts, and conditions constitute unprofessional conduct:
(1) Violating this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;
(2) Not meeting the qualifications for licensing set forth by this
chapter;
(3) Failure to comply with an assurance of discontinuance entered
into with the director; or
(4) Committing any other act, or failing to act, which act or
failure are customarily regarded as being contrary to the accepted
professional conduct or standard generally expected of those conducting
home inspections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 HEARING BEFORE THE DIRECTOR. The
procedures governing adjudicative proceedings before agencies under
chapter 34.05 RCW govern all hearings before the director or his or her
designee. Upon a finding that a license holder or applicant has
committed unprofessional conduct, the director may issue an order
providing for one or any combination of the following:
(1) Revocation of the license;
(2) Suspension of the license for a fixed or indefinite term;
(3) Restriction or limitation of the practice;
(4) Issuance of a civil fine not to exceed five thousand dollars
for each violation;
(5) Requiring satisfactory completion of a specific program of
remedial education or treatment;
(6) Monitoring of the practice by a peer approved by the director;
(7) Reprimand or censure;
(8) Compliance with conditions of probation for a designated period
of time;
(9) Withholding of a license request;
(10) Refund of fees billed to and collected from the consumer; or
(11) Other corrective action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 SUSPENSION OF LICENSE. The director shall
immediately suspend the license or practice permit of a person who has
been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social
and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a child
support order. If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for a license under this chapter during the suspension,
reissuance of the license is automatic upon the board's receipt of a
release issued by the department of social and health services stating
that the licensee is in compliance with the child support order. The
procedure in RCW 74.20A.320 is the exclusive administrative remedy for
contesting the establishment of noncompliance with a child support
order, and suspension of a license under this subsection, and satisfies
the requirements of RCW 34.05.422.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 CIVIL INFRACTIONS. The department has the
authority to issue civil infractions under chapter 7.80 RCW in the
following instances:
(1) Conducting or offering to conduct a home inspection without
being licensed in accordance with this chapter;
(2) Presenting or attempting to use as his or her own the home
inspector license of another;
(3) Giving any false or forged evidence of any kind to the director
or his or her authorized representative in obtaining a license;
(4) Falsely impersonating any other licensee; or
(5) Attempting to use an expired or revoked license.
All fees, fines, and penalties collected or assessed by a court
because of a violation of this section must be remitted to the
department to be deposited into the home inspector's account created in
section 20 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 RELIEF BY INJUNCTION. The director is
authorized to apply for relief by injunction without bond, to restrain
a person from the commission of any act that is prohibited under this
chapter. In such proceedings, it is not necessary to allege or prove
either that an adequate remedy at law does not exist, or that
substantial or irreparable damage would result from continued
violation. The director, individuals acting on the director's behalf,
and members of the board are immune from suit in any action, civil or
criminal, based on disciplinary proceedings or other official acts
performed in the course of their duties in the administration and
enforcement of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 LIMIT OF LIABILITY. The home inspector
shall be able to limit the home inspector's liability by mutual
agreement with the client.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS. All actions to
recover damages for any act or omission of a home inspector relating to
a home inspection that the home inspector conducts must be commenced
within one year after the date that the home inspection was completed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 Captions used in this chapter are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 Sections 1 through 28 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

Sec. 30 RCW 15.58.205 and 2003 c 212 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no
individual may perform services as a structural pest inspector or
advertise that they perform services of a structural pest inspector
without obtaining a structural pest inspector license from the
director. The license expires annually on a date set by rule by the
director. Application for a license must be on a form prescribed by
the director and must be accompanied by a fee of forty-five dollars.
(2) The following are exempt from the application fee requirement
of subsection (1) of this section when acting within the authorities of
their existing licenses issued under chapter 15.58 or 17.21 RCW:
Licensed pest control consultants; licensed commercial pesticide
applicators and operators; licensed private-commercial applicators; and
licensed demonstration and research applicators.
(3) The following are exempt from the structural pest inspector
licensing requirement: Individuals inspecting for damage caused by
wood destroying organisms if the inspections are solely for the purpose
of: (a) Repairing or making specific recommendations for the repair of
the damage, or (b) assessing a monetary value for the structure
inspected. Individuals performing wood destroying organism inspections
that incorporate but are not limited to the activities described in (a)
or (b) of this subsection are not exempt from the structural pest
inspector licensing requirement.
(4) Persons licensed as home inspectors under chapter 18.--- RCW
(sections 1 through 28 of this act) are exempt from the structural pest
inspector licensing requirement.
(5) Persons holding a valid license to act as a structural pest
inspector on July 1, 2003, are exempt from this requirement until
expiration of that license.
(((5))) (6) A structural pest inspector license is not valid for
conducting a complete wood destroying organism inspection unless the
inspector owns or is employed by a business with a structural pest
inspection company license.

--- END ---