BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public utility
districts provide customer-owned, nonprofit utility services throughout
Washington state. The legislature further finds that statutory bid
limits for public utility districts have not been increased to address
inflation and dramatic cost increases in construction materials. The
legislature further finds that the impact of existing bid limits and
high construction material costs is that public utility districts are
often unable to: Maintain and repair their own utility infrastructure,
provide training and experience to utility workers, and handle high
administrative costs. The legislature further finds that existing bid
limits result in increased costs to both public utility districts and
utility customers. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to
amend the bid limits for public utility districts to address inflation
and increased material costs.

Sec. 2 RCW 54.04.070 and 2002 c 72 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any item, or items of the same kind of materials, equipment, or
supplies purchased, the estimated cost of which is in excess of ((ten))
twenty-five thousand dollars, exclusive of sales tax shall be by
contract: PROVIDED, That a district may make purchases of the same
kind of items of materials, equipment and supplies not exceeding
((five)) twenty-five thousand dollars in any calendar month without a
contract, purchasing any excess thereof over ((five)) twenty-five
thousand dollars by contract. Any work ordered by a district
commission, the estimated cost of which is in excess of ((ten)) twenty-five thousand dollars exclusive of sales tax, shall be by contract,
except that a district commission may have its own regularly employed
personnel perform work which is an accepted industry practice under
prudent utility management without a contract. Prudent utility
management means performing work with regularly employed personnel
utilizing material of a worth not exceeding ((fifty)) two hundred
thousand dollars in value without a contract: PROVIDED, That such
limit on the value of material being utilized in work being performed
by regularly employed personnel shall not include the value of
individual items of equipment purchased or acquired and used as one
unit of a project. Before awarding such a contract, the commission
shall publish a notice once or more in a newspaper of general
circulation in the district at least thirteen days before the last date
upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for the
work or materials; plans and specifications of which shall at the time
of the publication be on file at the office of the district subject to
public inspection. Any published notice ordering work to be performed
for the district shall be mailed at the time of publication to any
established trade association which files a written request with the
district to receive such notices. The commission may at the same time
and as part of the same notice, invite tenders for the work or
materials upon plans and specifications to be submitted by the bidders.
All contract projects equal to or in excess of one hundred thousand
dollars shall be let by competitive bidding unless the public utility
district lets contracts using the small works roster process under RCW
39.04.155.
Whenever equipment or materials required by a district are held by
a governmental agency and are available for sale but such agency is
unwilling to submit a proposal, the commission may ascertain the price
of such items and file a statement of such price supported by the sworn
affidavit of one member of the commission and may consider such price
as a bid without a deposit or bond.
The commission may waive the competitive bidding requirements of
this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within
that section applies to the purchase or public work.

Sec. 3 RCW 54.04.082 and 2002 c 72 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the awarding of a contract to purchase any item, or items of
the same kind of materials, equipment, or supplies in an amount
exceeding ((ten)) twenty-five thousand dollars, but less than ((fifty))
one hundred thousand dollars per calendar month, exclusive of sales
tax, the commission may, in lieu of the procedure described in RCW
54.04.070 and 54.04.080 requiring public notice to invite sealed
proposals for such materials, equipment, or supplies, pursuant to
commission resolution use the process provided in RCW 39.04.190.
Waiver of the deposit or bid bond required under RCW 54.04.080 may be
authorized by the commission in securing such bid quotations.

--- END ---