BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
determine how to best provide a temporary sales and use tax exemption
on all purchases by individuals who suffered property damage in the
flood, but who have already paid for the repair, replacement, or
reconstruction of the property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
tangible personal property and labor and services used for
constructing, repairing, decorating, or rebuilding a residence or
associated structures that was owned and occupied by an eligible person
as a principal place of residence during calendar year 2007, when the
construction, repair, decorating, or rebuilding is as a result of flood
damage occurring during December 2007.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions and
restrictions apply:
(a) "Associated structures" includes, but is not limited to,
outbuildings, barns, storage sheds, or other structures that serve the
principal place of residence.
(b) "Eligible person" means a person residing in a county
designated by the president of the United States as a disaster area and
is eligible to receive individual assistance from the federal emergency
management agency.
(c) The terms "residence," "owned," and "occupied" have meanings
consistent with their meanings in RCW 84.36.379 through 84.36.389.
(d) The exemption under this section is available only if the buyer
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The department must immediately issue an
exemption certificate to all eligible persons that have already applied
for and received individual assistance from the federal emergency
management agency.
(e) The total amount of the exemption for an eligible person may
not exceed two hundred thousand dollars of tangible personal property
and labor and services.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of tangible personal property and labor and services for
constructing, repairing, decorating, or rebuilding a residence that was
owned and occupied by an eligible person as a principal place of
residence during calendar year 2007, when the construction, repair,
decorating, or rebuilding is as a result of flood damage occurring
during December 2007.
(2) The definitions and restrictions in section 2 of this act apply
to this section.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---