BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.56.022 and 1995 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Each)) (1) Tax statements shall show the amount of ((voter-approved)): (((1))) (a) Regular levies ((except those authorized in
RCW 84.55.050)), by taxing district; and (((2))) (b) excess levies, by
taxing district. Such amounts may be shown either as a dollar amount
or as a percentage of the total amount of taxes.
(2) If a taxpayer, as shown by the tax rolls, holds solely a
security interest in the real property as described in RCW 84.40.045,
the county treasurer shall provide the person making payments to the
taxpayer a copy of the tax statement; however, the copy must clearly
indicate that it is not a bill for collection of property taxes.

--- END ---