BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in an era of
consumer product recalls, increasing state emphasis on quality ratings
and accountability, and decreasing resources at the federal level for
consumer protection, there may be a gap in outreach to consumers in the
state. The legislature further finds that many state agencies provide
helpful information to consumers, but consumers may not always know
where to look to find such information. To remedy this potential
information gap, the legislature declares that a "one-stop" consumer
protection web site should be created so that consumers in Washington
state have access to clear and appropriate information regarding
consumer services that are available to them across state government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall coordinate among state agencies to develop
a consumer protection web site. The web site shall serve as a one-stop
web site for consumer information. At a minimum, the web site must
provide links to information on:
(a) Insurance information provided by the office of the insurance
commissioner, including information on how to file consumer complaints
against insurance companies, how to look up authorized insurers, and
how to learn more about health insurance benefits;
(b) Child care information provided by the department of early
learning, including how to select a child care provider, how child care
providers are rated, and information about product recalls;
(c) Financial information provided by the department of financial
institutions, including consumer information on financial fraud,
investing, credit, and enforcement actions;
(d) Health care information provided by the department of health,
including health care provider listings and quality assurance
information;
(e) Home care information provided by the home care quality
authority, including information to assist consumers in finding an in-home provider;
(f) Licensing information provided by the department of licensing,
including information regarding business, vehicle, and professional
licensing; and
(g) Other information available on existing state agency web sites
that could be a helpful resource for consumers.
(2) By July 1, 2008, state agencies shall report to the department
on whether they maintain resources for consumers that could be made
available through the consumer protection web site.
(3) By September 1, 2008, the department shall make the consumer
protection web site available to the public.
(4) After September 1, 2008, the department, in coordination with
other state agencies, shall develop a plan on how to build upon the
consumer protection web site to create a consumer protection portal.
The plan must also include an examination of the feasibility of
developing a toll-free information line to support the consumer
protection portal. The plan must be submitted to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.

--- END ---