BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that foster parents are an essential partner
in the child welfare system, with responsibility for the care of
vulnerable children whose families are unable to meet their needs.
Because children who enter the foster care system have experienced
varying degrees of stress and trauma before placement, foster parents
sometimes are called upon to provide care for children with significant
behavioral challenges and intensive developmental needs. Other
children who enter foster care may require extraordinary care due to
health care needs or medical fragility. The legislature also finds
that foster parents with specialized skills and experience, or
professional training and expertise, can contribute significantly to a
child's well-being by promoting placement stability and supporting the
child's developmental growth while in foster care. The legislature
intends to implement a specialized foster home program to enhance the
continuum of care options and to promote permanency and positive
outcomes for children served in the child welfare system by authorizing
the department to contract for specialized foster home services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall select two or more geographic areas with
high concentrations of children with significant needs in foster care
for the implementation of phase one of a specialized foster home
program. In determining the scope of the first phase of the program,
the department shall: (a) Examine areas where there are concentrations
of children with significant behavioral challenges and intensive
developmental or medical needs who are being served in family foster
homes; (b) consider areas of appropriate size that will allow for
careful analysis of the impact of the specialized foster home program
on the array of out-of-home care providers, including providers of
behavioral rehabilitation services; and (c) determine the number of
children to be served in these selected areas. During phase one of the
implementation of the program, only licensed foster parents under the
supervision of the department shall be eligible to participate in the
program. Implementation of the program at the phase one sites also
shall be structured to support the long-term goal of eventual expansion
of the program statewide.
(2) Based on the information gathered by the work group convened
under chapter 413, Laws of 2007, and the additional information
gathered pursuant to this section, the department shall actively:
(a) Seek recommendations from foster parents and other out-of-home
service providers in the program sites regarding the qualifications and
requirements of specialized foster home providers, the needs of the
children to be served, and the desired outcomes to be measured or
monitored at the respective program sites; and
(b) Consult with experts in child welfare, children's mental
health, and children's health care to identify the evidence-based or
promising practice models to be employed in the program and the
appropriate supports to ensure program fidelity, including, but not
limited to, the necessary training and clinical consultation and
oversight to be provided to specialized foster homes.
(3) Using the recommendations from foster parents, the
consultations with professionals from appropriate disciplines, and the
information provided in the report to the legislature under chapter
413, Laws of 2007, including the information presented to the work
group convened to prepare and present the report, the department shall
implement the program through contracts with foster parents who are
determined by the department to meet the eligibility criteria for the
specialized foster home program. The department shall:
(a) Define the criteria for specialized foster home providers,
which shall include a requirement that the foster parent be licensed by
the department as a foster parent, as well as meet additional
requirements relating to relevant experience, education, training, and
professional expertise necessary to meet the high needs of children
identified as eligible for this program;
(b) Define criteria for identifying children with high needs who
may be eligible for placement in a specialized foster home provider.
Such criteria shall be based on the best interests of the child and
include an assessment of the child's past and current level of
functioning as well as a determination that the child's treatment plan
and developmental needs are consistent with the placement plan;
(c) Establish a policy for placement of children with high needs in
specialized foster homes, including a process for matching the child's
needs with the foster parent's skills and expertise;
(d) Establish a limit on the number and ages of children with high
needs that may be placed in a specialized foster home pursuant to the
specialized foster home program contract. Such limitation shall
recognize that children with externalizing behaviors are most likely to
experience long-term improvements in their behavior when care is
provided in settings that minimize exposure to peers with challenging
behaviors;
(e) Identify one or more approved models of skill building for use
by specialized foster home providers;
(f) Specify the training and consultation requirements that support
the models of service;
(g) Establish a system of supports, including clinical consultation
and oversight for specialized foster homes;
(h) Establish a level of stipend payments to specialized foster
home providers that is not tied to deficits in the child's level of
functioning;
(i) Establish clearly defined responsibilities of specialized
foster home providers, who have a specialized foster home contract
including responsibilities to promote permanency and connections with
birth parents; and
(j) Develop a process for annual performance reviews of specialized
foster home providers.
(4) Contracts between the department and a specialized foster home
provider shall include a statement of work focusing on achieving
stability in placement and measuring improved permanency outcomes shall
specify at least the following elements:
(a) The model of treatment and care to be provided;
(b) The training and ongoing professional consultation to be
provided;
(c) The method for determining any additional supports to be
provided to an eligible child or the specialized foster home provider;
(d) The desired outcomes to be measured;
(e) A reasonable and efficient process for seeking a modification
of the contract;
(f) The rate and terms of payment under the contract; and
(g) The term of the contract and the processes for an annual
performance review of the specialized foster home provider and an
annual assessment of the child.
(5) Beginning on or before October 1, 2008, the department shall
begin the selection of, and negotiation of contracts with, specialized
foster home providers in the phase one areas selected for
implementation.
(6) Nothing in this act gives an eligible foster parent the right
to a contract under the specialized foster home program, and nothing in
this act gives a specialized foster home provider that has a contract
under the program a right to have a child or children placed in the
home pursuant to the contract.
(7) "Specialized foster home providers" means foster parents who
are determined by the department to be eligible foster parents, who
have a specialized foster home program contract with the department.
(8) The department shall provide an implementation status update to
the governor and the legislature by January 30, 2009. Based on the
experiences and lessons learned from implementation of the program
during phase one, the department shall recommend a process and timeline
for expanding the program and implementing it statewide. The
department shall report to the governor and the appropriate members of
the legislature by September 1, 2009, and shall identify the essential
elements of the specialized foster home program that should be
addressed or replicated as the program is expanded to the next phase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to the governor with respect to specialized foster home
providers. Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the employer of specialized foster home providers who,
solely for the purposes of collective bargaining, are public employees.
The public employer shall be represented for bargaining purposes by the
governor or the governor's designee.
(2) There shall be collective bargaining between the governor and
specialized foster home providers, except as follows:
(a) A statewide unit of all specialized foster home providers is
the only unit appropriate for purposes of collective bargaining. The
commission shall adopt reasonable rules providing for the inclusion of
unrepresented specialized foster home providers when, after
implementation of phase one of the specialized foster home program
described in section 2 of this act: (i) The labor organization
certified as the exclusive bargaining representative of the specialized
foster home providers petitions to represent one or more new groups of
specialized foster home providers and demonstrates that it has majority
support among those groups; or (ii) when any labor organization
petitions to represent the entire bargaining unit of specialized foster
home providers and demonstrates that it has at least a thirty percent
showing of interest to warrant an election.
(b) The exclusive bargaining representative of specialized foster
home providers in the unit specified in (a) of this subsection shall be
the representative chosen in an election conducted pursuant to RCW
41.56.070. Bargaining authorization cards furnished as the showing of
interest in support of any representation petition or motion for
intervention filed under this section shall be exempt from disclosure
under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(c) Notwithstanding the definition of "collective bargaining" in
RCW 41.56.030(4), the scope of collective bargaining for specialized
foster home providers under this section shall be limited solely to:
(i) Economic compensation for enhanced services provided by specialized
foster home providers in the form of a stipend; (ii) health and welfare
benefits; (iii) labor management committees; and (iv) grievance
procedures. Retirement benefits shall not be subject to collective
bargaining. By such obligation, neither party shall be compelled to
agree to a proposal or be required to make a concession unless
otherwise provided in this chapter.
(d) In addition to the entities listed in the mediation and
interest arbitration provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and
41.56.480, the provisions apply to the governor or the governor's
designee and the exclusive bargaining representative of specialized
foster home providers, except that:
(i) In addition to the factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel under RCW 41.56.465, the panel shall
consider the financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement.
(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of
the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, the decision is not
binding on the state.
(e) Specialized foster home providers do not have the right to
strike.
(3) Specialized foster home providers who are public employees
solely for the purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1)
of this section are not, for that reason, employees of the state for
any other purpose. This section applies only to the governance of the
collective bargaining relationship between the employer and specialized
foster home providers as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.
(4) This section does not create or modify:
(a) The department's authority to establish a plan of care for each
foster child or its core responsibility to manage foster care services,
including determination of the level of care that each foster child is
eligible to receive. This subsection shall not be interpreted to
require collective bargaining over an individual foster child's plan of
care;
(b) The department's obligation to comply with the federal funding
statutes and regulations, including but not limited to the social
security act and the terms of any state plan or waiver granted by the
federal government to ensure federal financial participation in the
provision of the services;
(c) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services including standards of eligibility of
children in foster care and specialized foster home providers
participating in the programs and the nature of services provided. The
governor shall not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under
this chapter that does not expressly reserve the legislative rights
described in this subsection (4)(c);
(d) The right of the court, the department, or any other agency or
individual acting with proper legal authority, to remove a child from
the care of a specialized foster home provider. The right or action of
the court, the department, or any other agency or individual acting
with proper legal authority to remove a child from the care of a
specialized foster home provider shall not constitute an unfair labor
practice;
(e) The department's authority to set minimum licensing standards
for foster parents, to establish a method for determining foster care
maintenance payment rates that will be paid for the benefit of foster
children, and to determine the foster care maintenance rate for each
child in care;
(f) The department's authority to establish, pursuant to statute,
the nature and means of taking or resolving licensing action against
any foster parent, or investigations and actions involving allegations
of abuse or neglect made against a foster parent;
(g) The department's ability to meet and consult with foster
parents, including meetings with specialized foster home providers, as
required under RCW 74.13.031;
(h) The department's authority to define the criteria for
specialized foster homes, including training, education, relevant
experience, and professional expertise, and the department's authority
to define the criteria for identifying high needs children who may be
eligible for placement in a specialized foster home; or
(i) RCW 43.43.832, 43.20A.205, or 74.15.130.
(5) Nothing in this section is intended to imply that the state,
the department, or its contractors agree to any additional vicarious,
joint, or several liability for the action or inaction of a specialized
foster home provider or prospective specialized foster home provider.
(6) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (7) of this
section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed biennial
or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW
43.88.030, a request for funds necessary to implement the stipend and
benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into
under this section or for legislation necessary to implement such
agreement.
(7) A request for funds necessary to implement the stipend and
benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into
under this section shall not be submitted by the governor to the
legislature unless such request has been:
(a) Submitted to the director of financial management by October
1st before the legislative session at which the request is to be
considered, except that, for initial negotiations under this section,
the request must be submitted after July 1, 2009; and
(b) Certified by the director of financial management as being
feasible financially for the state or reflects the binding decision of
an arbitration panel reached under this section.
(8) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submission, any such agreement will be reopened solely for
the purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to implement the
agreement.
(9) The governor shall periodically consult with the joint
committee on employment relations established by RCW 41.80.010
regarding appropriations necessary to implement the stipend and benefit
provisions of any collective bargaining agreement and, upon completion
of negotiations, advise the committee on the elements of the agreement
and on any legislation necessary to implement such agreement.
(10) After the expiration date of any collective bargaining
agreement entered into under this section, all of the terms and
conditions specified in any such agreement remain in effect until the
effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from
the expiration date stated in the agreement, except as provided in
subsection (4)(c) of this section.
(11) If, after the stipend and benefit provisions of an agreement
are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue shortfall occurs
resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by proclamation of the
governor or by resolution of the legislature, both parties shall
immediately enter into collective bargaining for a mutually agreed upon
modification of the agreement.
(12) In enacting this section, the legislature intends to provide
state action immunity under federal and state antitrust laws for the
joint activities of specialized foster home providers and their
exclusive bargaining representative to the extent such activities are
authorized by this chapter.
(13) For purposes of chapter 41.56 RCW, "specialized foster home
providers" means specialized foster home providers as defined in
section 2 of this act, but not providers who are related to, or family
members of, the children with extraordinary behavioral, developmental,
or medical needs for whom they provide care.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.04.810 and 2007 c 184 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Individual providers, as defined in RCW 74.39A.240, family child
care providers, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, ((and)) adult family home
providers, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, and specialized foster home
providers, as defined in section 3 of this act, are not employees of
the state or any of its political subdivisions and are specifically and
entirely excluded from all provisions of this title, except as provided
in RCW 74.39A.270, 41.56.028, ((and)) 41.56.029, and section 3 of this
act.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.56.113 and 2007 c 184 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the written authorization of an individual provider, a
family child care provider, ((or)) an adult family home provider, or a
specialized foster home provider within the bargaining unit and after
the certification or recognition of the bargaining unit's exclusive
bargaining representative, the state as payor, but not as the employer,
shall, subject to subsection (3) of this section, deduct from the
payments to an individual provider, a family child care provider,
((or)) an adult family home provider, or from the stipends paid to a
specialized foster home provider the monthly amount of dues as
certified by the secretary of the exclusive bargaining representative
and shall transmit the same to the treasurer of the exclusive
bargaining representative.
(2) If the governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of
a bargaining unit of individual providers, family child care providers,
((or)) adult family home providers, or specialized foster home
providers enter into a collective bargaining agreement that:
(a) Includes a union security provision authorized in RCW
41.56.122, the state as payor, but not as the employer, shall, subject
to subsection (3) of this section, enforce the agreement by deducting
from the payments or stipends, as applicable, to bargaining unit
members the dues required for membership in the exclusive bargaining
representative, or, for nonmembers thereof, a fee equivalent to the
dues; or
(b) Includes requirements for deductions of payments other than the
deduction under (a) of this subsection, the state, as payor, but not as
the employer, shall, subject to subsection (3) of this section, make
such deductions upon written authorization of the individual provider,
family child care provider, ((or)) adult family home provider, or the
specialized foster home provider.
(3)(a) The initial additional costs to the state in making
deductions ((from the payments to individual providers, family child
care providers, and adult family home providers)) under this section
shall be negotiated, agreed upon in advance, and reimbursed to the
state by the exclusive bargaining representative.
(b) The allocation of ongoing additional costs to the state in
making deductions ((from the payments to individual providers, family
child care providers, or adult family home providers)) under this
section shall be an appropriate subject of collective bargaining
between the exclusive bargaining representative and the governor unless
prohibited by another statute. If no collective bargaining agreement
containing a provision allocating the ongoing additional cost is
entered into between the exclusive bargaining representative and the
governor, or if the legislature does not approve funding for the
collective bargaining agreement as provided in RCW 74.39A.300,
41.56.028, ((or)) 41.56.029, or section 3 of this act, as applicable,
the ongoing additional costs to the state in making deductions ((from
the payments to individual providers, family child care providers, or
adult family home providers)) under this section shall be negotiated,
agreed upon in advance, and reimbursed to the state by the exclusive
bargaining representative.
(4) The governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of a
bargaining unit of family child care providers may not enter into a
collective bargaining agreement that contains a union security
provision unless the agreement contains a process, to be administered
by the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit of
family child care providers, for hardship dispensation for license-exempt family child care providers who are also temporary assistance
for needy families recipients or WorkFirst participants.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.01.047 and 2007 c 184 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 43.01.040 through 43.01.044 do not apply to individual
providers under RCW 74.39A.220 through 74.39A.300, family child care
providers under RCW 41.56.028, ((or)) adult family home providers under
RCW 41.56.029, or specialized foster home providers under section 3 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition of
federal funds which support the operations and services provided by the
department of social and health services, the conflicting part of this
act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 3 through 6 of this act take effect
January 1, 2009.

--- END ---