BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.390 and 2007 c 486 s 2 and 2007 c 6 s 904 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the
governing body of a public facilities district (a) created before July
31, 2002, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction
of a new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an
existing new regional center, before January 1, 2004; (b) created
before July 1, 2006, under chapter 35.57 RCW in a county or counties in
which there are no other public facilities districts on June 7, 2006,
and in which the total population in the public facilities district is
greater than ninety thousand that commences construction of a new
regional center before February 1, 2007; (c) created under the
authority of RCW 35.57.010(1)(d); or (d) created before September 1,
2007, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW, in a county or counties in
which there are no other public facilities districts on July 22, 2007,
and in which the total population in the public facilities district is
greater than seventy thousand, that commences construction of a new
regional center before January 1, 2009, or before January 1, 2011, in
the case of a new regional center in a county designated by the
president as a disaster area in December 2007, may impose a sales and
use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from
those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the public
facilities district. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.033 percent of
the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article
used in the case of a use tax.
(2)(a) The governing body of a public facilities district imposing
a sales and use tax under the authority of this section may increase
the rate of tax up to 0.037 percent if, within three fiscal years of
July 1, 2008, the department determines that, as a result of RCW
82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW 82.14.020,
a public facilities district's sales and use tax collections for fiscal
years after July 1, 2008, have been reduced by a net loss of at least
0.50 percent from the fiscal year before July 1, 2008. The fiscal year
in which this section becomes effective is the first fiscal year after
July 1, 2008.
(b) The department shall determine sales and use tax collection net
losses under this section as provided in RCW 82.14.500 (2) and (3).
The department shall provide written notice of its determinations to
public facilities districts. Determinations by the department of a
public facilities district's sales and use tax collection net losses as
a result of RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to
RCW 82.14.020 are final and not appealable.
(c) A public facilities district may increase its rate of tax after
it has received written notice from the department as provided in (b)
of this subsection. The increase in the rate of tax must be made in
0.001 percent increments and must be the least amount necessary to
mitigate the net loss in sales and use tax collections as a result of
RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to RCW
82.14.020. The increase in the rate of tax is subject to RCW
82.14.055.
(3) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public facilities
district.
(4) No tax may be collected under this section before August 1,
2000. The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds
issued for the construction of the regional center and related parking
facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years after the
tax is first collected.
(5) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the
purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount
from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three percent of
the amount collected under this section, provided that amounts
generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 35.57
RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 36.100 RCW
shall not constitute a public or private source. For the purpose of
this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited to
cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used for
the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions from
public or private foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector
partners as part of a public and private partnership agreement
negotiated by the public facilities district.
(6) The combined total tax levied under this section shall not be
greater than 0.037 percent. If both a public facilities district
created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public facilities district
created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this section, the
tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57
RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.
(7) A public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW
is not eligible to impose the tax under this section if the legislative
authority of the county where the public facilities district is located
has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---