BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board, in consultation with
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the autism task
force, and representatives from state and nonprofit agencies that
promote autism awareness and provide programs and services for people
with autism, shall develop autism awareness and training policy
guidelines for schools to ensure that teachers responsible for autistic
children are well-prepared and up-to-date on the most effective methods
of teaching children with autism.
(2) The autism awareness and training policy guidelines shall
ensure, but need not be limited to requiring that:
(a) A candidate for a Washington instructional certificate
satisfactorily complete instruction in autism awareness and methods of
teaching students with autism at an accredited institution of higher
education;
(b) A person seeking certification through an alternate route,
within one year of being employed, satisfactorily complete instruction
in autism awareness and methods for teaching students with autism at an
accredited institution of higher education; and
(c) All teachers not subject to (a) or (b) of this subsection be
required to pursue instruction in autism awareness and methods for
teaching students with autism by the 2010-11 school year as part of the
professional development requirement established by the professional
educator standards board.
(3) By September 1, 2008, the professional educator standards board
shall develop recommendations for autism awareness instruction and
methods of teaching students with autism for all teacher preparation
and professional development programs and shall submit the
recommendations to the governor and the education committees of the
legislature.
(4) By December 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction
shall report the policy guidelines to school districts for the
districts to use to develop and adopt their policies.
(5) By April 1, 2009, each school district shall use the guidelines
developed under subsection (1) of this section to develop and adopt a
school district policy for each school in the district to ensure that
teachers are well-prepared and up-to-date on the most effective methods
of teaching children with autism.
(6) Guidelines adopted by school districts under this section shall
also apply to classified staff seeking a special education endorsement
or certification, or both.

--- END ---