BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Given that transportation is the source of
nearly half of Washington's greenhouse gas emissions, and
transportation-related emissions are expected to grow by more than
twenty-five percent by 2020, the legislature finds that significant
reductions in transportation-related emissions are required to meet the
climate pollution reduction goals in Executive Order 07-02.
To reduce transportation-related emissions, the state must
implement multiple strategies. New technologies and cleaner fuels are
vital to reducing greenhouse gas emissions. However, as long as annual
vehicle miles traveled continue to grow, those climate change goals
will remain out of reach.
The state's ability to achieve significant vehicle miles traveled
reductions depends, in large part, on the implementation and use of
expanded regional and local multimodal design, tools, innovations, and
investments. The legislature further finds that the reduction of
vehicle miles traveled, through a partnership at the state, regional,
and local levels, is critical to reaching the state's climate pollution
reduction goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
To support the implementation of RCW 47.04.280 and 47.01.078(4),
the department shall adopt broad statewide goals to reduce annual per
capita vehicle miles traveled by 2050 consistent with the stated goals
of Executive Order 07-02. Consistent with these goals, the department
shall:
(1) Adopt and seek to achieve the following benchmarks:
(a) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by
eighteen percent by 2020;
(b) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by thirty
percent by 2035; and
(c) Decrease the annual per capita vehicle miles traveled by fifty
percent by 2050;
(2) By July 1, 2008, establish and convene a collaborative process
to develop a set of tools and best practices to assist state, regional,
and local entities in making progress towards the benchmarks
established in subsection (1) of this section. The collaborative
process must:
(a) Be jointly facilitated by the department and the department of
community, trade, and economic development;
(b) Provide for participation from regional transportation planning
organizations, the Washington state transit association, the Puget
Sound clean air agency, and at least one major private employer that
participates in the commute trip reduction program;
(c) Identify current strategies to reduce vehicle miles traveled in
the state as well as successful strategies in other jurisdictions that
may be applicable in the state; and
(d) Identify potential new revenue options for local and regional
governments to authorize to finance vehicle miles traveled reduction
efforts;
(3) By December 1, 2008, provide a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature on the collaborative process and
resulting recommended tools and best practices to achieve the reduction
in annual per capita vehicle miles traveled goals.

--- END ---