BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.36.020 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 56 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a district may
raise revenue by levy of an annual tax not to exceed forty-five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value against the assessed valuation
of the taxable property in such port district for general port
purposes, including the establishment of a capital improvement fund for
future capital improvements, except that any levy for the payment of
the principal and interest of the general bonded indebtedness of the
port district shall be in excess of any levy made by the port district
under the forty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
limitation. The levy shall be made and taxes collected in the manner
provided for the levy and collection of taxes in school districts of
the first class.
(2) The following provisions apply only to a county bordering Puget
Sound with a population of greater than one million five hundred
thousand citizens:
(a) All general purpose taxes levied for collection in 2009 and
thereafter and not dedicated to debt service shall be transferred to
the state treasurer for deposit into the Puget Sound recovery local
account created in RCW 90.71.400.
(b) An additional amount of tax may not be levied under this
section after the effective date of this section for the payment of
bonds or other indebtedness of the district.
(c) For taxes levied for collection in 2009 and thereafter, the
general purpose levy under subsection (1) of this section may not
exceed five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the
assessed valuation of the taxable property. However, the levy rate may
be increased in an amount equivalent to any reduction in the levy rate
of a levy used to pay bonds or other indebtedness of the district.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) The regular property tax levy for each taxing district other
than the state may be set at the amount which would be allowed
otherwise under this chapter if the regular property tax levy for the
district for taxes due in prior years beginning with 1986 had been set
at the full amount allowed under this chapter including any levy
authorized under RCW 52.16.160 that would have been imposed but for the
limitation in RCW 52.18.065, applicable upon imposition of the benefit
charge under chapter 52.18 RCW.
(2) A port district located in a county bordering Puget Sound with
a population of greater than one million five hundred thousand citizens
may not use banked levy capacity to pay or secure bonds or other
indebtedness of the district.
(3) The purpose of this section is to remove the incentive for a
taxing district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum level permitted
under this chapter, and to protect the future levy capacity of a taxing
district that reduces its tax levy below the level that it otherwise
could impose under this chapter, by removing the adverse consequences
to future levy capacities resulting from such levy reductions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 53.36 RCW
to read as follows:
A port district located in a county bordering Puget Sound with a
population of greater than one million five hundred thousand citizens
may not, after the effective date of this act, contract indebtedness or
borrow money for port district purposes, or issue general obligation
bonds for port district purposes, to be paid for with a levy for
general port purposes under RCW 53.36.020.

Sec. 4 RCW 53.36.030 and 1996 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection and section 3
of this act, a port district may at any time contract indebtedness or
borrow money for district purposes and may issue general obligation
bonds therefor not exceeding an amount, together with any existing
indebtedness of the district not authorized by the voters, of one-fourth of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the
district.
(b) Port districts having less than eight hundred million dollars
in value of taxable property during 1991 may at any time contract
indebtedness or borrow money for port district purposes and may issue
general obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an amount, combined
with existing indebtedness of the district not authorized by the
voters, of three-eighths of one percent of the value of the taxable
property in the district. Prior to contracting for any indebtedness
authorized by this subsection (1)(b), the port district must have a
comprehensive plan for harbor improvements or industrial development
and a long-term financial plan approved by the department of community,
trade, and economic development. The department of community, trade,
and economic development is immune from any liability for its part in
reviewing or approving port district's improvement or development
plans, or financial plans. Any indebtedness authorized by this
subsection (1)(b) may be used only to acquire or construct a facility,
and, prior to contracting for such indebtedness, the port district must
have a lease contract for a minimum of five years for the facility to
be acquired or constructed by the debt.
(2) Except as provided in section 3 of this act, with the assent of
three-fifths of the voters voting thereon at a general or special port
election called for that purpose, a port district may contract
indebtedness or borrow money for district purposes and may issue
general obligation bonds therefor provided the total indebtedness of
the district at any such time shall not exceed three-fourths of one
percent of the value of the taxable property in the district.
(3) In addition to the indebtedness authorized under subsections
(1) and (2) of this section, port districts having less than two
hundred million dollars in value of taxable property and operating a
municipal airport may at any time contract indebtedness or borrow money
for airport capital improvement purposes and may issue general
obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an additional one-eighth of one
percent of the value of the taxable property in the district without
authorization by the voters; and, with the assent of three-fifths of
the voters voting thereon at a general or special port election called
for that purpose, may contract indebtedness or borrow money for airport
capital improvement purposes and may issue general obligation bonds
therefor for an additional three-eighths of one percent provided the
total indebtedness of the district for all port purposes at any such
time shall not exceed one and one-fourth percent of the value of the
taxable property in the district.
(4) Except as provided in section 3 of this act, any port district
may issue general district bonds evidencing any indebtedness, payable
at any time not exceeding fifty years from the date of the bonds. Any
contract for indebtedness or borrowed money authorized by RCW
53.36.030(1)(b) shall not exceed twenty-five years. The bonds shall be
issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.
(5) Elections required under this section shall be held as provided
in RCW 39.36.050.
(6) For the purpose of this section, "indebtedness of the district"
shall not include any debt of a county-wide district with a population
less than twenty-five hundred people when the debt is secured by a
mortgage on property leased to the federal government; and the term
"value of the taxable property" shall have the meaning set forth in RCW
39.36.015.
(7) This section does not apply to a loan made under a loan
agreement under chapter 39.69 RCW, and a computation of indebtedness
under this chapter must exclude the amount of a loan under such a loan
agreement.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.71.400 and 2007 c 341 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Puget Sound recovery state account is created in the state
treasury. To the account shall be deposited such funds as the
legislature directs or appropriates to the account. Federal grants,
gifts, or other financial assistance received by the Puget Sound
partnership and other state agencies from nonstate sources for the
specific purpose of recovering Puget Sound may be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used for the protection and
recovery of Puget Sound.
(2) The Puget Sound recovery local account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from a port district located in a county
bordering Puget Sound with a population of greater than one million
five hundred thousand citizens under RCW 53.36.020 must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only as
provided in section 6 of this act. Only the executive director of the
partnership or executive director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Expenditures from the Puget Sound recovery local account
created in RCW 90.71.400 may be used for the following purposes:
(a) Physical construction projects identified in the action agenda;
and
(b) Ongoing activities identified in the action agenda.
(2) Physical projects and activities funded through expenditures
from the Puget Sound recovery local account must be located in the
county where the revenue was generated, benefit a watershed within that
county, or benefit the Puget Sound waters directly adjacent to that
county. If the taxpayers of more than one county have participated in
the revenue generation, then the expenditures must be proportional to
the amount of revenue generated by each county.
(3) The director of the partnership must coordinate with the
apprenticeship council created in RCW 49.04.010 in an attempt to match
apprentice opportunities with construction projects funded through
expenditures from the Puget Sound recovery local account.
(4) The partnership must present an annual report to the executive
body of any counties where revenue in the Puget Sound recovery local
account has been collected that details planned and actual expenditures
in that county from the Puget Sound recovery local account.

--- END ---