BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in order to
facilitate the transfer of state responsibility for certain historic
bridges that remain under state jurisdiction but are no longer on state
highways to local government, it is necessary to develop new funding
mechanisms that will, over time, relieve the state of maintenance and
operation costs of these bridges, as well as future costs of repair and
rehabilitation or replacement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A transportation improvement district may be created by the
legislative authority of any city or town in which is located a
mechanical lift bridge under state jurisdiction that: (a) Links two
employment centers as defined by a regional planning body; (b) crosses
a federally designated navigable waterway; (c) provides access for
emergency services to and from a major container shipping port; (d) is
on a local, state, or national historic register; (e) is located on an
arterial street that was formerly a state highway; and (f) has received
a substandard score on an engineering evaluation standard. The
transportation improvement district boundaries shall be the same as the
city limits and shall not extend beyond the city limits into another
city or town or unincorporated areas.
(2) The legislative authority of a city or town creating a
transportation improvement district shall (a) agree to assume
jurisdiction of the bridge described under subsection (1) of this
section upon the formation of the transportation improvement district
and (b) carry out the improvements financed by the transportation
improvement district as well as ongoing maintenance and operating costs
following rehabilitation or reconstruction of the bridge. The
legislative authority may seek state loans, grants, or other financial
assistance to pay for future needs of the bridge. Other revenue
including, but not limited to, state and federal appropriations, tolls,
competitive grants, and local and private revenue sources, may be
combined with the revenue from a transportation improvement district to
finance bridge rehabilitation or reconstruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a city or town that has created a
transportation improvement district under section 2 of this act may
impose a sales and use tax within the boundaries of the transportation
improvement district in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the transportation improvement district. The rate of the tax
shall not exceed 0.20 percent of the selling price in the case of a
sales tax or the value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of the tax
on behalf of the city or town at no charge to the transportation
improvement district.
(3) The tax imposed under this section shall be used solely for
financing, repair, restoration, rehabilitation, maintenance,
construction, reconstruction, mitigation, property acquisition, and
other costs necessary for the repair or replacement of a qualifying
bridge described under section 2 of this act, including any mechanical
or electrical systems and bridge supports and approaches.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2008.

--- END ---