BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.36.072 and 1993 c 408 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each court shall establish a means to preliminarily determine
by a written declaration signed under penalty of perjury by the person
summoned, the qualifications set forth in RCW 2.36.070 of each person
summoned for jury duty prior to their appearance at the court to which
they are summoned to serve.
(2) Upon receipt by the summoning court of a written declaration
stating that a declarant does not meet the qualifications set forth in
RCW 2.36.070, that declarant shall be excused from appearing in
response to the summons. If a person summoned to appear for jury duty
fails to sign and return a declaration of his or her qualifications to
serve as a juror prior to appearing in response to a summons and is
later determined to be unqualified for one of the reasons set forth in
RCW 2.36.070, that person shall not be entitled to any compensation as
provided in RCW 2.36.150.
(3) Information provided to the court for preliminary determination
of statutory qualification for jury duty may only be used for the term
such person is summoned and may not be used for any other purpose,
except ((that)) under the following circumstances:
(a) The court, or designee, may report a change of address or
nondelivery of summons of persons summoned for jury duty to the county
auditor; and
(b) The summoning court must immediately notify the applicant,
county auditor, and secretary of state if it receives a written
declaration or otherwise learns that a declarant does not meet the
qualifications set forth in RCW 2.36.070 (1), (2), (3), or (5).

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.08.010 and 2006 c 320 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter: "Information required for voter
registration" means the minimum information provided on a voter
registration application that is required by the county auditor in
order to place a voter registration applicant on the voter registration
rolls. This information includes:
(1) Name and full legal name, if different;
(2) Residential address;
(3) Date of birth;
(4) Washington state driver's license number or Washington state
identification card number, or the last four digits of the applicant's
Social Security number if the applicant does not have a Washington
state driver's license or Washington state identification card;
(5) A signature attesting to the truth of the information provided
on the application; ((and))
(6) A check or indication in the box confirming the individual is
a United States citizen; and
(7) A check or indication confirming that the individual has not
been convicted of a felony and, if the individual has been convicted of
a felony, that voting rights have been restored.
The residential address provided must identify the actual physical
residence of the voter in Washington, as defined in RCW 29A.04.151,
with detail sufficient to allow the voter to be assigned to the proper
precinct and to locate the voter to confirm his or her residence for
purposes of verifying qualification to vote under Article VI, section
1 of the state Constitution. A residential address may be either a
traditional address or a nontraditional address. A traditional address
consists of a street number and name, optional apartment number or unit
number, and city or town, as assigned by a local government, which
serves to identify the parcel or building of residence and the unit if
a multiunit residence. A nontraditional address consists of a
narrative description of the location of the voter's residence, and may
be used when a traditional address has not been assigned to the voter's
residence. If the postal service does not deliver mail to the voter's
residential address, or the voter prefers to receive mail at a
different address, the voter may separately provide the mailing address
at which they receive mail. Any mailing address provided shall be used
only for mail delivery purposes and not for precinct assignment or
confirmation of residence for voter qualification purposes.
If the individual does not have a driver's license, state
identification card, or Social Security number, the registrant must be
issued a unique voter registration number in order to be placed on the
voter registration rolls. All other information supplied is ancillary
and not to be used as grounds for not registering an applicant to vote.
Modification of the language of the official Washington state voter
registration form by the voter will not be accepted and will cause the
rejection of the registrant's application.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.110 and 2005 c 246 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An application is considered complete only if it contains the
applicant's name and full legal name, if different, complete valid
residence address, date of birth, signature attesting to the truth of
the information provided, a mark in the check-off box confirming United
States citizenship, a mark in the check-off box confirming no felony
conviction or, if the applicant has a felony conviction, proof of
restoration of voting rights, and an indication that the provided
driver's license number, state identification card number, or Social
Security number has been confirmed by the secretary of state. If it is
not complete, the auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice of
the deficiency to the applicant. This verification notice shall
require the applicant to provide the missing information. If the
verification notice is not returned by the applicant within forty-five
days or is returned as undeliverable, the name of the applicant shall
not be placed on the official list of registered voters. If the
applicant provides the required verified information, the applicant
shall be registered to vote as of the original date of mailing or date
of delivery, whichever is applicable.
(2) If the information required in subsection (1) of this section
is complete, the applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of
the original date of mailing or date of delivery, whichever is
applicable. The auditor shall record the appropriate precinct
identification, taxing district identification, and date of
registration on the voter's record in the state voter registration
list. Within forty-five days after the receipt of an application but
no later than seven days before the next primary, special election, or
general election, the auditor shall send to the applicant, by first-class mail, an acknowledgement notice identifying the registrant's
precinct and containing such other information as may be required by
the secretary of state. The postal service shall be instructed not to
forward a voter registration card to any other address and to return to
the auditor any card which is not deliverable.
(3) If an acknowledgement notice card is properly mailed as
required by this section to the address listed by the voter as being
the voter's mailing address and the notice is subsequently returned to
the auditor by the postal service as being undeliverable to the voter
at that address, the auditor shall promptly send the voter a
confirmation notice. The auditor shall place the voter's registration
on inactive status pending a response from the voter to the
confirmation notice.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.08.210 and 2005 c 246 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application
providing the following information concerning his or her
qualifications as a voter in this state:
(1) The address of the last former registration of the applicant as
a voter in the state;
(2) The applicant's full name and full legal name, if different;
(3) The applicant's date of birth;
(4) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes;
(5) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the
same as the address in subsection (4) of this section;
(6) The sex of the applicant;
(7) The applicant's Washington state driver's license number or
Washington state identification card number, or the last four digits of
the applicant's Social Security number if he or she does not have a
Washington state driver's license or Washington state identification
card;
(8) A check box for the applicant to indicate that he or she does
not have a Washington state driver's license, Washington state
identification card, or Social Security number;
(9) A check box allowing the applicant to indicate that he or she
is a member of the armed forces, national guard, or reserves, or that
he or she is an overseas voter;
(10) A check box allowing the applicant to confirm that he or she
is at least eighteen years of age;
(11) A check box allowing the applicant to indicate whether he or
she has ever been convicted of a felony;
(12) Clear and conspicuous language, designed to draw the
applicant's attention, stating that the applicant must be a United
States citizen in order to register to vote;
(((12))) (13) A check box and declaration confirming that the
applicant is a citizen of the United States;
(((13))) (14) The following warning:
"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter
registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your
qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class
C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, a
fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both."
(((14))) (15) The following affirmation by the applicant:
"By signing this document, I hereby assert, under penalty of
perjury, that I am legally eligible to vote. If I am found to have
voted illegally, I may be prosecuted and/or fined for this illegal act.
In addition, I hereby acknowledge that my name and last known address
will be forwarded to the appropriate state and/or federal authorities
if I am found to have voted illegally."
(((15))) (16) The oath required by RCW 29A.08.230 and a space for
the applicant's signature; and
(((16))) (17) Any other information that the secretary of state
determines is necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and
prevent duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.
This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to
be prescribed by the secretary of state.
If the applicant fails to provide the information required for
voter registration, the auditor shall send the applicant a verification
notice. The applicant may not be registered until the required
information is provided. If a verification notice is returned as
undeliverable or the applicant fails to respond to the notice within
forty-five days, the applicant shall not be registered to vote.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.08.440 and 2003 c 111 s 231 are each amended to
read as follows:
To maintain a valid voter registration, a person who changes his or
her legal name shall notify the county auditor regarding the name
change in one of the following ways: (1) By sending the auditor a
notice clearly identifying the name under which he or she is registered
to vote, the voter's new full legal name, and the voter's residence.
Such a notice must be signed by the voter using both this former name
and the voter's new full legal name; (2) by appearing in person before
the auditor or a registration assistant and signing such a change-of-name notice; (3) by signing such a change-of-name notice at the voter's
precinct polling place on the day of a primary or special or general
election; (4) by properly executing a name change on a mail-in
registration application or a prescribed state agency application.
A properly registered voter who files a change-of-name notice at
the voter's precinct polling place during a primary or election and who
desires to vote at that primary or election shall sign the poll book
using the voter's former and new names in the same manner as is
required for the change-of-name notice.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.08.510 and 2004 c 267 s 124 are each amended to
read as follows:
((In addition to case-by-case maintenance under RCW 29A.08.620 and
29A.08.630 and the general program of maintenance of voter registration
lists under RCW 29A.08.605,)) Deceased voters will be canceled from
voter registration lists as follows:
(1) ((Periodically)) Monthly, the registrar of vital statistics of
the state shall prepare a list of persons who resided in each county,
for whom a death certificate was transmitted to the registrar and was
not included on a previous list, and shall supply the list to the
secretary of state.
The secretary of state shall compare this monthly list with the
registration records and cancel the registrations of deceased voters
((within at least forty-five days before the next primary or
election)).
(2) In addition, each county auditor may also use newspaper
obituary articles as a source of information in order to cancel a
voter's registration from the official state voter registration list.
The auditor must verify the identity of the voter by matching the
voter's date of birth or an address. The auditor shall record the date
and source of the obituary in the cancellation records.
(3) In addition, any registered voter may sign a statement, subject
to the penalties of perjury, to the effect that to his or her personal
knowledge or belief another registered voter is deceased. This
statement may be filed with the county auditor or the secretary of
state. Upon the receipt of such signed statement, the county auditor
or the secretary of state shall cancel the registration ((records
concerned)) from the official state voter registration list.
(4) Once each year, the secretary of state shall conduct an audit
of county registration records regarding cancellation of deceased
voters. The audit shall consist of a comparison of the deceased voter
information received with the county registration records to ensure
that the appropriate cancellations are made.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.08.520 and 2005 c 246 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon receiving official notice of a person's conviction of a
felony in either state or federal court, if the convicted person is a
registered voter in the county, the county auditor shall cancel the
defendant's voter registration. ((Additionally,))
(2) The secretary of state in conjunction with the department of
corrections, the Washington state patrol, the office of the
administrator for the courts, and other appropriate state agencies
shall arrange for a ((quarterly)) semiannual comparison of a list of
known felons with the statewide voter registration list. If a person
is found on a felon list and the statewide voter registration list, the
secretary of state or county auditor shall confirm the match through a
date of birth comparison and suspend the voter registration from the
official state voter registration list. The canceling authority shall
send to the person at his or her last known voter registration address
a notice of the proposed cancellation and an explanation of the
requirements for restoring the right to vote once all terms of
sentencing have been completed. If the person does not respond within
thirty days, the registration must be canceled.
(((2))) (3) The right to vote may be restored by, for each felony
conviction, one of the following:
(a) A certificate of discharge issued by the sentencing court, as
provided in RCW 9.94A.637;
(b) A court order restoring the right, as provided in RCW 9.92.066;
(c) A final order of discharge issued by the indeterminate sentence
review board, as provided in RCW 9.96.050; or
(d) A certificate of restoration issued by the governor, as
provided in RCW 9.96.020.
(4) Once each year, the secretary of state shall conduct an audit
of county registration records regarding cancellation of felon voters.
The audit shall consist of a comparison of the felon voter information
received and the county registration records to ensure that the
appropriate cancellations are made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the secretary of state or a county auditor receives
information from the courts regarding a juror's ineligibility to serve
based on age, citizenship, residence, or felony conviction pursuant to
RCW 2.36.072(3)(b), the county auditor shall verify the reason for
ineligibility and take appropriate action to cancel or transfer the
registration. If the reason for ineligibility for jury duty is based
on felony conviction, procedures in RCW 29A.08.520 must be followed.
(2) Once each year, the secretary of state shall conduct an audit
of county registration records regarding cancellation of voters based
on information received about their ineligibility to serve on a jury.
The audit shall consist of a comparison of the ineligible juror
information received from the courts and the county registration
records to ensure that the appropriate cancellations and transfers are
made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 5 of this act take effect
January 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---