BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A legislative task force on
nutritional information disclosure is established, with members
appointed by the governor as provided in this subsection:
(i) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;
(ii) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives;
(iii) Four representatives of the restaurant industry in
consultation with the Washington restaurant association;
(iv) Two representatives of consumer groups in consultation with
the American heart association and the American diabetes association;
(v) One representative from the state board of health; and
(vi) One representative from a local board of health or health
district.
(b) The task force shall choose its chair from among its membership
at its first meeting.
(2) The task force must study current efforts on nutritional
information disclosure at restaurants including, but not limited to,
systems for estimating actual nutritional information, health impacts
of menu labeling, cost and impact to the restaurant industry, and
alternatives to any current approaches. The task force must also
review how other states are addressing the issue.
(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(4) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(5) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008, with
recommendations for providing nutritional information to consumers in
restaurant settings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A moratorium is enacted upon all local
boards of health or health districts from adopting an ordinance, rule,
policy, regulation, or permit requirement regarding mandatory menu
labeling or nutritional information disclosure until April 26, 2009.
Any ordinance, rule, policy, regulation, or permit requirement
regarding mandatory menu labeling or nutritional information disclosure
adopted before the effective date of this section shall not be enforced
until April 26, 2009. This chapter does not prohibit a local board of
health or health district from adopting or encouraging voluntary
measures regarding menu labeling or nutritional information disclosure
at restaurants.

--- END ---