BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Residential property is exempt from the state portion of the
property tax on fifty thousand dollars of assessed value.
(2) A commercial property owner may apply to the county assessor to
exempt fifty thousand dollars of assessed value for the state portion
of the property tax for a single parcel of property. Application shall
be made on forms furnished by the county assessor and prescribed by the
department. A commercial property owner may not apply for an exemption
under this section in more than one county. The department may adopt
rules necessary to administer this section.

--- END ---