BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.320 RCW
to read as follows:
The homeownership security account is hereby created in the custody
of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may be used
solely for the purposes of preventing predatory lending and providing
homeownership education, information, and counseling. Only the
director of the department of financial institutions or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.320 RCW
to read as follows:
The director of financial institutions or the director's designee
may provide funds from the account for the establishment,
administration, and implementation of financial literacy and education
programs, including but not limited to:
(1) Education and outreach programs that assist Washington citizens
of all ages in understanding saving, investing, budgeting, and other
skills necessary to obtain individual financial independence, fiscal
responsibility, and financial management skills.
(2) Unbiased information and counseling regarding residential
mortgage transactions, nontraditional or subprime mortgages, predatory
lending practices, gap financing and down payment assistance programs,
or other financial products or practices in the marketplace relating to
homeownership.
The department may deliver the programs in subsections (1) and (2)
of this section using grants, contracts, or interagency agreements with
state and local governments and other nongovernmental organizations as
necessary. The department may coordinate these programs with ongoing
efforts by other public and private nonprofit entities to maximize the
programs' effectiveness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.320 RCW
to read as follows:
Contributions from either private or nonprofit organizations may be
deposited in the homeownership security account created in section 1 of
this act. More than fifty percent of the funds from this account must
be used to assist low and moderate-income persons defined to be at or
below eighty percent of county median income. Private contributors to
this account may request that the department provide an accounting of
their annual contributions to the account for the purpose of reporting
the contributions to government and regulatory agencies, or for other
purposes as required by the contributing organization.

--- END ---