BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, according to a
recent report from a consultant retained by the state board of
education, end-of-course assessments have certain advantages over
comprehensive assessments such as the current form of the Washington
assessment of student learning, and in most other areas end-of-course
assessments are comparable to comprehensive assessments in meeting
public policy objectives for a statewide assessment system. The
legislature further finds that because the state's assessment contract
will be renegotiated before the end of 2008, the 2008 legislature has
an opportunity to provide policy direction in the design of the state
assessment system and the design of the Washington assessment of
student learning.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2007 c 354 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge
and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do
based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student
assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and
requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state
board of education.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four
and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential
academic learning requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the Washington
assessment of student learning and used for state or federal
accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and
identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an
emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content
expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content
expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of
expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven
working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content
expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing
the Washington assessment of student learning.
(3)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to
develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the
content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in
the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if
each student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements
identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall
administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system
may include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
(b) Effective with the 2009 administration of the Washington
assessment of student learning, the superintendent shall redesign the
assessment in the content areas of reading, mathematics, and science in
all grades except high school by shortening test administration and
reducing the number of short answer and extended response questions.
(c)(i) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop statewide end-of-course assessments for high school mathematics that measure student
achievement of the state mathematics standards. The superintendent
shall develop end-of-course assessments in algebra I and geometry. The
superintendent shall make the algebra I end-of-course assessments
available to school districts on an optional basis in the 2009-10
school year. The end-of-course assessments in algebra I and geometry
shall be implemented statewide in the 2010-11 school year.
(ii) For the graduating class of 2013 and for purposes of the
certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061, results from
the algebra I end-of-course assessment plus the geometry end-of-course
assessment may be used to demonstrate that a student meets the state
standard on the mathematics content area of the high school Washington
assessment of student learning.
(iii) Beginning with the graduating class of 2014 and for purposes
of the certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061, the
mathematics content area of the Washington assessment of student
learning shall be assessed using the algebra I end-of-course assessment
plus the geometry end-of-course assessment.
(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the
essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments,
then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall
be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and
easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness.

--- END ---