BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of health in consultation
with the department of general administration and the department of
labor and industries shall convene and chair a work group to study
approaches and techniques that are effective at preventing or
minimizing the potential for adverse environmental health effects on
occupants of state-owned office buildings and privately owned office
buildings leased and occupied by state offices.
(2) The secretary of health shall establish the work group and
include representatives from: The department of general
administration; the department of labor and industries; the state
building code council; agency representatives of small, mid-size, and
large facilities; state employee unions; industry representatives,
including a representative from a professional trade association from
the Olympia area that represents professional developers and owners of
private office buildings leased to the state and occupied by state
offices; and other stakeholders as deemed appropriate by the department
of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of health shall:
(a) Conduct a pilot study in the Olympia area of at least two
state-owned buildings and one privately owned office building leased
and occupied by state offices. The purpose of the study is to measure
and monitor indoor air quality and general building conditions as they
relate to an evaluation of potential environmental hazards that may
negatively impact working conditions;
(b) Design a water quality sampling study to test the tap water at
a minimum of two state-owned buildings and one privately owned office
building leased and occupied by state offices for lead, copper, and
other public health contaminants;
(c) Determine which state-owned office buildings and privately
owned office buildings that are leased and occupied by state offices
provide bottled water instead of using available tap water, and for
those buildings report on:
(i) Reasons why the state offices are being provided with bottled
water;
(ii) Barriers to using available tap water in the state offices
including taste and water quality; and
(iii) Recommendations for policies to minimize the purchase of
bottled water at all state-owned office buildings and privately owned
office buildings leased by the state and occupied by state offices.
(2) Using the results from the pilot study, the water quality
study, and the study of bottled water, the work group shall provide
recommendations on practical cost-effective opportunities to minimize
the potential adverse health effects on building occupants of state
facilities. Recommendations may include statutory or regulatory
changes, incentives, and other approaches. Recommendations must be
presented in a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2009.

--- END ---