BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The state is committed to providing early learning services to
all eligible economically disadvantaged families;
(b) Research has demonstrated that comprehensive services,
including family support services designed to meet the early education
needs of low-income and at-risk children, are successful in improving
school readiness, reducing the risk of juvenile delinquency and
incarceration, and reducing reliance on public assistance among these
children later in life;
(c) The state's early childhood education and assistance program
was originally established to serve as the state counterpart to the
federal head start program. When it was created, it aligned with the
federal program in both standards and funding levels;
(d) The state early childhood education and assistance program has
served an important role in providing comprehensive services to low-
income children. However, since it was first created, per-child
funding levels for the state program have not kept pace with funding
levels for the federal program. This has resulted in fewer service
hours for children and less intensive services for families;
(e) Aligning performance standards and funding levels for the state
early childhood education and assistance program with federal head
start will improve the quality of state-supported early learning
programs. Additionally, it will improve school readiness through
measures, such as a forty percent increase in class time, and it will
achieve administrative efficiencies and make state-supported services
more easily recognizable and accessible to parents and families
eligible for these programs; and
(f) Providing quality early learning services for children from
birth to age three is the most cost-effective investment society can
make. Additionally, the state can use the demonstrated results from
the federal early head start program as an example to expand its reach
of services already provided to three and four-year old children to
children in the critical birth to three years age category.
(2) Therefore, it is the goal of the legislature to establish the
Washington head start program to ensure that early learning services
continuously improve and to align the state early childhood education
and assistance program with the federal head start and early head start
programs by the year 2010. There should then be one integrated
Washington head start program implemented statewide, supported by both
state and federal funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department shall develop a plan to
implement a statewide Washington head start program. To the extent
possible while maintaining quality standards, the program should align
the state early childhood education and assistance program with federal
head start program eligibility criteria, guidelines, performance
standards, and methods/processes for ensuring continuous improvement in
program quality. In this plan, the department shall make
recommendations that:
(a) Identify federal head start program guidelines, performance
measures and standards, or other requirements for which state
flexibility would be recommended. This shall include an analysis of
how state flexibility may impact outcomes for children and how that
flexibility might deviate from outcomes associated with the federal
standards. Areas to be examined must include, but are not limited to,
transportation requirements, service hour configurations, delivery
methods, and impact on rural programs;
(b) Identify any change in the state early childhood education and
assistance program laws that would be required to implement a
Washington head start program;
(c) Identify additional resources needed to meet federal guidelines
and standards. Areas to be examined must include, but are not limited
to: Per-child funding levels, professional development and training
needs, facilities needs, and technical assistance;
(d) Identify state early childhood education and assistance
programs that offer full-day, full-year services to children, and what
steps need to be taken to transition these programs into a Washington
head start program;
(e) To the extent that state funds are provided for this purpose,
identify and report on the implementation of state-supported pilot
programs modeled on the federal early head start program.
Recommendations must include a timeline, strategy, and funding needs to
implement a statewide, state-supported early head start program that
will be a part of the Washington head start program; and
(f) Provide a process for the department to work the regional
office of federal head start to identify any exceptions or waivers
needed to provide flexibility and maintain high quality standards.
(2) In developing its recommendations for this plan, the department
shall seek, where appropriate and available, training or technical
assistance from the appropriate regional office of federal head start
in order to maximize nonstate resources that might be available for the
consultative work and research involved with developing this plan. The
department also shall consult with and solicit input from:
(a) State early childhood education and assistance program
providers on Indian reservations and across the state, including
providers who operate solely state-supported programs;
(b) Tribal governments operating head start programs and early head
start programs in the state to ensure that the needs of Indian and
Alaskan native children and their families are incorporated into the
recommendations of the plan, especially as they pertain to standards or
guidelines around language acquisition, school readiness, availability
and need for services among Indian and Alaskan native children and
their families, and curriculum development; and
(c) Providers operating migrant and seasonal head start programs in
the state in order to address the needs of the children of migrant and
seasonal farmworker families.
(3) The department shall make recommendations on how to
periodically review the standards and guidelines of the Washington head
start program, including how to incorporate the latest research and
information on early childhood development as well as any new
innovations that may further improve outcomes to low-income children
and their families.
(4) The department shall deliver its report to the governor and
legislature by December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to chapter 43.215 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---