BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection (1) apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Applicable percentage" means zero percent for each of the
first two credit allowance dates, twelve percent for the third and
fourth credit allowance dates, and fifteen percent for the fifth credit
allowance date.
(b) "Credit allowance date," with respect to any qualified equity
investment means:
(i) The date on which such investment is initially made; and
(ii) Each of the six anniversary dates of such date thereafter.
(c) "Direct tracing" means the tracking, by accepted accounting
methods, of the proceeds of qualified equity investments into qualified
low-income community investments.
(d) "Long-term debt security" means any debt instrument issued by
a qualified community development entity, at par value or a premium,
with an original maturity date of at least seven years from the date of
its issuance, with no acceleration of repayment, amortization, or
prepayment features prior to its original maturity date, and with no
distribution, payment, or interest features related to the
profitability of the qualified community development entity or the
performance of the qualified community development entity's investment
portfolio. The foregoing in no way limits the holder's ability to
accelerate payments on the debt instrument in situations where the
issuer has defaulted on covenants designed to ensure compliance with
this section or Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 45D of the federal internal
revenue code of 1986, as amended.
(e) "Purchase price" means the amount paid to the issuer of a
qualified equity investment for such qualified equity investment.
(f) "Qualified active low-income community business" is defined as
provided in Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 45D of the federal internal revenue
code of 1986, as amended, as of January 1, 2008. However, any business
that derives or projects to derive fifteen percent or more of its
annual revenue from the rental or sale of real estate may not be
considered to be a qualified active low-income community business.
(g) "Qualified community development entity" is defined as provided
in Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 45D of the federal internal revenue code of
1986, as amended, as of January 1, 2008, if such entity has entered
into an allocation agreement with the community development financial
institutions fund of the United States treasury department with respect
to credits authorized by Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 45D of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, which includes the state of
Washington within the service area set forth in such allocation
agreement.
(h) "Qualified equity investment" means:
(i) Any equity investment in, or long-term debt security issued by,
a qualified community development entity that:
(A) Is acquired after the effective date of this act at its
original issuance solely in exchange for cash;
(B) Has at least eighty-five percent of its cash purchase price
used by the issuer to make qualified low-income community investments;
and
(C) Is designated by the issuer as a qualified equity investment
under this subsection (1)(h)(i)(C) and is certified by the department
as not exceeding the limitation contained in subsection (4) of this
section.
(ii) "Qualified equity investment" includes any qualified equity
investment that does not meet the provisions of (h)(i) of this
subsection, if such investment was a qualified equity investment in the
hands of a prior holder.
(i) "Qualified low-income community investment" means any capital
or equity investment in, or loan to, any qualified active low-income
community business. With respect to any one qualified active low-income community business, the maximum amount of qualified low-income
community investments made in such business, on a collective basis with
all of its affiliates, must be ten million dollars whether issued to
one or several qualified community development entities.
(j) "Tax credit" means a credit against the tax otherwise due under
this chapter.
(k) "Taxpayer" means any individual or entity subject to the tax
imposed under this chapter.
(2) A taxpayer that makes a qualified equity investment is entitled
to a tax credit against the tax otherwise imposed under this chapter as
follows:
(a) On each credit allowance date of a qualified equity investment,
the taxpayer or subsequent holder of the qualified equity investment,
is entitled to a tax credit during the taxable year, which includes the
credit allowance date;
(b) The tax credit amount is equal to the applicable percentage
multiplied by the purchase price paid to the issuer of such qualified
equity investment; and
(c) The amount of the tax credit claimed may not exceed the amount
of the taxpayer's tax liability under this chapter for the tax year for
which the tax credit is claimed.
(3) No tax credit claimed under this section is refundable or
saleable on the open market. Tax credits earned by a partnership,
limited liability company, s-corporation, or other pass-through entity
may be allocated to the partners, members, or shareholders of such
entity for their direct use in accordance with the provisions of any
agreement among such partners, members, or shareholders. Any amount of
tax credit that the taxpayer is prohibited from claiming under this
section in a taxable year may be carried forward to any of the
taxpayer's five subsequent taxable years.
(4) The department must limit the monetary amount of qualified
equity investments permitted under this section to a level necessary to
limit tax credit utilization at no more than fifteen million dollars of
tax credits in any fiscal year. The limitation on qualified equity
investments must be based on the anticipated utilization of credits
without regard to the potential for taxpayers to carry forward tax
credits to later tax years.
(5) The issuer of the qualified equity investment must certify to
the department the anticipated dollar amount of such investments to be
made in this state during the first twelve-month period following the
initial credit allowance date. If on the second credit allowance date,
the actual dollar amount of such investments is different than the
amount estimated, the department shall adjust the credits arising on
the second allowance date to account for such difference.
(6)(a) Provided that the proceeds of a qualified equity investment
are invested completely in qualified low-income community investments
in Washington state, the purchase price, for the purpose of calculating
the credit created by this act, is equal to one hundred percent of the
qualified equity investment, regardless of the location of investments
made with the proceeds of other qualified equity investments issued by
the same community development entity.
(b) To the extent a portion of a qualified equity investment is not
invested in Washington state, the purchase price is reduced by the same
ratio in (a) of this subsection, independently of the location of
investments made with proceeds of other qualified equity investments
issued by the same community development entity. In such case, the
burden is on the community development entity to establish the extent
to which the qualified equity investments are fully invested in
Washington state, either by establishing that the community development
entity itself invests exclusively in Washington state, or otherwise
establishing, through direct tracing, the portion of a qualified equity
investment invested solely in Washington state.
(7) The department must recapture, from the taxpayer that claimed
the credit on a return, the tax credit allowed under this section if:
(a) Any amount of the federal tax credit available with respect to
a qualified equity investment that is eligible for a tax credit under
this section is recaptured under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 45D of the
federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended. In such case the
department's recapture must be proportionate to the federal recapture
with respect to such qualified equity investment; or
(b) The issuer redeems or makes principal repayment with respect to
a qualified equity investment prior to the seventh anniversary of the
issuance of such qualified equity investment. In such case the
department's recapture must be proportionate to the amount of the
redemption or repayment with respect to the qualified equity
investment, except as provided otherwise in subsection (8) of this
section.
(8) The provisions of subsection (7)(b) of this section do not
apply and an investment will be considered held by an issuer, even if
the investment has been sold or repaid, when the issuer reinvests an
amount equal to the capital returned to or recovered by the issuer from
the original investment, exclusive of any profits realized, in another
qualified low-income community investment within twelve months of the
receipt of such capital. An issuer may not be required to reinvest
capital returned from qualified low-income community investments after
the sixth anniversary of the issuance of the qualified equity
investment, the proceeds of which were used to make the qualified low-income community investment, and the qualified low-income community
investment shall be considered held by the issuer through the seventh
anniversary of the qualified equity investment's issuance.
(9)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) Except as may be required otherwise by department rule under
(c) of this subsection, a person claiming a tax credit under this
section must file a survey with the department by July 1, 2013. The
survey must include:
(i) The amount of tax credit claimed under this section;
(ii) The types and locations of projects that were invested in and
the amount of private equity investment leveraged due to the tax
credits claimed under this section; and
(iii) Information, as determined by the department, about
employment positions, including but not limited to the number, types,
and salary and wages of jobs created in the low-income community
businesses in which qualified equity investments were made to claim the
tax credits under this section.
(c) The department may, as necessary to measure the results of the
tax credit program, request additional information to be submitted with
the survey or more frequent surveys.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax credit claimed, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax credit claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request. If the amount of the tax credit
as reported on the survey is different than the amount actually claimed
on the taxpayer's tax returns or otherwise allowed by the department,
the amount actually claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(e) The department shall use the information required under this
subsection to report on the tax credit program authorized under this
section. The department must report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2013, on:
(i) The amount of tax credits taken under this section;
(ii) The types and locations of projects that were invested in and
the amount of private equity investment leveraged due to the tax
credits provided under this section;
(iii) The effect of the tax credit program on job creation in low-income community businesses, including the number, types, and salary
and wages of jobs created for Washington residents;
(iv) The impact on low-income community business growth and on
capital available for investment in low-income community businesses;
and
(v) Such other related factors as the department selects.
(10) To claim a credit under this section, a person must
electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and other
information the department requires in an electronic format as provided
or approved by the department. Any return, form, or information
required to be filed in an electronic format under this section is not
filed until received by the department in an electronic format.
(11) The department may develop rules to implement the provisions
of this section and to administer the allocation of tax credits issued
for qualified equity investments under this section, which must be
conducted on a first-come, first-served basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the
"Washington state new markets development program".

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires December 31, 2013.

--- END ---