BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.185 and 1999 c 281 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for bonded wine warehouses which shall
authorize the storage and handling of bottled wine ((only)). Under
this license a licensee may maintain a warehouse for the storage of
wine off the premises of a winery.
(2) The board shall adopt similar qualifications for a bonded wine
warehouse license as required for obtaining a domestic winery license
as specified in RCW 66.24.010 and 66.24.170. A licensee must be a sole
proprietor, a partnership, a limited liability company, or a
corporation. One or more domestic wineries may operate as a
partnership, corporation, business co-op, or agricultural co-op for the
purposes of obtaining a bonded wine warehouse license.
(3) All bottled wine shipped to a bonded wine warehouse from a
winery or another bonded wine warehouse shall remain under bond and no
tax imposed under RCW 66.24.210 shall be due, unless the wine is
removed from bond and shipped to a licensed Washington wine
distributor. Wine may be removed from a bonded wine warehouse only for
the purpose of being (a) exported from the state, (b) shipped to a
licensed Washington wine distributor, ((or)) (c) returned to a winery
or bonded wine warehouse, or shipped to a consumer pursuant to RCW
66.20.360 through 66.20.390.
(4) Warehousing of wine by any person other than (a) a licensed
domestic winery or a bonded wine warehouse licensed under the
provisions of this section, (b) a licensed Washington wine distributor,
(c) a licensed Washington wine importer, (d) a wine certificate of
approval holder (W7), or (e) the liquor control board, is prohibited.
(5) A license applicant shall hold a federal permit for a bonded
wine cellar and may be required to post a continuing wine tax bond of
such an amount and in such a form as may be required by the board prior
to the issuance of a bonded wine warehouse license. The fee for this
license shall be one hundred dollars per annum.
(6) The board shall adopt rules requiring a bonded wine warehouse
to be physically secure, zoned for the intended use and physically
separated from any other use.
(7) Every licensee shall submit to the board a monthly report of
movement of bottled wines to and from a bonded wine warehouse in a form
prescribed by the board. The board may adopt other necessary
procedures by which bonded wine warehouses are licensed and regulated.
(8) Handling of bottled wine, as provided for in this section,
includes packaging and repackaging services; bottle labeling services;
creating baskets or variety packs that may or may not include nonwine
products; and picking, packing, and shipping wine orders direct to
consumer. A winery contracting with a bonded wine warehouse for
handling bottled wine shall comply with all applicable state and
federal laws and shall be responsible for financial transactions in
direct to consumer shipping activities.

--- END ---