BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Legislative intent. The purpose of this act
is to recognize the difficulty, challenge, and danger of law
enforcement work, the jeopardy to public safety posed by law
enforcement officers impaired by drugs, and the importance of local
community safety standards.
The legislature finds that law enforcement officers face extreme
hazards and life-threatening circumstances while protecting and serving
the public. Law enforcement officers are also granted certain powers
such as the right to arrest, the right to drive at high speeds on
crowded streets, and the right to use deadly force. The legislature
finds that many law enforcement officers are also often exposed to
illegal drugs in the course of performing their duties and that the
state and local communities go to great lengths and expense to hire,
train, and equip law enforcement officers.
The legislature recognizes that drug use by law enforcement
officers severely undermines the integrity of law enforcement agencies
and undermines the public's trust and confidence in its officers. The
legislature desires to assure that local communities can ensure that
its law enforcement officers are always capable of performing at peak
levels of productivity and health. The legislature finds that due to
the special nature of their work, law enforcement officers are exposed
to higher incidents of stress, danger, hostility, and risk, which can
and does impact their physical and mental well-being. The legislature
recognizes that law enforcement officers are critically important to
public safety, and that their well-being is vital. The legislature
finds that an impaired law enforcement officer creates a direct threat
to the public safety.
It is the intent of the legislature that local communities be
allowed to establish local community safety standards ensuring that no
officer is impaired by a chemical dependency or substance addiction
that would adversely affect the officer's ability to do his or her job
safely. Therefore, the legislature establishes this act allowing local
communities to require that all peace officers working in their
jurisdiction submit to mandatory posttraffic collision, postshooting,
and random drug testing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Definitions. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.
(1) "Confirmation test" means a second analytical procedure to
identify the presence of a specific controlled substance or controlled
substance metabolite which is independent of the screen test and which
uses a different technique and chemical principle from that of the
screen test in order to ensure reliability and accuracy.
(2) "Drug" means any controlled substance subject to testing
pursuant to drug testing regulations adopted by the United States
department of transportation.
(3) "Drug test" means a method for determining the presence of a
drug in a specimen using a scientifically reliable method performed in
accordance with regulations governing drug testing adopted by the
United States department of transportation.
(4) "Medical review officer" means a licensed physician who:
(a) Has knowledge of substance abuse disorders, laboratory testing
procedures, and chain of custody collection procedures;
(b) Verifies positive, confirmed test results; and
(c) Has the necessary medical training to interpret and evaluate a
peace officer's positive test result in relation to the peace officer's
medical history and any other relevant biomedical information.
(5) "Peace officer" means a general authority Washington peace
officer as defined by RCW 10.93.020(3) and reserve peace officers. For
purposes of this chapter, a reserve peace officer is an individual who
is an officer of a Washington law enforcement agency who does not serve
such agency on a compensated or full-time basis but who, when called by
the agency into active service, is fully commissioned on the same basis
as a general authority Washington peace officer to enforce the criminal
laws of the state.
(6) "Random selection method" means a mechanism for the selection
of an individual which results in an equal probability that any person
from the group of individuals subject to the selection mechanism will
be selected.
(7) "Shooting" means the discharge of a firearm by a peace officer
in the performance of his or her duties resulting in death or injury to
any human being.
(8) "Specimen" means tissue, fluid, or a product of the human body
capable of revealing the presence of drugs or their metabolites.
(9) "Traffic collision" means an occurrence associated with the
operation of a motor vehicle if, as a result, any individual suffers or
complains of bodily injury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Submission to voters. (1) A city, county,
town, port district, or any other taxing district may institute
mandatory drug testing after a traffic collision or shooting and random
drug testing for all peace officers employed by it, after approval by
the voters, pursuant to the terms of this section.
(2) The drug testing proposition must be submitted at a general or
special election.
(3) The proposition may be imposed only when specifically
authorized by a majority of registered voters voting on the
proposition.
(4) Ballot propositions shall conform with chapter 29A.36 RCW.
(5) Mandatory drug testing imposed under this section shall conform
to all sections of this act and shall commence no later than twelve
months after the date of the election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Random peace officer drug testing. Random
peace officer drug testing imposed pursuant to section 3 of this act
shall conform to the following:
(1) At least thirty percent of the average number of peace officers
employed by the taxing district's law enforcement agency shall undergo
random drug testing by the agency each calendar year;
(2) Peace officers who are notified of selection for random drug
testing shall proceed to the test site immediately;
(3) Random drug testing shall occur during, or immediately before
or after, a regular work period;
(4) The selection of peace officers for random drug testing shall
be made by a random selection method; and
(5) Random drug testing shall be unannounced and the dates for
administering the tests shall be spread reasonably throughout the
calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Postshooting peace officer drug testing.
Peace officer drug testing after a shooting imposed pursuant to section
3 of this act shall require that a peace officer who discharges a
firearm in the performance of his or her duties resulting in death or
injury to any human being shall submit to a drug test as soon as
practicable following the discharge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Posttraffic collision peace officer drug
testing. Posttraffic collision drug testing imposed pursuant to
section 3 of this act shall require that a peace officer who is
operating a motor vehicle involved in a traffic collision shall submit
to a drug test as soon as practicable following the traffic collision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Testing policy. Drug testing pursuant to
this act shall be carried out within the terms of a written policy that
has been distributed to all peace officers subject to the policy. The
written policy shall include at least the following:
(1) A description of those persons who are subject to testing;
(2) The circumstances under which testing will be required;
(3) A description of the testing methods and collection procedures
to be used;
(4) The consequences of a refusal to participate in the testing;
(5) The right of a peace officer, on request, to obtain the written
test results;
(6) The right of a peace officer, on request, to explain in a
confidential setting a positive test result; and
(7) A statement of the law enforcement agency's policy regarding
the confidentiality of the test results.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Procedures for specimen collection and
testing. All specimen collection and testing pursuant to this act
shall be performed in accordance with the following:
(1) A specimen shall be collected with due regard to the privacy of
the individual providing the specimen, and in a manner reasonably
calculated to prevent substitution or contamination of the specimen;
(2) Specimen collection shall be documented, and the documentation
procedures shall include labeling of specimen containers so as to
reasonably preclude the likelihood of erroneous identification of test
results;
(3) Specimen storage and transportation to the place of testing
shall be performed in a manner that reasonably precludes the
probability of sample misidentification, contamination, and
adulteration;
(4) Specimen testing shall conform to scientifically accepted
analytical methods and procedures;
(5) Specimen testing shall be conducted at a laboratory approved or
certified by the United States department of health and human services;
(6) Before the result of a positive initial screening may be used
as a basis for any action by a law enforcement agency, the law
enforcement agency shall verify or confirm the positive initial
screening test by a confirmation test;
(7) Laboratory analyses required by this act shall be restricted to
those tests required by this act to detect drugs. They shall not be
used for other purposes such as the analysis of physiological states or
diseases;
(8) Prior to reporting a positive test result, the medical review
officer shall give the peace officer an opportunity to discuss the test
result, including providing verification of any prescription
medications. If the peace officer meets with the medical review
officer and fails to present information affecting the test result or
if the peace officer refuses to meet with the medical review officer,
the medical review officer will verify a positive test result and will
inform the law enforcement agency on a confidential basis that the
peace officer tested positive;
(9) Within five working days after its receipt of a positive
confirmed test result from the laboratory, the law enforcement agency
shall inform the peace officer in writing of the positive test result.
The law enforcement agency shall provide to the peace officer, upon
request, a copy of the test results; and
(10) If the peace officer meets with the medical review officer and
fails to present information affecting a positive test result, the
medical review officer will inform the peace officer that he or she may
request split specimen testing. For purposes of this section, "split
specimen testing" means that a peace officer who wishes to challenge a
positive drug test must notify the medical review officer that he or
she wishes split specimen testing within seventy-two hours after he or
she is notified of a positive test result, and the test of the second
specimen must be processed at a different laboratory than the
laboratory that tested the primary specimen.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Protection from litigation. (1) No cause of
action is or may be established against a law enforcement agency that
has established a program of drug testing in accordance with this act
unless the law enforcement agency's action was based on a false
positive drug test result and the law enforcement agency knew or
clearly should have known that the result was in error and ignored the
true test result because of reckless or malicious disregard for the
truth.
(2) In any claim, including a claim under this act, if it is
alleged that a law enforcement agency's action was based on a false
positive test result, there is a rebuttable presumption that the test
result was valid if the law enforcement agency complied with the
provisions of this act; and the law enforcement agency is not liable
for monetary damages if its reliance on a false positive test result
was reasonable and in good faith.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Confidentiality. The drug test results
obtained pursuant to this act shall be treated as sensitive information
and shall be released only to persons within the agency who have senior
administrative personnel authority and to their immediate staff. All
drug test results shall be maintained by the law enforcement agency in
a secure location with controlled access and separate from other files
containing personnel information. No evidence derived from a positive
test result pursuant to this act shall be admissible in a criminal
prosecution concerning unlawful possession, sale, or distribution of
controlled substances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Other lawful testing. Nothing in this act
shall prohibit law enforcement agencies from conducting any lawful
testing of peace officers that is in addition to the minimum testing in
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 11 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.101 RCW under the new subchapter heading "Mandatory
drug testing of peace officers."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

--- END ---