BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.08.060 and 1941 c 77 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Proof of provocation of the attack by the injured person shall be
a complete defense to an action for damages, except when the injured
person is a child under the age of six.

--- END ---