BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.35.180 and 1998 c 341 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for any period prior to the member's employment in an
eligible position, a plan 2 or plan 3 member who is employed by a
school district or districts or an educational service district:
(a) Shall receive a service credit month for each month of the
period from September through August of the following year if he or she
is employed in an eligible position, earns compensation earnable for
eight hundred ten hours or more during that period, and is employed
during nine months of that period;
(b) If a member in an eligible position for each month of the
period from September through August of the following year does not
meet the hours requirements of (a) of this subsection, the member is
entitled to one-half service credit month for each month of the period
if he or she earns earnable compensation for at least six hundred
thirty hours but less than eight hundred ten hours during that period,
and is employed nine months of that period;
(c) In all other instances, a member in an eligible position is
entitled to service credit months as follows:
(i) One service credit month for each month in which compensation
is earned for ninety or more hours;
(ii) One-half service credit month for each month in which
compensation is earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety
hours; and
(iii) One-quarter service credit month for each month in which
compensation is earned for less than seventy hours.
(2) Beginning on the effective date of this act and through
December 31, 2010, an active contributing member that:
(a) Was employed in an eligible position before September 1, 1987;
(b) Made member contributions for service that was not credited, as
the hours worked were insufficient to earn partial service credit for
certain months of service under the rules in place at that time;
(c) Either did not withdraw, or has restored, all withdrawn
service; and
(d) The hours worked before September 1, 1987, would have been
sufficient for partial service credit had the service been earned under
subsection (1) of this section;
may apply to the department to have those periods of partial service
earned prior to September 1, 1987, credited to their accounts to the
extent that the hours worked meet the service credit formulae in
subsection (1) of this section. A member applying for periods of
partial service must provide proof to the department of the hours
worked for any month in question according to rules adopted by the
department.
(3) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

--- END ---