BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.180.050 and 1986 c 264 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to other powers and duties prescribed in this
chapter, and in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter to provide
decent, safe, sanitary, and affordable housing for eligible persons,
the commission is empowered to:
(a) Issue bonds in accordance with this chapter;
(b) Invest in, purchase, or make commitments to purchase or take
assignments from mortgage lenders of mortgages or mortgage loans;
(c) Make loans to or deposits with mortgage lenders for the purpose
of making mortgage loans; and
(d) Participate fully in federal and other governmental programs
and to take such actions as are necessary and consistent with this
chapter to secure to itself and the people of the state the benefits of
those programs and to meet their requirements, including such actions
as the commission considers appropriate in order to have the interest
payments on its bonds and other obligations treated as tax exempt under
the code.
(2) The commission shall establish eligibility standards for
eligible persons, considering at least the following factors:
(a) Income;
(b) Family size;
(c) Cost, condition and energy efficiency of available residential
housing;
(d) Availability of decent, safe, and sanitary housing;
(e) Age or infirmity; and
(f) Applicable federal, state, and local requirements.
The state auditor shall audit the books, records, and affairs of
the commission annually to determine, among other things, if the use of
bond proceeds complies with the general plan of housing finance
objectives, including compliance with the objective for the use of
financing assistance ((for implementation of cost-effective energy
efficiency measures in dwellings)) to increase the supply of affordable
and decent housing throughout the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.180.070 and 1999 c 372 s 11 and 1999 c 131 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The commission shall adopt a general plan of housing finance
objectives to be implemented by the commission during the period of the
plan. The commission may exercise the powers authorized under this
chapter prior to the adoption of the initial plan. In developing the
plan, the commission shall consider and set objectives for:
(1) The use of funds for single-family and multifamily housing;
(2) The use of funds to promote increased housing density;
(3) The use of funds for new construction, rehabilitation,
including refinancing of existing debt, and home purchases;
(((3))) (4) The housing needs of low-income and moderate-income
persons and families, and of elderly persons or ((mentally or
physically handicapped)) persons with disabilities or mental illness;
(((4))) (5) The use of funds in coordination with federal, state,
and local housing programs for low-income persons;
(((5))) (6) The use of funds in urban, rural, suburban, and special
areas of the state;
(((6))) (7) The use of financing assistance to stabilize and
upgrade declining urban neighborhoods;
(((7))) (8) The use of financing assistance for economically
depressed areas, areas of minority concentration, reservations, and in
mortgage-deficient areas;
(((8))) (9) The geographical distribution of bond proceeds so that
the benefits of the housing programs provided under this chapter will
be available to address demand on a fair basis throughout the state;
(((9))) (10) The use of financing assistance for implementation of
cost-effective energy efficiency measures in dwellings.
The plan shall include an estimate of the amount of bonds the
commission will issue during the term of the plan and how bond proceeds
will be expended.
The plan shall be adopted by resolution of the commission following
at least one public hearing thereon, notice of which shall be made by
mailing to the clerk of the governing body of each county and by
publication in the Washington State Register no more than forty and no
less than twenty days prior to the hearing. A draft of the plan shall
be made available not less than thirty days prior to any such public
hearing. ((At least every two years,)) The commission shall report to
the legislature annually regarding implementation of the plan. The
commission shall update the plan every two years.
((The commission may periodically update the plan.))
The commission shall adopt rules designed to result in the use of
bond proceeds in a manner consistent with the plan. The commission may
periodically update its rules.
This section is designed to deal only with the use of bond proceeds
and nothing in this section shall be construed as a limitation on the
commission's authority to issue bonds.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.180.160 and 2006 c 262 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The total amount of outstanding indebtedness of the commission may
not exceed ((four)) six and one-half billion dollars at any time. The
calculation of outstanding indebtedness shall include the initial
principal amount of an issue and shall not include interest that is
either currently payable or that accrues as a part of the face amount
of an issue payable at maturity or earlier redemption. Outstanding
indebtedness shall not include notes or bonds as to which the
obligation of the commission has been satisfied and discharged by
refunding or for which payment has been provided by reserves or
otherwise.

--- END ---