BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is the state's
policy to maintain the highest quality and reliability of drinking
water supplies to all citizens of the state. Small water systems may
face greater challenges in this regard because of declining quality in
water sources, catastrophic events such as flooding that impair water
sources, the age of the system's infrastructure, saltwater intrusion
into water sources, inadequate rate base for conducting necessary
improvements, and other challenges. In response to these needs, the
water system acquisition and rehabilitation program was created through
biennial budget law, and through the current biennium has a total of
nine million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars toward assisting
dozens of water systems to improve the quality of water supply service
to thousands of customers.
It is the purpose of this act to establish an ongoing water system
acquisition and rehabilitation program, to direct a review of the
program to date, and to provide for recommendations for strengthening
the program and increasing the financial assistance available under the
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.119A
RCW to read as follows:
To the extent funding is appropriated, the department shall provide
financial assistance through a water system acquisition and
rehabilitation program, hereby created. The program shall be jointly
administered with the public works board and the department of
community, trade, and economic development. The agencies shall adopt
guidelines for the program using as a model the procedures and criteria
of the drinking water revolving loan program authorized under RCW
70.119A.170. All financing provided through the program must be in the
form of grants that partially cover project costs. The maximum grant
to any eligible entity may not exceed twenty-five percent of the funds
allocated to the appropriation in any fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department of health in consultation
with the public works board shall prepare a report on the water system
acquisition and rehabilitation program in section 2 of this act and
make recommendations regarding strengthening the program and increasing
the financial assistance provided through the program.
(2) The report shall:
(a) Identify the state's policies and objectives regarding water
system management, operation, and regulation, including
regionalization, satellite management, adequate capitalization, and
prevention of the proliferation of small water systems; and
(b) Review the program's projects initiated and completed to date,
and other state funding assistance for water system acquisition and
rehabilitation.
(3) The report shall also review and make recommendations on the
following:
(a) Funding levels and funding sources;
(b) The form of assistance provided, whether grants or loans;
(c) Funding cycles, including an annual or open cycle;
(d) Eligibility of group B systems for assistance;
(e) Consideration of benefits other than public health or water
quality benefits, such as economic benefits;
(f) Activities that may be funded beyond acquisition,
preconstruction design, and construction, including the costs for the
agencies to administer the program;
(g) The project priority setting process and relative priority for
funding projects for systems that serve few residential customers;
(h) Requiring installation of service meters in funded projects;
(i) Eligibility for grants of municipalities that have not owned
and operated a group A water system for at least five years;
(j) Tiering of project priorities to provide the highest priority
to assisting systems with a high public health risk;
(k) Consideration of the system's rate base and the ability of the
households on the system to afford rate increases to fund a portion of
the necessary system rehabilitation; and
(l) Allowing an eligible purveyor that has already acquired a
failing water system to be eligible for grants to cover any costs of
rehabilitating the failing water system.
(4) The report shall be provided to the fiscal and water policy
committees of the senate and house of representatives not later than
January 1, 2009. The report shall include a survey of estimated water
system acquisition and rehabilitation program funding needs, based on
existing informal survey information and information from local
governments, the utilities and transportation commission, and
purveyors.

--- END ---