BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.61.010 and 1987 c 432 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the environmental, recreational, and
aesthetic values of many of the state's lakes are threatened by
eutrophication and other deterioration and that existing governmental
authorities are unable to adequately improve and maintain the quality
of the state's lakes.
The legislature intends that an ecosystem-based beach management
approach should be used to help promote the health of aquatic
ecosystems and that such a management approach be undertaken in a
manner that retains ecosystem values within the state. This management
approach should use long-term strategies that focus on reducing
nutrient inputs from human activities affecting the aquatic ecosystem,
such as decreasing nutrients into storm water sewers, decreasing
fertilizer application, promoting the proper disposal of pet waste,
promoting the use of vegetative borders, promoting the reduction of
nutrients from on-site septic systems where appropriate, and protecting
riparian areas. Organic debris, including vegetation, driftwood,
seaweed, kelp, and organisms, are extremely important to beach
ecosystems.
It is the purpose of this chapter to establish a governmental
mechanism by which property owners can embark on a program of lake or
beach improvement and maintenance for their and the general public's
benefit, health, and welfare. Public property, including state
property, shall be considered the same as private property in this
chapter, except liens for special assessments and liens for rates and
charges shall not extend to public property. Lake bottom property and
marine property below the line of the ordinary high water mark shall
not be considered to be benefited, shall not be subject to special
assessments or rates and charges, and shall not receive voting rights
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beach management districts may be created for the purpose of
controlling and removing aquatic plants or vegetation. These districts
must develop a plan for these activities, in consultation with
appropriate federal, state, and local agencies. The plan must include
an element addressing nutrient loading from land use activities in a
subbasin that is a tributary to the area targeted for management. The
plan must be consistent with the action agenda approved by the Puget
Sound partnership, where applicable.
(2) Plans for the control and removal of aquatic plants or
vegetation must, to the greatest extent possible, meet the following
requirements:
(a) Avoid or minimize the excess removal of living and nonliving
nontarget native vegetation and organisms;
(b) Avoid or minimize management activities that will result in
compacting beach sand, gravel, and substrate;
(c) Minimize adverse impacts to: (i) The project site when
disposing of excessive accumulations of vegetation; and (ii) other
areas of the beach or deep water environment; and
(d) Retain all natural habitat features on the beach, including
retaining trees, stumps, logs, and large rocks in their natural
location.
(3) Seaweed removal under this section may only occur on the shore
of a saltwater body that lies between the extreme low tide and the
ordinary high water mark, as those terms are defined in RCW 90.58.030.
(4) The control or removal of native aquatic plants or vegetation
shall be authorized in the following areas:
(a) Beaches or near shore areas located within at least one mile of
a ferry terminal that are in a county with a population of one million
or more residents; and
(b) Beaches or near shore areas in a city that meets the following:
(i) Is adjacent to Puget Sound;
(ii) Has at least eighty-five thousand residents;
(iii) Shares a common boundary with a neighboring county; and
(iv) Is in a county with a population of one million or more
residents.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.61.020 and 2000 c 184 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any county may create lake or beach management districts to finance
the improvement and maintenance of lakes or beaches located within or
partially within the boundaries of the county. All or a portion of a
lake or beach and the adjacent land areas may be included within one or
more lake or beach management districts. More than one lake or beach,
or portions of lakes or beaches, and the adjacent land areas may be
included in a single lake or beach management district.
Special assessments or rates and charges may be imposed on the
property included within a lake or beach management district to finance
lake or beach improvement and maintenance activities, including: (1)
((The control or removal of)) Controlling or removing aquatic plants
and vegetation; (2) improving water quality; (3) ((the control of))
controlling water levels; (4) treating and diverting storm water
((diversion and treatment)); (5) controlling agricultural waste
((control)); (6) studying lake or marine water quality problems and
solutions; (7) cleaning and maintaining ditches and streams entering
the lake or marine waters or leaving the lake; ((and)) (8) monitoring
air quality; and (9) the related administrative, engineering, legal,
and operational costs, including the costs of creating the lake or
beach management district.
Special assessments or rates and charges may be imposed annually on
all the land in a lake or beach management district for the duration of
the lake or beach management district without a related issuance of
lake or beach management district bonds or revenue bonds. Special
assessments also may be imposed in the manner of special assessments in
a local improvement district with each landowner being given the choice
of paying the entire special assessment in one payment, or to paying
installments, with lake or beach management district bonds being issued
to obtain moneys not derived by the initial full payment of the special
assessments, and the installments covering all of the costs related to
issuing, selling, and redeeming the lake or beach management district
bonds.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.61.025 and 2000 c 184 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
To improve the ability of counties to finance long-term lake or
beach management objectives, lake or beach management districts may be
created for any needed period of time.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.61.030 and 1987 c 432 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A lake or beach management district may be initiated upon either
the adoption of a resolution of intention by a county legislative
authority or the filing of a petition signed by ten landowners or the
owners of at least fifteen percent of the acreage contained within the
proposed lake or beach management district, whichever is greater. A
petition or resolution of intention shall set forth: (1) The nature of
the lake or beach improvement or maintenance activities proposed to be
financed; (2) the amount of money proposed to be raised by special
assessments or rates and charges; (3) if special assessments are to be
imposed, whether the special assessments will be imposed annually for
the duration of the lake or beach management district, or the full
special assessments will be imposed at one time, with the possibility
of installments being made to finance the issuance of lake or beach
management district bonds, or both methods; (4) if rates and charges
are to be imposed, the annual amount of revenue proposed to be
collected and whether revenue bonds payable from the rates and charges
are proposed to be issued; (5) the number of years proposed for the
duration of the lake or beach management district; and (6) the proposed
boundaries of the lake or beach management district.
The county legislative authority may require the posting of a bond
of up to five thousand dollars before the county considers the proposed
creation of a lake or beach management district initiated by petition.
The bond may only be used by the county to finance its costs in
studying, holding hearings, making notices, preparing special
assessment rolls or rolls showing the rates and charges on each parcel,
and conducting elections related to the lake or beach management
district if the proposed lake or beach management district is not
created.
A resolution of intention shall also designate the number of the
proposed lake or beach management district, and fix a date, time, and
place for a public hearing on the formation of the proposed lake or
beach management district. The date for the public hearing shall be at
least thirty days and no more than ninety days after the adoption of
the resolution of intention unless an emergency exists.
Petitions shall be filed with the county legislative authority.
The county legislative authority shall determine the sufficiency of the
signatures, which shall be conclusive upon all persons. No person may
withdraw his or her name from a petition after it is filed. If the
county legislative authority determines a petition to be sufficient and
the proposed lake or beach management district appears to be in the
public interest and the financing of the lake or beach improvement or
maintenance activities is feasible, it shall adopt a resolution of
intention, setting forth all of the details required to be included
when a resolution of intention is initiated by the county legislative
authority.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.61.040 and 1994 c 264 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notice of the public hearing shall be published in at least two
consecutive issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the
proposed lake or beach management district, the date of the first
publication to be at least fifteen days prior to the date fixed for the
public hearing by the resolution of intention. Notice of the public
hearing shall also be given to the owner or reputed owner of any lot,
tract, parcel of land, or other property within the proposed lake or
beach management district by mailing the notice at least fifteen days
before the date fixed for the public hearing to the owner or reputed
owner of the property as shown on the tax rolls of the county assessor
at the address shown thereon. Notice of the public hearing shall also
be mailed to the departments of fish and wildlife, natural resources,
and ecology at least fifteen days before the date fixed for the public
hearing.
Notices of the public hearing shall: (1) Refer to the resolution
of intention; (2) designate the proposed lake or beach management
district by number; (3) set forth a proposed plan describing: (a) The
nature of the proposed lake or beach improvement or maintenance
activities; (b) the amount of special assessments or rates and charges
proposed to be raised by the lake or beach management district; (c) if
special assessments are proposed to be imposed, whether the special
assessments will be imposed annually for the duration of the lake or
beach management district, or the full special assessments will be
payable at one time, with the possibility of periodic installments
being paid and lake or beach management bonds being issued, or both;
(d) if rates and charges are proposed to be imposed, the annual amount
of revenue proposed to be collected and whether revenue bonds payable
from the rates and charges are proposed to be issued; and (e) the
proposed duration of the lake or beach management district; and (4)
indicate the date, time, and place of the public hearing designated in
the resolution of intention.
In the case of the notice sent to each owner or reputed owner by
mail, the notice shall set forth the estimated amount of the cost of
the lake or beach improvement or maintenance activities to be borne by
special assessment, or annual special assessments, or rates and charges
on the lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property owned by the owner
or reputed owner.
If the county legislative authority has designated a committee of
itself or an officer to hear complaints and make recommendations to the
full county legislative authority, as provided in RCW 36.61.060, the
notice shall also describe this additional step before the full county
legislative authority may adopt a resolution creating the lake or beach
management district.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.61.050 and 1994 c 264 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county legislative authority shall hold a public hearing on the
proposed lake or beach management district at the date, time, and place
designated in the resolution of intention.
At this hearing the county legislative authority shall hear
objections from any person affected by the formation of the lake or
beach management district. Representatives of the departments of fish
and wildlife, natural resources, and ecology shall be afforded
opportunities to make presentations on and comment on the proposal.
Members of the public shall be afforded an opportunity to comment on
the proposal. The county legislative authority must consider
recommendations provided to it by the departments of fish and wildlife,
natural resources, and ecology. The public hearing may be extended to
other times and dates declared at the public hearing. The county
legislative authority may make such changes in the boundaries of the
lake or beach management district or such modification in plans for the
proposed lake or beach improvement or maintenance activities as it
deems necessary. The county legislative authority may not change
boundaries of the lake or beach management district to include property
that was not included previously without first passing an amended
resolution of intention and giving new notice to the owners or reputed
owners of property newly included in the proposed lake or beach
management district in the manner and form and within the time provided
for the original notice. The county legislative authority shall not
alter the plans for the proposed lake or beach improvement or
maintenance activities to result in an increase in the amount of money
proposed to be raised, and shall not increase the amount of money
proposed to be raised, without first passing an amended resolution of
intention and giving new notice to property owners in the manner and
form and within the time provided for the original notice.

Sec. 8 RCW 36.61.060 and 1985 c 398 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
A county legislative authority may adopt an ordinance providing for
a committee of itself, or an officer, to hold public hearings on the
proposed formation of a lake or beach management district and hear
objections to the proposed formation as provided in RCW 36.61.050. The
committee or officer shall make a recommendation to the full
legislative authority, which need not hold a public hearing on the
proposed creation of the lake or beach management district. The full
county legislative authority by resolution may approve or disapprove
the recommendation and submit the question of creating the lake or
beach management district to the property owners as provided in RCW
36.61.070 through 36.61.100.

Sec. 9 RCW 36.61.070 and 1987 c 432 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
After the public hearing, the county legislative authority may
adopt a resolution submitting the question of creating the lake or
beach management district to the owners of land within the proposed
lake or beach management district, including publicly owned land, if
the county legislative authority finds that it is in the public
interest to create the lake or beach management district and the
financing of the lake or beach improvement and maintenance activities
is feasible. The resolution shall also include: (1) A plan describing
the proposed lake or beach improvement and maintenance activities which
avoid adverse impacts on fish and wildlife and provide for appropriate
measures to protect and enhance fish and wildlife; (2) the number of
years the lake or beach management district will exist; (3) the amount
to be raised by special assessments or rates and charges; (4) if
special assessments are to be imposed, whether the special assessments
shall be imposed annually for the duration of the lake or beach
management district or only once with the possibility of installments
being imposed and lake or beach management bonds being issued, or both,
and, if both types of special assessments are proposed to be imposed,
the lake or beach improvement or maintenance activities proposed to be
financed by each type of special assessment; (5) if rates and charges
are to be imposed, a description of the rates and charges and the
possibility of revenue bonds being issued that are payable from the
rates and charges; and (6) the estimated special assessment or rate and
charge proposed to be imposed on each parcel included in the proposed
lake or beach management district.
No lake or beach management district may be created by a county
that includes territory located in another county without the approval
of the legislative authority of the other county.

Sec. 10 RCW 36.61.080 and 1987 c 432 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ballot shall be mailed to each owner or reputed owner of any
lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property within the proposed lake
management district, including publicly owned land, which ballot shall
contain the following proposition:

"Shall lake management district No. . . . . be formed?
Yes . . . . . . . .
No . . . . . . . ."

(2) A ballot shall be mailed to each owner or reputed owner of any
lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property within the proposed beach
management district, including publicly owned land, which ballot shall
contain the following proposition:

"Shall beach management district No. . . . . be formed?
Yes . . . . . . . .
No . . . . . . . ."

(3) In addition, the ballot shall contain appropriate spaces for
the signatures of the landowner or landowners, or officer authorized to
cast such a ballot. Each ballot shall include a description of the
property owner's property and the estimated special assessment, or rate
and charge, proposed to be imposed upon the property. A copy of the
instructions and the resolution submitting the question to the
landowners shall also be included.

Sec. 11 RCW 36.61.090 and 1987 c 432 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The balloting shall be subject to the following conditions, which
shall be included in the instructions mailed with each ballot, as
provided in RCW 36.61.080: (1) All ballots must be signed by the owner
or reputed owner of property according to the assessor's tax rolls; (2)
each ballot must be returned to the county legislative authority not
later than ((five o'clock)) 5:00 p.m. of a specified day, which shall
be at least twenty but not more than thirty days after the ballots are
mailed; (3) each property owner shall mark his or her ballot for or
against the creation of the proposed lake or beach management district,
with the ballot weighted so that the property owner has one vote for
each dollar of estimated special assessment or rate and charge proposed
to be imposed on his or her property; and (4) the valid ballots shall
be tabulated and a simple majority of the votes cast shall determine
whether the proposed lake or beach management district shall be
approved or rejected.

Sec. 12 RCW 36.61.100 and 1987 c 432 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the proposal receives a simple majority vote in favor of
creating the lake or beach management district, the county legislative
authority shall adopt an ordinance creating the lake or beach
management district and may proceed with establishing the special
assessments or rates and charges, collecting the special assessments or
rates and charges, and performing the lake or beach improvement or
maintenance activities. If a proposed lake management district
includes more than one lake and its adjacent areas, the lake management
district may only be established if the proposal receives a simple
majority vote in favor of creating it by the voters on each lake and
its adjacent areas. The county legislative authority shall publish a
notice in a newspaper of general circulation in a lake or beach
management district indicating that such an ordinance has been adopted
within ten days of the adoption of the ordinance.
The ballots shall be available for public inspection after they are
counted.

Sec. 13 RCW 36.61.110 and 1985 c 398 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
No lawsuit may be maintained challenging the jurisdiction or
authority of the county legislative authority to proceed with the lake
or beach improvement and maintenance activities and creating the lake
or beach management district or in any way challenging the validity of
the actions or decisions or any proceedings relating to the actions or
decisions unless the lawsuit is served and filed no later than forty
days after publication of a notice that the ordinance has been adopted
ordering the lake or beach improvement and maintenance activities and
creating the lake or beach management district. Written notice of the
appeal shall be filed with the county legislative authority and clerk
of the superior court in the county in which the property is situated.

Sec. 14 RCW 36.61.115 and 1987 c 432 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
A special assessment, or rate and charge, on any lot, tract, parcel
of land, or other property shall not be increased beyond one hundred
ten percent of the estimated special assessment, or rate and charge,
proposed to be imposed as provided in the resolution adopted in RCW
36.61.070, unless the creation of a lake or beach management district
is approved under another mailed ballot election that reflects the
weighted voting arising from such increases.

Sec. 15 RCW 36.61.120 and 1985 c 398 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
After a lake or beach management district is created, the county
shall prepare a proposed special assessment roll. A separate special
assessment roll shall be prepared for annual special assessments if
both annual special assessments and special assessments paid at one
time are imposed. The proposed special assessment roll shall list:
(1) Each separate lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property in the
lake or beach management district; (2) the acreage of such property,
and the number of feet of lake or beach frontage, if any; (3) the name
and address of the owner or reputed owner of each lot, tract, parcel of
land, or other property as shown on the tax rolls of the county
assessor; and (4) the special assessment proposed to be imposed on each
lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property, or the annual special
assessments proposed to be imposed on each lot, tract, parcel of land,
or other property.
At the time, date, and place fixed for a public hearing, the county
legislative authority shall act as a board of equalization and hear
objections to the special assessment roll, and at the times to which
the public hearing may be adjourned, the county legislative authority
may correct, revise, raise, lower, change, or modify the special
assessment roll or any part thereof, or set the proposed special
assessment roll aside and order a new proposed special assessment roll
to be prepared. The county legislative authority shall confirm and
approve a special assessment roll by adoption of a resolution.
If a proposed special assessment roll is amended to raise any
special assessment appearing thereon or to include omitted property, a
new public hearing shall be held. The new public hearing shall be
limited to considering the increased special assessments or omitted
property. Notices shall be sent to the owners or reputed owners of the
affected property in the same manner and form and within the time
provided for the original notice.
Objections to a proposed special assessment roll must be made in
writing, shall clearly state the grounds for objections, and shall be
filed with the governing body prior to the public hearing. Objections
to a special assessment or annual special assessments that are not made
as provided in this section shall be deemed waived and shall not be
considered by the governing body or a court on appeal.

Sec. 16 RCW 36.61.140 and 1985 c 398 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notice of the original public hearing on the proposed special
assessment roll, and any public hearing held as a result of raising
special assessments or including omitted property, shall be published
and mailed to the owner or reputed owner of the property as provided in
RCW 36.61.040 for the public hearing on the formation of the lake or
beach management district. However, the notice need only provide the
total amount to be collected by the special assessment roll and shall
state that: (1) A public hearing on the proposed special assessment
roll will be held, giving the time, date, and place of the public
hearing; (2) the proposed special assessment roll is available for
public perusal, giving the times and location where the proposed
special assessment roll is available for public perusal; (3) objections
to the proposed special assessment must be in writing, include clear
grounds for objections, and must be filed prior to the public hearing;
and (4) failure to so object shall be deemed to waive an objection.
Notices mailed to the owners or reputed owners shall additionally
indicate the amount of special assessment ascribed to the particular
lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property owned by the person so
notified.

Sec. 17 RCW 36.61.160 and 1987 c 432 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever special assessments are imposed, all property included
within a lake or beach management district shall be considered to be
the property specially benefited by the lake or beach improvement or
maintenance activities and shall be the property upon which special
assessments are imposed to pay the costs and expenses of the lake or
beach improvement or maintenance activities, or such part of the costs
and expenses as may be chargeable against the property specially
benefited. The special assessments shall be imposed on property in
accordance with the special benefits conferred on the property up to
but not in excess of the total costs and expenses of the lake or beach
improvement or maintenance activities as provided in the special
assessment roll.
Special assessments may be measured by front footage, acreage, the
extent of improvements on the property, or any other factors that are
deemed to fairly reflect special benefits, including those authorized
under RCW 35.51.030. Special assessments may be calculated by using
more than one factor. Zones around the public improvement may be used
that reflect different levels of benefit in each zone that are measured
by a front footage, acreage, the extent of improvements, or other
factors.
Public property, including property owned by the state of
Washington, shall be subject to special assessments to the same extent
that private property is subject to the special assessments, except no
lien shall extend to public property.

Sec. 18 RCW 36.61.170 and 1985 c 398 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
The total annual special assessments may not exceed the estimated
cost of the lake or beach improvement or maintenance activities
proposed to be financed by such special assessments, as specified in
the resolution of intention. The total of special assessments imposed
in a lake or beach management district that are of the nature of
special assessments imposed in a local improvement district shall not
exceed one hundred fifty percent of the estimated total cost of the
lake or beach improvement or maintenance activities that are proposed
to be financed by the lake or beach management district as specified in
the resolution of intention. After a lake or beach management district
has been created, the resolution of intention may be amended to
increase the amount to be financed by the lake or beach management
district by using the same procedure in which a lake or beach
management district is created.

Sec. 19 RCW 36.61.190 and 1985 c 398 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
Special assessments and installments on any special assessment
shall be collected by the county treasurer.
The county treasurer shall publish a notice indicating that the
special assessment roll has been confirmed and that the special
assessments are to be collected. The notice shall indicate the
duration of the lake or beach management district and shall describe
whether the special assessments will be paid in annual payments for the
duration of the lake or beach management district, or whether the full
special assessments will be payable at one time, with the possibility
of periodic installments being paid and lake or beach management bonds
being issued, or both.
If the special assessments are to be payable at one time, the
notice additionally shall indicate that all or any portion of the
special assessments may be paid within thirty days from the date of
publication of the first notice without penalty or interest. This
notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the
lake or beach management district.
Within ten days of the first newspaper publication, the county
treasurer shall notify each owner or reputed owner of property whose
name appears on the special assessment roll, at the address shown on
the special assessment roll, for each item of property described on the
list: (1) Whether one special assessment payable at one time or
special assessments payable annually have been imposed; (2) the amount
of the property subject to the special assessment or annual special
assessments; and (3) the total amount of the special assessment due at
one time, or annual amount of special assessments due. If the special
assessment is due at one time, the notice shall also describe the
thirty-day period during which the special assessment may be paid
without penalty, interest, or cost.

Sec. 20 RCW 36.61.200 and 1985 c 398 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the special assessments are to be payable at one time, all or
any portion of any special assessment may be paid without interest,
penalty, or costs during this thirty-day period and placed into a
special fund to defray the costs of the lake or beach improvement or
maintenance activities. The remainder shall be paid in installments as
provided in a resolution adopted by the county legislative authority,
but the last installment shall be due at least two years before the
maximum term of the bonds issued to pay for the improvements or
maintenance. The installments shall include amounts sufficient to
redeem the bonds issued to pay for the lake or beach improvement and
maintenance activities. A twenty-day period shall be allowed after the
due date of any installment within which no interest, penalty, or costs
on the installment may be imposed.
The county shall establish by ordinance an amount of interest that
will be imposed on late special assessments imposed annually or at
once, and on installments of a special assessment. The ordinance shall
also specify the penalty, in addition to the interest, that will be
imposed on a late annual special assessment, special assessment, or
installment which shall not be less than five percent of the delinquent
special assessment or installment.
The owner of any lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property
charged with a special assessment may redeem it from all liability for
the unpaid amount of the installments by paying, to the county
treasurer, the remaining portion of the installments that is
attributable to principal on the lake or beach management district
bonds.

Sec. 21 RCW 36.61.220 and 1985 c 398 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within fifteen days after a county creates a lake or beach
management district, the county shall cause to be filed with the county
treasurer, a description of the lake or beach improvement and
maintenance activities proposed that the lake or beach management
district finances, the lake or beach management district number, and a
copy of the diagram or print showing the boundaries of the lake or
beach management district and preliminary special assessment roll or
abstract of same showing thereon the lots, tracts, parcels of land, and
other property that will be specially benefited thereby and the
estimated cost and expense of such lake or beach improvement and
maintenance activities to be borne by each lot, tract, parcel of land,
or other property. The treasurer shall immediately post the proposed
special assessment roll upon his or her index of special assessments
against the properties affected by the lake or beach improvement or
maintenance activities.

Sec. 22 RCW 36.61.230 and 1985 c 398 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
The special assessment or annual special assessments imposed upon
the respective lots, tracts, parcels of land, and other property in the
special assessment roll or annual special assessment roll confirmed by
resolution of the county legislative authority for the purpose of
paying the cost and expense in whole or in part of any lake or beach
improvement or maintenance activities shall be a lien upon the property
assessed from the time the special assessment roll is placed in the
hands of the county treasurer for collection, but as between the
grantor and grantee, or vendor and vendee of any real property, when
there is no express agreement as to payment of the special assessments
against the real property, the lien of such special assessments shall
attach thirty days after the filing of the diagram or print and the
estimated cost and expense of such lake or beach improvement or
maintenance activities to be borne by each lot, tract, parcel of land,
or other property, as provided in RCW 36.61.220. Interest and penalty
shall be included in and shall be a part of the special assessment
lien. No lien shall extend to public property subjected to special
assessments.
The special assessment lien shall be paramount and superior to any
other lien or encumbrance theretofore or thereafter created except a
lien for general taxes.

Sec. 23 RCW 36.61.260 and 2000 c 184 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties may issue lake or beach management district bonds in
accordance with this section. Lake or beach management district bonds
may be issued to obtain money sufficient to cover that portion of the
special assessments that are not paid within the thirty-day period
provided in RCW 36.61.190.
Whenever lake or beach management district bonds are proposed to be
issued, the county legislative authority shall create a special fund or
funds for the lake or beach management district from which all or a
portion of the costs of the lake or beach improvement and maintenance
activities shall be paid. Lake or beach management district bonds
shall not be issued in excess of the costs and expenses of the lake or
beach improvement and maintenance activities and shall not be issued
prior to twenty days after the thirty days allowed for the payment of
special assessments without interest or penalties.
Lake or beach management district bonds shall be exclusively
payable from the special fund or funds and from a guaranty fund that
the county may have created out of a portion of proceeds from the sale
of the lake or beach management district bonds.
(2) Lake or beach management district bonds shall not constitute a
general indebtedness of the county issuing the bond nor an obligation,
general or special, of the state. The owner of any lake or beach
management district bond shall not have any claim for the payment
thereof against the county that issues the bonds except for payment
from the special assessments made for the lake or beach improvement or
maintenance activities for which the lake or beach management district
bond was issued and from a lake or beach management district guaranty
fund that may have been created. The county shall not be liable to the
owner of any lake or beach management district bond for any loss to the
lake or beach management district guaranty fund occurring in the lawful
operation of the fund. The owner of a lake or beach management
district bond shall not have any claim against the state arising from
the lake or beach management district bond, special assessments, or
guaranty fund. Tax revenues shall not be used to secure or guarantee
the payment of the principal of or interest on lake or beach management
district bonds.
The substance of the limitations included in this subsection shall
be plainly printed, written, engraved, or reproduced on: (a) Each lake
or beach management district bond that is a physical instrument; (b)
the official notice of sale; and (c) each official statement associated
with the lake or beach management district bonds.
(3) If the county fails to make any principal or interest payments
on any lake or beach management district bond or to promptly collect
any special assessment securing the bonds when due, the owner of the
lake or beach management district bond may obtain a writ of mandamus
from any court of competent jurisdiction requiring the county to
collect the special assessments, foreclose on the related lien, and
make payments out of the special fund or guaranty fund if one exists.
Any number of owners of lake or beach management districts may join as
plaintiffs.
(4) A county may create a lake or beach management district bond
guaranty fund for each issue of lake or beach management district
bonds. The guaranty fund shall only exist for the life of the lake or
beach management district bonds with which it is associated. A portion
of the bond proceeds may be placed into a guaranty fund. Unused moneys
remaining in the guaranty fund during the last two years of the
installments shall be used to proportionally reduce the required level
of installments and shall be transferred into the special fund into
which installment payments are placed.
(5) Lake or beach management district bonds shall be issued and
sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW. The authority to create a
special fund or funds shall include the authority to create accounts
within a fund.

Sec. 24 RCW 36.61.270 and 1987 c 432 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever rates and charges are to be imposed in a lake or beach
management district, the county legislative authority shall prepare a
roll of rates and charges that includes those matters required to be
included in a special assessment roll and shall hold a public hearing
on the proposed roll of rates and charges as provided under RCW
36.61.120 through 36.61.150 for a special assessment roll. The county
legislative authority shall have full jurisdiction and authority to
fix, alter, regulate, and control the rates and charges imposed by a
lake or beach management district and may classify the rates or charges
by any reasonable factor or factors, including benefit, use, front
footage, acreage, the extent of improvements on the property, the type
of improvements on the property, uses to which the property is put,
service to be provided, and any other reasonable factor or factors.
The flexibility to establish rates and charges includes the authority
to reduce rates and charges on property owned by low-income persons.
Except as provided in this section, the collection of rates and
charges, lien status of unpaid rates and charges, and method of
foreclosing on such liens shall be subject to the provisions of chapter
36.94 RCW. Public property, including state property, shall be subject
to the rates and charges to the same extent that private property is
subject to them, except that liens may not be foreclosed on the public
property, and the procedure for imposing such rates and charges on
state property shall conform with the procedure provided for in chapter
79.44 RCW concerning the imposition of special assessments upon state
property. The total amount of rates and charges cannot exceed the cost
of lake or beach improvement or maintenance activities proposed to be
financed by such rates and charges, as specified in the resolution of
intention. Revenue bonds exclusively payable from the rates and
charges may be issued by the county under chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec. 25 RCW 36.94.020 and 1997 c 447 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The construction, operation, and maintenance of a system of
sewerage and/or water is a county purpose. Subject to the provisions
of this chapter, every county has the power, individually or in
conjunction with another county or counties to adopt, provide for,
accept, establish, condemn, purchase, construct, add to, operate, and
maintain a system or systems of sanitary and storm sewers, including
outfalls, interceptors, plans, and facilities and services necessary
for sewerage treatment and disposal, and/or system or systems of water
supply within all or a portion of the county. However, counties shall
not have power to condemn sewerage and/or water systems of any
municipal corporation or private utility.
Such county or counties shall have the authority to control,
regulate, operate, and manage such system or systems and to provide
funds therefor by general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, local
improvement district bonds, utility local improvement district or local
improvement district assessments, and in any other lawful fiscal
manner. Rates or charges for on-site inspection and maintenance
services may not be imposed under this chapter on the development,
construction, or reconstruction of property.
Under this chapter, after July 1, 1998, any requirements for
pumping the septic tank of an on-site sewage system should be based,
among other things, on actual measurement of accumulation of sludge and
scum by a trained inspector, trained owner's agent, or trained owner.
Training must occur in a program approved by the state board of health
or by a local health officer.
Before adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility
services, or incorporating residences into an on-site inspection and
maintenance or sewer utility under this chapter, notification must be
provided, prior to the applicable public hearing, to all residences
within the proposed service area that have on-site systems permitted by
the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the
residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the
service.
A county shall not provide on-site sewage system inspection,
pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services under this
section using county employees unless the on-site system is connected
by a publicly owned collection system to the county's sewerage system,
and the on-site system represents the first step in the sewage disposal
process. Nothing in this section shall affect the authority of a state
or local health officer to carry out their responsibilities under any
other applicable law.
A county may, as part of a system of sewerage established under
this chapter, provide for, finance, and operate any of the facilities
and services and may exercise the powers expressly authorized for
county storm water, flood control, pollution prevention, and drainage
services and activities under chapters 36.89, 86.12, 86.13, and 86.15
RCW. A county also may provide for, finance, and operate the
facilities and services and may exercise any of the powers authorized
for aquifer protection areas under chapter 36.36 RCW; for lake or beach
management districts under chapter 36.61 RCW; for diking districts, and
diking, drainage, and sewerage improvement districts under chapters
85.05, 85.08, 85.15, 85.16, and 85.18 RCW; and for shellfish protection
districts under chapter 90.72 RCW. However, if a county by reference
to any of those statutes assumes as part of its system of sewerage any
powers granted to such areas or districts and not otherwise available
to a county under this chapter, then (1) the procedures and
restrictions applicable to those areas or districts apply to the
county's exercise of those powers, and (2) the county may not
simultaneously impose rates and charges under this chapter and under
the statutes authorizing such areas or districts for substantially the
same facilities and services, but must instead impose uniform rates and
charges consistent with RCW 36.94.140. By agreement with such an area
or district that is not part of a county's system of sewerage, a county
may operate that area's or district's services or facilities, but a
county may not dissolve any existing area or district except in
accordance with any applicable provisions of the statute under which
that area or district was created.

Sec. 26 RCW 39.34.190 and 2003 c 327 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a city or county and the governing
body of any special purpose district enumerated in subsection (2) of
this section may authorize up to ten percent of its water-related
revenues to be expended in the implementation of watershed management
plan projects or activities that are in addition to the county's,
city's, or district's existing water-related services or activities.
Such limitation on expenditures shall not apply ((to additional
revenues for watershed plan implementation that are authorized by voter
approval under section 5 of this act or)) to water-related revenues of
a public utility district organized according to Title 54 RCW. Water-related revenues include rates, charges, and fees for the provision of
services relating to water supply, treatment, distribution, and
management generally, and those general revenues of the local
government that are expended for water management purposes. A local
government may not expend for this purpose any revenues that were
authorized by voter approval for other specified purposes or that are
specifically dedicated to the repayment of municipal bonds or other
debt instruments.
(2) The following special purpose districts may exercise the
authority provided by this section:
(a) Water districts, sewer districts, and water-sewer districts
organized under Title 57 RCW;
(b) Public utility districts organized under Title 54 RCW;
(c) Irrigation, reclamation, conservation, and similar districts
organized under Titles 87 and 89 RCW;
(d) Port districts organized under Title 53 RCW;
(e) Diking, drainage, and similar districts organized under Title
85 RCW;
(f) Flood control and similar districts organized under Title 86
RCW;
(g) Lake or beach management districts organized under chapter
36.61 RCW;
(h) Aquifer protection areas organized under chapter 36.36 RCW; and
(i) Shellfish protection districts organized under chapter 90.72
RCW.
(3) The authority for expenditure of local government revenues
provided by this section shall be applicable broadly to the
implementation of watershed management plans addressing water supply,
water transmission, water quality treatment or protection, or any other
water-related purposes. Such plans include but are not limited to
plans developed under the following authorities:
(a) Watershed plans developed under chapter 90.82 RCW;
(b) Salmon recovery plans developed under chapter 77.85 RCW;
(c) Watershed management elements of comprehensive land use plans
developed under the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW;
(d) Watershed management elements of shoreline master programs
developed under the shoreline management act, chapter 90.58 RCW;
(e) Nonpoint pollution action plans developed under the Puget Sound
water quality management planning authorities of chapter 90.71 RCW and
chapter 400-12 WAC;
(f) Other comprehensive management plans addressing watershed
health at a WRIA level or sub-WRIA basin drainage level;
(g) Coordinated water system plans under chapter 70.116 RCW and
similar regional plans for water supply; and
(h) Any combination of the foregoing plans in an integrated
watershed management plan.
(4) The authority provided by this section to expend revenues for
watershed management plan implementation shall be construed broadly to
include, but not be limited to:
(a) The coordination and oversight of plan implementation,
including funding a watershed management partnership for this purpose;
(b) Technical support, monitoring, and data collection and
analysis;
(c) The design, development, construction, and operation of
projects included in the plan; and
(d) Conducting activities and programs included as elements in the
plan.

Sec. 27 RCW 86.09.151 and 1986 c 278 s 52 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Said flood control districts shall have full authority to carry
out the objects of their creation and to that end are authorized to
acquire, purchase, hold, lease, manage, improve, repair, occupy, and
sell real and personal property or any interest therein, either inside
or outside the boundaries of the district, to enter into and perform
any and all necessary contracts, to appoint and employ the necessary
officers, agents and employees, to sue and be sued, to exercise the
right of eminent domain, to levy and enforce the collection of special
assessments and in the manner herein provided against the lands within
the district, for district revenues, and to do any and all lawful acts
required and expedient to carry out the purpose of this chapter.
(2) In addition to the powers conferred in this chapter and those
in chapter 85.38 RCW, flood control districts may engage in activities
authorized under RCW 36.61.020 for lake or beach management districts
using procedures granted in this chapter and in chapter 85.38 RCW.

Sec. 28 RCW 35.21.403 and 1985 c 398 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any city or town may establish lake and beach management districts
within its boundaries as provided in chapter 36.61 RCW. When a city or
town establishes a lake or beach management district pursuant to
chapter 36.61 RCW, the term "county legislative authority" shall be
deemed to mean the city or town governing body, the term "county" shall
be deemed to mean the city or town, and the term "county treasurer"
shall be deemed to mean the city or town treasurer or other fiscal
officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall, within available funds, provide technical
assistance to community groups and county and city legislative
authorities requesting assistance with the development of beach
management programs. The department shall work with the departments of
fish and wildlife, natural resources, and the Puget Sound partnership
in coordinating agency assistance to community groups and county and
city legislative authorities.
(2) The department shall coordinate with relevant state agencies
and marine resources committees established in the area of beach
management districts to provide technical assistance to beach
management districts.
(3) The department shall, within available funds, coordinate with
relevant state agencies to provide technical assistance to beach
management districts so that beach management districts are able to
ensure that proposed beach improvement and maintenance plans and
activities of these districts are consistent with applicable federal,
state, and local laws, and federal, state, and local resource
management plans including, but not limited to:
(a) Shoreline master programs;
(b) Development regulations adopted to protect critical areas;
(c) State and federally identified habitat conservation plans and
species recovery plans;
(d) State marine species management plans; and
(e) Shoreline and nearshore protection and restoration plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---