BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that children's
histories of abuse and neglect and aspects of their foster care
experiences significantly impact their needs even after they are
adopted and achieve permanent placements. The number of children being
adopted from the foster care system has increased over the last decade.
Policy changes also have resulted in more children who are eligible for
adoption but who have not yet been adopted. The legislature also finds
that adoption disruption occurs at a rate of approximately ten to
sixteen percent of adoptions. The risk of adoptions being terminated
is greatest for older children and within the first few years of the
adoption. Risk factors associated with adoption disruption and
termination include a variety of child-related factors and parent-related factors. The legislature intends to promote postadoption and
postpermanency services to children and families in order to support
families, to reduce adoption disruptions and terminations, and to
increase the number of potential adoptive families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose,
the department shall contract for an information and referral services
provider to support families with children adopted out of foster care.
The contract shall include components for statewide support of families
who may be seeking adoption-specific resources and information,
including referrals for individual or family counseling, support
groups, or community services; a lending library; and relevant training
programs. The information and referrals must be provided by an entity
knowledgeable and experienced in adoption issues. The contract shall
specify that the service provider must serve as the central point of
contact for Washington families seeking adoption-related information
and referral services. The department also shall develop a simple
process for voluntary sharing of contact information for adoptive
parents for the purpose of facilitating periodic surveys by the
contracted information and referral services provider about the service
and support needs of families who have adopted children from foster
care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose,
the department shall contract for education advocacy services for
children adopted out of foster care. Advocacy services may be designed
to provide support and guidance for parents to navigate the education
system, and may include training, information, referral, consultation,
and direct advocacy designed to promote the educational success of the
child.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall provide outreach to parents of children
adopted out of foster care and encourage adoptive parents to seek an
annual assessment of the functioning of the adoptive child with the
family to determine if there are services needed to help maintain or
strengthen the adoptive placement. The annual assessment encouraged
under this section is intended to help families to build strong
relationships, to recognize and enhance their strengths, and to
understand and address adoption-related dynamics.

--- END ---