BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.84.010 and 1991 c 222 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent and purpose of this chapter to protect the public
by the certification and registration of practitioners of radiological
technology. By promoting high standards of professional performance,
by requiring professional accountability, and by credentialing those
persons who seek to provide radiological technology under the title of
((radiological)) radiologic technologists, and by regulating all
persons utilizing ionizing radiation on human beings this chapter
identifies those practitioners who have achieved a particular level of
competency. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require that
individual or group policies or contracts of an insurance carrier,
health care service contractor, or health maintenance organization
provide benefits or coverage for services and supplies provided by a
person certified under this chapter.
The legislature finds and declares that this chapter conforms to
the guidelines, terms, and definitions for the credentialing of health
or health-related professions specified under chapter 18.120 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.84.020 and 2000 c 93 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(3) "Licensed practitioner" means any licensed health care
practitioner performing services within the person's authorized scope
of practice.
(4) "Radiologic technologist" means an individual certified under
this chapter, other than a licensed practitioner, who practices
radiologic technology as a:
(a) Diagnostic radiologic technologist, who is a person who
actually handles X-ray equipment in the process of applying radiation
on a human being for diagnostic purposes at the direction of a licensed
practitioner, this includes parenteral procedures related to radiologic
technology when performed under the direct supervision of a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW; ((or))
(b) Therapeutic radiologic technologist, who is a person who uses
radiation-generating equipment for therapeutic purposes on human
subjects at the direction of a licensed practitioner, this includes
parenteral procedures related to radiologic technology when performed
under the direct supervision of a physician licensed under chapter
18.71 or 18.57 RCW; ((or))
(c) Nuclear medicine technologist, who is a person who prepares
radiopharmaceuticals and administers them to human beings for
diagnostic and therapeutic purposes and who performs in vivo and in
vitro detection and measurement of radioactivity for medical purposes
at the direction of a licensed practitioner; or
(d) Radiologist assistant, who is an advanced-level certified
diagnostic radiologic technologist who practices under levels of
supervision defined by the secretary, and:
(i) Enhances patient care by assisting the radiologist in the
diagnostic imaging environment;
(ii) Performs advanced diagnostic procedures including injecting
agents that facilitate or enable diagnostic imaging, performs selected
diagnostic aspirations and needle localizations for biopsy under
radiologist direction and supervision, performs fluoroscopy, and
placing nasoenteric and oroenteric feeding tubes in uncomplicated
patients;
(iii) Monitors and tailors selected examinations;
(iv) Communicates preliminary observations to a radiologist and
communicates final radiologist reports to referring health care
providers when directed;
(v) Performs selected peripheral venous diagnostic procedures; and
(vi) Assists radiologists with invasive procedures and performs
additional procedures under radiologist direction and supervision.
(5) "Approved school of radiologic technology" means a school of
radiologic technology or radiologist assistant program approved by the
council on medical education of the American medical association or the
American registry of radiologic technologists or a school found to
maintain the equivalent of such a course of study as determined by the
department. Such school may be operated by a medical or educational
institution, and for the purpose of providing the requisite clinical
experience, shall be affiliated with one or more general hospitals.
(6) "Radiologic technology" means the use of ionizing radiation
upon a human being for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes.
(7) "Radiologist" means a physician certified by the American board
of radiology or the American osteopathic board of radiology.
(8) "Registered X-ray technician" means a person who is registered
with the department, and who applies ionizing radiation at the
direction of a licensed practitioner and who does not perform
parenteral procedures.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.84.030 and 1991 c 222 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person may practice radiologic technology without being
registered or certified under this chapter, unless that person is a
licensed practitioner as defined in RCW 18.84.020(3). A person
represents himself or herself to the public as a certified
((radiological)) radiologic technologist when that person adopts or
uses a title or description of services that incorporates one or more
of the following items or designations:
(1) Certified radiologic technologist or CRT, for persons so
certified under this chapter;
(2) Certified radiologic therapy technologist, CRTT, or CRT, for
persons certified in the therapeutic field;
(3) Certified radiologic diagnostic technologist, CRDT, or CRT, for
persons certified in the diagnostic field; ((or))
(4) Certified nuclear medicine technologist, CNMT, or CRT, for
persons certified as nuclear medicine technologists; or
(5) Certified radiologist assistant or CRA for persons certified as
radiologist assistants.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.84.040 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 506 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the
secretary may:
(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to
implement this chapter;
(b) ((Set all registration, certification, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250;
(c))) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(((d))) (c) Evaluate and designate those schools from which
graduation will be accepted as proof of an applicant's eligibility to
receive a certificate;
(((e))) (d) Determine whether alternative methods of training are
equivalent to formal education, and to establish forms, procedures, and
criteria for evaluation of an applicant's alternative training to
determine the applicant's eligibility to receive a certificate;
(((f))) (e) Prepare, grade, and administer, or determine the nature
of, and supervise the grading and administration of examinations for
obtaining a certificate;
(f) Issue a certificate to any applicant who has met the education,
training, examination, preceptorship, and conduct requirements for
certification; and
(g) Issue a registration to an applicant who meets the requirement
for a registration.
(2) The secretary may hire clerical, administrative, and
investigative staff as needed to implement this chapter.
(3) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the
issuance and denial of registrations and certifications, unregistered
and uncertified practice, and the discipline of registrants and
certificants under this chapter. The secretary is the disciplining
authority under this chapter.
(4) The secretary may appoint ad hoc members of the profession to
serve in an ad hoc advisory capacity to the secretary in carrying out
this chapter. The members will serve for designated times and provide
advice on matters specifically identified and requested by the
secretary. The members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.220 and reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.040 and
43.03.060.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.84.080 and 1991 c 3 s 209 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue a certificate to any applicant who
demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction, that the following
requirements have been met to practice as:
(a) A diagnostic radiologic technologist, therapeutic radiologic
technologist, or nuclear medicine technologist:
(i) Graduation from an approved school or successful completion of
alternate training that meets the criteria established by the
secretary; and
(((b))) (ii) Good moral character; or
(b) A radiologist assistant:
(i) Satisfactory completion of a baccalaureate degree,
postbaccalaureate certificate, or master's degree encompassing a
radiologist assistant curriculum from an approved school of radiologic
technology;
(ii) Satisfactory completion of a radiologist-directed clinical
preceptorship; and
(iii) Satisfactory completion of a radiologist assistant
examination approved by the secretary.
(2) Applicants shall be subject to the grounds for denial or
issuance of a conditional license under chapter 18.130 RCW.
(3) The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate
proof of meeting the requirements for certification and for designation
of certification in a particular field of radiologic technology.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.84.100 and 1996 c 191 s 71 are each amended to read
as follows:
Applications for certification must be submitted on forms provided
by the secretary. The secretary may require any information and
documentation that reasonably relates to the determination of whether
the applicant meets the requirements for certification provided for in
this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant shall comply with
administrative procedures((,)) and administrative requirements((, and
fees)) determined by the secretary ((as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and
43.70.280)).

Sec. 7 RCW 18.84.110 and 1996 c 191 s 72 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall establish the administrative procedures((,))
and administrative requirements((, and fees)) for renewal of
certificates ((as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 18.84 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The date and location of radiologist assistant examinations
must be established by the secretary. Applicants who have been found
by the secretary to meet the other requirements for obtaining a
certificate must be scheduled for the next examination following the
filing of the application. The secretary shall establish by rule the
examination application deadline.
(2) The secretary or the secretary's designee shall examine each
applicant, by means determined most effective, on subjects appropriate
to the scope of practice, as applicable. The examinations must be
limited to the purpose of determining whether the applicant possesses
the minimum skill and knowledge necessary to practice competently.
(3) The examination papers, all grading of the papers, and the
grading of any practical work must be preserved for a period of not
less than one year after the secretary has made and published the
decisions. All examinations must be conducted under fair and wholly
impartial methods.
(4) Any applicant failing to make the required grade in the first
examination may take up to two subsequent examinations as the applicant
desires. Upon failing four examinations, the secretary may invalidate
the original application and require remedial education before the
person may take future examinations.
(5) The secretary may approve an examination prepared or
administered by a private testing agency or association of
credentialing agencies for use by an applicant in meeting the
credentialing requirements, including examinations prepared and
administered by the American registry of radiologic technologists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 18.84 RCW
to read as follows:
It is unprofessional conduct under chapter 18.130 RCW for any
person registered or certified under this chapter to interpret images,
make diagnoses, prescribe medications or therapies, or perform other
procedures that may be prohibited by rule.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.70.110 and 2007 c 259 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining
a license. After June 30, 1995, municipal corporations providing
emergency medical care and transportation services pursuant to chapter
18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees, provided that such other
emergency services shall only be charged for their pro rata share of
the cost of licensure and inspection, if appropriate. The secretary
may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the secretary, the fees
would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when
the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, fees
charged shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the
department for the licensure of the activity or class of activities and
may include costs of necessary inspection.
(3) License fees shall include amounts in addition to the cost of
licensure activities in the following circumstances:
(a) For registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, support of a central nursing resource center
as provided in RCW 18.79.202, until June 30, 2013;
(b) For all health care providers licensed under RCW 18.130.040,
the cost of regulatory activities for retired volunteer medical worker
licensees as provided in RCW 18.130.360; and
(c) For physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, physician
assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, osteopathic physicians
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, osteopathic physicians' assistants
licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, naturopaths licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW, podiatrists licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, chiropractors
licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW, registered nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW,
optometrists licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW, mental health counselors
licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, massage therapists licensed under
chapter 18.108 RCW, clinical social workers licensed under chapter
18.225 RCW, and acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW, the
license fees shall include up to an additional twenty-five dollars to
be transferred by the department to the University of Washington for
the purposes of RCW 43.70.112.
(4) Department of health advisory committees may review fees
established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the
appropriateness of the level of such fees.
(5) Nothing in this section authorizes the secretary to establish
or collect fees of any nature from a radiologist assistant certified
under chapter 18.84 RCW.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.70.250 and 2006 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost
of each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be
fully borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business.
The secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all
application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees,
permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing
or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered
by the department. In fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the
fees for each program at a sufficient level to defray the costs of
administering that program and the cost of regulating licensed
volunteer medical workers in accordance with RCW 18.130.360, except as
provided in RCW 18.79.202 until June 30, 2013. All such fees shall be
fixed by rule adopted by the secretary in accordance with the
provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) Nothing in this section authorizes the secretary to establish
or collect fees of any nature from a radiologist assistant certified
under chapter 18.84 RCW.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.70.280 and 1999 c 34 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary, in consultation with health profession boards
and commissions, shall establish by rule the administrative procedures,
administrative requirements, and fees for initial issue, renewal, and
reissue of a credential for professions under RCW 18.130.040, including
procedures and requirements for late renewals and uniform application
of late renewal penalties. Failure to renew invalidates the credential
and all privileges granted by the credential. Administrative
procedures and administrative requirements do not include establishing,
monitoring, and enforcing qualifications for licensure, scope or
standards of practice, continuing competency mechanisms, and discipline
when such authority is authorized in statute to a health profession
board or commission. For the purposes of this section, "in
consultation with" means providing an opportunity for meaningful
participation in development of rules consistent with processes set
forth in RCW 34.05.310.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary which
provides for a licensing period for any type of license subject to this
chapter including those under RCW 18.130.040, the secretary of health
may, from time to time, extend or otherwise modify the duration of any
licensing, certification, or registration period, whether an initial or
renewal period, if the secretary determines that it would result in a
more economical or efficient operation of state government and that the
public health, safety, or welfare would not be substantially adversely
affected thereby. However, no license, certification, or registration
may be issued or approved for a period in excess of four years, without
renewal. Such extension, reduction, or other modification of a
licensing, certification, or registration period shall be by rule or
regulation of the department of health adopted in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW. Such rules and regulations may
provide a method for imposing and collecting such additional
proportional fee as may be required for the extended or modified
period.
(3) Nothing in this section authorizes the secretary to establish
or collect fees of any nature from a radiologist assistant certified
under chapter 18.84 RCW.

--- END ---