BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state capital
budget provides billions of dollars for projects in communities across
the state of Washington. These state dollars and policies shape the
map of urban, suburban, and rural communities in every region of the
state. This state investment sometimes leads to the unintended
consequences of failed small businesses, the increased costs of
services, displaced jobs from one community to another with no net gain
in the number of jobs created, additional requests for state funding to
adjust for the unintended consequences, and developed infrastructure on
the margins of a community instead of addressing the infrastructure
needs in a community's core where higher density is encouraged.
Without careful analysis, state funded capital projects may lead to
sprawl and inefficiencies in access to goods, services, and
transportation.
The legislature also finds that the 2007 study committee on public
infrastructure programs and funding structures recommended that state
infrastructure assistance to local governments should support projects
that are consistent with state policy goals, including the growth
management act, energy policy, transportation policy, sustainable
communities, workforce development goals, and economic development
goals.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to ensure that state
funded capital projects create a net gain in economic activity, limit
land use patterns that contribute to the production of greenhouse
gases, and result in the following benefits to communities and the
business environment:
(1) Creation of additional family wage jobs, rather than shifting
jobs from one location to another;
(2) Promotion of the development and sustainability of small
businesses;
(3) A reduction of the overall cost for public infrastructure;
(4) Efficiencies in the delivery of goods and services, public
transit, and transportation;
(5) The avoidance of additional costs to state and local
governments that adversely impact local residents and small businesses;
and
(6) The promotion of compliance with the growth management act and
smart growth while not fostering sprawl.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.88.030 and 2006 c 334 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of financial management shall provide all agencies
with a complete set of instructions for submitting biennial budget
requests to the director at least three months before agency budget
documents are due into the office of financial management. The budget
document or documents shall consist of the governor's budget message
which shall be explanatory of the budget and shall contain an outline
of the proposed financial policies of the state for the ensuing fiscal
period, as well as an outline of the proposed six-year financial
policies where applicable, and shall describe in connection therewith
the important features of the budget. The biennial budget document or
documents shall also describe performance indicators that demonstrate
measurable progress towards priority results. The message shall set
forth the reasons for salient changes from the previous fiscal period
in expenditure and revenue items and shall explain any major changes in
financial policy. Attached to the budget message shall be such
supporting schedules, exhibits and other explanatory material in
respect to both current operations and capital improvements as the
governor shall deem to be useful to the legislature. The budget
document or documents shall set forth a proposal for expenditures in
the ensuing fiscal period, or six-year period where applicable, based
upon the estimated revenues and caseloads as approved by the economic
and revenue forecast council and caseload forecast council or upon the
estimated revenues and caseloads of the office of financial management
for those funds, accounts, sources, and programs for which the forecast
councils do not prepare an official forecast. Revenues shall be
estimated for such fiscal period from the source and at the rates
existing by law at the time of submission of the budget document,
including the supplemental budgets submitted in the even-numbered years
of a biennium. However, the estimated revenues and caseloads for use
in the governor's budget document may be adjusted to reflect budgetary
revenue transfers and revenue and caseload estimates dependent upon
budgetary assumptions of enrollments, workloads, and caseloads. All
adjustments to the approved estimated revenues and caseloads must be
set forth in the budget document. The governor may additionally
submit, as an appendix to each supplemental, biennial, or six-year
agency budget or to the budget document or documents, a proposal for
expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period from revenue sources derived
from proposed changes in existing statutes.
The budget document or documents shall also contain:
(a) Revenues classified by fund and source for the immediately past
fiscal period, those received or anticipated for the current fiscal
period, and those anticipated for the ensuing biennium;
(b) The undesignated fund balance or deficit, by fund;
(c) Such additional information dealing with expenditures,
revenues, workload, performance, and personnel as the legislature may
direct by law or concurrent resolution;
(d) Such additional information dealing with revenues and
expenditures as the governor shall deem pertinent and useful to the
legislature;
(e) Tabulations showing expenditures classified by fund, function,
and agency;
(f) The expenditures that include nonbudgeted, nonappropriated
accounts outside the state treasury;
(g) Identification of all proposed direct expenditures to implement
the Puget Sound water quality plan under chapter 90.71 RCW, shown by
agency and in total; and
(h) Tabulations showing each postretirement adjustment by
retirement system established after fiscal year 1991, to include, but
not be limited to, estimated total payments made to the end of the
previous biennial period, estimated payments for the present biennium,
and estimated payments for the ensuing biennium.
(2) The budget document or documents shall include detailed
estimates of all anticipated revenues applicable to proposed operating
or capital expenditures and shall also include all proposed operating
or capital expenditures. The total of beginning undesignated fund
balance and estimated revenues less working capital and other reserves
shall equal or exceed the total of proposed applicable expenditures.
The budget document or documents shall further include:
(a) Interest, amortization and redemption charges on the state
debt;
(b) Payments of all reliefs, judgments, and claims;
(c) Other statutory expenditures;
(d) Expenditures incident to the operation for each agency;
(e) Revenues derived from agency operations;
(f) Expenditures and revenues shall be given in comparative form
showing those incurred or received for the immediately past fiscal
period and those anticipated for the current biennium and next ensuing
biennium;
(g) A showing and explanation of amounts of general fund and other
funds obligations for debt service and any transfers of moneys that
otherwise would have been available for appropriation;
(h) Common school expenditures on a fiscal-year basis;
(i) A showing, by agency, of the value and purpose of financing
contracts for the lease/purchase or acquisition of personal or real
property for the current and ensuing fiscal periods; and
(j) A showing and explanation of anticipated amounts of general
fund and other funds required to amortize the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability of the retirement system specified under chapter
41.45 RCW, and the contributions to meet such amortization, stated in
total dollars and as a level percentage of total compensation.
(3) The governor's operating budget document or documents shall
reflect the statewide priorities as required by RCW 43.88.090.
(4) The governor's operating budget document or documents shall
identify activities that are not addressing the statewide priorities.
(5) A separate capital budget document or schedule shall be
submitted that will contain the following:
(a) A statement setting forth a long-range facilities plan for the
state that identifies and includes the highest priority needs within
affordable spending levels;
(b) A capital program consisting of proposed capital projects for
the next biennium and the two biennia succeeding the next biennium
consistent with the long-range facilities plan. Insomuch as is
practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the capital program shall
reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels proposed in
previously submitted capital budget documents in order to provide a
reliable long-range planning tool for the legislature and state
agencies;
(c) A capital plan consisting of proposed capital spending for at
least four biennia succeeding the next biennium;
(d) A strategic plan for reducing backlogs of maintenance and
repair projects. The plan shall include a prioritized list of specific
facility deficiencies and capital projects to address the deficiencies
for each agency, cost estimates for each project, a schedule for
completing projects over a reasonable period of time, and
identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future
backlogs;
(e) A statement of the reason or purpose for a project;
(f) Verification that a project is consistent with the provisions
set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW;
(g) A statement about the proposed site, size, and estimated life
of the project, if applicable;
(h) Estimated total project cost;
(i) For major projects valued over five million dollars, estimated
costs for the following project components: Acquisition, consultant
services, construction, equipment, project management, and other costs
included as part of the project. Project component costs shall be
displayed in a standard format defined by the office of financial
management to allow comparisons between projects;
(j) Estimated total project cost for each phase of the project as
defined by the office of financial management;
(k) Estimated ensuing biennium costs;
(l) Estimated costs beyond the ensuing biennium;
(m) Estimated construction start and completion dates;
(n) Source and type of funds proposed;
(o) Estimated ongoing operating budget costs or savings resulting
from the project, including staffing and maintenance costs;
(p) For any capital appropriation requested for a state agency for
the acquisition of land or the capital improvement of land in which the
primary purpose of the acquisition or improvement is recreation or
wildlife habitat conservation, the capital budget document, or an
omnibus list of recreation and habitat acquisitions provided with the
governor's budget document, shall identify the projected costs of
operation and maintenance for at least the two biennia succeeding the
next biennium. Omnibus lists of habitat and recreation land
acquisitions shall include individual project cost estimates for
operation and maintenance as well as a total for all state projects
included in the list. The document shall identify the source of funds
from which the operation and maintenance costs are proposed to be
funded;
(q) Such other information bearing upon capital projects as the
governor deems to be useful;
(r) Standard terms, including a standard and uniform definition of
normal maintenance, for all capital projects;
(s) Such other information as the legislature may direct by law or
concurrent resolution.
For purposes of this subsection (5), the term "capital project"
shall be defined subsequent to the analysis, findings, and
recommendations of a joint committee comprised of representatives from
the house capital appropriations committee, senate ways and means
committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
and office of financial management.
(6) The capital budget instructions shall require the public works
board criteria in RCW 43.155.070; the community economic revitalization
board criteria in RCW 43.160.060; the job development fund criteria in
RCW 43.160.230; the local infrastructure financing tool criteria in RCW
39.102.040; the transportation improvement board criteria in RCW
47.26.282; the nonprofit youth organization criteria in RCW 43.63A.135;
the nonprofit nonresidential social services criteria in RCW
43.63A.125; the nonprofit performing arts, art museums, and cultural
facilities criteria in RCW 43.63A.750; and the Washington state
historical society criteria in RCW 27.34.330 to include a review of
applicant answers to the questions in (a) through (bb) of this
subsection. Before making funding decisions, these boards and
departments must consider the answers to the questions and the growth-related impacts of a project. The purpose of the questions is to
identify the impacts from the proposal and to assist the boards or
departments to determine whether the proposed project is consistent
with state policy goals. Capital budget instructions must include the
following questions:
(a) How many family wage jobs will be created by the project?
(b) Will the project result in development or expansion that may
displace existing jobs in any other community or state?
(c) Is the project located in a distressed area or will the jobs
benefit socially disadvantaged groups?
(d) Are resources available to train local residents who are
unemployed or underemployed?
(e) Describe the impact on area small businesses: Will this
development displace existing businesses in the region, adversely
impact existing small businesses, and/or increase small business
opportunities?
(f) Will the project impact the local jurisdiction's central
business district?
(g) Will the jobs created assist the state in meeting clean energy
targets?
(h) Will the project contribute to state greenhouse gas reduction
goals?
(i) Will the project promote infill and redevelopment or greenfield
or brownfield development?
(j) Will the project convert either working farms or forests, or
both to residential or commercial development?
(k) Has the project applicant pursued working with other entities
to improve the sustainability of the local area; i.e., consolidate the
footprint of the project or reduce energy and transportation costs?
(l) Do plans exist for future additions, expansions, or other
activity related to the proposal?
(m) Does the project fix infrastructure or is it developing new
infrastructure?
(n) Does the project require the expansion of the urban growth
boundary or will it cause the community to consider expanding the urban
growth boundary in the next five years?
(o) Describe how the local comprehensive plan is furthered by this
project: Will the project encourage development in areas designated as
natural resource lands or rural areas? Will this project encourage
development in areas where development is preferred by the
comprehensive plan?
(p) Is the project consistent with the comprehensive plans of
adjacent jurisdictions?
(q) Is the project included in the local capital facility plan?
(r) Are other capital projects planned for the area?
(s) Will the project address existing safety hazards?
(t) Will investments be made to mitigate the impact that this
project will have on the increased number of school children, traffic
congestion, run off, and other services provided by area governments?
(u) Will this project lead to the need for additional local, state,
or federal funds to serve this project or the commuter trips or
development induced by this investment? If so, are the funds
available?
(v) Will the applicant report on the results that the project
intends to accomplish and on the unintended consequences that might
arise?
(w) Will the project move more people and freight per dollar than
the other projects?
(x) Is the project consistent with plans adopted by regional
transportation planning organizations?
(y) Will the development associated with this project be connected
with local transit options?
(z) Will the project result in longer commutes to work or to access
goods and services?
(aa) Will the project require additional transportation
infrastructure to service the project?
(bb) Will the project contribute to or reduce transportation
congestion; i.e., colocated facility, closer location to clients, and
nearby public transportation?
(7) No change affecting the comparability of agency or program
information relating to expenditures, revenues, workload, performance
and personnel shall be made in the format of any budget document or
report presented to the legislature under this section or RCW
43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget document or report
which was presented to the previous regular session of the legislature
during an odd-numbered year without prior legislative concurrence.
Prior legislative concurrence shall consist of (a) a favorable majority
vote on the proposal by the standing committees on ways and means of
both houses if the legislature is in session or (b) a favorable
majority vote on the proposal by members of the legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee if the legislature is not in
session.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.82.035 and 2007 c 506 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall design and implement
a modified predesign process for any space request to lease, purchase,
or build facilities that involve (a) the housing of new state programs,
(b) a major expansion of existing state programs, or (c) the relocation
of state agency programs. This includes the consolidation of multiple
state agency tenants into one facility. The office of financial
management shall define facilities that meet the criteria described in
(a) and (b) of this subsection.
(2) State agencies shall submit modified predesigns to the office
of financial management and the legislature. Modified predesigns must
include a problem statement, an analysis of alternatives to address
programmatic and space requirements, proposed locations, and a
financial assessment. For proposed projects of twenty thousand gross
square feet or less, the agency may provide a cost-benefit analysis,
rather than a life-cycle cost analysis, as determined by the office of
financial management.
(3) Projects that meet the capital requirements for predesign on
major facility projects with an estimated project cost of five million
dollars or more pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW shall not be required to
prepare a modified predesign.
(4) The office of financial management shall require state agencies
to identify plans for major leased facilities as part of the ten-year
capital budget plan. State agencies shall not enter into new or
renewed leases of more than one million dollars per year unless such
leases have been approved by the office of financial management except
when the need for the lease is due to an unanticipated emergency. The
regular termination date on an existing lease does not constitute an
emergency. The department of general administration shall notify the
office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal
committees if an emergency situation arises.
(5) For project proposals in which there are estimates of
operational savings, the office of financial management shall require
the agency or agencies involved to provide details including but not
limited to fund sources and timelines.
(6) The office of financial management shall require state agencies
to answer the questions in (a) through (x) of this subsection. The
office of financial management's state agency facility oversight review
must consider the growth-related impacts of a project before project
approval. The purpose of the questions is to identify the growth-related impacts of the proposed project and to assist the office of
financial management in determining whether the project is consistent
with state policy goals.
(a) Do plans exist for future additions, expansions, or other
activities related to the proposed project?
(b) Will existing jobs be shifted from one location to another by
the project?
(c) Will the project impact a local jurisdiction's central business
district?
(d) Is the project located in a distressed area or will the jobs
benefit socially disadvantaged groups?
(e) Are resources available to train local residents who are
unemployed or underemployed?
(f) Will the development associated with this project be connected
with local transit options?
(g) Will the project result in longer commutes to work or to access
goods and services?
(h) Will the project require additional transportation
infrastructure to service the project?
(i) Will the project contribute to or reduce transportation
congestion; i.e., colocated facility, closer location to clients, and
nearby public transportation?
(j) Will the project promote infill and redevelopment or greenfield
or brownfield development?
(k) Will the project contribute to state greenhouse gas reduction
goals?
(l) Does the proposed project fix infrastructure or develop new
infrastructure?
(m) Will the project address existing safety hazards?
(n) Does the project require the expansion of the urban growth
boundary or will it cause the community to consider expanding the urban
growth boundary in the next five years?
(o) How is the local comprehensive plan furthered by this project?
(p) Will the project encourage development in areas designated as
natural resource lands or rural areas?
(q) Will this project encourage development in areas where
development is preferred by the comprehensive plan?
(r) Is the project consistent with the comprehensive plans of
adjacent jurisdictions?
(s) Is the project consistent with the plan adopted by regional
transportation planning organizations?
(t) Are other capital projects planned for the area?
(u) Has the project applicant pursued working with other entities
to improve the sustainability of the local area; i.e., consolidate the
footprint of the project or reduce energy and transportation costs?
(v) Will investments be made to mitigate the impact that this
project will have on the increased number of school children, traffic
congestion, run off, and other services provided by area governments?
(w) Will this project lead to more local, state, or federal funds
to serve this project or the commuter trips or development induced by
this investment? If so, are the funds available?
(x) Will the applicant report on the results that the project
intends to accomplish and on the unintended consequences that might
arise?

Sec. 4 RCW 43.155.070 and 2007 c 341 s 24 and 2007 c 231 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board
must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if such request
is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040
which has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited
from receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if the
comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required
by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a loan or loan
guarantee.
(3) In considering awarding loans for public facilities to special
districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board shall
consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) The board shall develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board shall attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
shall consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority
to a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(d) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(e) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;
(f) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(g) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(h) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(i) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system;
(j) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(k) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) The board shall require applicants to answer the questions in
RCW 43.88.030(6) (a) through (bb) and must review the responses to the
questions and consider the growth-related impacts of a project before
making funding decisions.
(6) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government
applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure additional
local or other sources of funding for each public works project for
which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(((6))) (7) Before November 1st of each year, the board shall
develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives a description of the loans made under RCW
43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (((9))) (10) of this section
during the preceding fiscal year and a prioritized list of projects
which are recommended for funding by the legislature, including one
copy to the staff of each of the committees. The list shall include,
but not be limited to, a description of each project and recommended
financing, the terms and conditions of the loan or financial guarantee,
the local government jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration
of the jurisdiction's critical need for the project and documentation
of local funds being used to finance the public works project. The
list shall also include measures of fiscal capacity for each
jurisdiction recommended for financial assistance, compared to
authorized limits and state averages, including local government sales
taxes; real estate excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or
taxes on sewerage, water, garbage, and other utilities.
(((7))) (8) The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise
financially obligate funds from the public works assistance account
before the legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of
public works projects. The legislature may remove projects from the
list recommended by the board. The legislature shall not change the
order of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.
(((8))) (9) Subsection (((7))) (8) of this section does not apply
to loans made under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (((9)))
(10) of this section.
(((9))) (10) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans
shall be exempted from subsection (((7))) (8) of this section.
(((10))) (11) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or
recycling facilities under this chapter, a city or county must
demonstrate that the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent
with and necessary to implement the comprehensive solid waste
management plan adopted by the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.
(((11))) (12) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to
address the effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be
funded under this section only if the project is not in conflict with
the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.160.060 and 2007 c 231 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board is authorized to make direct loans to political
subdivisions of the state and to federally recognized Indian tribes for
the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions and federally
recognized Indian tribes in financing the cost of public facilities,
including development of land and improvements for public facilities,
project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility, and marketing studies and plans; project
design, site planning, and analysis; project debt and revenue impact
analysis; as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration,
expansion, or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be
authorized for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and
to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the
limited resources of the political subdivision or the federally
recognized Indian tribe and the finding by the board that financial
circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project to move
forward. However, at least ten percent of all financial assistance
provided by the board in any biennium shall consist of grants to
political subdivisions and federally recognized Indian tribes.
Application for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the
board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board shall conform
to the following requirements:
(1) The board shall not provide financial assistance:
(a) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote a retail shopping development or expansion.
(b) For any project that evidence exists would result in a
development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other
community in the state.
(c) For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and
other fixtures which are a part of real property.
(d) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote gambling.
(2) The board shall only provide financial assistance:
(a) For those projects which would result in specific private
developments or expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food
processing, assembly, warehousing, advanced technology, research and
development, and industrial distribution; (ii) for processing
recyclable materials or for facilities that support recycling,
including processes not currently provided in the state, including but
not limited to, de-inking facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard
waste, and problem-waste processing; (iii) for manufacturing facilities
that rely significantly on recyclable materials, including but not
limited to waste tires and mixed waste paper; (iv) which support the
relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban areas to rural
counties or rural natural resources impact areas; or (v) which
substantially support the trading of goods or services outside of the
state's borders.
(b) For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for
the successful maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial
or commercial plants or will otherwise assist in the creation or
retention of long-term economic opportunities.
(c) When the application includes convincing evidence that a
specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will
occur only if the public facility improvement is made.
(3) The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to:
(a) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the
project would create, not just the total number of jobs it would create
after the project is completed and according to the unemployment rate
in the area in which the jobs would be located;
(b) The rate of return of the state's investment, that includes the
expected increase in state and local tax revenues associated with the
project; and
(c) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007.
(4) The board shall require applicants to answer the questions in
RCW 43.88.030(6) (a) through (bb) and must review the responses to the
questions and consider the growth-related impacts of a project before
making funding decisions.
(5) A responsible official of the political subdivision or the
federally recognized Indian tribe shall be present during board
deliberations and provide information that the board requests.
Before any financial assistance application is approved, the
political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking
the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is
available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from
the community economic revitalization board.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.160.230 and 2007 c 231 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The job development fund program is created to provide grants
for public infrastructure projects that will stimulate job creation or
assist in job retention. The program is to be administered by the
board. The board shall establish a competitive process to request and
prioritize proposals and make grant awards.
(2) For the purposes of chapter 425, Laws of 2005, "public
infrastructure projects" has the same meaning as "public facilities" as
defined in RCW 43.160.020(11).
(3) The board shall conduct a statewide request for project
applications. The board shall apply the following criteria for
evaluation and ranking of applications:
(a) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the
project would create, including, but not limited to: (i) The total
number of jobs; (ii) the total number of full-time, family wage jobs;
(iii) the unemployment rate in the area; and (iv) the increase in
employment in comparison to total community population;
(b) The present level of economic activity in the community and the
existing local financial capacity to increase economic activity in the
community;
(c) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;
(d) The rate of return of the state's investment, that includes the
expected increase in state and local tax revenues associated with the
project;
(e) The lack of another timely source of funding available to
finance the project which would likely prevent the proposed community
or economic development, absent the financing available under chapter
425, Laws of 2005;
(f) The ability of the project to improve the viability of existing
business entities in the project area;
(g) Whether or not the project is a partnership of multiple
jurisdictions;
(h) Demonstration that the requested assistance will directly
stimulate community and economic development by facilitating the
creation of new jobs or the retention of existing jobs; and
(i) The availability of existing assets that applicants may apply
to projects.
(4) The board shall require applicants to answer the questions in
RCW 43.88.030(6) (a) through (bb) and must review the responses to the
questions and consider the growth-related impacts of a project before
making funding decisions.
(5) Job development fund program grants may only be awarded to
those applicants that have entered into or expect to enter into a
contract with a private developer relating to private investment that
will result in the creation or retention of jobs upon completion of the
project. Job development fund program grants shall not be provided for
any project where:
(a) The funds will not be used within the jurisdiction or
jurisdictions of the applicants; or
(b) Evidence exists that the project would result in a development
or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other community
in the state.
(((5))) (6) The board shall, with the joint legislative audit and
review committee, develop performance criteria for each grant and
evaluation criteria to be used to evaluate both how well successful
applicants met the community and economic development objectives stated
in their applications, and how well the job development fund program
performed in creating and retaining jobs.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.102.040 and 2007 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to applying to the board to use local infrastructure
financing, a sponsoring local government shall:
(a) Designate a revenue development area within the limitations in
RCW 39.102.060;
(b) Certify that the conditions in RCW 39.102.070 are met;
(c) Complete the process in RCW 39.102.080;
(d) Provide public notice as required in RCW 39.102.100; and
(e) Pass an ordinance adopting the revenue development area as
required in RCW 39.102.090.
(2) Any local government that has created an increment area under
chapter 39.89 RCW and has not issued bonds to finance any public
improvement may apply to the board and have its increment area
considered for approval as a revenue development area under this
chapter without adopting a new revenue development area under RCW
39.102.090 and 39.102.100 if it amends its ordinance to comply with RCW
39.102.090(1) and otherwise meets the conditions and limitations under
this chapter.
(3) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.475, a sponsoring local government, including any cosponsoring
local government seeking authority to impose a sales and use tax under
RCW 82.14.475, must apply to the board and be approved for a project
award amount. The application shall be in a form and manner prescribed
by the board and include but not be limited to information establishing
that the applicant is an eligible candidate to impose the local sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.475, the anticipated effective date for
imposing the tax, the estimated number of years that the tax will be
imposed, and the estimated amount of tax revenue to be received in each
fiscal year that the tax will be imposed. The board shall make
available forms to be used for this purpose. As part of the
application, each applicant must provide to the board a copy of the
ordinance or ordinances creating the revenue development area as
required in RCW 39.102.090. A notice of approval to use local
infrastructure financing shall contain a project award that represents
the maximum amount of state contribution that the applicant, including
any cosponsoring local governments, can earn each year that local
infrastructure financing is used. The total of all project awards
shall not exceed the annual state contribution limit. The
determination of a project award shall be made based on information
contained in the application and the remaining amount of annual state
contribution limit to be awarded. Determination of a project award by
the board is final.
(4) The board shall require applicants to answer the questions in
RCW 43.88.030(6) (a) through (bb) and must review the responses to the
questions and consider the growth-related impacts of a project before
making funding decisions.
(5)(a) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, applying in calendar year 2007 for a competitive project
award, must submit completed applications to the board no later than
July 1, 2007. By September 15, 2007, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the board shall approve competitive project
awards from competitive applications submitted by the 2007 deadline.
No more than two million five hundred thousand dollars in competitive
project awards shall be approved in 2007. For projects not approved by
the board in 2007, sponsoring and cosponsoring local governments may
apply again to the board in 2008 for approval of a project.
(b) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, applying in calendar year 2008 for a competitive project
award, must submit completed applications to the board no later than
July 1, 2008. By September 18, 2008, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the board shall approve competitive project
awards from competitive applications submitted by the 2008 deadline.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 39.102.050(2), a total of no more
than five million dollars in competitive project awards shall be
approved for local infrastructure financing.
(d) The project selection criteria and weighting developed prior to
July 22, 2007, for the application evaluation and approval process
shall apply to applications received prior to November 1, 2007. In
evaluating applications for a competitive project award after November
1, 2007, the board shall, in consultation with the Washington state
economic development commission, develop the relative weight to be
assigned to the following criteria:
(i) The project's potential to enhance the sponsoring local
government's regional and/or international competitiveness;
(ii) The project's ability to encourage mixed use and transit-oriented development and the redevelopment of a geographic area;
(iii) Achieving an overall distribution of projects statewide that
reflect geographic diversity;
(iv) The estimated wages and benefits for the project is greater
than the average labor market area;
(v) The estimated state and local net employment change over the
life of the project;
(vi) The current economic health and vitality of the proposed
revenue development area and the contiguous community and the estimated
impact of the proposed project on the proposed revenue development area
and contiguous community;
(vii) The estimated state and local net property tax change over
the life of the project;
(viii) The estimated state and local sales and use tax increase
over the life of the project;
(ix) An analysis that shows that, over the life of the project,
neither the local excise tax allocation revenues nor the local property
tax allocation revenues will constitute more than eighty percent of the
total local funds as described in RCW 39.102.020(29)(c); and
(x) If a project is located within an urban growth area, evidence
that the project utilizes existing urban infrastructure and that the
transportation needs of the project will be adequately met through the
use of local infrastructure financing or other sources.
(e)(i) Except as provided in this subsection (((4))) (5)(e), the
board may not approve the use of local infrastructure financing within
more than one revenue development area per county.
(ii) In a county in which the board has approved the use of local
infrastructure financing, the use of such financing in additional
revenue development areas may be approved, subject to the following
conditions:
(A) The sponsoring local government is located in more than one
county; and
(B) The sponsoring local government designates a revenue
development area that comprises portions of a county within which the
use of local infrastructure financing has not yet been approved.
(iii) In a county where the local infrastructure financing tool is
authorized under RCW 39.102.050, the board may approve additional use
of the local infrastructure financing tool.
(((5))) (6) Once the board has approved the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local governments, to use local
infrastructure financing, notification must be sent by the board to the
sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local governments,
authorizing the sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local
governments, to impose the local sales and use tax authorized under RCW
82.14.475, subject to the conditions in RCW 82.14.475.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.26.282 and 2002 c 189 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
In any project funded by the transportation improvement board,
except for projects in cities having a population of less than five
thousand persons, and in addition to any other items required to be
considered by statute, the board also shall consider the land use
implications of the project, such as whether the programs and projects:
(1) Support development in and revitalization of existing
downtowns;
(2) Implement local comprehensive plans for rural and urban
residential and nonresidential densities;
(3) Have land use planning and regulations encouraging compact
development for rural and urban residential and nonresidential
densities; ((and))
(4) Promote the use of multimodal transportation; and
(5) Are consistent with state policy goals and have growth-related
impacts identified in responses to the questions in RCW 43.88.030(6)
(a) through (bb). The board must review the responses to the questions
and consider the growth-related impacts of a project before making
funding decisions.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.63A.135 and 2006 c 371 s 234 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and
prioritize projects whose primary objective is to assist nonprofit
youth organizations in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating
facilities used for the delivery of nonresidential services, excluding
outdoor athletic fields.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must establish a competitive process to prioritize applications for the
assistance as follows:
(a) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications from
local governments, nonprofit organizations, and other entities, as
determined by the department of community, trade, and economic
development. The department of community, trade, and economic
development must evaluate and rank applications in consultation with a
citizen advisory committee using objective criteria. Projects must
have a major recreational component, and must have either an
educational or social service component. At a minimum, applicants must
demonstrate that the requested assistance will increase the efficiency
or quality of the services it provides to youth. The evaluation and
ranking process must also include an examination of existing assets
that applicants may apply to projects. Grant assistance under this
section may not exceed twenty-five percent of the total cost of the
project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include
cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose
of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(b) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the governor
and the legislature in the department of community, trade, and economic
development's biennial capital budget request beginning with the 2005-2007 biennium and thereafter. The list must include a description of
each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and
documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The total
amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial project
list must not exceed eight million dollars. The department of
community, trade, and economic development may not sign contracts or
otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the
legislature has approved a specific list of projects.
(c) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the
department of community, trade, and economic development must include
provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the
grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the
grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant.
If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the
contract, the grantee must repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall require applicants to answer the questions in RCW 43.88.030(6)
(a) through (bb) and must review the responses to the questions and
consider the growth-related impacts of a project before making funding
decisions.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.63A.125 and 2006 c 371 s 233 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a competitive process to solicit
proposals for and prioritize projects that assist nonprofit
organizations in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating facilities
used for the delivery of nonresidential social services.
(2) The department shall establish a competitive process to
prioritize applications for the assistance as follows:
(a) The department shall conduct a statewide solicitation of
project applications from local governments, nonprofit organizations,
and other entities, as determined by the department. The department
shall evaluate and rank applications in consultation with a citizen
advisory committee using objective criteria. At a minimum, applicants
must demonstrate that the requested assistance will increase the
efficiency or quality of the social services it provides to citizens.
The evaluation and ranking process shall also include an examination of
existing assets that applicants may apply to projects. Grant
assistance under this section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of
the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total
project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired
solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(b) The department shall submit a prioritized list of recommended
projects to the governor and the legislature in the department's
biennial capital budget request beginning with the 2001-2003 biennium
and thereafter. For the 1999-2001 biennium, the department shall
conduct a solicitation and ranking process, as described in (a) of this
subsection, for projects to be funded by appropriations provided for
this program in the 1999-2001 capital budget. The list shall include
a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding,
and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The
total amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial
project list shall not exceed ten million dollars. Except for the
1999-2001 biennium, the department shall not sign contracts or
otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the
legislature has approved a specific list of projects.
(c) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the
department shall include provisions which require that capital
improvements shall be held by the grantee for a specified period of
time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities shall
be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found
to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee
shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant
plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington
general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.
(3) The department shall require applicants to answer the questions
in RCW 43.88.030(6) (a) through (bb) and must review the responses to
the questions and consider the growth-related impacts of a project
before making funding decisions.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.63A.750 and 2006 c 371 s 235 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A competitive grant program to assist nonprofit organizations
in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating performing arts, art
museums, and cultural facilities is created.
(2)(a) The department shall submit a list of recommended performing
arts, art museum projects, and cultural organization projects eligible
for funding to the governor and the legislature in the department's
biennial capital budget request beginning with the 2001-2003 biennium
and thereafter. The list, in priority order, shall include a
description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding,
and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The
total amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial
project list shall not exceed twelve million dollars.
(b) The department shall establish a competitive process to
prioritize applications for state assistance as follows:
(i) The department shall conduct a statewide solicitation of
project applications from nonprofit organizations, local governments,
and other entities, as determined by the department. The department
shall evaluate and rank applications in consultation with a citizen
advisory committee, including a representative from the state arts
commission, using objective criteria. The evaluation and ranking
process shall also consider local community support for projects and an
examination of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects.
(ii) The department may establish the amount of state grant
assistance for individual project applications but the amount shall not
exceed twenty percent of the estimated total capital cost or actual
cost of a project, whichever is less. The remaining portions of the
project capital cost shall be a match from nonstate sources. The
nonstate match may include cash, the value of real property when
acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind
contributions. The department is authorized to set matching
requirements for individual projects. State assistance may be used to
fund separate definable phases of a project if the project demonstrates
adequate progress and has secured the necessary match funding.
(iii) The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise
financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has
approved a specific list of projects. In contracts for grants
authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions
requiring that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a
specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and
that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the
grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the
contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.
(3) The department shall require applicants to answer the questions
in RCW 43.88.030(6) (a) through (bb) and must review the responses to
the questions and consider the growth-related impacts of a project
before making funding decisions.

Sec. 12 RCW 27.34.330 and 2006 c 371 s 232 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington state historical society shall establish a
competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize heritage
capital projects for potential funding in the state capital budget.
The society shall adopt rules governing project eligibility and
evaluation criteria.
(2) Application for funding of specific projects may be made to the
society by local governments, public development authorities, nonprofit
corporations, tribal governments, and other entities, as determined by
the society.
(3) The society, with the advice of leaders in the heritage field,
including but not limited to representatives from the office of the
secretary of state, the eastern Washington state historical society,
and the department of archaeology and historic preservation, shall
establish and submit a prioritized list of heritage capital projects to
the governor and the legislature in the society's biennial capital
budget request. The list shall include a description of each project,
the amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate
funds to be used for the project.
(a) The total amount of recommended state funding for projects on
a biennial project list shall not exceed ten million dollars.
(b) The prioritized list shall be developed through open and public
meetings and the amount of state funding shall not exceed thirty-three
percent of the total cost of the project.
(c) The Washington state historical society shall require
applicants to answer the questions in RCW 43.88.030(6) (a) through (bb)
and must review the responses to the questions and consider the growth-related impacts of a project before making funding decisions.
(4) The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include
cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose
of the project, and in-kind contributions. The department shall not
sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this
section until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects.
In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the society
shall include provisions requiring that capital improvements be held by
the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of
the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the
grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions
of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 6 of this act expires June 30,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 7 of this act expires June 30,
2039.

--- END ---