BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to establish a master hunter program to
encourage and enhance hunter/landowner relations. The master hunter
program's purpose is to assist the department in effectively managing
wildlife in areas and at times when both a high ethical standard and a
demonstrated skill level are needed for resource protection and public
safety. Individuals certified by the department to participate in the
master hunter program may assist the department and private landowners
with issues such as wildlife conservation, habitat protection, and
wildlife damage.
(2) The commission shall adopt rules for the administration of the
master hunter program in order to avoid potential fraud and abuse. No
person may qualify for the master hunter program under this section
without first undergoing a criminal background check.
(3) Persons who meet and maintain the master hunter program
requirements may participate in special hunts or animal removals under
chapters 77.12 and 77.36 RCW.

--- END ---