BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.430 and 2007 c 293 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to fish and wildlife is exempt
from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Commercial fishing catch data from logbooks required to be
provided to the department of fish and wildlife under RCW 77.12.047,
when the data identifies specific catch location, timing, or
methodology and the release of which would result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the commercial fisher providing the catch data,
however, this information may be released to government agencies
concerned with the management of fish and wildlife resources;
(2) Sensitive fish and wildlife data. Sensitive fish and wildlife
data may be released to the following entities and their agents for
fish, wildlife, land management purposes, or scientific research needs:
Government agencies, public utilities, and accredited colleges and
universities. Sensitive fish and wildlife data may be released to
tribal governments. Sensitive fish and wildlife data may also be
released to the owner, lessee, or right-of-way or easement holder of
the private land to which the data pertains. The release of sensitive
fish and wildlife data may be subject to a confidentiality agreement,
except upon release of sensitive fish and wildlife data to the owner,
lessee, or right-of-way or easement holder of private land who
initially provided the data. Sensitive fish and wildlife data does not
include data related to reports of predatory wildlife as specified in
RCW 77.12.885. Sensitive fish and wildlife data must meet at least one
of the following criteria of this subsection as applied by the
department of fish and wildlife:
(a) The nesting sites or specific locations of endangered species
designated under RCW 77.12.020, or threatened or sensitive species
classified by rule of the department of fish and wildlife;
(b) Radio frequencies used in, or locational data generated by,
telemetry studies; or
(c) Other location data that could compromise the viability of a
specific fish or wildlife population, and where at least one of the
following criteria are met:
(i) The species has a known commercial or black market value;
(ii) There is a history of malicious take of that species and the
species behavior or ecology renders it especially vulnerable;
(iii) There is a known demand to visit, take, or disturb the
species; or
(iv) The species has an extremely limited distribution and
concentration; ((and))
(3) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
recreational licenses under RCW 77.32.010 or commercial licenses under
chapter 77.65 or 77.70 RCW, except name, address of contact used by the
department, and type of license, endorsement, or tag; however, the
department of fish and wildlife may disclose personally identifying
information to:
(a) Government agencies concerned with the management of fish and
wildlife resources;
(b) The department of social and health services, child support
division, and to the department of licensing in order to implement RCW
77.32.014 and 46.20.291; and
(c) Law enforcement agencies for the purpose of firearm possession
enforcement under RCW 9.41.040; and
(4) Information that the department of fish and wildlife has
received or accessed but may not disclose due to confidentiality
requirements in the Magnuson-Stevens fishery conservation and
management reauthorization act of 2006 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1861(h)(3) and
(i), and Sec. 1881a(b)).

--- END ---