BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that sickle cell
disease is a lifelong hereditary red blood cell disorder that
predominantly affects African-Americans. The disease can cause a
lifetime of severe medical complications that require painful and
expensive treatment. The legislature further finds that Washington
state screens newborn infants for sickle cell disease at birth but that
this information is not adequately communicated between people who may
not have the disease, but carry the genetic trait for it. While there
is no cure for sickle cell disease, the legislature finds that the pain
and suffering it causes may be controlled with better education,
diagnosis, and treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The joint select committee on sickle cell
disease is created. The committee consists of two members of each
caucus of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, and two
members of each caucus of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives. The committee shall review
current practices for screening, diagnosis, treatment, and education
about sickle cell disease in Washington state. The committee shall
also review issues related to access to appropriate treatment,
dissemination of information related to the disease and family risk,
insurance coverage for treatment, and morbidity and mortality rates.
The committee shall make recommendations to the legislature by December
1, 2008.

--- END ---