BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71A.20.170 and 2005 c 353 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The developmental disabilities community trust account is
created in the state treasury. All proceeds from the use of excess
property identified in the 2002 joint legislative audit and review
committee capital study of the division of developmental disabilities
residential habilitation centers, or at any other time as determined by
the department of social and health services, at Lakeland Village
((and)), Francis Haddon Morgan Center, Fircrest school, and Rainier
school that would not impact current residential habilitation center
operations must be deposited into the account. ((Income)) Proceeds may
come from the lease of the land, conservation easements, sale of
timber, or other activities short of sale of the property. "Excess
property" includes that portion of the property at Rainier school
previously under the cognizance and control of Washington State
University for use as a dairy/forage research facility. "Proceeds"
include the net receipts from the use of all or a portion of the
properties. Only investment income from the principal of the proceeds
deposited into the trust account may be spent from the account. Moneys
in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures
from the account shall be used exclusively to provide family support
and/or employment/day services to eligible persons with developmental
disabilities who can be served by community-based developmental
disability services. It is the intent of the legislature that the
account should not be used to replace, supplant, or reduce existing
appropriations.
(2) ((The department shall report on its efforts and strategies to
provide income to the developmental disabilities community trust
account from the excess property identified in subsection (1) of this
section from the lease of the property, sale of timber, or other
activity short of sale of the property. The department shall report by
June 30, 2006.
(3))) The account shall be known as the Dan Thompson memorial
developmental disabilities community trust account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By December 31, 2008, the board of natural
resources shall exchange land that is not excess property as identified
in the Fircrest school master plan required by section 2037, chapter
520, Laws of 2007, for charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory
land of equal assessed value identified as excess property of the
Fircrest school campus by the Fircrest school master plan required by
section 2037, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

--- END ---