BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.52.100 and 1994 c 223 s 74 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of forming a cemetery district, a petition
designating the boundaries of the proposed district by metes and bounds
or describing the lands to be included in the proposed district by
government townships, ranges, and legal subdivisions, signed by not
less than ((fifteen)) ten percent of the registered voters who reside
within the boundaries of the proposed district, setting forth the
object of the formation of such district and stating that the
establishment thereof will be conducive to the public welfare and
convenience, shall be filed with the county auditor of the county
within which the proposed district is located, accompanied by an
obligation signed by two or more petitioners agreeing to pay the cost
of publishing the notice hereinafter provided for. The county auditor
shall, within thirty days from the date of filing of such petition,
examine the signatures and certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency
thereof. The name of any person who signed a petition shall not be
withdrawn from the petition after it has been filed with the county
auditor. If the petition is found to contain a sufficient number of
valid signatures, the county auditor shall transmit it, with a
certificate of sufficiency attached, to the county legislative
authority, which shall thereupon, by resolution entered upon its
minutes, receive the same and fix a day and hour when it will publicly
hear the petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 68.52 RCW
to read as follows:
A county legislative authority may, by ordinance or resolution,
provide for a ballot proposition to form a cemetery district. When
proposed by ordinance or resolution of the county legislative
authority, a ballot proposition shall designate the boundaries of the
proposed district by metes and bounds or describing the lands to be
included in the proposed district by government townships, ranges, and
legal subdivisions. The ballot proposition authorizing the formation
of a cemetery district shall be submitted to the voters residing within
the proposed district consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

--- END ---