BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.26.020 and 2006 c 200 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) Unless indicated otherwise, "board" means the governing body of
a regional fire protection service authority, including both the board
initially appointed at the time of the formation of the authority and
the subsequently elected board of commissioners taking office in
accordance with requirements of this chapter.
(2) "Appointed board" means the governing body of a regional fire
protection service authority initially appointed upon the formation of
a regional fire protection service authority.
(3) "Elected board" or "board of commissioners" means the governing
body of a regional fire protection service authority elected in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter.
(4) "Commissioner" means a member of an elected board of
commissioners.
(5) "Regional fire protection service authority" or "authority"
means a municipal corporation, an independent taxing authority within
the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a
taxing district within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution, whose boundaries are coextensive with two or more
adjacent fire protection jurisdictions and that has been created by a
vote of the people under this chapter to implement a regional fire
protection service authority plan.
(((3))) (6) "Regional fire protection service authority planning
committee" or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created
under RCW 52.26.030 to create and propose to fire protection
jurisdictions a regional fire protection service authority plan to
design, finance, and develop fire protection and emergency service
projects.
(((4))) (7) "Regional fire protection service authority plan" or
"plan" means a plan to develop and finance a fire protection service
authority project or projects, including, but not limited to, specific
capital projects, fire operations and emergency service operations
pursuant to RCW 52.26.040(3)(b), and preservation and maintenance of
existing or future facilities.
(((5))) (8) "Fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire district,
city, town, port district, or Indian tribe.
(((6))) (9) "Regular property taxes" has the same meaning as in RCW
84.04.140.

Sec. 2 RCW 52.26.080 and 2004 c 129 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the formation of an authority, the governing body will be
a temporary, appointed board determined in accordance with the plan and
consisting solely of elected officials holding office in the
participating entities. The number of board members representing each
of the participating entities shall be in accordance with the plan.
However, an individual entity participating in the plan is limited to
a maximum of three appointed board members.
(2) The appointed board shall be replaced by an elected board of
commissioners in accordance with the requirements of this chapter. The
elected board of commissioners shall consist of five members initially
elected at the first general election occurring after the passage of
three years following the formation of the authority. The
commissioners must be registered voters within the jurisdictional
boundaries of the authority.
(3)(a) Following the election of the five-member board of
commissioners in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, one
appointed board member from each of the participating entities shall
remain on the board for a period of one year as an ex officio,
nonvoting member. These ex officio members shall continue to serve on
the board in a consultative capacity to the newly elected members and
their term of office shall expire one year after the elected board
assumes office. During this one-year transition period, the ex officio
board members shall continue to receive the same compensation received
during their service on the original appointed board.
(b) Where a participating entity was represented on the original
appointed board by more than one member, the ex officio member
representing that entity in accordance with this subsection shall be
appointed by the public official or governing body that made the
original appointments to the board on behalf of that entity.
(4) The board shall adopt rules for the conduct of business. The
board shall adopt bylaws to govern authority affairs, which may
include:
(a) The time and place of regular meetings;
(b) Rules for calling special meetings;
(c) The method of keeping records of proceedings and official acts;
(d) Procedures for the safekeeping and disbursement of funds; and
(e) Any other provisions the board finds necessary to include.
(((2) The governing board shall be determined by the plan and
consist solely of elected officials.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The initial five members of the elected
board of commissioners shall be elected at the first general election
occurring after the passage of three years following the formation of
the authority. Candidates shall file for not more than one of the five
separate commissioner positions. Elections shall be held as provided
in chapter 29A.52 RCW, with the county auditor opening up a special
filing period as provided in RCW 29A.24.171 and 29A.24.181, as if there
were a vacancy. The person who receives the greatest number of votes
for each position shall be elected to that position. The terms of
office of the initial commissioners shall be staggered as follows: (1)
The two persons elected receiving the greatest number of votes shall be
elected to six-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or five-year terms of office if the election is held in
an even-numbered year; (2) the two persons elected receiving the next
greatest number of votes shall be elected to a four-year term of office
if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a three-year term of
office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; (3) the other
person elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office if the
election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office
if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The initial
commissioners shall take office immediately when elected and qualified
and their terms of office shall be calculated from the first day of
January in the year following their election.
The term of office of each subsequent commissioner shall be six
years. Each commissioner shall serve until a successor is elected and
qualified and assumes office in accordance with RCW 29A.20.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Elections to elect the members of the board
of commissioners shall be conducted by the election officials of the
county or counties in which the authority is located in accordance with
the general election laws of the state. Such elections shall be held
in accordance with RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Each member of the board of commissioners
shall receive ninety dollars per day or portion thereof, not to exceed
eight thousand six hundred forty dollars per year, for time spent in
actual attendance at official meetings of the board or in performance
of other services or duties on behalf of the authority.
In addition, they shall receive necessary expenses incurred in
attending meetings of the board or when otherwise engaged in authority
business, and shall be entitled to receive the same insurance available
to all firefighters of the authority. The premiums for such insurance,
except liability insurance, shall be paid by the individual
commissioners who elect to receive it.
Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to
the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
The board of commissioners shall fix the compensation to be paid
the secretary and all other agents and employees of the district. The
board of commissioners may, by resolution adopted by unanimous vote,
authorize any of its members to serve as volunteer firefighters without
compensation. A commissioner actually serving as a volunteer
firefighter may enjoy the rights and benefits of a volunteer
firefighter.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2009, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The polling places for a regional fire
protection service authority election may be located inside or outside
the boundaries of the authority, as determined by the auditor or
auditors of the county or counties in which the fire protection
district is located, and the elections of the fire protection district
shall not be held to be irregular or void on that account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Vacancies on a board of commissioners shall
occur as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW. In addition, if a commissioner
is absent from the authority for three consecutive regularly scheduled
meetings unless by permission of the board, the office shall be
declared vacant by the board of commissioners. However, such an action
shall not be taken unless the commissioner is notified by mail after
two consecutive unexcused absences that the position will be declared
vacant if the commissioner is absent without being excused from the
next regularly scheduled meeting. Vacancies on a board of
commissioners shall be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Before beginning the duties of office, each
commissioner shall take and subscribe the official oath for the
faithful discharge of the duties of office as required by RCW
29A.04.133, which oath shall be filed in the office of the auditor of
the county in which all, or the largest portion, of the authority is
located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The commissioners shall elect a chairman
from their number and shall appoint a secretary of the authority, who
may or may not be a member of the board, for such term as they shall by
resolution determine. The secretary, if a member of the board, shall
not receive additional compensation for serving as secretary.
The secretary of the authority shall keep a record of the
proceedings of the board, shall perform other duties as prescribed by
the board or by law, and shall take and subscribe an official oath
similar to that of the commissioners which oath shall be filed in the
same office as that of the commissioners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The board of commissioners shall hold
regular monthly meetings at a place and date as it determines by
resolution, and may adjourn its meetings as required for the proper
transaction of business. Special meetings of the board of
commissioners shall be called at any time under the provisions of RCW
42.30.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 All meetings of the board of commissioners
shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 42.30 RCW and a majority
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. All records of
the board of commissioners shall be open to inspection in accordance
with chapter 42.56 RCW. Subject to the requirements of the regional
fire protection service authority plan, the board of commissioners has
the power and duty to adopt a seal of the authority, to manage and
conduct the business affairs of the authority, to make and execute all
necessary contracts, to employ any necessary services, and to adopt
reasonable rules to govern the authority and to perform its functions,
and generally to perform all such acts as may be necessary to carry out
the objects of the creation of the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The board of commissioners of an authority
may adopt a resolution by unanimous vote causing a ballot proposition
to be submitted to voters of the authority authorizing the creation of
commissioner districts. The board of commissioners shall create
commissioner districts if the ballot proposition authorizing the
creation of commissioner districts is approved by a simple majority
vote of the voters of the authority voting on the proposition. No two
commissioners may reside in the same commissioner district.
No change in the boundaries of any commissioner district shall be
made within one hundred twenty days next before the date of a general
district election, nor within twenty months after the commissioner
districts have been established or altered. However, if a boundary
change results in one commissioner district being represented by two or
more commissioners, those commissioners having the shortest unexpired
terms shall be assigned by the commission to commissioner districts
where there is a vacancy, and the commissioners so assigned shall be
deemed to be residents of the commissioner districts to which they are
assigned for purposes of determining whether those positions are
vacant.
The population of each commissioner district shall include
approximately equal population. Commissioner districts shall be
redrawn as provided in chapter 29A.76 RCW. Commissioner districts
shall be used as follows: (1) Only a registered voter who resides in
a commissioner district may be a candidate for, or serve as, a
commissioner of the commissioner district; and (2) only voters of a
commissioner district may vote at a primary to nominate candidates for
a commissioner of the commissioner district. Voters of the entire
authority may vote at a general election to elect a person as a
commissioner of the commissioner district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 3 through 12 of this act are each
added to chapter 52.26 RCW.

--- END ---