BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.42.450 and 1997 c 392 s 216 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The facility shall admit as residents only those individuals
whose needs can be met by:
(a) The facility;
(b) The facility cooperating with community resources; or
(c) The facility cooperating with other providers of care
affiliated or under contract with the facility.
(2) The facility shall transfer a resident to a hospital or other
appropriate facility when a change occurs in the resident's physical or
mental condition that requires care or service that the facility cannot
provide. The resident, the resident's guardian, if any, the resident's
next of kin, the attending physician, and the department shall be
consulted at least fifteen days before a transfer or discharge unless
the resident is transferred under emergency circumstances. The
department shall use casework services or other means to insure that
adequate arrangements are made to meet the resident's needs.
(3) A resident shall be transferred or discharged only for medical
reasons, the resident's welfare or request, the welfare of other
residents, or nonpayment. A resident may not be discharged for
nonpayment if the discharge would be prohibited by the medicaid
program.
(4) If a resident chooses to remain in the nursing facility, the
department shall respect that choice, provided that if the resident is
a medicaid recipient, the resident continues to require a nursing
facility level of care.
(5) If the department determines that a resident no longer requires
a nursing facility level of care, the resident shall not be discharged
from the nursing facility until at least thirty days after written
notice is given to the resident, the resident's surrogate decision
maker and, if appropriate, a family member or the resident's
representative. A form for requesting a hearing to appeal the
discharge decision shall be attached to the written notice. The
written notice shall include at least the following:
(a) The reason for the discharge;
(b) A statement that the resident has the right to appeal the
discharge; and
(c) The name, address, and telephone number of the state long-term
care ombudsman.
(6) If the resident appeals a department discharge decision, the
resident shall not be discharged without the resident's consent until
at least thirty days after a final order is entered upholding the
decision to discharge the resident.
(7) Before the facility transfers or discharges a resident, the
facility must first attempt through reasonable accommodations to avoid
the transfer or discharge unless the transfer or discharge is agreed to
by the resident. The facility shall admit or retain only individuals
whose needs it can safely and appropriately serve in the facility with
available staff or through the provision of reasonable accommodations
required by state or federal law. "Reasonable accommodations" has the
meaning given to this term under the federal Americans with
disabilities act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq. and other
applicable federal or state antidiscrimination laws and regulations.
(8) Any resident who is transferred or discharged by the nursing
facility and requests a fair hearing challenging the transfer or
discharge shall be allowed immediate readmittance into the first
gender-appropriate available bed in the nursing facility and may
remain, pending the issuance of a final order at the fair hearing.
However, if the resident was transferred or discharged to a hospital,
the resident will be allowed immediate readmittance into the first
gender-appropriate available bed in the nursing facility after the
attending physician determines that the resident no longer needs
hospital care and that the resident's needs can be met in a nursing
facility.
(9) The resident may be readmitted pending the issuance of a final
order following an appeal requested by the resident if the nursing
facility determines, following an assessment within a reasonable time
period, that it can meet the needs of the resident and that the health
and safety of the resident or other individuals in the facility would
not be jeopardized.

--- END ---