BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In the case of a boarding home that voluntarily withdraws
from participation in the state medicaid program for residential care
and services but continues to provide services of the type provided by
boarding homes:
(i) The facility's voluntary withdrawal from participation is not
an acceptable basis for the transfer or discharge of medicaid residents
of the facility who were residing in the facility on the day before the
effective date of the withdrawal or the transfer or discharge of
residents who shall become entitled to medicaid assistance within one
hundred eighty days of the date of withdrawal, providing that such
residents have been in private pay status in the facility for at least
two years prior to the date of withdrawal from the state medicaid
program. The requirement to continue to serve residents described in
this subsection shall be dependent on the continuation of the
reimbursement rates described in the medicaid contract in place on the
date when the facility voluntarily withdraws from the state medicaid
program;
(ii) The provisions of this section continue to apply to the
residents of the facility until the date of their discharge from the
facility; and
(iii) In the case of each person who begins residence in the
facility on or after the effective date of the facility's withdrawal
from medicaid participation referenced in (a)(i) of this subsection,
the facility shall provide notice orally and in a prominent manner in
writing of the information described in subsection (2) of this section
on a separate page before the person begins residence, and shall obtain
from each person at that time a signed, written acknowledgement of
receipt of the information, separate from other documents signed by the
person.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as affecting any
requirement that a boarding home provide advance notice to the
department of its intention to voluntarily terminate the facility's
medicaid contract with the department.
(2) The following information must be provided to the persons
described in subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section:
(a) The facility will not participate in the medicaid program with
respect to that person; and
(b) The facility may transfer or discharge that person from the
facility if the person is unable to pay the charges of the facility,
even if the person becomes eligible for medicaid assistance for
boarding home services.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, with
respect to the persons described in subsection (1)(a)(i) of this
section, a medicaid contract between the department and a facility
described in subsection (1) of this section is deemed to continue in
effect under that agreement after the effective date of the facility's
voluntary withdrawal from participation in the medicaid program for
purposes of:
(a) Receiving payments under the medicaid program for boarding home
services provided to such persons;
(b) Maintaining compliance with all requirements of the medicaid
contract between the department and the facility; and
(c) Continuing to apply the inspection, contracting, and
enforcement authority provided under the department's contract,
regulations, and law.
(4) Except as provided in subsections (1)(a)(iii) and (2) of this
section, this section shall not apply to a person who begins residence
in a facility on or after the effective date of the facility's
withdrawal from participation in the medicaid program for residential
care and services.

--- END ---