BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.28.1816 and 2007 c 497 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Lodging tax revenues under this chapter may be used, directly
by local jurisdictions or indirectly through a convention and visitors
bureau or destination marketing organization, for the marketing and
operations of special events and festivals and to support the
operations and capital expenditures of tourism-related facilities owned
by nonprofit organizations described under (([section])) section
501(c)(3) and (([section])) section 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue
code of 1986, as amended.
(2) Local jurisdictions that use the lodging tax revenues under
this section must submit an annual economic impact report ((for these
expenditures)) to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for expenditures made beginning January 1, 2008. These
reports must include the expenditures by the local jurisdiction for
tourism promotion purposes and what is used by a nonprofit organization
exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6). This
economic impact report, at a minimum, must include: (a) The total
revenue received under this chapter for each year; (b) the list of
festivals, special events, or nonprofit 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6)
organizations that received funds under this chapter; (c) the list of
festivals, special events, or tourism facilities sponsored or owned by
the local jurisdiction that received funds under this chapter; (d) the
amount of revenue expended on each festival, special event, or
tourism-related facility owned or sponsored by a nonprofit 501(c)(3) or
501(c)(6) organization or local jurisdiction; (((d))) (e) the estimated
number of tourists, persons traveling over fifty miles to the
destination, persons remaining at the destination overnight, and
lodging stays generated per festival, special event, or tourism-related
facility owned or sponsored by a nonprofit 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6)
organization or local jurisdiction; (((e) an estimated increase in
sales and use tax revenues attributable to the special event, festival,
or tourism-related facility owned by a nonprofit 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6)
organization;)) and (f) any other measurements the local government
finds that demonstrate the impact of the increased tourism attributable
to the festival, special event, or tourism-related facility owned or
sponsored by a nonprofit 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6) organization or local
jurisdiction.
(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee must report to
the legislature and the governor on the use and economic impact of
lodging tax revenues by local jurisdictions since ((July 22, 2007))
January 1, 2008, to support festivals, special events, and tourism-related facilities owned or sponsored by a nonprofit organization under
section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as
amended, or a local jurisdiction, and the economic impact generated by
these festivals, events, and facilities. This report shall be due
September 1, 2012.
(4) Reporting under this section must begin with calendar year
2008.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2013.

--- END ---