BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The higher education coordinating board
shall contract with a private vendor to create a three-to five-year
marketing plan to increase student interest in high-demand fields of
study and to increase public awareness of high-demand fields and
degrees. The marketing program shall target unlikely college students
in middle school or high school with a focus on low-income and
underrepresented communities, likely college students in middle school
and high school, adult learners, parents, and educators.
(2) The private vendor shall be selected based upon the proven
ability to provide:
(a) Creative planning for educational advertising;
(b) Production of successful advertisement campaigns;
(c) Production of collateral materials;
(d) Opinion research for the evaluation of advertising campaigns;
and
(e) Web site creation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of seven hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the higher
education coordinating board for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---