BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.260 and 2006 c 107 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each recipient shall be assessed after determination of program
eligibility and before referral to job search. Assessments shall be
based upon factors that are critical to obtaining employment, including
but not limited to education, availability of child care, history of
family violence, history of substance abuse, and other factors that
affect the ability to obtain employment. Assessments may be performed
by the department or by a contracted entity. The assessment shall be
based on a uniform, consistent, transferable format that will be
accepted by all agencies and organizations serving the recipient.
Based on the assessment, an individual responsibility plan shall be
prepared that: (a) Sets forth an employment goal and a plan for moving
the recipient immediately into employment; (b) contains the obligation
of the recipient to become and remain employed; (c) moves the recipient
into whatever employment the recipient is capable of handling as
quickly as possible; and (d) describes the services available to the
recipient to enable the recipient to obtain and keep employment.
(2) If the assessment conducted under this section or other
reliable information indicates the likelihood that the recipient's
reliance on public assistance is the result in whole or in part of the
recipient's substance abuse or chemical dependency, the individual
responsibility plan developed under this section shall include a
process for the recipient to engage in periodic urinalysis drug
testing, which may be accomplished through a treatment program, routine
employer screening of employees, or other lawful means.
(3) Recipients who are not engaged in work and work activities, and
do not qualify for a good cause exemption under RCW 74.08A.270, shall
engage in self-directed service as provided in RCW 74.08A.330.
(((3))) (4) If a recipient refuses to engage in work and work
activities required by the department, the family's grant shall be
reduced by the recipient's share, and may, if the department determines
it appropriate, be terminated.
(((4))) (5) The department may waive the penalties required under
subsection (((3))) (4) of this section, subject to a finding that the
recipient refused to engage in work for good cause provided in RCW
74.08A.270.
(((5))) (6) In implementing this section, the department shall
assign the highest priority to the most employable clients, including
adults in two-parent families and parents in single-parent families
that include older preschool or school-age children to be engaged in
work activities.
(((6))) (7) In consultation with the recipient, the department or
contractor shall place the recipient into a work activity that is
available in the local area where the recipient resides.
(((7))) (8) Assessments conducted under this section shall include
a consideration of the potential benefit to the recipient of engaging
in financial literacy activities. The department shall consider the
options for financial literacy activities available in the community,
including information and resources available through the financial
literacy public-private partnership created under RCW 28A.300.450. The
department may authorize up to ten hours of financial literacy
activities as a core activity or an optional activity under WorkFirst.

--- END ---