BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28C.18.080 and 1997 c 369 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The state comprehensive plan for workforce training and
education shall be updated every two years and presented to the
governor and the appropriate legislative policy committees.)) The board
shall develop a state comprehensive plan for workforce training and
education for a ten-year time period. The board shall submit the
initial ten-year state comprehensive plan to the governor and the
appropriate legislative policy committees by December 1, 2008. Every
four years by December 1st, beginning December 1, 2012, the board shall
submit an update of the ten-year state comprehensive plan for workforce
training and education to the governor and the appropriate legislative
policy committees. Following public hearings, the legislature shall,
by concurrent resolution, approve or recommend changes to the initial
plan and the updates. The plan shall then become the state's workforce
training policy unless legislation is enacted to alter the policies set
forth in the plan.
(2) The comprehensive plan shall include workforce training role
and mission statements for the workforce development programs of
operating agencies represented on the board and sufficient specificity
regarding expected actions by the operating agencies to allow them to
carry out actions consistent with the comprehensive plan.
(3) Operating agencies represented on the board shall have
operating plans for their workforce development efforts that are
consistent with the comprehensive plan and that provide detail on
implementation steps they will take to carry out their responsibilities
under the plan. Each operating agency represented on the board shall
provide an annual progress report to the board.
(4) The comprehensive plan shall include recommendations to the
legislature and the governor on the modification, consolidation,
initiation, or elimination of workforce training and education programs
in the state.
(5) The comprehensive plan shall address how the state's workforce
development system will meet the needs of employers hiring for
industrial projects of statewide significance.
(6) The board shall report to the appropriate legislative policy
committees by December 1 of each year on its progress in implementing
the comprehensive plan and on the progress of the operating agencies in
meeting their obligations under the plan.

--- END ---