BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.130 and 2006 c 116 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To facilitate access to information and materials on
educational improvement and research, the superintendent of public
instruction, to the extent funds are appropriated, shall establish the
center for the improvement of student learning. The center shall work
in conjunction with parents, educational service districts,
institutions of higher education, and education, parent, community, and
business organizations.
(2) The center, in conjunction with other staff in the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, shall:
(a) Serve as a clearinghouse for information regarding successful
educational improvement and parental involvement programs in schools
and districts, and information about efforts within institutions of
higher education in the state to support educational improvement
initiatives in Washington schools and districts;
(b) Provide best practices research that can be used to help
schools develop and implement: Programs and practices to improve
instruction; systems to analyze student assessment data, with an
emphasis on systems that will combine the use of state and local data
to monitor the academic progress of each and every student in the
school district; comprehensive, school-wide improvement plans; school-based shared decision-making models; programs to promote lifelong
learning and community involvement in education; school-to-work
transition programs; programs to meet the needs of highly capable
students; programs and practices to meet the needs of students with
disabilities; programs and practices to meet the diverse needs of
students based on gender, racial, ethnic, economic, and special needs
status; research, information, and technology systems; and other
programs and practices that will assist educators in helping students
learn the essential academic learning requirements;
(c) Develop and maintain an internet web site to increase the
availability of information, research, and other materials;
(d) Work with appropriate organizations to inform teachers,
district and school administrators, and school directors about the
waivers available and the broadened school board powers under RCW
28A.320.015;
(e) Provide training and consultation services, including
conducting regional summer institutes;
(f) Identify strategies for improving the success rates of ethnic
and racial student groups and students with disabilities, with
disproportionate academic achievement;
(g) Work with parents, teachers, and school districts in
establishing a model absentee notification procedure that will properly
notify parents when their student has not attended a class or has
missed a school day. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall consider various types of communication with parents
including, but not limited to, electronic mail, phone, and postal mail;
and
(h) Perform other functions consistent with the purpose of the
center as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall select and
employ a director for the center.
(4) The superintendent may enter into contracts with individuals or
organizations including but not limited to: School districts;
educational service districts; educational organizations; teachers;
higher education faculty; institutions of higher education; state
agencies; business or community-based organizations; and other
individuals and organizations to accomplish the duties and
responsibilities of the center. In carrying out the duties and
responsibilities of the center, the superintendent, whenever possible,
shall use practitioners to assist agency staff as well as assist
educators and others in schools and districts.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
report to the legislature by September 1, 2007, and thereafter
biennially, regarding the effectiveness of the center for (([the])) the
improvement of student learning, how the services provided by the
center for (([the])) the improvement of student learning have been used
and by whom, and recommendations to improve the accessibility and
application of knowledge and information that leads to improved student
learning and greater family and community involvement in the public
education system.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.06B.020 and 2006 c 116 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The education ombudsman shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To develop parental involvement materials, including
instructional guides developed to inform parents of the essential
academic learning requirements required by the superintendent of public
instruction. The instructional guides also shall contain actions
parents may take to assist their children in meeting the requirements,
and should focus on reaching parents who have not previously been
involved with their children's education;
(2) To provide information to students, parents, and interested
members of the public regarding this state's public elementary and
secondary education system;
(3) To identify obstacles to greater parent and community
involvement in school shared decision-making processes and recommend
strategies for helping parents and community members to participate
effectively in school shared decision-making processes, including
understanding and respecting the roles of school building
administrators and staff;
(4) To identify and recommend strategies for improving the success
rates of ethnic and racial student groups and students with
disabilities, with disproportionate academic achievement;
(5) To refer complainants and others to appropriate resources,
agencies, or departments;
(6) To facilitate the resolution of complaints made by parents and
students with regard to the state's public elementary and secondary
education system;
(7) To perform such other functions consistent with the purpose of
the education ombudsman; and
(8) To consult with representatives of the following organizations
and groups regarding the work of the office of the education ombudsman,
including but not limited to:
(a) The state parent teacher association;
(b) Certificated and classified school employees;
(c) School and school district administrators;
(d) Parents of special education students;
(e) Parents of English language learners;
(f) The Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs;
(g) The Washington state commission on African-American affairs;
(h) The Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American
affairs; and
(i) The governor's office of Indian affairs.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.090 and 1999 c 388 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By September 10, 1998, and by September 10th each year
thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall report to
schools, school districts, and the legislature on the results of the
Washington assessment of student learning and state-mandated norm-referenced standardized tests.
(2) The reports shall include the assessment results by school and
school district, and include changes over time. For the Washington
assessment of student learning, results shall be reported as follows:
(a) The percentage of students meeting the standards;
(b) The percentage of students performing at each level of the
assessment; ((and))
(c) Disaggregation of results by at least the following subgroups
of students: White, Black, Hispanic, American Indian/Alaskan Native,
Asian, Pacific Islander/Hawaiian Native, low income, transitional
bilingual, migrant, special education, and, beginning with the 2009-10
school year, students covered by section 504 of the federal
rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794); and
(d) A learning improvement index that shows changes in student
performance within the different levels of student learning reported on
the Washington assessment of student learning.
(3) The reports shall contain data regarding the different
characteristics of schools, such as poverty levels, percent of English
as a second language students, dropout rates, attendance, percent of
students in special education, and student mobility so that districts
and schools can learn from the improvement efforts of other schools and
districts with similar characteristics.
(4) The reports shall contain student scores on mandated tests by
comparable Washington schools of similar characteristics.
(5) The reports shall contain information on public school choice
options available to students, including vocational education.
(6) The reports shall be posted on the superintendent of public
instruction's internet web site.
(7) To protect the privacy of students, the results of schools and
districts that test fewer than ten students in a grade level shall not
be reported. In addition, in order to ensure that results are reported
accurately, the superintendent of public instruction shall maintain the
confidentiality of statewide data files until the superintendent
determines that the data are complete and accurate.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor the
percentage and number of special education and limited English-proficient students exempted from taking the assessments by schools and
school districts to ensure the exemptions are in compliance with
exemption guidelines.

--- END ---