BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the affordable
housing shortage constitutes a danger to the health, safety, and
welfare of all residents of the state, and is a barrier to sound growth
and sustainable economic development for the cities and counties. As
new commercial and industrial development generates new jobs, it also
creates demand for low and moderate-income housing not met by market
rate housing development in many parts of Washington state.
Therefore, the legislature finds that if local jurisdictions
provide zoning incentives to commercial and industrial development to
provide low and moderate-income housing, more jobs can be created in
areas that will have units affordable to low and moderate-income
households and more employees can live closer to their jobs. The
growth management act encourages innovative land use management
techniques such as density bonuses. Enacting more specific
authorization for zoning incentives for commercial and industrial
development to provide affordable housing will encourage greater use of
such incentives to achieve the purposes of the growth management act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may use
incentive zoning for commercial or industrial development to increase
the availability of affordable housing, or to preserve affordable
housing, or both, within the jurisdiction.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "incentive zoning" means any
development regulations, conditional rezones, or development approvals
that allow greater building height, more development capacity,
different uses, or more relaxed development standards, than otherwise
would apply to a commercial or industrial development, or that grant
other incentives to such a development, on the condition that
affordable housing be provided or preserved, either on or off of the
development site, or on condition that the developer provide money or
property to be used for affordable housing.
(3) Incentive zoning used under the authority of this section must
comply with the following:
(a) Housing units developed, preserved, or acquired pursuant to
incentive zoning must be affordable to, and occupied by, households
with income levels determined by the city or county, subject to the
limits in this subsection (3)(a), as follows:
(i) Rental housing units must be affordable to, and occupied by,
households with incomes not exceeding: (A) Eighty percent of the
median income, if located outside high-cost areas; or (B) the median
income, if located in high-cost areas.
(ii) Housing units for owner-occupancy must be affordable to, and
occupied by, households with incomes not exceeding: (A) One hundred
fifteen percent of the median income, if located outside high-cost
areas; or (B) one hundred fifty percent of the median income, if
located in high-cost areas.
(iii) "High-cost area" means a county where the third quarter
median house price for the previous year as reported by the Washington
center for real estate research at Washington State University is equal
to or greater than one hundred thirty percent of the statewide median
house price published during the same time period.
(b) Housing units created, acquired, or preserved pursuant to
incentive zoning must be committed to remain as affordable housing for
at least fifty years. A city or county may establish or agree to terms
on which a commitment may be reduced or terminated based on provision
of substitute affordable housing or a payment to be used for affordable
housing.
(4) A city or county may enact or expand incentive zoning for
commercial or industrial development whether or not the program may
impose a tax, fee, or charge on the development or construction of
property. A local jurisdiction may collect reasonable fees from an
applicant for an incentive zoning program to cover the cost to the
city, town, county, or other municipal corporation of administering the
incentive zoning program.
(5) If an applicant for a permit or development approval chooses
not to seek any benefits of an incentive program enacted pursuant to
this section, a city, county, or town may not condition, deny, or delay
the issuance of a permit or development approval for failure to
participate in such program, provided the permit application or
development project is consistent with zoning and development standards
on the subject property.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.02.020 and 2006 c 149 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except only as expressly provided in chapters 67.28 and 82.14 RCW,
the state preempts the field of imposing taxes upon retail sales of
tangible personal property, the use of tangible personal property,
parimutuel wagering authorized pursuant to RCW 67.16.060, conveyances,
and cigarettes, and no county, town, or other municipal subdivision
shall have the right to impose taxes of that nature. Except as
provided in RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090, no county, city, town, or
other municipal corporation shall impose any tax, fee, or charge,
either direct or indirect, on the construction or reconstruction of
residential buildings, commercial buildings, industrial buildings, or
on any other building or building space or appurtenance thereto, or on
the development, subdivision, classification, or reclassification of
land. However, this section does not preclude dedications of land or
easements within the proposed development or plat which the county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation can demonstrate are
reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed development or
plat to which the dedication of land or easement is to apply.
This section does not prohibit voluntary agreements with counties,
cities, towns, or other municipal corporations that allow a payment in
lieu of a dedication of land or to mitigate a direct impact that has
been identified as a consequence of a proposed development,
subdivision, or plat. A local government shall not use such voluntary
agreements for local off-site transportation improvements within the
geographic boundaries of the area or areas covered by an adopted
transportation program authorized by chapter 39.92 RCW. Any such
voluntary agreement is subject to the following provisions:
(1) The payment shall be held in a reserve account and may only be
expended to fund a capital improvement agreed upon by the parties to
mitigate the identified, direct impact;
(2) The payment shall be expended in all cases within five years of
collection; and
(3) Any payment not so expended shall be refunded with interest to
be calculated from the original date the deposit was received by the
county and at the same rate applied to tax refunds pursuant to RCW
84.69.100; however, if the payment is not expended within five years
due to delay attributable to the developer, the payment shall be
refunded without interest.
No county, city, town, or other municipal corporation shall require
any payment as part of such a voluntary agreement which the county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation cannot establish is
reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed development or
plat.
Nothing in this section prohibits cities, towns, counties, or other
municipal corporations from collecting reasonable fees from an
applicant for a permit or other governmental approval to cover the cost
to the city, town, county, or other municipal corporation of processing
applications, inspecting and reviewing plans, or preparing detailed
statements required by chapter 43.21C RCW.
This section does not limit the existing authority of any county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation to impose special
assessments on property specifically benefitted thereby in the manner
prescribed by law.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing or permits counties, cities, or towns to impose water, sewer,
natural gas, drainage utility, and drainage system charges: PROVIDED,
That no such charge shall exceed the proportionate share of such
utility or system's capital costs which the county, city, or town can
demonstrate are attributable to the property being charged: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That these provisions shall not be interpreted to expand or
contract any existing authority of counties, cities, or towns to impose
such charges.
Nothing in this section prohibits a transportation benefit district
from imposing fees or charges authorized in RCW 36.73.120 nor prohibits
the legislative authority of a county, city, or town from approving the
imposition of such fees within a transportation benefit district.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing transportation impact fees authorized pursuant to chapter
39.92 RCW.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
requiring property owners to provide relocation assistance to tenants
under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450.
Nothing in this section limits the authority of counties, cities,
or towns to implement incentive zoning consistent with section 2 of
this act, nor to enforce agreements made pursuant to such incentive
zoning.
Nothing in this section limits the authority of counties, cities,
or towns to implement programs consistent with RCW 36.70A.540, nor to
enforce agreements made pursuant to such programs.
This section does not apply to special purpose districts formed and
acting pursuant to Titles 54, 57, or 87 RCW, nor is the authority
conferred by these titles affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The powers granted in this act are
supplemental and additional to the powers otherwise held by local
governments, and nothing in this act shall be construed as a limit on
such powers. The authority granted in this act extends to any
incentive zoning adopted by a local government through an ordinance or
resolution prior to the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 31, 2008.

--- END ---