BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the global
production of plastic bags has significant environmental impacts each
year, including the consumption of over twelve million barrels of oil
and the deaths of thousands of marine animals through ingestion and
entanglement. Each year, an estimated five hundred billion to one
trillion plastic bags are used worldwide and many of these bags end up
as litter each year. Most plastic bags do not biodegrade. Most
plastic bags photograde, breaking into small bits of plastic. These
small bits of plastic contaminate soil and waterways and enter in the
food web when animals accidentally ingest those materials. The
legislature recognizes the state's need for regulation and elimination
of the use of plastic check-out bags.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of ecology shall convene
and chair a work group to study approaches and techniques that are
effective at minimizing the potential for adverse environmental impacts
caused by the manufacture, use, recycling, and disposal of plastic
check-out bags.
(2) The director of the department of ecology shall establish the
work group and include representatives from: The department of health;
industry; and other stakeholders as deemed appropriate by the
department of ecology.
(3) The work group shall make recommendations to the legislature on
practical and cost-effective opportunities to minimize the potential
for adverse environmental impacts caused by the manufacture, use,
recycling, and disposal of plastic check-out bags. The definition of
"plastic check-out bag" is any plastic bag that is provided by a retail
store or wholesale store to a customer at the point of sale.
(4) In carrying out its assignment, the work group shall include,
but not be limited to, the following considerations:
(a) Laws and regulations of other states regarding the manufacture,
use, recycling, and disposal of plastic check-out bags compared to
Washington state and federal laws and regulations regarding the
manufacture, use, recycling, and disposal of plastic check-out bags;
(b) Research findings regarding the scope of the environmental
impact caused by plastic check-out bags; and
(c) Alternative options for reducing the environmental impact
caused by the manufacture, use, recycling, and disposal of plastic
check-out bags in Washington, including the economic and environmental
impacts of implementation of each alternative options. At a minimum,
the following alternative options must be delineated, analyzed, and
reported on:
(i) Banning plastic check-out bags;
(ii) Mandatory recycling of plastic check-out bags; and
(iii) Taxes charged for plastic check-out bags.
(5) Recommendations may include statutory or regulatory changes,
incentives, and other approaches. Recommendations must be presented in
a report to the governor and to the legislature by December 1, 2008.

--- END ---