BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the global
energy economy is undergoing significant changes creating a situation
where energy prices are increasingly more expensive and the sources of
energy increasingly less secure. Additionally, the legislature finds
that there is growing concern about the consequences associated with
greenhouse gas emissions from conventional sources of energy and the
need for action to address the threats of climate change. The
legislature finds ocean and tidal resources, as well as other forms of
hydrokinetic energy, will play an important role in providing clean,
carbon-free, reliable, and affordable energy to the citizens of
Washington. The legislature finds that the development of wave and
tidal energy technologies in Washington will create more highly valued
green jobs in the state.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to facilitate the
development of clean, carbon-free, reliable, and affordable power
sources for the energy needs of Washington's growing economy. Also, it
is the intent of the legislature to help catalyze the emergence of a
new water-power industry that is able to export technology and
expertise to the rest of the country and the world. In addition, the
legislature finds that hydrokinetic energy technologies are in their
infancy and care must be taken to properly design and site these
facilities in order to avoid impacts on the marine environment. To
achieve these goals, the legislature intends to establish a public-private organization that will support a sustainable approach to
hydrokinetic energy development aimed at economic development,
environmental protection, and community stability.
(3)(a) It is the intent of the legislature for state agencies to
explore a streamlined approach to environmental permit decision making
for wave and tidal power projects.
(b) To optimize the development and siting process for wave and
tidal power systems and to provide environmental protection, the
legislature finds that state regulatory and natural resource agencies,
public and private sector interests, tribes, local and regional
governments, and applicable federal agencies must work cooperatively to
establish common goals, minimize project siting delays, develop
consistency in the application of environmental standards, and
eliminate duplicative processes through assigned responsibilities of
selected permit drafting and compliance activities between state
agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Center" means the Washington state center for excellence in
hydrokinetic energy.
(2) "Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council.
(3) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) "Hydrokinetic energy" means hydroelectric generation from ocean
waves, tides, and currents, from free-flowing rivers and streams, and
from water discharges.
(5) "Water discharges" means water discharges from agricultural,
industrial, and commercial operations, wastewater treatment plants, or
residential properties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department and the council shall convene
and cochair a work group to develop the Washington state center for
excellence in hydrokinetic energy and to explore mechanisms to
streamline and make more efficient current permitting processes for
wave and tidal power projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The work group created under section 3
of this act consists of, but is not limited to, representatives from:
(a) The department of natural resources;
(b) The department of ecology;
(c) The department of fish and wildlife;
(d) The utilities and transportation commission;
(e) A wave energy company or tidal energy company, or both;
(f) A wave energy industry association or tidal energy industry
association, or both;
(g) Either a state or private university researching wave energy or
a state or private university researching tidal energy, or both;
(h) The Northwest Indian fisheries commission;
(i) An electrical utility;
(j) A local government;
(k) A commercial fishing association;
(l) A conservation group with expertise in energy-related issues;
(m) A conservation group with expertise in marine ecology; and
(n) A marine recreation group.
(2) State agencies under subsection (1) of this section that are
members of the council under RCW 80.50.030 shall provide their existing
designee members to serve on the work group in carrying out the
responsibilities of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) In developing the center, the work group
created in section 3 of this act shall ensure that the center is a
public-private entity and that the center supports a sustainable
approach to hydrokinetic energy development aimed at economic
development, environmental protection, and community stability.
(2) The work group created in section 3 of this act shall make
recommendations to the legislature to include, but not be limited to,
the following:
(a) How the center will conduct and support research and
demonstrations of wave and tidal energy technologies in order to
facilitate the deployment and commercialization of these technologies
in Washington;
(b) How the center will establish and operate wave and tidal energy
test ranges that allow developers to demonstrate their wave and tidal
energy technologies;
(c) How the center will maintain processes to assist developers in
permitting their wave and tidal energy technologies;
(d) How the center will collect, manage, and disseminate data
necessary to assess statewide wave and tidal resources;
(e) How the center will promote Washington as the optimal location
for the development of and deployment of wave and tidal energy
technologies;
(f) What the public-private governance structure of the center will
be, considering the life sciences discovery fund as a model;
(g) How the center will coordinate with other governmental wave and
tidal institutions and initiatives in the Pacific Northwest economic
region;
(h) How the center will be funded through either state, federal, or
private sources of funding, or a combination of these funding sources;
(i) How the center will assist the state and various other entities
in reducing greenhouse gas emissions;
(j) How the center will assist other forms of hydrokinetic energy
technologies in addition to wave and tidal energy;
(k) How the center will identify and develop protocols to manage
issues involving competing uses of water space; and
(l) What types of review and data are necessary to ensure that
hydrokinetic energy will be designed and sited so as to avoid negative
impacts on marine ecosystems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The work group created in section 3 of this
act shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature containing its recommendations under section 5 of this act,
as well as draft legislation implementing its recommendations, by
December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1)(a) The work group created in section 3
of this act shall explore mechanisms to streamline and make more
efficient permitting processes for wave and tidal power projects. The
work group may recommend development of a permit process which allows
for concurrent public review, consolidated appeals, and other
mechanisms which result in permit process efficiency. In making these
recommendations, the work group will ensure that there is adequate
environmental review of the full range of potential impacts from this
technology and that meaningful public involvement opportunities are
preserved. The work group shall also identify and make recommendations
of any potential barriers to the streamlining.
(b) The work group shall consider and make recommendations
regarding research relating to the marine environment. In making the
recommendations, the work group shall consider how future marine
research would add value to the existing understanding of the overall
marine environment and provide guidance on future research with the
goal of eliminating redundant research activities.
(2) The work group created in section 3 of this act, in developing
recommendations for permit streamlining, shall consider additional
issues that may be associated with permitting a wave or tidal energy
project, which include, but are not limited to:
(a) Disturbance or destruction of marine life, including acoustic
impacts;
(b) Toxic releases from leaks or accidental spills of liquids used
in those systems with working hydraulic fluids;
(c) Possible threat to navigation from collisions;
(d) Interference of mooring and anchorage lines with commercial and
sport fishing;
(e) Tidal power plants that dam estuaries that can impede sea life
migration and build up silt behind such facilities, impacting local
ecosystems; and
(f) Potential impacts of tidal power on tides, currents, and
flushing.
(3) By June 30, 2009, the work group created in section 3 of this
act shall develop a work plan that details critical issues that need to
be resolved to develop efficient, streamlined permitting processes for
wave and tidal power projects. The work group shall provide the work
plan to the legislature for review every six months. If the work group
determines that additional time is required to develop recommendations
for the permitting process for wave power projects, the work group
shall report to the legislature on the need for additional time and
update the work plan accordingly.
(4) By June 30, 2010, the work group created in section 3 of this
act shall provide a final report to the legislature on its findings and
recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act expires January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---