BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Puget Sound is a
unique and vital resource to the state of Washington. Puget Sound
provides unparalleled scenic, recreational fishing, tourism, and
transportation opportunities. These opportunities enhance Washington's
economy and the quality of life for all citizens of the state.
The legislature further finds that, as manager of state-owned
aquatic lands, the department of natural resources must provide a
balance of public benefits for all citizens of the state. The
department of natural resources must, by statute, manage aquatic lands
to: Encourage direct public use and access; foster water-dependent
uses; ensure environmental protection; utilize renewable resources; and
generate revenue in a manner consistent with these management goals.
Additionally, the legislature finds that the state has an
obligation to be a good steward of Puget Sound so that future
generations may enjoy the many benefits of this important natural
resource. Therefore, the legislature intends to ensure that any leases
of state-owned land for intertidal commercial geoduck aquaculture by
the department of natural resources are consistent with protecting the
resources of Puget Sound and providing a balance of benefits to
Washington's citizens.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.135.100 and 2007 c 216 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If state-owned aquatic lands are used for aquaculture
production or harvesting, rents and fees shall be established through
competitive bidding or negotiation.
(2) After an initial twenty-three acres are leased, the department
is prohibited from offering leases that would permit the intertidal
commercial aquaculture of geoducks on more than fifteen acres of state-owned aquatic lands ((a [per])) per year until December 1, 2014.
(3) Any intertidal leases entered into by the department for
geoduck aquaculture must be conditioned in such a way that the
department can engage in monitoring of the environmental impacts of the
lease's execution, without unreasonably diminishing the economic
viability of the lease, and that the lease tracts are eligible to be
made part of the studies conducted under RCW 28B.20.475.
(4) In addition to the general monitoring requirements of
subsection (3) of this section, the department must designate
appropriate intertidal commercial geoduck aquaculture leases for
in-depth environmental monitoring. In-depth monitoring sites must
constitute at least one-fifth of the state-owned aquatic acreage leased
each year for the purpose of intertidal commercial geoduck aquaculture.
The monitoring must be designed to evaluate the impacts of each
different phase of intertidal commercial geoduck aquaculture on the
environment, including site recovery following the completion of
aquaculture activities. In order to effectively monitor site recovery,
the department may not allow replanting of a site designated for
in-depth environmental monitoring for at least ten years following an
intertidal commercial geoduck harvest on that site.
(5) The department must notify all abutting landowners and any
landowner within three hundred feet of the lands to be leased of the
intent of the department to lease any intertidal lands for the purposes
of geoduck aquaculture.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.135 RCW
under the subchapter heading "leasing for shellfish
cultivation/aquaculture use" to read as follows:
(1) When determining appropriate lease sites for intertidal
commercial geoduck aquaculture on state-owned aquatic land, the
department shall seek to:
(a) Avoid impacts to landowners by leasing only sites with high
banks or no or minimal upland residential development;
(b) Avoid impacts to aquatic life by leasing only sites with no or
minimal natural stock shellfish, eelgrass, spawning fish populations,
and other aquatic life; and
(c) Avoid impacts to recreation by leasing only sites with no or
minimal recreational use on or above the aquatic lands.
(2) If avoiding impacts under subsection (1) of this section is
impracticable, the department must seek to minimize any impacts and to
provide mitigation for any unavoidable impacts.
(3) The department must develop detailed criteria for determining
appropriate lease sites for intertidal commercial geoduck aquaculture
on state-owned aquatic land. The criteria must be consistent with
subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The department must provide
this criteria to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 79.135 RCW
under the subchapter heading "leasing for shellfish
cultivation/aquaculture use" to read as follows:
Before entering into any lease of state-owned aquatic land that
would allow intertidal commercial geoduck aquaculture, the department
must hold a public hearing in the county where the state-owned aquatic
land, or the greatest proportion of the state-owned aquatic land, is
located. The department must make every reasonable effort to hold the
public hearing at a location near the proposed lease site. At least
fifteen days, but not more than thirty days before the hearing, the
department must publish a public notice of reasonable size in display
advertising form, setting forth the date, time, and place of hearing,
at least once in one or more daily newspapers of general circulation in
the county or counties where the state-owned aquatic land is located.
At the same time the published notice is given, the department must
disseminate a news release pertaining to the hearing among printed and
electronic media in the area where the state-owned aquatic land is
located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act applies only to state-owned aquatic
lands and does not apply to privately owned lands.

--- END ---