BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington's marine highways provide vital
transportation links between communities. Citizens, businesses, and
visitors depend on the state's ferry system to provide safe, dependable
auto and passenger service in order to conduct daily life and commerce
activities. On November 20, 2007, the secretary of the department of
transportation ordered the eighty-year old steel electric class vessels
to be immediately removed from service because previously undetected
corrosion and pitting in the vessel hulls posed a risk to the safety of
passengers and crew. The emergency removal of the state ferry system's
steel electric class vessels has imposed a significant hardship on the
citizens and businesses served by those vessels. Therefore, an
expedited procurement is required for the construction of new vessels
to fully restore service to routes previously served by the steel
electric class vessels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall construct one or more new ferry vessels
for service on routes that require a vessel that carries no more than
one hundred motor vehicles. The department shall include in the
procurement of the new vessels a requirement that the vessels be
constructed within the boundaries of the state of Washington, except
that equipment furnished by the state and components, products, and
systems that are standard manufactured items are not subject to the in-state requirement under this subsection.
(2) For purposes of this section, "constructed" means: The
fabrication, by the joining together by welding or fastening, of all
steel parts from which the total vessel is constructed including, but
not limited to, all shell frames, longitudinals, bulkheads, webs,
piping runs, wire ways, and ducting. "Constructed" also means (a) the
installation of all components and systems including, but not limited
to, equipment and machinery, castings, electrical, electronics, deck
covering, lining, paint, and joiner work required by the contract and
(b) the interconnection of all equipment, machinery, and services, such
as piping, wiring, and ducting.
(3) The procurement of the new ferry vessels must also include a
requirement that all warranty work on the vessels be performed within
the boundaries of the state of Washington, insofar as practicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---