BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.550 and 2005 c 483 s 5 and 2005 c 274 s 288 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon the motion of any person having been denied an opportunity
to inspect or copy a public record by an agency, the superior court in
the county in which a record is maintained may require the responsible
agency to show cause why it has refused to allow inspection or copying
of a specific public record or class of records. The burden of proof
shall be on the agency to establish that refusal to permit public
inspection and copying is in accordance with a statute that exempts or
prohibits disclosure in whole or in part of specific information or
records.
(2) Upon the motion of any person who believes that an agency has
not made a reasonable estimate of the time that the agency requires to
respond to a public record request, the superior court in the county in
which a record is maintained may require the responsible agency to show
that the estimate it provided is reasonable. The burden of proof shall
be on the agency to show that the estimate it provided is reasonable.
(3) Judicial review of all agency actions taken or challenged under
RCW 42.56.030 through 42.56.520 shall be de novo. Courts shall take
into account the policy of this chapter that free and open examination
of public records is in the public interest, even though such
examination may cause inconvenience or embarrassment to public
officials or others. Courts may examine any record in camera in any
proceeding brought under this section. The court may conduct a hearing
based solely on affidavits.
(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any person who
prevails against an agency in any action in the courts seeking the
right to inspect or copy any public record or the right to receive a
response to a public record request within a reasonable amount of time
shall be awarded all costs, including reasonable attorney fees,
incurred in connection with such legal action. In addition, it shall
be within the discretion of the court to award such person an amount
not less than five dollars and not to exceed one hundred dollars for
each day that he or she was denied the right to inspect or copy said
public record.
(b) A person requesting public records while incarcerated, detained
in, or committed to any state, local, or federal correctional facility,
secure facility as defined in RCW 71.09.020, or any private facility
contracting with any governmental entity shall not be entitled to any
penalty award for each day he or she was denied requested public
records. Rather, penalties shall be awarded to the crime victims'
compensation program, as outlined in chapter 7.68 RCW, in an amount not
less than five dollars and not to exceed one hundred dollars for each
day that an incarcerated, detained, or committed requester was
wrongfully denied requested public records. An incarcerated, detained,
or committed requester prevailing against an agency in any action under
this chapter shall be awarded all costs, including reasonable attorney
fees, incurred with such action. This provision applies retroactively
to all cases where a penalty award is not a final judgment.
(5) For actions under this section against counties, the venue
provisions of RCW 36.01.050 apply.
(6) Actions under this section must be filed within one year of the
agency's claim of exemption or the last production of a record on a
partial or installment basis.

--- END ---