BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many residents in
the state do not have access to the mainstream financial products and
services that are available to the general public. Despite efforts to
address these inequities, a significant number of people remain
unbanked or underbanked. New and innovative approaches need to be
created to encourage asset building, strengthen economic prosperity,
and ensure the sustainability of these communities.
The legislature intends to establish a framework that will provide
access to capital and services to low-income individuals through a
network of community-based organizations, financial institutions,
consumers, and local and state governments. The creation of this state
framework will allow state-chartered and tribal financial institutions
and credit unions to provide essential financial products and services
to low-income clients. These include, but are not limited to: Earned
income tax credit services, individual development accounts, short-term
loans, wire transmitting services, check cashing, mortgage loan
assistance, and financial literacy training to educate the client on
the importance of savings, investing, and borrowing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Individual development account" or "account" means an account
established by contract between a low-income individual and a
sponsoring organization for the benefit of the low-income individual
and funded through periodic contributions by the low-income individual
that are matched with contributions by or through the sponsoring
organization as provided in RCW 43.31.450 through 43.31.485.
(2) "Low-income individual" means a person whose household income
is equal to or less than either:
(a) Eighty percent of the median family income, adjusted for
household size, for the county or metropolitan statistical area where
the person resides; or
(b) Two hundred percent of the federal poverty guidelines updated
periodically in the federal register by the United States department of
health and human services under the authority of 42 U.S.C. Sec.
9902(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department of financial institutions
and the department of community, trade, and economic development shall
jointly establish the financial services intermediary. The director of
the department of financial institutions and the director of the
department of community, trade, and economic development, or their
designees, shall convene and serve as cochairs of the intermediary.
The intermediary shall consist of ten members, or their designees, as
provided in this subsection.
(a) The director of the department of financial institutions;
(b) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development;
(c) The state treasurer;
(d) The executive director of the Washington state investment
board;
(e) The director of the department of revenue;
(f) The executive director of the housing finance commission;
(g) The executive director of the higher education coordinating
board;
(h) The executive director of the Washington state microenterprise
association;
(i) A member of the state board for community and technical
colleges; and
(j) A member of the financial literacy public-private partnership.
(2) Staff support for the financial services intermediary shall be
provided by the department of financial institutions and the department
of community, trade, and economic development or a person or nonprofit
entity as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The financial services intermediary may contract with a person
or a nonprofit entity to administer the financial services intermediary
who has relationships with the financial services sector and experience
working with nonprofit programs involving asset accumulation for low-income individuals.
(4) The financial services intermediary, in cooperation with the
department of financial institutions and the department of community,
trade, and economic development, shall report to the legislature
November 15th of each year on:
(a) Whether programs of the financial services intermediary have
resulted in broader access to and use of mainstream financial services
and products by low-income individuals; and
(b) From the perspective of financial institutions, whether low-income clients who have participated in programs of the financial
services intermediary are better informed about the financial services
and products available to them.
(5) The financial services intermediary is established to:
(a) Improve the ability of low-income individuals to access and use
mainstream financial products offered by financial institutions;
(b) Identify strategies to make more mainstream financial products
available to low-income individuals;
(c) Coordinate with financial institutions to leverage the
financial resources of low-income individuals served by community-based
asset building coalitions to offer mainstream financial services to
those individuals;
(d) Consult and cooperate with organizations and government
agencies that are already engaged in asset building and financial
literacy activities, such as the financial literacy public-private
partnership established in RCW 28A.300.450;
(e) Enter into memoranda of agreement with community-based asset
building coalitions and financial institutions as provided in section
4 of this act; and
(f) Perform other duties as deemed appropriate by the intermediary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Financial institutions and community-based asset building coalitions choosing to participate in the programs
of the financial services intermediary shall enter into and comply with
the terms of memoranda of agreement with the financial services
intermediary.
(2)(a) Memoranda of agreement between financial institutions and
the financial services intermediary shall require that financial
institutions:
(i) Offer mainstream financial products and services to low-income
individuals who are party to a contract as provided in subsection (3)
of this section;
(ii) Cooperate with and provide feedback to the financial services
intermediary, community-based asset building coalitions, and other
organizations and governmental agencies that are offering financial
literacy programs;
(iii) Provide information to the financial services intermediary to
assist in meeting its reporting requirements in section 3(4) of this
act; and
(iv) Meet other requirements as established through the memoranda
of agreement with the financial services intermediary.
(b) Memoranda of agreement between community-based asset building
coalitions and the financial services intermediary shall require that
community-based asset building coalitions:
(i) Offer individual development account programs as provided in
RCW 43.31.450 through 43.31.485;
(ii) Offer financial literacy programs, approved by the financial
services intermediary, for low-income individuals;
(iii) Provide information to the financial services intermediary to
assist in meeting its reporting requirements in section 3(4) of this
act; and
(iv) Meet other requirements as established by the financial
services intermediary.
(3) Low-income individuals who participate in the programs of the
financial services intermediary shall:
(a) Adhere to rules and procedures for individual development
accounts as established in RCW 43.31.450 through 43.31.485;
(b) Participate in financial literacy programs approved by the
financial services intermediary; and
(c) Meet other requirements as established by the financial
services intermediary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department of financial institutions
shall track and monitor financial institutions' participation in the
programs of the financial services intermediary and share this
information with the intermediary.
(2) Participation by banks in the programs of the financial
services intermediary shall be considered by the director of financial
institutions when he or she assesses the bank's performance record in
meeting community credit needs as provided in RCW 30.60.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---