BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The regional transit authority serving
the Puget Sound region shall work in conjunction with the Puget Sound
regional council to review existing studies and consider other relevant
information for the purpose of determining whether commuter rail
service between eastern Snohomish county and eastern King county, based
on commuter needs, can be a meaningful component of the region's future
transportation system. A feasibility study must be conducted if the
initial review does not provide sufficient information to:
(a) Assess how many riders might be attracted to commuter rail
service in this region;
(b) Identify and evaluate which locations would most benefit from
commuter rail service;
(c) Identify and evaluate potential station sites;
(d) Provide a general analysis of the ability of the existing rail
lines and sections to accommodate commuter rail service, the effect of
this service on existing and planned rail and freight operations, and
an estimate of how tourism in the region might be affected;
(e) Estimate costs for establishing a concurrent bicycle and
pedestrian pathway along or near the Woodinville subdivision; and
(f) Identify which portions of the existing railroad sections would
be most beneficial and cost-effective to develop for commuter rail
service.
(2) The authority and council shall submit a joint report on the
results of their initial review and any feasibility study to the
transportation committees of the house of representatives and senate by
February 1, 2009.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus transportation appropriations act, this
act is null and void.

--- END ---