BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In aquatic rehabilitation zone one, any new or retrofitted on-site sewage disposal systems installed after July 1, 2009, may not
discharge to ground or surface waters more than twenty milligrams per
liter of total nitrogen. In aquatic rehabilitation zone one, any new
or retrofitted wastewater treatment system installed after July 1,
2009, must use all known, available, and reasonable methods of nitrogen
removal.
(2) By December 1, 2008, the department of health and the
department of ecology shall jointly report to the legislature regarding
the impact of removing phosphates from the discharge of on-site sewage
disposal systems and wastewater treatment systems in aquatic
rehabilitation zone one.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW
to read as follows:
In aquatic rehabilitation zone one as designated in RCW 90.88.010,
any new or retrofitted on-site sewage disposal system installed after
July 1, 2009, may not discharge to ground or surface waters more than
twenty milligrams per liter of total nitrogen.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.118A
RCW to read as follows:
In aquatic rehabilitation zone one as designated in RCW 90.88.010,
any new or retrofitted on-site sewage disposal system installed after
July 1, 2009, may not discharge to ground or surface waters more than
twenty milligrams per liter of total nitrogen.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.118B.040 and 2007 c 343 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the protection of human health and the environment, the
secretary shall adopt rules for the comprehensive regulation of large
on-site sewage systems, which includes, but is not limited to, the
siting, design, construction, installation, maintenance, repair, and
permitting of the systems.
(2) In adopting the rules, the secretary shall, in consultation
with the department of ecology, require that large on-site sewage
systems comply with the applicable sections of chapter 90.48 RCW
regarding control and prevention of pollution of waters of the state,
including but not limited to:
(a) Surface and groundwater standards established under RCW
90.48.035; and
(b) Those provisions requiring all known, available, and reasonable
methods of treatment.
(3) In aquatic rehabilitation zone one as designated in RCW
90.88.010, any new or retrofitted large on-site sewage disposal system
installed after July 1, 2009, may not discharge to ground or surface
waters more than twenty milligrams per liter of total nitrogen.
(4) In adopting the rules, the secretary shall ensure that
requirements for large on-site sewage systems are consistent with the
requirements of any comprehensive plans or development regulations
adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW or any other applicable comprehensive
plan, land use plan, or development regulation adopted by a city, town,
or county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
In aquatic rehabilitation zone one as designated in RCW 90.88.010,
any new or retrofitted wastewater treatment system installed after July
1, 2009, must use all known, available, and reasonable methods of
nitrogen removal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---