BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.290 and 2005 c 274 s 409 are each amended to
read as follows:
Records that are relevant to ((a)) an ongoing controversy to which
an agency is a party but which records would not be available to
another party under the rules of pretrial discovery for causes pending
in the superior courts are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.
This exemption does not apply to any records created prior to the
filing of litigation or notice of a legal claim against the agency.

--- END ---