BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.631 and 1984 c 209 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
If an offender violates any condition or requirement of a sentence,
a community corrections officer may arrest or cause the arrest of the
offender without a warrant, pending a determination by the court or a
department of corrections hearing officer. If there is reasonable
cause to believe that an offender has violated a condition or
requirement of the sentence, an offender may be required to submit to
a search and seizure of the offender's person, residence, automobile,
or other personal property. For the safety and security of department
staff, an offender may be required to submit to pat searches or other
limited security searches by community corrections officers,
correctional officers, and other agency approved staff, without
reasonable cause, when present on department premises or vehicles. Pat
searches of female offenders shall only be conducted by female staff
except in emergency situations. A community corrections officer may
also arrest an offender for any crime committed in his or her presence.
The facts and circumstances of the conduct of the offender shall be
reported by the community corrections officer, with recommendations, to
the court or department of corrections hearing officer.
If a community corrections officer arrests or causes the arrest of
an offender under this section, the offender shall be confined and
detained in the county jail of the county in which the offender was
taken into custody, and the sheriff of that county shall receive and
keep in the county jail, where room is available, all prisoners
delivered to the jail by the community corrections officer, and such
offenders shall not be released from custody on bail or personal
recognizance, except upon approval of the court or authorized
department staff, pursuant to a written order.

--- END ---