BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Identity theft is an epidemic in Washington
state. Washington consistently ranks among the top ten states for
citizen victimization by identity theft.
It is rare that the crime of identity theft does not involve
multiple crimes, such as burglary, drug crimes, and fraud. About two-thirds of identity theft criminals are habitual offenders who have
prior convictions. Perpetrators of identity theft do not
geographically contain themselves, often infiltrating numerous counties
in search of citizens, merchants, and financial institutions to
victimize.
It is essential to establish a central clearinghouse where all
types of information related to identity theft can be deposited,
analyzed, and disseminated to law enforcement and prosecutors. A
central identity theft clearinghouse will increase multijurisdictional
investigative and prosecuting efforts, including greater access to and
use of analysts.
In 2002, local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies in
Washington joined together to develop a new system of intelligence
sharing. The key component of the system is the Washington joint
analytical center (WAJAC), a centralized fusion center serving as a
single point of intelligence collection. Regional intelligence groups
located throughout the state provide a link to line level personnel and
homeland security partners. The purpose of WAJAC is to investigate
crimes with the goal of preventing acts of terrorism.
It is the intent of the legislature to create and locate a central
identity theft clearinghouse with WAJAC. This colocation will enhance
the missions of both entities as a result of their ability to share
pertinent information and thus maximize the efforts of law enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
establish the Washington identity theft analysis center (WITAC). It
shall be colocated with the Washington joint analytical center.
(2) WITAC is directed to create and maintain a web site accessible
to law enforcement and prosecutors.
(a) Subject to chapter 10.97 RCW, the web site shall be a central
repository of information pertaining to identity theft arrests and
convictions.
(b) Each local law enforcement agency shall transmit its identity
theft incident reports to WITAC.
(c) Information pertaining to identity theft may be contributed by
private parties; however, data shall not be accessible by or
disclosable to private parties.
(3)(a) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall provide WITAC with sufficient staff and resources, within funds
appropriated for this purpose, and may accept loans of law enforcement
officers as provided in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Law enforcement agencies may assign officers to WITAC for a
minimum term of two years, and WITAC shall train the officers as
analysts. Local law enforcement officers shall be paid by the state
while so employed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of . . . . . . . . dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs to be used for the purposes
of section 2 of this act.

--- END ---