BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that many
Washington families have income that is too low to afford the high cost
of health care, child care, and work-related expenses. Lower-income
families pay a higher percentage of their income in state and local
taxes than do higher-income families. The legislature finds that
higher-income families are able to recover some of the sales and use
taxes that they pay to support state and local government through the
federal income tax deduction for sales and use taxes, but that lower-income people, who are not able to itemize, receive no benefit from
this deduction.
(2) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to evaluate
potential revenue sources and the fiscal cost of providing a sales tax
remittance program for low-income workers who claim the federal earned
income tax credit. To make this evaluation, the department of revenue,
in consultation with the department of community, trade, and economic
development, shall conduct a study. The study must address the
following elements:
(a) Health care expenses, child care expenses, and work-related
expenses, as a percentage of income, for Washington state workers
claiming the federal earned income tax credit and the percentage for
all other workers;
(b) Payments for state and local taxes, as a percentage of income,
for Washington state workers claiming the federal credit and the
percentage for all other workers;
(c) The number of Washington workers who claim the federal earned
income tax credit;
(d) The percentage of returns by county of workers claiming the
credit;
(e) Geographic distribution throughout the state of Washington of
workers who claim the credit;
(f) The percentage of returns of workers claiming the credit who
have one or more qualifying children;
(g) The fiscal cost of providing a Washington state sales tax
remittance program to Washington workers claiming the credit;
(h) Potential revenue sources to fund a Washington state sales tax
remittance program;
(i) Administrative issues related to implementing a Washington
state sales tax remittance program;
(j) Legal issues related to a Washington state sales tax remittance
program;
(k) State refunds, credits, or exemptions for workers provided in
other states that are a percentage of, or based on, the credit.
(3) The study may include any other matters the department
determines necessary for the proper evaluation of the potential
Washington state sales tax remittance program for low-income workers
who claim the federal earned income tax credit.
(4) The department shall report its findings to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "credit" or "federal credit"
means the federal earned income tax credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---