BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that patient safety
and service are essential components of a successful health care
system. Recognizing the limitations of individual providers and
resources, it is not possible for each health care provider to offer
every possible service to every patient in a safe or timely manner. To
that end there has been a long tradition in all areas of the health
care field to utilize a referral process in order to effectively
connect a patient with the services he or she needs. In order to
facilitate safe, timely, medically appropriate, and efficient patient
care, the legislature finds that a standardization of the referral
process in the pharmacy profession is in the best interests of both
patients and pharmacies. Through this process a patient is guaranteed
access to necessary treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Pharmacies have a duty to facilitate the delivery of lawfully
prescribed and medically appropriate drugs or devices and those
approved for restricted distribution by pharmacies, or to facilitate
the delivery of therapeutically equivalent drugs or devices to patients
in a timely manner, except under the following circumstances:
(a) Prescriptions containing obvious or known errors, inadequacies
in the instructions, known contraindications, or incompatible
prescriptions;
(b) Potentially fraudulent prescriptions; and
(c) National or state emergencies or guidelines affecting
availability, usage, or supplies of drugs or devices.
(2) A pharmacy fulfills the duty to facilitate the delivery of
lawfully prescribed medically appropriate drugs or devices if, when
presented with a lawful, medically appropriate prescription, or request
for distribution, a pharmacy:
(a) Dispenses the lawfully prescribed and medically appropriate
drug or device or a therapeutically equivalent alternative drug or
device;
(b) Guarantees the patient's access to the lawfully prescribed and
medically appropriate drug or device by referring the patient to a
pharmacy or medical provider who will provide the care. To complete
the referral, the referring pharmacy shall contact the provider of the
patient's choice to confirm that the drug or device is available, and
transfer the prescription to the new provider; or
(c) If the patient or the patient's caregiver objects to referral,
returns the patient's unfilled prescription.
(3) Nothing in this section requires a pharmacy to deliver a drug
or device without payment of its usual and customary or contracted
charge.
(4) A pharmacy or pharmacist may not be disciplined or
discriminated against in employment or professional privileges for
referring a patient to another provider in lieu of dispensing a drug or
device so long as the pharmacy or pharmacist has complied with the
requirements of this section.

--- END ---