BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall acquire and maintain a ready supply of
antiviral medication to ensure the availability of a full course of
therapy to twenty-five percent of the population of the state during an
epidemic emergency. In determining the necessary quantity for the
supply, the department shall consider any federal supplies of antiviral
medications that have been allocated to the state to offset the amount
that the department must acquire and maintain.
(2) The reserve supply of antiviral medication may only be accessed
and distributed to the public upon the governor's declaration that
there is a severe outbreak of influenza or other infectious disease.

--- END ---