BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of corrections and any community corrections officer
employed by the department of corrections are not civilly liable for
damages arising from acts or omissions in the supervision of offenders
in the community, unless the acts or omissions constitute gross
negligence.

--- END ---