BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.135 and 2000 c 91 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When an offender registers with the county sheriff pursuant to
RCW 9A.44.130, the county sheriff shall notify the police chief or town
marshal of the jurisdiction in which the offender has registered to
live. If the offender registers to live in an unincorporated area of
the county, the sheriff shall make reasonable attempts to verify that
the offender is residing at the registered address. If the offender
registers to live in an incorporated city or town, the police chief or
town marshal shall make reasonable attempts to verify that the offender
is residing at the registered address. Reasonable attempts at
verifying an address shall include at a minimum:
(a) For offenders who have not been previously designated sexually
violent predators under chapter 71.09 RCW or an equivalent procedure in
another jurisdiction, each year the chief law enforcement officer of
the jurisdiction where the offender is registered to live shall send by
certified mail, with return receipt requested, a nonforwardable
verification form to the offender at the offender's last registered
address.
(b) For offenders who have been previously designated sexually
violent predators under chapter 71.09 RCW or the equivalent procedure
in another jurisdiction, even if the designation has subsequently been
removed, every ninety days the county sheriff shall send by certified
mail, with return receipt requested, a nonforwardable verification form
to the offender at the offender's last registered address.
(c) The offender must sign the verification form, state on the form
whether he or she still resides at the last registered address, and
return the form to the chief law enforcement officer of the
jurisdiction where the offender is registered to live within ten days
after receipt of the form.
(2) The chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction where the
offender has registered to live shall make reasonable attempts to
locate any sex offender who fails to return the verification form or
who cannot be located at the registered address. If the offender fails
to return the verification form or the offender is not at the last
registered address, the chief law enforcement officer of the
jurisdiction where the offender has registered to live shall promptly
forward this information to the county sheriff and to the Washington
state patrol for inclusion in the central registry of sex offenders.
(3) When an offender notifies the county sheriff of a change to his
or her residence address pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130, and the new address
is in a different law enforcement jurisdiction, the county sheriff
shall notify the police chief or town marshal of the jurisdiction from
which the offender has moved.
(4)(a) When performing its duties under this section, a law
enforcement agency may request address verification assistance by
sending an offender's name, address, social security number,
photograph, and fingerprints to the department of social and health
services.
(b) Upon receiving information under (a) of this subsection, the
department shall:
(i) Check the information against any database containing
residential address information that is maintained by a state agency to
which the department has access for purposes of child support
enforcement; and
(ii) Within fourteen days, disclose any residential addresses it
has for the offender to the requesting law enforcement agency.
(c) The department of social and health services may not deny a
request made under this subsection because the law enforcement agency
did not submit all of the offender's information required under (a) of
this subsection, but may deny the request if the information submitted
by the law enforcement agency is so incomplete as to make a database
search impracticable.
(d) Requests from law enforcement agencies and responses from the
department of social and health services made under this subsection are
exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of social and health services and its employees are
immune from civil liability for damages arising from sex and kidnapping
offender address verification assistance provided under RCW 9A.44.135
unless the department or employee has acted with gross negligence or in
bad faith.

--- END ---