BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.102.130 and 2003 c 79 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
A city that imposes a business and occupation tax shall provide for
the allocation and apportionment of a person's gross income, other than
persons subject to the provisions of chapter 82.14A RCW, as follows:
(1) Gross income derived from all activities other than those taxed
as service or royalties shall be allocated to the location where the
activity takes place.
(a) In the case of sales of tangible personal property, the
activity takes place where delivery to the buyer occurs.
(b) If a business activity allocated under this subsection (1)
takes place in more than one city and all cities impose a gross
receipts tax, a credit shall be allowed as provided in RCW 35.102.060;
if not all of the cities impose a gross receipts tax, the affected
cities shall allow another credit or allocation system as they and the
taxpayer agree.
(2) Gross income derived as royalties from the granting of
intangible rights shall be allocated to the commercial domicile of the
taxpayer.
(3) Gross income derived from activities taxed as services shall be
apportioned to a city by multiplying apportionable income by a
fraction, the numerator of which is the payroll factor plus the
service-income factor and the denominator of which is two.
(a) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the
total amount paid in the city during the tax period by the taxpayer for
compensation and the denominator of which is the total compensation
paid everywhere during the tax period. Compensation is paid in the
city if:
(i) The individual is primarily assigned within the city;
(ii) The individual is not primarily assigned to any place of
business for the tax period and the employee performs fifty percent or
more of his or her service for the tax period in the city; or
(iii) The individual is not primarily assigned to any place of
business for the tax period, the individual does not perform fifty
percent or more of his or her service in any city(([,])), and the
employee resides in the city.
(b) The service income factor is a fraction, the numerator of which
is the total service income of the taxpayer in the city during the tax
period, and the denominator of which is the total service income of the
taxpayer everywhere during the tax period. Service income is in the
city if:
(i) The customer location is in the city; or
(ii) The income-producing activity is performed in more than one
location and a greater proportion of the service-income-producing
activity is performed in the city than in any other location, based on
costs of performance, and the taxpayer is not taxable at the customer
location; or
(iii) The service-income-producing activity is performed within the
city, and the taxpayer is not taxable in the customer location.
(c) If the allocation and apportionment provisions of this
subsection do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's
business activity in the city or cities in which the taxpayer does
business, the taxpayer may petition for or the tax administrators may
jointly require, in respect to all or any part of the taxpayer's
business activity, that one of the following methods be used jointly by
the cities to allocate or apportion gross income, if reasonable:
(i) Separate accounting;
(ii) The use of a single factor;
(iii) The inclusion of one or more additional factors that will
fairly represent the taxpayer's business activity in the city; or
(iv) The employment of any other method to effectuate an equitable
allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer's income.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Apportionable income" means the gross income of the business
taxable under the service classifications of a city's gross receipts
tax, including income received from activities outside the city if the
income would be taxable under the service classification if received
from activities within the city, less any exemptions or deductions
available.
(b) "Compensation" means wages, salaries, commissions, and any
other form of remuneration paid to individuals for personal services
that are or would be included in the individual's gross income under
the federal internal revenue code.
(c) "Individual" means any individual who, under the usual common
law rules applicable in determining the employer-employee relationship,
has the status of an employee of that taxpayer.
(d) "Customer location" means the location within the city or
unincorporated area of a county where the majority of the contacts
between the taxpayer and the customer take place. For the purposes of
this subsection (4)(d):
(i) It will be presumed that the customer's billing address as
regularly used in the taxpayer's books and records is the "customer
location."
(ii) Where the taxpayer can show that the customer's billing
address is not the location where the majority of the contacts between
the taxpayer and the customer take place, the taxpayer may use the
taxpayer's physical office location as the customer location.
(iii) Cities may require the use of a different customer location,
where there is clear and convincing evidence that the taxpayer has
manipulated the customer's billing address to reduce its municipal tax
obligation.
(e) "Primarily assigned" means the business location of the
taxpayer where the individual performs his or her duties.
(f) "Service-taxable income" or "service income" means gross income
of the business subject to tax under either the service or royalty
classification.
(g) "Tax period" means the calendar year during which tax liability
is accrued. If taxes are reported by a taxpayer on a basis more
frequent than once per year, taxpayers shall calculate the factors for
the previous calendar year for reporting in the current calendar year
and correct the reporting for the previous year when the factors are
calculated for that year, but not later than the end of the first
quarter of the following year.
(h) "Taxable in the customer location" means either that a taxpayer
is subject to a gross receipts tax in the customer location for the
privilege of doing business, or that the government where the customer
is located has the authority to subject the taxpayer to gross receipts
tax regardless of whether, in fact, the government does so.

--- END ---