BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The number of overweight children in the United States has
doubled in the last two to three decades, totaling approximately one
hundred fifty-five million overweight and obese children and teens.
Seventy percent of overweight children become overweight adults;
(b) Obese children have a higher risk of developing serious health
problems, including but not limited to high blood pressure, high
cholesterol, eventual heart disease, sleep apnea, liver disease, and
asthma;
(c) Studies have found that physical activity is an integral part
of avoiding obesity. One such study found that for every weekday an
adolescent participated in a physical education class, the odds of
becoming an obese adult decreased by five percent; and
(d) Recess is often criticized for taking time away from academic
schoolwork and leading to injuries that result in lawsuits against
school districts. However, research shows that a break for physical
activity increases the mental stimulation and focus of students after
they return to their schoolwork. In addition, it has been found that,
without recess, any time saved for schoolwork is canceled by increased
restlessness and lack of attention among students.
(2) Therefore, the purposes of this act are to:
(a) Ensure the opportunity for healthy physical activity for
elementary school children in order to lessen the chances of adolescent
and adult obesity; and
(b) Establish an appreciation for lifelong physical fitness and
activity among elementary school children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Without exception, all public schools shall provide at least
fifteen minutes of uninterrupted recess each school day for students in
grades kindergarten through six.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "recess" means a time period
during which students are not obligated to remain in the regular
classroom and opportunities for physical activity are provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect September 1, 2008.

--- END ---