BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
A person conducting business as a sole proprietorship may credit
against the tax imposed by this chapter, fifty percent of the value
paid during the reporting period for health insurance premiums. The
credit may not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for the
reporting period. Unused credit may be carried over and used in
subsequent tax reporting periods. No refunds are granted for credits
under this section.

--- END ---