BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.86 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No retailer may charge a restocking fee if the merchandise that
is to be returned or exchanged is defective or damaged.
(2) As used in this section, "restocking fee" means a fee charged
by a retailer for the return or exchange of merchandise.

--- END ---