BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, counties and cities shall include the best available science
in developing policies and development regulations to protect the
functions and values of critical areas. In addition, counties and
cities shall give special consideration to conservation or protection
measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous fisheries.
(2) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas. The growth management
hearings boards are directed to adopt procedures and criteria in
consultation with cities and counties for retaining scientific or other
experts under this section and RCW 36.70A.270.
(3) In the development of critical areas policies and development
regulations, counties and cities must address each of the following on
the record:
(a) To demonstrate that the best available science was included:
(i) The specific policies and development regulations adopted to
protect the functions and values of critical areas; and
(ii) The sources of best available scientific information included
in the decision making; and
(b) Any other information, including legal, social, cultural,
economic, and political information, and other programs that may have
been included in developing critical areas policies and regulations.
(4)(a) The department, in collaboration with other state agencies
with jurisdiction and expertise, may adopt written management
recommendations for optional use by cities and counties in protecting
the functions and values of one or more critical areas listed in RCW
36.70A.030(5).
(b) State agencies must demonstrate on the record, as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, that the best available science was
included in developing management recommendations for protecting the
functions and values of critical areas, with consideration of regional
differences among critical areas and the appropriate application of the
management recommendations to protect critical areas.
(c) Management recommendations for cities and counties proposed by
the department in collaboration with other state agencies under this
subsection must be approved through the following process:
(i) The proposed management recommendations shall be submitted for
technical review by scientists and other professionals with expertise
in the relevant scientific and professional disciplines. The reviewing
scientists and other professionals with expertise shall be from
organizations including but not limited to academic institutions;
federal, state, local, and tribal governments; and the private sector.
The results of this technical review must be summarized in writing and
made available on the department's web site;
(ii) Following completion of the technical review process in (c)(i)
of this subsection, notice of the proposed management recommendations
must be published in the state register, and the department must
maintain the full text of the proposed management recommendations on
its web site and accept public comment for a minimum of sixty days from
the date of publication. Comments received during this public review
period must be made available on the department's web site, and will be
considered by the department, in collaboration with other state
agencies with jurisdiction and expertise. Summaries may be provided in
lieu of voluminous or repetitive comments;
(iii) At the close of the technical review process and the public
review period, the department may adopt the management recommendations
by causing a notice of proposed management recommendations for
protecting the functions and values of critical areas to be published
in the state register and on the department's web site. Notice shall
also be provided to persons submitting comments on the proposed
management recommendations during the public review period; and
(iv) At the end of sixty days from the date the notice of proposed
management recommendations for protecting the functions and values of
critical areas is published in the state register, if no petition for
review of the management recommendation has been filed under RCW
36.70A.290, the department shall cause a notice of adoption of final
management recommendations for protecting the functions and values of
critical areas to be published in the state register and on the
department's web site. If a petition for review is filed within sixty
days, the publication of a notice of final management recommendations
for protecting the functions and values of critical areas shall be
delayed until the petition is finally resolved and the management
recommendations are found to comply with this chapter. The filing of
a petition for review shall not affect the use of the management
recommendations for purposes other than under this subsection.
(d) At least once every five years, the department, in
collaboration with other state agencies with jurisdiction and
expertise, shall review and, if necessary to incorporate best available
science that has become available or otherwise to comply with this
chapter, update the management recommendations adopted under this
subsection. The department shall cause a notice of proposed update of
management recommendations for protecting the functions and values of
critical areas or a notice of a decision not to update management
recommendations for protecting the functions and values of critical
areas to be published in the state register and on the department's web
site.
(i) Following publication of a notice of proposed update of
management recommendations, amendments to the management
recommendations shall be adopted through the process set forth in (c)
of this subsection and shall be appealable in the same manner and to
the same extent as the initial management recommendations.
(ii) Following publication of a notice of a decision not to update
management recommendations, any interested person may file a petition
for review of the department's decision within the time provided in RCW
36.70A.290(3). The sole issue before the growth management hearings
board shall be whether the department's decision not to update
management recommendations under this subsection (4)(d) was clearly
erroneous.
(e) Where a county or city states specifically that it has chosen
to develop and adopt all or a portion of its critical areas policies
and regulations through application of final management recommendations
adopted under this subsection, the growth management hearings board or
a reviewing court shall review the county or city policies and
regulations only for consistency with those portions of the final
management recommendations specified by the county or city. The board
or court shall review all other portions of critical areas policies and
regulations for compliance with subsections (1) and (3) of this
section.
(f) Where a county or city chooses not to apply final management
recommendations adopted under this section when developing its critical
areas policies and regulations, the growth management hearings board or
a reviewing court shall review the policies and regulations for
compliance with subsections (1) and (3) of this section.
(g) A growth management hearings board or a reviewing court shall
not consider final management recommendations adopted under this
subsection to be the only means of complying with this chapter's
critical areas protection requirements and best available science
requirements, nor shall a board or court consider final management
recommendations to establish a minimum standard for identifying the
best available science or protecting the functions and values of
critical areas.
(h) This subsection does not alter the requirements in RCW
36.70A.106.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.280 and 2003 c 332 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A growth management hearings board shall hear and determine
only those petitions alleging either:
(a) That a state agency, county, or city planning under this
chapter is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter,
chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption of shoreline master
programs or amendments thereto, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to
plans, development regulations, or amendments, adopted under RCW
36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; ((or))
(b) That the twenty-year growth management planning population
projections adopted by the office of financial management pursuant to
RCW 43.62.035 should be adjusted; or
(c) That the department was clearly erroneous in adopting
management recommendations under RCW 36.70A.172(4) that do not comply
with the requirements of RCW 36.70A.172(4), or that the department's
decision not to update management recommendations under RCW
36.70A.172(4)(d) is clearly erroneous. Any appeal under this
subsection (1)(c) must be heard by a panel comprised of at least two
members from each of the three growth management hearings boards.
(2) Except for petitions filed under subsection (1)(c) of this
section, a petition may be filed only by: (a) The state, or a county
or city that plans under this chapter; (b) a person who has
participated orally or in writing before the county or city regarding
the matter on which a review is being requested; (c) a person who is
certified by the governor within sixty days of filing the request with
the board; or (d) a person qualified pursuant to RCW 34.05.530. A
petition may be filed under subsection (1)(c) of this section only by
a person who has submitted comments during the public review period
specified in RCW 36.70A.172(4)(c)(ii).
(3) For purposes of this section "person" means any individual,
partnership, corporation, association, state agency, governmental
subdivision or unit thereof, Indian tribe, or public or private
organization or entity of any character.
(4) To establish participation standing under subsection (2)(b) of
this section, a person must show that his or her participation before
the county or city was reasonably related to the person's issue as
presented to the board.
(5) When considering a possible adjustment to a growth management
planning population projection prepared by the office of financial
management, a board shall consider the implications of any such
adjustment to the population forecast for the entire state.
The rationale for any adjustment that is adopted by a board must be
documented and filed with the office of financial management within ten
working days after adoption.
If adjusted by a board, a county growth management planning
population projection shall only be used for the planning purposes set
forth in this chapter and shall be known as a "board adjusted
population projection". None of these changes shall affect the
official state and county population forecasts prepared by the office
of financial management, which shall continue to be used for state
budget and planning purposes.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.290 and 1997 c 429 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All requests for review to a growth management hearings board
shall be initiated by filing a petition that includes a detailed
statement of issues presented for resolution by the board. The board
shall render written decisions articulating the basis for its holdings.
The board shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not presented to
the board in the statement of issues, as modified by any prehearing
order.
(2) All petitions relating to whether or not an adopted
comprehensive plan, development regulation, or permanent amendment
thereto, is in compliance with the goals and requirements of this
chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be filed within sixty days
after publication by the legislative bodies of the county or city.
(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the date of
publication for a city shall be the date the city publishes the
ordinance, or summary of the ordinance, adopting the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto, as is required to be
published.
(b) Promptly after adoption, a county shall publish a notice that
it has adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or
amendment thereto.
Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, for purposes of this
section the date of publication for a county shall be the date the
county publishes the notice that it has adopted the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto.
(c) For local governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly
after approval or disapproval of a local government's shoreline master
program or amendment thereto by the department of ecology as provided
in RCW 90.58.090, the local government shall publish a notice that the
shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been approved or
disapproved by the department of ecology. For purposes of this
section, the date of publication for the adoption or amendment of a
shoreline master program is the date the local government publishes
notice that the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been
approved or disapproved by the department of ecology.
(3) All petitions relating to whether management recommendations
adopted by the department under RCW 36.70A.172(4) comply with the
requirements of RCW 36.70A.172(4) must be filed within sixty days after
the notice of proposed management recommendations for protecting the
functions and values of critical areas is published in the state
register pursuant to RCW 36.70A.172(4)(c)(iii).
(4) Unless the board dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds
that the person filing the petition lacks standing, or the parties have
filed an agreement to have the case heard in superior court as provided
in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall, within ten days of receipt of the
petition, set a time for hearing the matter.
(((4))) (5) The board shall base its decision on the record
developed by the city, county, or the state and supplemented with
additional evidence if the board determines that such additional
evidence would be necessary or of substantial assistance to the board
in reaching its decision.
(((5))) (6) The board, shall consolidate, when appropriate, all
petitions involving the review of the same comprehensive plan or the
same development regulation or regulations.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.300 and 1997 c 429 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall issue a final order that shall be based
exclusively on whether or not a state agency, county, or city is in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as
it relates to adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs, or
chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development
regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter
90.58 RCW.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, the
final order shall be issued within one hundred eighty days of receipt
of the petition for review, or, if multiple petitions are filed, within
one hundred eighty days of receipt of the last petition that is
consolidated.
(b) The board may extend the period of time for issuing a decision
to enable the parties to settle the dispute if additional time is
necessary to achieve a settlement, and (i) an extension is requested by
all parties, or (ii) an extension is requested by the petitioner and
respondent and the board determines that a negotiated settlement
between the remaining parties could resolve significant issues in
dispute. The request must be filed with the board not later than seven
days before the date scheduled for the hearing on the merits of the
petition. The board may authorize one or more extensions for up to
ninety days each, subject to the requirements of this section.
(c) In a review under RCW 36.70A.280(1)(c), the board shall issue
a final order within two hundred seventy days of receipt of the
petition for review, or, if multiple petitions are filed, within one
hundred eighty days of receipt of the last petition that is
consolidated. The board may extend this deadline as provided in (b) of
this subsection.
(3) In the final order, the board shall either:
(a) Find that the state agency, county, or city is in compliance
with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates
to the adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter
43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development regulations,
and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; or
(b) Find that the state agency, county, or city is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as
it relates to the adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs,
or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development
regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter
90.58 RCW, in which case the board shall remand the matter to the
affected state agency, county, or city. The board shall specify a
reasonable time not in excess of one hundred eighty days, or such
longer period as determined by the board in cases of unusual scope or
complexity, within which the state agency, county, or city shall comply
with the requirements of this chapter. The board may require periodic
reports to the board on the progress the jurisdiction is making towards
compliance.
(4) Unless the board makes a determination of invalidity as
provided in RCW 36.70A.302, a finding of noncompliance and an order of
remand shall not affect the validity of comprehensive plans and
development regulations during the period of remand.
(5) Any party aggrieved by a final decision of the hearings board
may appeal the decision to superior court as provided in RCW 34.05.514
or 36.01.050 within thirty days of the final order of the board.

--- END ---