BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.835 and 2007 c 491 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All teachers who first become employed by an employer in an
eligible position on or after July 1, 2007, shall have a period of
ninety days to make an irrevocable choice to become a member of plan 2
or plan 3 for the duration of the member's continuous employment
relationship with an employer. At the end of ninety days, if the
member has not made a choice to become a member of plan 2, he or she
becomes a member of plan 3.
(2) Within ninety days of the date that a member either changes
employers or resumes employment after a separation from service from an
employer of no fewer than one and one-half months, he or she has the
option to irrevocably choose membership in plan 2 or plan 3 for the
duration of the member's continuous employment with an employer. For
members of plan 3 this ninety-day period runs simultaneously with the
ninety-day period provided for choosing a contribution rate provided in
RCW 41.34.040(3)(d). At the end of ninety days, if the member has not
made a choice to change plans, the member remains a member of plan 2 or
plan 3, as established in his or her most recent period of employment
with an employer.
(3) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become
a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default under
subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the
department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon
becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service
credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and
all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the
member's plan 3 defined contribution account.
(((3))) (4) The plan choice provision as set forth in section 3,
chapter 491, Laws of 2007 was intended by the legislature as a
replacement benefit for gain-sharing. Until there is legal certainty
with respect to the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW, the right to plan
choice under this section is noncontractual, and the legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal this section. Legal certainty
includes, but is not limited to, the expiration of any: Applicable
limitations on actions; and periods of time for seeking appellate
review, up to and including reconsideration by the Washington supreme
court and the supreme court of the United States. Until that time, all
teachers who first become employed by an employer in an eligible
position on or after July 1, 2007, may choose either plan 2 or plan 3
under this section. If the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW is held to be
invalid in a final determination of a court of law, and the court
orders reinstatement of gain-sharing or other alternate benefits as a
remedy, then all teachers who first become employed by an employer in
an eligible position on or after the date of such reinstatement shall
be members of plan 3.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.35.610 and 2007 c 491 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All classified employees who first become employed by an
employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2007, shall have
a period of ninety days to make an irrevocable choice to become a
member of plan 2 or plan 3 for the duration of the member's continuous
employment relationship with an employer. At the end of ninety days,
if the member has not made a choice to become a member of plan 2, he or
she becomes a member of plan 3.
(2) Within ninety days of the date that a member either changes
employers or resumes employment after a separation from service from an
employer of no fewer than one and one-half months, he or she has the
option to irrevocably choose membership in plan 2 or plan 3 for the
duration of the member's continuous employment with an employer. For
members of plan 3, this ninety-day period runs simultaneously with the
ninety-day period provided for choosing a contribution rate provided in
RCW 41.34.040(3)(d). At the end of ninety days, if the member has not
made a choice to change plans, the member remains a member of plan 2 or
plan 3, as established in his or her most recent period of employment
with an employer.
(3) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become
a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default under
subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the
department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon
becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service
credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and
all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the
member's plan 3 defined contribution account.
(((3))) (4) The plan choice provision as set forth in section 7,
chapter 491, Laws of 2007 was intended by the legislature as a
replacement benefit for gain-sharing. Until there is legal certainty
with respect to the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW, the right to plan
choice under this section is noncontractual, and the legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal this section. Legal certainty
includes, but is not limited to, the expiration of any: Applicable
limitations on actions; and periods of time for seeking appellate
review, up to and including reconsideration by the Washington supreme
court and the supreme court of the United States. Until that time, all
classified employees who first become employed by an employer in an
eligible position on or after July 1, 2007, may choose either plan 2 or
plan 3 under this section. If the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW is held
to be invalid in a final determination of a court of law, and the court
orders reinstatement of gain-sharing or other alternate benefits as a
remedy, then all classified employees who first become employed by an
employer in an eligible position on or after the date of such
reinstatement shall be members of plan 3.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.40.785 and 2000 c 247 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All employees who first become employed by an employer in an
eligible position on or after March 1, 2002, for state agencies or
institutes of higher education, or September 1, 2002, for other
employers, shall have a period of ninety days to make an irrevocable
choice to become a member of plan 2 or plan 3 for the duration of the
member's continuous employment relationship with an employer. At the
end of ninety days, if the member has not made a choice to become a
member of plan 2, he or she becomes a member of plan 3.
(2) Within ninety days of the date that a member either changes
employers or resumes employment after a separation from service from an
employer of no fewer than one and one-half months, he or she has the
option to irrevocably choose membership in plan 2 or plan 3 for the
duration of the member's continuous employment with an employer. For
members of plan 3, this ninety-day period runs simultaneously with the
ninety-day period provided for choosing a contribution rate provided in
RCW 41.34.040(3)(d). At the end of ninety days, if the member has not
made a choice to change plans, the member remains a member of plan 2 or
plan 3, as established in his or her most recent period of employment
with an employer.
(3) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become
a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the
department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon
becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service
credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and
all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the
member's plan 3 defined contribution account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with a final determination by the federal internal revenue
service that is a prescribed condition to favorable tax treatment of
one or more of the retirement plans, the conflicting part of this act
is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to
the individual members directly affected. This finding does not affect
the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the
members concerned. The legislature reserves the right to amend or
repeal this act in the future as may be required to comply with a final
federal determination that amendment or repeal is necessary to maintain
the favorable tax treatment of a plan.

--- END ---