BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A partial exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 in
the form of a remittance is provided for sales to qualifying businesses
of replacement server equipment to be installed, without intervening
use, in an eligible computer data center, and to charges made for labor
and services rendered in respect to installing such replacement server
equipment. The exemption provided in this section applies only to the
state portion of the sales tax.
(2)(a) A qualifying business claiming an exemption under this
section must first pay the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 on sales
eligible for exemption under this section and may then apply to the
department for remittance of fifty percent of the tax paid.
(b) A qualifying business claiming the exemption must submit an
application for remittance to the department, not more often than once
per calendar quarter, in a form and manner as required by the
department. The application must include the amount of exemption
claimed, the purchases for which the exemption is claimed, and such
other information that the department determines is necessary to
determine eligibility for the exemption. A qualifying business
claiming the exemption under this section must keep and preserve
adequate records establishing the qualifying business's eligibility for
the exemption. Pending or approved applications are subject to audit
verification by the department.
(c) The department must, on a quarterly basis, remit exempted
amounts to qualifying businesses that submitted applications during the
previous quarter that were approved, in whole or part, by the
department.
(3) A qualifying business claiming an exemption under this section
must complete the annual survey described in section 5 of this act.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Computer data center" means a facility comprised of one or
more buildings constructed or refurbished specifically, and used
primarily, to house servers, where the facility has the following
characteristics: (i) Uninterruptible power supplies, generator backup
power, or both; (ii) sophisticated fire suppression and prevention
systems; and (iii) enhanced physical security, such as: (A) Restricted
access to the facility to selected personnel; (B) permanent security
guards; video camera surveillance; or an electronic system requiring
passcodes, keycards, or biometric scans, such as hand scans and retinal
or fingerprint recognition; or (C) security features similar to those
in (a)(iii)(A) and (B) of this subsection (4).
(b) "Electronic data storage and data management services" include,
but are not limited to: Providing data storage and backup services,
providing computer processing power, and hosting enterprise software
applications. The term also includes hosting web sites that provide
free or subscription services such as e-mail, web browsing and
searching, media applications, and other related online services.
(c) "Eligible computer data center" means a computer data center
with at least twenty thousand square feet of floor space dedicated to
housing working servers and located in a rural county as defined in RCW
82.14.370(5).
(d) "Qualifying business" means a business entity that exists for
the primary purpose of engaging in commercial activity for profit.
For purposes of this definition, "business entity" means a
corporation, other than a municipal, quasi-municipal, and public or
other corporation created by the state or federal government, tribal
government, municipality, or political subdivision of the state;
association; limited liability company; partnership, including general
partnership, limited partnership, and limited liability partnership; or
other legal entity. Consistent with this definition, "business entity"
does not include the state or federal government or any of their
departments, agencies, and institutions; tribal governments; and
political subdivisions of this state.
(e) "Replacement server equipment" means server equipment that
replaces existing server equipment located at the eligible data center
in which the replacement server equipment will be installed.
(f)(i) "Server" includes blade or rack-mount servers and means a
computer that is used in a computer data center solely to provide
electronic data storage and data management services for internal use
by the owner or lessee of the computer data center, for clients of the
owner or lessee of the computer data center, or both.
(ii) "Server" does not include personal computers.
(g) "Server equipment" means the server chassis and all computer
hardware and software contained within the server chassis. Consistent
with this definition, "server equipment" does not include the racks
upon which the server chassis is installed, cables, and computer
peripherals such as keyboards, monitors, printers, mice, and other
devices that work outside of the computer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A partial exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 in
the form of a remittance is provided for the use by qualifying
businesses of replacement server equipment to be installed, without
intervening use, in an eligible computer data center, and to the use of
labor and services rendered in respect to installing such replacement
server equipment. The exemption provided in this section applies only
to the state portion of the use tax.
(2)(a) A qualifying business claiming an exemption under this
section must first pay the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 on the use of
property and services eligible for exemption under this section and may
then apply to the department for remittance of fifty percent of the tax
paid.
(b) A qualifying business claiming the exemption must submit an
application for remittance to the department, not more often than once
per calendar quarter, in a form and manner as required by the
department. The application must include the amount of exemption
claimed, the acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed, and such
other information that the department determines is necessary to
determine eligibility for the exemption. A qualifying business
claiming the exemption under this section must keep and preserve
adequate records establishing the qualifying business's eligibility for
the exemption. Pending or approved applications are subject to audit
verification by the department.
(c) The department must, on a quarterly basis, remit exempted
amounts to qualifying businesses that submitted applications during the
previous quarter that were approved, in whole or part, by the
department.
(3) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The exemptions in sections 1 and 2 of this act are for the state
portion of the sales and use tax only and do not extend to the taxes
authorized in this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 81.104.170 and 1997 c 450 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation
authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation
benefit areas, and regional transit authorities may submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters and, if approved by a majority of
persons voting, fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with
the terms of this chapter, solely for the purpose of providing high
capacity transportation service.
The tax authorized pursuant to this section shall be in addition to
the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing
district. The maximum rate of such tax shall be approved by the voters
and shall not exceed one percent of the selling price (in the case of
a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax).
The maximum rate of such tax that may be imposed shall not exceed
nine-tenths of one percent in any county that imposes a tax under RCW
82.14.340, or within a regional transit authority if any county within
the authority imposes a tax under RCW 82.14.340. The exemptions in RCW
82.08.820 ((and)), 82.12.820, and sections 1 and 2 of this act are for
the state portion of the sales and use tax and do not extend to the tax
authorized in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) Qualifying businesses claiming an exemption under section 1 or
2 of this act must complete an annual survey. The survey is due by
March 31st of the year following the calendar year in which a sales or
use tax exemption under section 1 or 2 of this act is first claimed and
the seven succeeding calendar years. The survey must include the
amount of sales and use tax exempted. The survey must also include the
following information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax exemption taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on the amount of the
tax exemption taken is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of
RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(2) If a qualifying business fails to complete the annual survey
required under subsection (1)(b) of this section by the date due, an
amount equal to all previously exempted state sales and use taxes is
immediately due and payable. Interest and penalties for taxes due and
payable under this subsection are prospective only. The due date for
determining interest and penalties on taxes payable under this
subsection is April 1st of the year in which the qualifying business
fails to complete the annual survey.
(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee must use the
information to study the sales and use tax exemptions authorized in
this act. The committee must report to the legislature by December 1,
2012, and December 1, 2015. The reports must measure the effect of the
program on job creation, the number of jobs created for Washington
residents in rural counties, company growth, the diversification of the
state's economy in rural counties, growth in high technology investment
in rural counties, the movement of high technology firms operations
into the state, and such other factors as the department selects.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.32.590 and 2006 c 354 s 17, 2006 c 300 s 10, 2006
c 177 s 8, 2006 c 112 s 7, and 2006 c 84 s 7 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey or annual report under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.5351,
82.32.650, 82.32.635, 82.32.640, 82.32.630, 82.32.610, section 5 of
this act, or 82.74.040 by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall extend the
time for filing the survey or report. Such extension shall be for a
period of thirty days from the date the department issues its written
notification to the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under
this section. The department may grant additional extensions as it
deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey or annual report by the due date was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department
shall be guided by rules adopted by the department for the waiver or
cancellation of penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of
any tax was due to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.32.600 and 2007 c 54 s 23 and 2007 c 54 s 22 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file annual surveys or annual reports under
RCW 82.04.4452 or 82.32.5351, 82.32.610, 82.32.630, 82.32.635,
82.32.640, section 5 of this act, or 82.74.040 must electronically file
with the department all surveys, reports, returns, and any other forms
or information the department requires in an electronic format as
provided or approved by the department. As used in this section,
"returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) Any survey, report, return, or any other form or information
required to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of
this section is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---