BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The economy of the state of Washington requires a well-prepared
workforce. To meet that need, more Washington students must be
prepared for postsecondary education and training. Further, the
personal enrichment and success of Washington citizens increasingly
depends on their ability to use the state's postsecondary education and
training system. To accomplish these ends, the legislature intends to
blur the lines between college and high school and increase the number
of students who begin earning college credits while still in high
school.
(2) Many Washington high school students may not realize that they
are capable of college-level work, and not all students have ready and
affordable access to college-level courses. The legislature finds
that, by creating new opportunities to earn college credit in high
school and exposing students to the rigor of college-level work,
students are more likely to believe they can succeed in higher
education and thus, are more likely to enroll in the state's
postsecondary education system.
(3) The legislature also finds that several different types of dual
credit programs are currently available to students, each employing a
different model of instruction. While the programs all serve high
school students who are interested in earning college credit,
eligibility requirements and costs to students vary. Further, there is
no established statewide plan to coordinate these programs.
(4) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to expand access
to dual credit programs and ensure that each is administered in a
cost-effective manner, for students, schools, institutions of higher
education, and the state. The first step in expanding access and
increasing efficiency is to identify a statewide strategic direction
for the further development and funding of dual credit programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The superintendent of public instruction
shall convene a work group that includes representatives from dual
credit programs including representatives from high schools, the tech
prep program, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
public four-year institutions of higher education, the workforce
training and education coordinating board, the higher education
coordinating board, and the council of presidents to develop a
strategic plan for statewide coordination of dual credit programs.
(2) The work group shall examine dual credit programs including but
not limited to running start, college in the high school, tech prep,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate. The examination
shall clearly articulate the purpose and definition of each program,
the goals associated with each program, the personnel required both to
administer and teach each program, the benefits to students, and the
barriers to access. The examination shall also specify, for each
program, the average cost to students as well as the cost to the state,
the school, and the institutions of higher education.
(3) The work group shall recommend a strategic plan for
coordinating the administration of dual credit programs based on the
findings of the examination in this section. The strategic plan shall
identify goals for increased student enrollments, strategies to
increase access and efficiency, options for addressing costs to the
state, schools, and institutions of higher education, and strategies to
contain costs for students and their families.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit the
strategic plan to the education and higher education policy committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---