BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.160.060 and 2007 c 231 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board is authorized to make direct loans to political
subdivisions of the state and to federally recognized Indian tribes for
the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions and federally
recognized Indian tribes in financing the cost of public facilities,
including development of land and improvements for public facilities,
project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility, and marketing studies and plans; project
design, site planning, and analysis; project debt and revenue impact
analysis; as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration,
expansion, or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be
authorized for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and
to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the
limited resources of the political subdivision or the federally
recognized Indian tribe and the finding by the board that financial
circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project to move
forward. However, at least ten percent of all financial assistance
provided by the board in any biennium shall consist of grants to
political subdivisions and federally recognized Indian tribes.
Application for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the
board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board shall conform
to the following requirements:
(1) The board shall not provide financial assistance:
(a) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote a retail shopping development or expansion.
(b) For any project that evidence exists would result in a
development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other
community in the state.
(c) For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and
other fixtures which are a part of real property.
(d) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote gambling.
(2) The board shall only provide financial assistance:
(a) For those projects which would result in specific private
developments or expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food
processing, assembly, warehousing, advanced technology, research and
development, and industrial distribution; (ii) for processing
recyclable materials or for facilities that support recycling,
including processes not currently provided in the state, including but
not limited to, de-inking facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard
waste, and problem-waste processing; (iii) for manufacturing facilities
that rely significantly on recyclable materials, including but not
limited to waste tires and mixed waste paper; (iv) which support the
relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban areas to rural
counties or rural natural resources impact areas; or (v) which
substantially support the trading of goods or services outside of the
state's borders.
(b) For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for
the successful maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial
or commercial plants or will otherwise assist in the creation or
retention of long-term economic opportunities.
(c) When the application includes convincing evidence that a
specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will
occur only if the public facility improvement is made.
(d) For projects that are consistent with goals and objectives
adopted under RCW 43.162.020 by the Washington state economic
development commission, when they are adopted.
(e) For projects that are consistent with the Washington state
workforce training and education coordinating board strategic plan for
workforce development.
(3) The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to:
(a) Statewide priorities identified by the Washington state
economic development commission under RCW 43.162.020, and countywide
priorities identified in plans that are consistent with the elements
required by the Washington state economic development commission;
(b) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the
project would create, not just the total number of jobs it would create
after the project is completed and according to the unemployment rate
in the area in which the jobs would be located;
(((b) The rate of return of the state's investment, that includes
the expected increase in state and local tax revenues associated with
the project;)) and
(c) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007.
(4) A responsible official of the political subdivision or the
federally recognized Indian tribe shall be present during board
deliberations and provide information that the board requests.
Before any financial assistance application is approved, the
political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking
the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is
available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from
the community economic revitalization board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.160.230 (Job development fund program) and 2007 c 231 s
4 & 2005 c 425 s 2;
(2) RCW 43.160.240 (Job development fund program--Maximum grants)
and 2005 c 425 s 3;
(3) RCW 44.28.801 (State public infrastructure programs and funds--Inventory -- Report) and 2006 c 371 s 229 & 2005 c 425 s 5; and
(4) 2005 c 425 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---