BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.12.070 and 2007 c 146 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each employing unit shall keep true and accurate work
records, containing such information as the commissioner may prescribe.
Such records shall be open to inspection and be subject to being copied
by the commissioner or his or her authorized representatives at any
reasonable time and as often as may be necessary. The commissioner may
require from any employing unit any sworn or unsworn reports with
respect to persons employed by it, which he or she deems necessary for
the effective administration of this title.
(b) An employer who contracts with another person or entity for
work subject to chapter 18.27 or 19.28 RCW shall obtain and preserve a
record of the unified business identifier account number for the person
or entity performing the work. Failure to obtain or maintain the
record is subject to RCW 39.06.010 and to a penalty determined by the
commissioner, but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars, to be
collected as provided in RCW 50.24.120.
(2)(a) Each employer shall register with the department and obtain
an employment security account number. ((Registration must include the
names and social security numbers of the owners, partners, members, or
corporate officers of the business, as well as their mailing addresses
and telephone numbers and other information the commissioner may by
rule prescribe. Registration of corporations must also include the
percentage of stock ownership for each corporate officer, delineated by
zero percent, less than ten percent, or ten percent or more. Any
changes in the owners, partners, members, or corporate officers of the
business, and changes in percentage of ownership of the outstanding
shares of stock of the corporation, must be reported to the department
at intervals prescribed by the commissioner under (b) of this
subsection.
(b))) Each employer shall make periodic reports at such intervals
as the commissioner may by regulation prescribe, setting forth the
remuneration paid for employment to workers in its employ, the full
names and social security numbers of all such workers, and the total
hours worked by each worker and such other information as the
commissioner may by regulation prescribe.
(((c))) (b) If the employing unit fails or has failed to report the
number of hours in a reporting period for which a worker worked, such
number will be computed by the commissioner and given the same force
and effect as if it had been reported by the employing unit. In
computing the number of such hours worked, the total wages for the
reporting period, as reported by the employing unit, shall be divided
by the dollar amount of the state's minimum wage in effect for such
reporting period and the quotient, disregarding any remainder, shall be
credited to the worker: PROVIDED, That although the computation so
made will not be subject to appeal by the employing unit, monetary
entitlement may be redetermined upon request if the department is
provided with credible evidence of the actual hours worked. Benefits
paid using computed hours are not considered an overpayment and are not
subject to collections when the correction of computed hours results in
an invalid or reduced claim; however:
(i) A contribution paying employer who fails to report the number
of hours worked will have its experience rating account charged for all
benefits paid that are based on hours computed under this subsection;
and
(ii) An employer who reimburses the trust fund for benefits paid to
workers and fails to report the number of hours worked shall reimburse
the trust fund for all benefits paid that are based on hours computed
under this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.04.165 and 1993 c 290 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Services performed by a person appointed as an officer of a
corporation under RCW 23B.08.400, other than those covered by chapter
50.44 RCW, shall not be considered services in employment. However, a
corporation may elect to cover not less than all of its corporate
officers under RCW 50.24.160. If an employer does not elect to cover
its corporate officers under RCW 50.24.160, the employer must notify
its corporate officers in writing that they are ineligible for
unemployment benefits. However, if the employer fails to ((notify any
corporate officer, then that person shall not be considered to be a
corporate officer for the purposes of this section)) provide notice,
the individual's status as a corporate officer is unchanged and the
person remains ineligible for unemployment benefits.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.04.310 and 2007 c 146 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An individual is "unemployed" in any week during which the
individual performs no services and with respect to which no
remuneration is payable to the individual, or in any week of less than
full time work, if the remuneration payable to the individual with
respect to such week is less than one and one-third times the
individual's weekly benefit amount plus five dollars. The commissioner
shall prescribe regulations applicable to unemployed individuals making
such distinctions in the procedures as to such types of unemployment as
the commissioner deems necessary.
(2) An individual is not "unemployed" during any week which falls
totally within a period during which the individual, pursuant to a
collective bargaining agreement or individual employment contract, is
employed full time in accordance with a definition of full time
contained in the agreement or contract, and for which compensation for
full time work is payable. This subsection may not be applied
retroactively to an individual who had no guarantee of work at the
start of such period and subsequently is provided additional work by
the employer.
(((3) An officer of a corporation who owns ten percent or more of
the outstanding stock of the corporation, or a corporate officer who is
a family member of an officer who owns ten percent or more of the
outstanding stock of the corporation, whose claim for benefits is based
on any wages with that corporation, is:
(a) Not "unemployed" in any week during the individual's term of
office or ownership in the corporation, even if wages are not being
paid;
(b) "Unemployed" in any week upon dissolution of the corporation or
if the officer permanently resigns or is permanently removed from their
appointment and responsibilities with that corporation in accordance
with its articles of incorporation or bylaws.
As used in this section, "family member" means persons who are
members of a family by blood or marriage as parents, stepparents,
grandparents, spouses, children, brothers, sisters, stepchildren,
adopted children, or grandchildren.))

Sec. 4 RCW 50.04.080 and 2007 c 146 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) "Employer" means any individual or type of organization,
including any partnership, association, trust, estate, joint stock
company, insurance company, limited liability company, or corporation,
whether domestic or foreign, or the receiver, trustee in bankruptcy,
trustee, or the legal representative of a deceased person, having any
person in employment or, having become an employer, has not ceased to
be an employer as provided in this title.
(((2) For the purposes of collection remedies available under
chapter 50.24 RCW, "employer," in the case of a corporation or limited
liability company, includes persons found personally liable for any
unpaid contributions and interest and penalties on those contributions
under RCW 50.24.230.
(3) Except for corporations covered by chapters 50.44 and 50.50
RCW, "employer" does not include a corporation when all personal
services are performed only by bona fide corporate officers, unless the
corporation registers with the department as required in RCW 50.12.070
and elects to provide coverage for its corporate officers under RCW
50.24.160.))

Sec. 5 RCW 50.04.090 and 2007 c 146 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) "Employing unit" means any individual or any type of
organization, including any partnership, association, trust, estate,
joint stock company, insurance company, or corporation, whether
domestic or foreign, or the receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, trustee or
successor thereof, or the legal representative of a deceased person,
which has or subsequent to January 1, 1937, had in its employ or in its
"employment" one or more individuals performing services within this
state. The state and its political subdivisions shall be deemed
employing units as to any transactions occurring on or after September
21, 1977, which would render an employing unit liable for
contributions, interest, or penalties under RCW 50.24.130. "Employing
unit" includes Indian tribes as defined in RCW 50.50.010.
(((2) Except for corporations covered by chapters 50.44 and 50.50
RCW, "employing unit" does not include a corporation when all personal
services are performed only by bona fide corporate officers, unless the
corporation registers with the department as required in RCW 50.12.070
and elects to provide coverage for its corporate officers under RCW
50.24.160.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 50.24.230 (Corporate or limited
liability company officers, members, and owners -- Personal liability)
and 2007 c 146 s 18 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 2007 c 146 s 4 is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---