BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department shall administer the roving early
intervention specialist pilot program beginning July 1, 2008. The
purpose of the program is to provide assistance to licensed child care
providers and families with children ages birth to five with special
needs. The pilot shall be conducted in Pierce county.
(2) One roving early intervention specialist shall be housed at a
local child care resource and referral organization in Pierce county.
The specialist shall, at a minimum, have a bachelor of arts degree,
preferably in child and family counseling or early intervention
services. The specialist shall:
(a) Assist families with children with special needs to find child
care and other related services;
(b) Coordinate with families and child care providers to ensure a
child's enrollment and smooth transition into a child care facility;
(c) Recruit new child care providers and provide professional and
technical assistance to licensed child care providers, which includes
site visits to assist with any challenges that the providers are
experiencing and training for the providers; and
(d) Encourage child care providers not to expel a child with
special needs until the specialist has had the opportunity to
ameliorate the concerns.
(3) By August 1, 2009, the department shall report its findings to
the governor and appropriate education and fiscal committees of the
legislature. The department shall report (a) how often the child care
providers serving children with special needs received timely
consulting and evaluation assistance; (b) how many children who might
have been asked to leave a child care facility were retained due to the
intervention of the specialists; and (c) how many child care providers
reported improvement in learning progress and readiness with children
with special needs. The department shall provide recommendations for
increasing the number of roving early intervention specialists to serve
the statewide child care resource and referral network.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---