BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the amount of
banked levy capacity available to taxing districts is unknown. The
legislature further finds that the restoration of one percent limit in
November 2007 did not address the use of banked levy capacity. The
legislature further finds that requiring regular reports on property
tax collections and the amount of banked levy capacity will assist the
legislature and the people in determining how taxing districts should
use banked levy capacity in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW
to read as follows:
Each county assessor, before March 1st each year, must prepare and
submit to the department of revenue a detailed report on property taxes
levied within the county. The report must include assessed valuation,
levy rate, and levy amount for each type of levy by each taxing
district authorized to levy property taxes within the county. The
report must also include information necessary to calculate the
property tax limit contained in chapter 84.55 RCW for each taxing
district, including the regular property tax lawfully levied in the
three most recent years; the amount of new construction, improvements
to property, and the increase in assessed value of state-assessed
property; the tax rate for the preceding year; the levy amount
requested by the taxing district; copies of ordinances adopted under
RCW 84.55.0101 and 84.55.120; copies of ballot propositions authorizing
increases in the limit under RCW 84.55.050; the amount of levy capacity
available under RCW 84.55.092; and other information the department of
revenue may request. The department must compile the information
submitted by county assessors and submit a report to the legislature by
September 30th of each year.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) The regular property tax levy for each taxing district other
than the state may be set at the amount which would be allowed
otherwise under this chapter if the regular property tax levy for the
district for taxes due in prior years beginning with 1986 had been set
at the full amount allowed under this chapter including any levy
authorized under RCW 52.16.160 that would have been imposed but for the
limitation in RCW 52.18.065, applicable upon imposition of the benefit
charge under chapter 52.18 RCW.
(2) The purpose of this section is to remove the incentive for a
taxing district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum level permitted
under this chapter, and to protect the future levy capacity of a taxing
district that reduces its tax levy below the level that it otherwise
could impose under this chapter, by removing the adverse consequences
to future levy capacities resulting from such levy reductions.
(3) Until calendar year 2010, to set a regular property tax levy at
an amount authorized under this section, a taxing district must submit
an authorizing proposition to the voters for approval by a majority of
the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition. Elections
for this purpose must be held at a primary or general election.

--- END ---