BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.020 and 1985 c 360 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to promote the health, safety and
welfare of the occupants or users of buildings and structures and the
general public by the provision of building codes throughout the state
and by allowing a cause of action for damages based on the negligent
failure of a county or city to enforce the provisions of the state
building code. Accordingly, this chapter is designed to effectuate the
following purposes, objectives, and standards:
(1) To require minimum performance standards and requirements for
construction and construction materials, consistent with accepted
standards of engineering, fire and life safety.
(2) To require standards and requirements in terms of performance
and nationally accepted standards.
(3) To permit the use of modern technical methods, devices and
improvements.
(4) To eliminate restrictive, obsolete, conflicting, duplicating
and unnecessary regulations and requirements which could unnecessarily
increase construction costs or retard the use of new materials and
methods of installation or provide unwarranted preferential treatment
to types or classes of materials or products or methods of
construction.
(5) To provide for standards and specifications for making
buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by ((physically
disabled persons)) individuals with disabilities.
(6) To consolidate within each authorized enforcement jurisdiction,
the administration and enforcement of building codes.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.050 and 1985 c 360 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state building code required by this chapter shall be
enforced by the counties and cities. A county or city is liable for
damages caused by their negligent failure to enforce the provisions of
the state building code. The liability of a county or city is limited
to fifty percent of the actual damages proved.
(2) Any county or city not having a building department shall
contract with another county, city, or inspection agency approved by
the county or city for enforcement of the state building code within
its jurisdictional boundaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 7.06.010 and 7.06.020, all
actions, regardless of the amount in claim, for damages resulting from
the negligent failure of a county or city to enforce the provisions of
the state building code are subject to mandatory arbitration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) As provided in this section, a city must refund building
permit fees to the applicant when the inspector who inspects the
facility on behalf of the city to which the permit applies fails to
require the builder to remedy building code violations documented
through the inspection.
(b) If the cost to remedy the documented code violations is less
than the amount of the applicable building permit, the amount refunded
by the city must equal the cost of the actions necessary to remedy the
violations. If the cost to remedy the documented violations is equal
to or greater than the amount of the applicable building permit, the
city must refund the full permit fee.
(2) Nothing in this section confers immunity upon a city or
otherwise relieves a city from damages resulting from the failure of
the city to properly discharge duties mandated under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) As provided in this section, a code city must refund
building permit fees to the applicant when the inspector who inspects
the facility on behalf of the code city to which the permit applies
fails to require the builder to remedy building code violations
documented through the inspection.
(b) If the cost to remedy the documented code violations is less
than the amount of the applicable building permit, the amount refunded
by the code city must equal the cost of the actions necessary to remedy
the violations. If the cost to remedy the documented violations is
equal to or greater than the amount of the applicable building permit,
the code city must refund the full permit fee.
(2) Nothing in this section confers immunity upon a code city or
otherwise relieves a code city from damages resulting from the failure
of the code city to properly discharge duties mandated under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) As provided in this section, a county must refund building
permit fees to the applicant when the inspector who inspects the
facility on behalf of the county to which the permit applies fails to
require the builder to remedy building code violations documented
through the inspection.
(b) If the cost to remedy the documented code violations is less
than the amount of the applicable building permit, the amount refunded
by the county must equal the cost of the actions necessary to remedy
the violations. If the cost to remedy the documented violations is
equal to or greater than the amount of the applicable building permit,
the county must refund the full permit fee.
(2) Nothing in this section confers immunity upon a county or
otherwise relieves a county from damages resulting from the failure of
the county to properly discharge duties mandated under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon receipt of an application for a building permit, a city must:
(1) Notify the applicant of the municipal fire department or fire
district that serves the property to which the application applies; and
(2) notify the applicant if a fire truck is unable to serve that
property. Notifications required under this section must be made to
the permit applicant within fourteen days of the city's receipt of an
application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon receipt of an application for a building permit, a code city
must: (1) Notify the applicant of the municipal fire department or
fire district that serves the property to which the application
applies; and (2) notify the applicant if a fire truck is unable to
serve that property. Notifications required under this section must be
made to the permit applicant within fourteen days of the code city's
receipt of an application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon receipt of an application for a building permit, a county
must: (1) Notify the applicant of the municipal fire department or
fire district that serves the property to which the application
applies; and (2) notify the applicant if a fire truck is unable to
serve that property. Notifications required under this section must be
made to the permit applicant within fourteen days of the county's
receipt of an application.

--- END ---