BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.08.120 and 2000 c 138 s 210 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All material and work required by a port district not meeting
the definition of public work in RCW 39.04.010(4) may be procured in
the open market or by contract and all work ordered may be done by
contract or day labor.
(2)(a) All such contracts for work meeting the definition of
"public work" in RCW 39.04.010(4), the estimated cost of which exceeds
two hundred thousand dollars, shall be awarded using a competitive bid
process. The contract must be ((let)) awarded at public bidding upon
notice published in a newspaper of general circulation in the district
at least thirteen days before the last date upon which bids will be
received, calling for ((sealed)) bids upon the work, plans and
specifications for which shall then be on file in the office of the
commission for public inspection. The same notice may call for bids on
such work or material based upon plans and specifications submitted by
the bidder. The competitive bidding requirements for purchases or
public works may be waived pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption
contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.
((However)) (b) For all contracts related to work meeting the
definition of "public work" in RCW 39.04.010(4) that are estimated at
two hundred thousand dollars or less, a port district may let contracts
using the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155 in lieu of
((calling)) advertising for ((sealed)) bids. Whenever possible, the
managing official shall invite at least one proposal from a minority
contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this section.
When awarding such a contract for work, when utilizing proposals
from the small works roster, the managing official shall give weight to
the contractor submitting the lowest and best proposal, and whenever it
would not violate the public interest, such contracts shall be
distributed equally among contractors, including minority contractors,
on the small works roster.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.30.020 and 1974 ex.s. c 74 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other remedies or penalties contained in any
law, municipal charter, ordinance, resolution or other enactment, any
municipal officer by or through whom or under whose supervision, in
whole or in part, any contract is made in ((wilful)) willful and
intentional violation of any law, municipal charter, ordinance,
resolution or other enactment requiring competitive bidding, including
consulting, architectural, engineering, or other services, upon such
contract shall be held liable to a civil penalty of not less than three
hundred dollars and may be held liable, jointly and severally with any
other such municipal officer, for all consequential damages to the
municipal corporation. If, as a result of a criminal action, the
violation is found to have been intentional, the municipal officer
shall immediately forfeit his or her office. For purposes of this
section, "municipal officer" ((shall)) means an "officer" or "municipal
officer" as those terms are defined in RCW 42.23.020(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW
to read as follows:
By January 1, 2010, each port with more than ten million dollars in
annual gross revenues, excluding grant and loan funds, shall maintain
a database on a public web site of all contracts, including public
works and personal services. At a minimum, the database shall identify
the contractor, the purpose of the contract, effective dates and
periods of performance, the cost of the contract and funding source,
any modifications to the contract, and whether the contract was
competitively procured or awarded on a sole source basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislature hereby establishes a policy
of open competition for all personal service contracts entered into by
port districts unless specifically exempted under this chapter. It is
further the intent to provide differentiation between the competitive
procurement procedures for personal and professional services
contracts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the elected oversight body of an individual
port.
(2) "Competitive solicitation" means a documented formal process
providing an equal and open opportunity to qualified parties and
culminating in a selection based on criteria, in which criteria other
than price may be the primary basis for consideration. The criteria
may include such factors as the consultant's fees or costs, ability,
capacity, experience, reputation, responsiveness to time limitations,
responsiveness to solicitation requirements, quality of previous
performance, and compliance with statutes and rules relating to
contracts or services.
(3) "Consultant" means an independent individual or firm
contracting with a port to perform a service or render an opinion or
recommendation according to the consultant's methods and without being
subject to the control of the port except as to the result of the work.
The port monitors progress under the contract and authorizes payment.
(4) "Emergency" means a set of unforeseen circumstances beyond the
control of the port that either:
(a) Present a real, immediate threat to the proper performance of
essential functions; or
(b) May result in material loss or damage to property, bodily
injury, or loss of life if immediate action is not taken.
(5) "Evidence of competition" means documentation demonstrating
that the port has solicited responses from multiple firms in selecting
a consultant.
(6) "Personal service" means professional or technical expertise
provided by a consultant to accomplish a specific study, project, task,
or other work statement which may not reasonably be required in
connection with a public works project meeting the definition in RCW
39.04.010(4). "Personal service" does not include purchased services
as defined under subsection (8) of this section or professional
services procured using the competitive selection requirements in
chapter 39.80 RCW.
(7) "Personal service contract" means an agreement, or any
amendment thereto, with a consultant for the rendering of personal
services to the port.
(8) "Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. "Purchased
services" includes, but is not limited to, services for equipment
maintenance and repair; operation of a physical plant; security;
computer hardware and software maintenance; data entry; key punch
services; and computer time-sharing, contract programming, and
analysis.
(9) "Sole source" means a consultant providing professional or
technical expertise of such a unique nature that the consultant is
clearly and justifiably the only practicable source to provide the
service. The justification shall be based on the uniqueness of the
service, sole availability at the location required, or warranty or
defect correction service obligations of the consultant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 All personal service contracts shall be
entered into pursuant to competitive solicitation, except for:
(1) Emergency contracts;
(2) Sole source contracts;
(3) Contract amendments;
(4) Contracts between a consultant and a port of less than fifty
thousand dollars. However, contracts of fifty thousand dollars or
greater but less than two hundred thousand dollars shall have
documented evidence of competition. Ports shall not structure
contracts to evade these requirements; and
(5) Other specific contracts or classes or groups of contracts
exempted from the competitive solicitation process by the commission
when it has been determined that a competitive solicitation process is
not appropriate or cost-effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Emergency contracts shall be filed with the
commission and made available for public inspection within seven
working days following the commencement of work or execution of the
contract, whichever occurs first. Documented justification for
emergency contracts shall be provided to the commission when the
contract is filed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Sole source contracts shall be filed
with the commission and made available for public inspection prior to
the proposed starting date of the contract. Documented justification
for sole source contracts shall be provided to the commission when the
contract is filed. For sole source contracts of fifty thousand dollars
or more, documented justification shall include evidence that the port
attempted to identify potential consultants.
(2) Ports shall ensure that the costs, fees, or rates negotiated in
filed sole source contracts of fifty thousand dollars or more are
reasonable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A port commissioner or employee shall not
expend any funds for personal service contracts subject to this chapter
unless the port has complied with the competitive procurement and other
requirements of this chapter. The port commissioner or employee
executing the personal service contracts is responsible for compliance
with the requirements of this chapter. Willful and intentional failure
to comply with the requirements of this chapter subjects the port
commissioner or employee to a civil penalty in the amount of three
hundred dollars. A consultant who knowingly violates this chapter in
seeking or performing work under a personal services contract is
subject to a civil penalty of three hundred dollars or twenty-five
percent of the amount of the contract, whichever is greater. The state
auditor is responsible for auditing violations of this chapter through
its regular financial and accountability audits. The attorney general
is responsible for prosecuting violations of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Substantial changes in the scope of
work specified in the contract or which are substantial additions to
the scope of work specified in the formal solicitation document shall
be submitted to the commission for a determination as to whether the
change warrants the work to be awarded as a new contract.
(2) An amendment or amendments to personal service contracts, if
the value of the amendment or amendments, whether singly or
cumulatively, exceeds fifty percent of the value of the original
contract must be filed with the commission and made available for
public inspection prior to the proposed starting date of services under
the amendments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This chapter does not apply to:
(1) Contracts specifying a fee of less than fifty thousand dollars;
(2) Contracts awarded to companies that furnish a service where the
tariff is established by the utilities and transportation commission or
other public entity;
(3) Intergovernmental agreements awarded to any governmental
entity, whether federal, state, or local and any department, division,
or subdivision thereof;
(4) Contracts awarded for services to be performed for a standard
fee, when the standard fee is established by the contracting agency or
any other governmental entity and a like contract is available to all
qualified applicants;
(5) Contracts for services that are necessary to the conduct of
collaborative research if prior approval is granted by the funding
source;
(6) Contracts for professional services which are entered into
under chapter 39.80 RCW; and
(7) Contracts for the employment of expert witnesses for the
purposes of litigation or legal services to supplement the expertise of
port staff.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The municipal research services center,
in cooperation with the Washington public ports association, shall
develop guidelines for the effective and efficient management of
personal service contracts by all ports. The guidelines must, at a
minimum, include:
(a) Accounting methods, systems, measures, and principles to be
used by ports and consultants;
(b) Precontract procedures for selecting potential consultants
based on their qualifications and ability to perform;
(c) Incorporation of performance measures and measurable benchmarks
in contracts, and the use of performance audits;
(d) Uniform contract terms to ensure contract performance and
compliance with port, state, and federal standards;
(e) Proper payment and reimbursement methods to ensure that the
port receives full value for taxpayer moneys, including cost
settlements and cost allowance;
(f) Postcontract procedures, including methods for recovering
improperly spent or overspent moneys for disallowance and adjustment;
(g) Adequate contract remedies and sanctions to ensure compliance;
(h) Monitoring, fund tracking, risk assessment, and auditing
procedures and requirements;
(i) Financial reporting, record retention, and record access
procedures and requirements;
(j) Procedures and criteria for terminating contracts for cause or
otherwise; and
(k) Any other subject related to effective and efficient contract
management.
(2) The municipal research services center shall submit a status
report on the guidelines required by subsection (1) of this section to
the governor and the appropriate standing committees of the legislature
no later than December 1, 2008.
(3) The Washington public ports association shall publish a
guidebook for use by ports containing the guidelines developed under
subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The municipal research services center and the Washington
public ports association shall each make the guidelines available on
their web sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) A port entering into or amending
personal service contracts shall follow the policies adopted by the
commission, which shall be based on guidelines developed pursuant to
section 12 of this act.
(2) This section applies to ports entering into or renewing
contracts after January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The Washington public ports association
shall provide a training course for port personnel responsible for
executing and managing personal service contracts. The course must
contain training on effective and efficient contract management under
the guidelines established under section 12 of this act. Port
districts shall require port employees responsible for executing or
managing personal service contracts to complete the training course to
the satisfaction of the commission.

Sec. 15 RCW 39.04.010 and 2007 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Award" means the formal decision by the state or municipality
notifying a responsible bidder with the lowest responsive bid of the
((state)) state's or municipality's acceptance of the bid and intent to
enter into a contract with the bidder.
(2) "Contract" means a contract in writing for the execution of
public work for a fixed or determinable amount duly awarded after
advertisement and competitive bid, or a contract awarded under the
small works roster process in RCW 39.04.155.
(3) "Municipality" means every city, county, town, port district,
district, or other public agency authorized by law to require the
execution of public work, except drainage districts, diking districts,
diking and drainage improvement districts, drainage improvement
districts, diking improvement districts, consolidated diking and
drainage improvement districts, consolidated drainage improvement
districts, consolidated diking improvement districts, irrigation
districts, or other districts authorized by law for the reclamation or
development of waste or undeveloped lands.
(4) "Public work" means all work, construction, alteration, repair,
or improvement other than ordinary maintenance, executed at the cost of
the state or of any municipality, or which is by law a lien or charge
on any property therein. All public works, including maintenance when
performed by contract shall comply with chapter 39.12 RCW. "Public
work" does not include work, construction, alteration, repair, or
improvement performed under contracts entered into under RCW
36.102.060(4) or under development agreements entered into under RCW
36.102.060(7) or leases entered into under RCW 36.102.060(8).
(5) "Responsible bidder" means a contractor who meets the criteria
in RCW 39.04.350.
(6) "State" means the state of Washington and all departments,
supervisors, commissioners, and agencies of the state.

Sec. 16 RCW 39.04.155 and 2007 c 218 s 87, 2007 c 210 s 1, and
2007 c 133 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This section provides uniform small works roster provisions to
award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling,
alteration, repair, or improvement of real property that may be used by
state agencies and by any local government that is expressly authorized
to use these provisions. These provisions may be used in lieu of other
procedures to award contracts for such work with an estimated cost of
two hundred thousand dollars or less. The small works roster process
includes the limited public works process authorized under subsection
(3) of this section and any local government authorized to award
contracts using the small works roster process under this section may
award contracts using the limited public works process under subsection
(3) of this section.
(2)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may create a
single general small works roster, or may create a small works roster
for different specialties or categories of anticipated work. Where
applicable, small works rosters may make distinctions between
contractors based upon different geographic areas served by the
contractor. The small works roster or rosters shall consist of all
responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list, and where
required by law are properly licensed or registered to perform such
work in this state. A state agency or local government establishing a
small works roster or rosters may require eligible contractors desiring
to be placed on a roster or rosters to keep current records of any
applicable licenses, certifications, registrations, bonding, insurance,
or other appropriate matters on file with the state agency or local
government as a condition of being placed on a roster or rosters. At
least once a year, the state agency or local government shall publish
in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction a notice
of the existence of the roster or rosters and solicit the names of
contractors for such roster or rosters. In addition, responsible
contractors shall be added to an appropriate roster or rosters at any
time they submit a written request and necessary records. Master
contracts may be required to be signed that become effective when a
specific award is made using a small works roster.
(b) A state agency establishing a small works roster or rosters
shall adopt rules implementing this subsection. A local government
establishing a small works roster or rosters shall adopt an ordinance
or resolution implementing this subsection. Procedures included in
rules adopted by the department of general administration in
implementing this subsection must be included in any rules providing
for a small works roster or rosters that is adopted by another state
agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage in these
activities has been delegated to it by the department of general
administration under chapter 43.19 RCW. An interlocal contract or
agreement between two or more state agencies or local governments
establishing a small works roster or rosters to be used by the parties
to the agreement or contract must clearly identify the lead entity that
is responsible for implementing the provisions of this subsection.
(c) Procedures shall be established for securing telephone,
written, or electronic quotations from contractors on the appropriate
small works roster to assure that a competitive price is established
and to award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, as defined in
RCW 39.04.010. Invitations for quotations shall include an estimate of
the scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as materials
and equipment to be furnished. However, detailed plans and
specifications need not be included in the invitation. This subsection
does not eliminate other requirements for architectural or engineering
approvals as to quality and compliance with building codes. Quotations
may be invited from all appropriate contractors on the appropriate
small works roster. As an alternative, quotations may be invited from
at least five contractors on the appropriate small works roster who
have indicated the capability of performing the kind of work being
contracted, in a manner that will equitably distribute the opportunity
among the contractors on the appropriate roster. However, if the
estimated cost of the work is from one hundred thousand dollars to two
hundred thousand dollars, a state agency or local government((, other
than a port district,)) that chooses to solicit bids from less than all
the appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster must
also notify the remaining contractors on the appropriate small works
roster that quotations on the work are being sought. The government
has the sole option of determining whether this notice to the remaining
contractors is made by: (i) Publishing notice in a legal newspaper in
general circulation in the area where the work is to be done; (ii)
mailing a notice to these contractors; or (iii) sending a notice to
these contractors by facsimile or other electronic means. For purposes
of this subsection (2)(c), "equitably distribute" means that a state
agency or local government soliciting bids may not favor certain
contractors on the appropriate small works roster over other
contractors on the appropriate small works roster who perform similar
services.
(d) A contract awarded from a small works roster under this section
need not be advertised.
(e) Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained
shall be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by
telephone inquiry.
(3) In lieu of awarding contracts under subsection (2) of this
section, a state agency or authorized local government may award a
contract for work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement
projects estimated to cost less than thirty-five thousand dollars using
the limited public works process provided under this subsection.
Public works projects awarded under this subsection are exempt from the
other requirements of the small works roster process provided under
subsection (2) of this section and are exempt from the requirement that
contracts be awarded after advertisement as provided under RCW
39.04.010.
For limited public works projects, a state agency or authorized
local government shall solicit electronic or written quotations from a
minimum of three contractors from the appropriate small works roster
and shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder as
defined under RCW 39.04.010. After an award is made, the quotations
shall be open to public inspection and available by electronic request.
A state agency or authorized local government shall attempt to
distribute opportunities for limited public works projects equitably
among contractors willing to perform in the geographic area of the
work. A state agency or authorized local government shall maintain a
list of the contractors contacted and the contracts awarded during the
previous twenty-four months under the limited public works process,
including the name of the contractor, the contractor's registration
number, the amount of the contract, a brief description of the type of
work performed, and the date the contract was awarded. For limited
public works projects, a state agency or authorized local government
may waive the payment and performance bond requirements of chapter
39.08 RCW and the retainage requirements of chapter 60.28 RCW, thereby
assuming the liability for the contractor's nonpayment of laborers,
mechanics, subcontractors, materialpersons, suppliers, and taxes
imposed under Title 82 RCW that may be due from the contractor for the
limited public works project, however the state agency or authorized
local government shall have the right of recovery against the
contractor for any payments made on the contractor's behalf.
(4) The breaking of any project into units or accomplishing any
projects by phases is prohibited if it is done for the purpose of
avoiding the maximum dollar amount of a contract that may be let using
the small works roster process or limited public works process.
(5)(a) A state agency or authorized local government may use the
limited public works process of subsection (3) of this section to
solicit and award small works roster contracts to small businesses that
are registered contractors with gross revenues under one million
dollars annually as reported on their federal tax return.
(b) A state agency or authorized local government may adopt
additional procedures to encourage small businesses that are registered
contractors with gross revenues under two hundred fifty thousand
dollars annually as reported on their federal tax returns to submit
quotations or bids on small works roster contracts.
(6) As used in this section, "state agency" means the department of
general administration, the state parks and recreation commission, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife,
the department of transportation, any institution of higher education
as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated
authority by the department of general administration to engage in
construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration,
improvement, or repair activities.

Sec. 17 RCW 53.12.270 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 12 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The commission may delegate to the managing official of a port
district such administerial powers and duties of the commission as it
may deem proper for the efficient and proper management of port
district operations. Any such delegation shall be authorized by
appropriate resolution of the commission, which resolution must also
establish guidelines and procedures for the managing official to
follow.
(2) The commission shall establish, by resolution, policies to
comply with RCW 39.04.280 that set forth the conditions by which
competitive bidding requirements for public works contracts may be
waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 4 through 14 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 53 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---