BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.30.020 and 2000 c 11 s 84 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state horse park is hereby established, to be
located at a site approved by the commission. In approving a site for
the state horse park, the commission shall consider areas with large
blocks of land suitable for park development, the distance to various
population centers in the state, the ease of transportation to the site
for large vehicles traveling along either a north-south or an east-west
corridor, and other factors deemed important by the commission.
(2) Ownership of land for the state horse park shall be as follows:
(a) The commission is vested with and shall retain ownership of
land provided by the state for the state horse park. Any lands
acquired by the commission after July 23, 1995, for the state horse
park shall be purchased under chapter 79A.15 RCW. The legislature
encourages the commission to provide a long-term lease of the selected
property to the Washington state horse park authority at a minimal
charge. The lease shall contain provisions ensuring public access to
and use of the horse park facilities, and generally maximizing public
recreation opportunities at the horse park, provided that the facility
remains available primarily for horse-related activities.
(b) Land provided for the state horse park by the county or city in
which the park is located shall remain in the ownership of that county
or city unless the county or city determines otherwise. The
legislature encourages the county or city to provide a long-term lease
of selected property to the Washington state horse park authority at a
minimal charge.
(c) If the authority acquires additional lands through donations,
grants, or other means, or with funds generated from the operation of
the state horse park, the authority shall retain ownership of those
lands. The authority shall also retain ownership of horse park site
improvements paid for by or through donations or gifts to the
authority.
(3) Development, promotion, operation, management, and maintenance
of the state horse park is the responsibility of the authority created
in RCW 79A.30.030.

--- END ---