BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) A 1990 study of the shortage of trained health care specialists
confirmed that there is a need for health care professionals with
multiple skills in rural areas;
(b) Low patient volumes in rural hospitals and primary care clinics
continue to make it financially difficult to hire and retain separate
individuals with skills from each of these health care specialist
professions. The result is that patients continue to be forced to seek
health care in urban areas because the care cannot be provided locally;
and
(c) Some limited cross-credentialing of health care specialists,
including health care assistants, radiologic technologists, respiratory
therapists, and pharmacy and laboratory technologists, without a
reduction in the quality of health care provided by such individuals,
continues to be desirable in rural areas where shortages in health care
professionals exist. In addition, expansion of the health care
services that may be delegated to these health care specialists also
would increase access to health care in rural areas.
(2) The department of health, in consultation with the board of
health, the higher education coordinating board, representatives of
rural hospitals and rural primary health care clinics, and other
appropriate entities selected by the department of health, shall:
(a) Update the study conducted by the department of health in 1990
on methods to create opportunities for developing a pool of individuals
who are cross-trained in the specialty services provided by health care
assistants, radiologic technologists, respiratory therapists, and
pharmacy and laboratory technologists; and
(b) Assess the potential for improving rural health care if
additional authority is granted for licensed health care professionals
to delegate the provision of health care services to health care
specialists.
(3) The department of health shall:
(a) Assess the need in rural areas for health care specialists with
multiple skills;
(b) Assess the need in rural areas for licensed health care
professionals to have additional authority to delegate the provision of
health care services to health care specialists;
(c) Determine the barriers to cross-credentialing health care
specialists with multiple skills without reducing the quality of health
care;
(d) Examine current training, education, and state credentialing
requirements for each of the affected professions;
(e) Identify what training and educational requirements are needed
to allow for the medical practice of individuals with multiple skills;
(f) Develop recommendations on changes in current credentialing
requirements to allow for credentialing of individuals with multiple
skills; and
(g) Develop recommendations on the rural areas of the state in
which the practice of either cross-credentialed individuals or
expansion of delegation authority, or both should be allowed.
(4) The department of health shall report to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2008, on changes necessary in current credentialing requirements to
accomplish its recommendations.

--- END ---