BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.42.030 and 1994 c 163 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of natural resources may by contract, license,
or permit, or other arrangements, cause such wood debris to be removed
by private contractors, department of natural resources employees, or
by other public bodies.
(2) When wood debris is interfering or threatening to interfere
with the operation of a dam, the department of natural resources must
use the authority granted in this section to either remove or authorize
the removal of the wood debris within thirty days of the dam operator
or affected utility district providing written notice to the
commissioner of public lands that wood debris is interfering or
threatening to interfere with a dam's operation.
(3) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit any individual
from using any nonmerchantable wood debris for ((his)) the individual's
own personal use.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.42.060 and 2003 c 39 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, it shall be
unlawful to dispose of wood debris by depositing such material into any
of the navigable waters of this state((, except as)).
(2)(a) Wood debris may be deposited into navigable waters of the
state if authorized by law ((including)). Lawful wood debris deposits
include any discharge or deposit allowed to be made under and in
compliance with chapter 90.48 RCW and any rules duly adopted thereunder
or any deposit allowed to be made under and in compliance with chapter
76.09 or 77.85 RCW and any rules duly adopted under those chapters.
(b) Wood debris that is removed under RCW 76.42.030 for
interference with a dam's operation may not be returned to the
navigable waters of the state or deposited upon river banks or riparian
shoreline areas.
(3) Violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.55.041 and 2005 c 146 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
The removal of ((derelict fishing gear)) the following material
does not require a permit under this chapter:
(1) Derelict fishing gear if the gear is removed according to the
guidelines described in RCW 77.12.865; and
(2) Wood debris if the wood debris is removed under RCW 76.42.030
for interference with a dam's operation.

--- END ---