BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that many sewage
treatment facilities in the Puget Sound watershed manage excess
capacity not by building extra containment facilities or minimizing
passive introductions, but by allowing raw and untreated human sewage
and storm drain collections to flow directly into the Puget Sound.
This practice, although destructive to the Puget Sound's ecosystem, is
a legal activity and an accepted practice under the national pollution
discharge elimination system permit held by most sewage treatment
facilities.
(2) The legislature further finds that recent years have brought
with them significant investments in the health of Puget Sound, both by
the state, federal government, tribal governments, nonprofit
organizations, and the business community. These investments have come
in the form of policy initiatives, financial contributions, and
countless hours of volunteer labor.
(3) The legislature further finds that although sewage treatment
facilities may be technically allowed to discharge untreated sewage
into the Puget Sound, that does not mean that the entities responsible
for the facilities should be entitled to receive recognition as a Puget
Sound partner, and the benefits that come with the designation, while
actively embracing policies that result in a significant undermining of
the investments made to restore the health of Puget Sound.
(4) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to avoid the
creation of a mechanism that rewards sewage treatment facilities for
operating in a way that is destructive to the health of Puget Sound,
and to send a strong message to sewage treatment facilities that there
is a difference between how they are legally permitted to operate and
how they should choose to operate as good neighbors to a treasured and
imperiled aquatic ecosystem.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.71.340 and 2007 c 341 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature intends that fiscal incentives and
disincentives be used as accountability measures designed to achieve
consistency with the action agenda by:
(a) Ensuring that projects and activities in conflict with the
action agenda are not funded;
(b) Aligning environmental investments with strategic priorities of
the action agenda; and
(c) Using state grant and loan programs to encourage consistency
with the action agenda.
(2) The council shall adopt measures to ensure that funds
appropriated for implementation of the action agenda and identified by
proviso or specifically referenced in the omnibus appropriations act
pursuant to RCW 43.88.030(1)(g) are expended in a manner that will
achieve the intended results. In developing such performance measures,
the council shall establish criteria for the expenditure of the funds
consistent with the responsibilities and timelines under the action
agenda, and require reporting and tracking of funds expended. The
council may adopt other measures, such as requiring interagency
agreements regarding the expenditure of provisoed or specifically
referenced Puget Sound funds.
(3) The partnership shall work with other state agencies providing
grant and loan funds or other financial assistance for projects and
activities that impact the health of the Puget Sound ecosystem under
chapters 43.155, 70.105D, 70.146, 77.85, 79.105, 79A.15, 89.08, and
90.50A RCW to, within the authorities of the programs, develop
consistent funding criteria that prohibits funding projects and
activities that are in conflict with the action agenda.
(4)(a)(i) The partnership shall develop a process and criteria by
which entities that consistently achieve outstanding progress in
implementing the action agenda are designated as Puget Sound partners.
(ii) No public entity may be named a Puget Sound partner if that
entity operates a sewage treatment system and:
(A) Has as a condition of its national pollution discharge
elimination system permit, or other government approval of its
operations, a provision to discharge untreated sewage into the Puget
Sound during storm events; and
(B) Has actually discharged more than one million gallons of
untreated sewage in any one hour, either lawfully or unlawfully, into
the Puget Sound within the previous five years.
(b) State agencies shall work with the partnership to revise their
grant, loan, or other financial assistance allocation criteria to
create a preference for entities designated as Puget Sound partners for
funds allocated to the Puget Sound basin, pursuant to RCW 43.155.070,
70.105D.070, 70.146.070, 77.85.130, 79.105.150, 79A.15.040, 89.08.520,
and 90.50A.040. This process shall be developed on a timeline that
takes into consideration state grant and loan funding cycles.
(5) Any entity that receives state funds to implement actions
required in the action agenda shall report biennially to the council on
progress in completing the action and whether expected results have
been achieved within the time frames specified in the action agenda.

--- END ---