BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the purpose of
this act is to create a uniform interest rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The "uniform interest rate" means an
interest rate that is calculated for financial obligations annually
each December, at the rate of two percentage points above the
equivalent coupon yield, based on the previous six months average
auction rate for twenty-six week treasury bills. Interest shall accrue
at this rate during the succeeding calendar year.

Sec. 3 RCW 3.62.020 and 2004 c 15 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
costs, fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected in
whole or in part by district courts, except costs, fines, forfeitures
and penalties assessed and collected, in whole or in part, because of
the violation of city ordinances, shall be remitted by the clerk of the
district court to the county treasurer at least monthly, together with
a financial statement as required by the state auditor, noting the
information necessary for crediting of such funds as required by law.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 10.99.080, the county treasurer shall
remit thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received under
subsection (1) of this section except certain costs to the state
treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means those
costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010
or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in
criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other
similar statutes if such costs are specifically designated as costs by
the court and are awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs
incurred by the state or county in the prosecution of the case,
including the fees of defense counsel. Money remitted under this
subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited as provided in RCW
43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received by the county
treasurer under subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in
the county current expense fund.
(4) All money collected for county parking infractions shall be
remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly, with the
information required under subsection (1) of this section, to the
county treasurer for deposit in the county current expense fund.
(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest, upon assignment to a collection agency, at the uniform
interest rate ((of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency)) set forth in section 2 of this act. Interest may
accrue only while the case is in collection status.
(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the county current
expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county current expense
fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 4 RCW 3.62.040 and 2004 c 15 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
costs, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected, in
whole or in part, by district courts because of violations of city
ordinances shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court at
least monthly directly to the treasurer of the city wherein the
violation occurred.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 10.99.080, the city treasurer shall
remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received
under this section, other than for parking infractions and certain
costs, to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this
subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil
actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against
convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) All money collected for city parking infractions shall be
remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly to the
city treasurer for deposit in the city's general fund.
(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest, upon assignment to a collection agency, at the uniform
interest rate ((of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency)) set forth in section 2 of this act. Interest may
accrue only while the case is in collection status.
(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund,
and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 5 RCW 4.56.110 and 2004 c 185 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Interest on judgments shall accrue as follows:
(1) Judgments founded on written contracts, providing for the
payment of interest until paid at a specified rate, shall bear interest
at the rate specified in the contracts((: PROVIDED, That said)) if the
interest rate is set forth in the judgment.
(2) All judgments for unpaid child support that have accrued under
a superior court order or an order entered under the administrative
procedure act shall bear interest at the uniform interest rate ((of
twelve percent)) set forth in section 2 of this act.
(3) Judgments founded on the tortious conduct of individuals or
other entities, whether acting in their personal or representative
capacities, shall bear interest from the date of entry at ((two
percentage points above the equivalent coupon issue yield, as published
by the board of governors of the federal reserve system, of the average
bill rate for twenty-six week treasury bills as determined at the first
bill market auction conducted during the calendar month immediately
preceding the date of entry)) the uniform interest rate set forth in
section 2 of this act. In any case where a court is directed on review
to enter judgment on a verdict or in any case where a judgment entered
on a verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on review, interest on the
judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed shall date back to
and shall accrue from the date the verdict was rendered.
(4) Except as provided under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this
section, judgments shall bear interest from the date of entry at the
maximum rate permitted under RCW 19.52.020 on the date of entry
thereof. In any case where a court is directed on review to enter
judgment on a verdict or in any case where a judgment entered on a
verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on review, interest on the
judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed shall date back to
and shall accrue from the date the verdict was rendered at the uniform
interest rate set forth in section 2 of this act. ((The method for
determining an interest rate prescribed by this subsection is also the
method for determining the "rate applicable to civil judgments" for
purposes of RCW 10.82.090.))

Sec. 6 RCW 8.12.470 and 1947 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Wherever any assessment or installment thereof shall become
delinquent, the city treasurer shall enforce the collection thereof in
the same manner as provided in chapter 9, Laws of 1933 (([as codified
in chapter 35.50 RCW])), or such other laws as may be hereafter enacted
for the foreclosure of delinquent local (physical) improvement
assessments. All assessments or installments unpaid at the expiration
of the time fixed herein for the payment of the same((,)) shall bear
interest from the expiration date until paid at the uniform interest
rate ((of ten percent per annum, from said date until paid)) set forth
in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 8.25.230 and 1974 ex.s. c 79 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
A lien established as provided in RCW 8.25.220 shall be satisfied
or released by:
(1) Agreement between the parties to that effect; or
(2) Payment of the lien amount plus interest at the uniform
interest rate ((of five percent per annum)) set forth in section 2 of
this act; or
(3) Payment, within four years of the date of acquisition, of the
amount of offsetting special benefits as established pursuant to RCW
8.25.220(3) plus interest at the uniform interest rate ((of five
percent per annum within four years of the date of acquisition)) set
forth in section 2 of this act; or
(4) Satisfaction of a judgment lien entered as a result of a trial
before a jury unless jury be waived to establish the change in value of
the remainder of the original parcel because of the construction of the
project involved: PROVIDED, That if the result of the trial is to find
no special benefits then the lien is extinguished by operation of law.
Trial may be had on the petition of any party to the superior court of
the county wherein the subject remainder lies after notice of intent to
try the matter of special benefits has been served on all persons
having an interest in the subject remainder. Such notice shall be
filed with the clerk of the superior court and personally served upon
all persons having an interest in the subject remainder. Filing a
notice of intent to try the matter of special benefits shall be
accompanied by a fee in the amount paid when filing a petition in
condemnation.
(5) Upon expiration of six years time from the date of acquisition
without commencement of proceedings to foreclose the lien or try the
matter of special benefits to the remainder of the property, the lien
shall terminate by operation of law.

Sec. 8 RCW 8.25.240 and 1974 ex.s. c 79 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
A judgment entered as a result of a trial on the matter of special
benefits shall not exceed the previously established sum of (1) the
fair market value of any property taken; (2) the amount of damages if
any to a remainder of the property, without offsetting against either
of them the amount of any special benefits accruing to a remainder of
the property; (3) the interest ((at five percent per annum accrued
thereon to the date of entry of the judgment)) at the uniform interest
rate set forth in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 10.82.090 and 2004 c 121 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, financial
obligations imposed in a judgment shall bear interest from the date of
the judgment until payment, at the uniform interest rate ((applicable
to civil judgments)) set forth in section 2 of this act. All
nonrestitution interest retained by the court shall be split twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the public safety
and education account as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent
to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system
account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the county
current expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county current
expense fund to fund local courts.
(2) The court may, on motion by the offender, following the
offender's release from total confinement, reduce or waive the interest
on legal financial obligations levied as a result of a criminal
conviction. The court may reduce or waive the interest only as an
incentive for the offender to meet his or her legal financial
obligations. The court may not waive the interest on the restitution
portion of the legal financial obligation and may only reduce the
interest on the restitution portion of the legal financial obligation
if the principal of the restitution has been paid in full. The
offender must show that he or she has personally made a good faith
effort to pay, that the interest accrual is causing a significant
hardship, and that he or she will be unable to pay the principal and
interest in full and that reduction or waiver of the interest will
likely enable the offender to pay the full principal and any remaining
interest thereon. For purposes of this section, "good faith effort"
means that the offender has either (a) paid the principal amount in
full; or (b) made twenty-four consecutive monthly payments, excluding
any payments mandatorily deducted by the department of corrections, on
his or her legal financial obligations under his or her payment
agreement with the court. The court may grant the motion, establish a
payment schedule, and retain jurisdiction over the offender for
purposes of reviewing and revising the reduction or waiver of interest.
This section applies to persons convicted as adults or in juvenile
court.

Sec. 10 RCW 15.08.150 and 1961 c 11 s 15.08.150 are each amended
to read as follows:
If before or at the hearing the amount of the claim and the
auditor's and sheriff's fees are paid to the county treasurer, he shall
deliver to the auditor a duplicate receipt of the payment and the
auditor shall cancel the lien and notify the county commissioners
thereof. The treasurer shall pay the funds to the persons entitled
thereto as appears from the records in the auditor's office.
If payment is not made, the auditor shall present to the board of
county commissioners a verified copy of the record and claim, which
shall be accepted in any proceeding as prima facie evidence of the
truth of the contents thereof. The board shall receive and consider
the record and claim and all sworn testimony offered, and shall enter
an order fixing the amount of the claim and costs, and direct the
amount paid from the current expense fund, and the auditor shall draw
warrants therefor. The auditor shall record the order in his office as
other lien claims and it shall be a lien against the premises in favor
of the county, and shall bear interest ((at six percent per year)) from
the date of the order at the uniform interest rate set forth in section
2 of this act.

Sec. 11 RCW 21.20.430 and 1998 c 15 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person, who offers or sells a security in violation of any
provisions of RCW 21.20.010, 21.20.140 (1) or (2), or 21.20.180 through
21.20.230, is liable to the person buying the security from him or her,
who may sue either at law or in equity to recover the consideration
paid for the security, together with interest ((at eight percent per
annum)) from the date of payment at the uniform interest rate set forth
in section 2 of this act, costs, and reasonable attorneys' fees, less
the amount of any income received on the security, upon the tender of
the security, or for damages if he or she no longer owns the security.
Damages are the amount that would be recoverable upon a tender less (a)
the value of the security when the buyer disposed of it and (b)
interest ((at eight percent per annum)) from the date of disposition at
the uniform interest rate set forth in section 2 of this act.
(2) Any person who buys a security in violation of the provisions
of RCW 21.20.010 is liable to the person selling the security to him or
her, who may sue either at law or in equity to recover the security,
together with any income received on the security, upon tender of the
consideration received, costs, and reasonable attorneys' fees, or if
the security cannot be recovered, for damages. Damages are the value
of the security when the buyer disposed of it, and any income received
on the security, less the consideration received for the security, plus
interest ((at eight percent per annum)) from the date of disposition at
the uniform interest rate set forth in section 2 of this act, costs,
and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(3) Every person who directly or indirectly controls a seller or
buyer liable under subsection (1) or (2) above, every partner, officer,
director or person who occupies a similar status or performs a similar
function of such seller or buyer, every employee of such a seller or
buyer who materially aids in the transaction, and every broker-dealer,
salesperson, or person exempt under the provisions of RCW 21.20.040 who
materially aids in the transaction is also liable jointly and severally
with and to the same extent as the seller or buyer, unless such person
sustains the burden of proof that he or she did not know, and in the
exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the existence of
the facts by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist. There
is contribution as in cases of contract among the several persons so
liable.
(4)(a) Every cause of action under this statute survives the death
of any person who might have been a plaintiff or defendant.
(b) No person may sue under this section more than three years
after the contract of sale for any violation of the provisions of RCW
21.20.140 (1) or (2) or 21.20.180 through 21.20.230, or more than three
years after a violation of the provisions of RCW 21.20.010, either was
discovered by such person or would have been discovered by him or her
in the exercise of reasonable care. No person may sue under this
section if the buyer or seller receives a written rescission offer,
which has been passed upon by the director before suit and at a time
when he or she owned the security, to refund the consideration paid
together with interest ((at eight percent per annum)) from the date of
payment at the uniform interest rate set forth in section 2 of this
act, less the amount of any income received on the security in the case
of a buyer, or plus the amount of income received on the security in
the case of a seller.
(5) No person who has made or engaged in the performance of any
contract in violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or
order hereunder, or who has acquired any purported right under any such
contract with knowledge of the facts by reason of which its making or
performance was in violation, may base any suit on the contract. Any
condition, stipulation, or provision binding any person acquiring any
security to waive compliance with any provision of this chapter or any
rule or order hereunder is void.
(6) Any tender specified in this section may be made at any time
before entry of judgment.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (6) of this section, if
an initial offer or sale of securities that are exempt from
registration under RCW 21.20.310 is made by this state or its agencies,
political subdivisions, municipal or quasi-municipal corporations, or
other instrumentality of one or more of the foregoing and is in
violation of RCW 21.20.010(2), and any such issuer, member of the
governing body, committee member, public officer, director, employee,
or agent of such issuer acting on its behalf, or person in control of
such issuer, member of the governing body, committee member, public
officer, director, employee, or agent of such person acting on its
behalf, materially aids in the offer or sale, such person is liable to
the purchaser of the security only if the purchaser establishes
scienter on the part of the defendant. The word "employee" or the word
"agent," as such words are used in this subsection, do not include a
bond counsel or an underwriter. Under no circumstances whatsoever
shall this subsection be applied to require purchasers to establish
scienter on the part of bond counsels or underwriters. The provisions
of this subsection are retroactive and apply to any action commenced
but not final before July 27, 1985. In addition, the provisions of
this subsection apply to any action commenced on or after July 27,
1985.

Sec. 12 RCW 15.26.220 and 1969 c 129 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the event any person fails to pay the full amount of such
assessment or such other sum on or before the due date, the commission
may add to such unpaid assessment or sum an amount not more than ten
percent but not less than one dollar of the same to defray the cost of
enforcing the collection of such assessment, together with interest per
month on the unpaid balance ((of one percent per month)) commencing the
first month following the month in which payment was due at the uniform
interest rate set forth in section 2 of this act. In the event of
failure of such person or persons to pay any such due and payable
assessment or other such sum, the commission may bring a civil action
against such person or persons in a state court of competent
jurisdiction for the collection thereof, together with the interest and
the above specified ten percent thereon, and such reasonable attorneys'
fees as may be allowed by the court, and such action shall be tried and
judgment rendered as in any other cause of action for debt due and
payable.

Sec. 13 RCW 15.62.150 and 1989 c 5 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All assessments shall be collected by the commission on a
quarterly basis or as otherwise determined by the commission.
(2) The commission shall create a local fund in a local financial
institution approved by the director and shall deposit therein, each
day, all moneys received by the commission except an amount for petty
cash as fixed by commission regulations. Moneys in the fund shall only
be expended for the purposes of this chapter. Moneys in the fund are
not subject to appropriation.
(3) The commission fund is authorized to receive such gifts,
grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made
from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of
the purposes of the commission and expend the same or any income
therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.
(4) If an affected person fails to remit any assessment, such
assessment, plus interest ((at the rate of one percent)) per month from
the due date at the uniform interest rate set forth in section 2 of
this act, shall constitute a personal debt of the person assessed or
who otherwise owes the assessment and shall be due and payable within
thirty days from the date it becomes first due the commission. In the
event of failure of the person to pay due and payable assessments, the
commission may bring civil action against the person in a state court
of competent jurisdiction for collection thereof, together with any
reasonable costs including attorneys' fees. The action shall be tried
and judgment rendered as in any other cause of action for debt due and
payable. This provision is in addition to the penalty section
contained in RCW 15.62.220.

Sec. 14 RCW 26.18.110 and 1998 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An employer upon whom service of a wage assignment order has
been made shall answer the order by sworn affidavit within twenty days
after the date of service. The answer shall state whether the obligor
is employed by or receives earnings or other remuneration from the
employer, whether the employer will honor the wage assignment order,
and whether there are either multiple child support or spousal
maintenance attachments, or both, against the obligor.
(2) If the employer possesses any earnings or remuneration due and
owing to the obligor, the earnings subject to the wage assignment order
shall be withheld immediately upon receipt of the wage assignment
order. The withheld earnings shall be delivered to the Washington
state support registry or, if the wage assignment order is to satisfy
a duty of spousal maintenance, to the addressee specified in the
assignment within five working days of each regular pay interval.
(3) The employer shall continue to withhold the ordered amounts
from nonexempt earnings or remuneration of the obligor until notified
by:
(a) The court that the wage assignment has been modified or
terminated; or
(b) The Washington state support registry or obligee that the
accrued child support or spousal maintenance debt has been paid,
provided the wage assignment order contains the language set forth
under RCW 26.18.100(3)(b). The employer shall promptly notify the
addressee specified in the assignment when the employee is no longer
employed. If the employer no longer employs the employee, the wage
assignment order shall remain in effect for one year after the employee
has left the employment or the employer has been in possession of any
earnings or remuneration owed to the employee, whichever is later. The
employer shall continue to hold the wage assignment order during that
period. If the employee returns to the employer's employment during
the one-year period the employer shall immediately begin to withhold
the employee's earnings or remuneration according to the terms of the
wage assignment order. If the employee has not returned within one
year, the wage assignment shall cease to have effect at the expiration
of the one-year period, unless the employer continues to owe
remuneration for employment to the obligor.
(4) The employer may deduct a processing fee from the remainder of
the employee's earnings after withholding under the wage assignment
order, even if the remainder is exempt under RCW 26.18.090. The
processing fee may not exceed (a) ten dollars for the first
disbursement made by the employer to the Washington state support
registry; and (b) one dollar for each subsequent disbursement to the
clerk.
(5) An order for wage assignment for support for a dependent child
entered under this chapter shall have priority over any other wage
assignment or garnishment, except for another wage assignment or
garnishment for child support, or order to withhold and deliver under
chapter 74.20A RCW. An order for wage assignment for spousal
maintenance entered under this chapter shall have priority over any
other wage assignment or garnishment, except for a wage assignment,
garnishment, or order to withhold and deliver under chapter 74.20A RCW
for support of a dependent child, and except for another wage
assignment or garnishment for spousal maintenance.
(6) An employer who fails to withhold earnings as required by a
wage assignment issued under this chapter may be held liable to the
obligee for one hundred percent of the support or spousal maintenance
debt, or the amount of support or spousal maintenance moneys that
should have been withheld from the employee's earnings whichever is the
lesser amount, if the employer:
(a) Fails or refuses, after being served with a wage assignment
order, to deduct and promptly remit from the unpaid earnings the
amounts of money required in the order;
(b) Fails or refuses to submit an answer to the notice of wage
assignment after being served; or
(c) Is unwilling to comply with the other requirements of this
section.
Liability may be established in superior court. Awards in superior
court shall include costs, interest under RCW ((19.52.020 and))
4.56.110(3), and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(7) No employer who complies with a wage assignment issued under
this chapter may be liable to the employee for wrongful withholding.
(8) No employer may discharge, discipline, or refuse to hire an
employee because of the entry or service of a wage assignment issued
and executed under this chapter. If an employer discharges,
disciplines, or refuses to hire an employee in violation of this
section, the employee or person shall have a cause of action against
the employer. The employer shall be liable for double the amount of
damages suffered as a result of the violation and for costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees, and shall be subject to a civil penalty of
not more than two thousand five hundred dollars for each violation.
The employer may also be ordered to hire, rehire, or reinstate the
aggrieved individual.
(9) For wage assignments payable to the Washington state support
registry, an employer may combine amounts withheld from various
employees into a single payment to the Washington state support
registry, if the payment includes a listing of the amounts attributable
to each employee and other information as required by the registry.
(10) An employer shall deliver a copy of the wage assignment order
to the obligor as soon as is reasonably possible.

Sec. 15 RCW 26.23.030 and 1997 c 58 s 905 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created a Washington state support registry within the
division of child support as the agency designated in Washington state
to administer the child support program under Title IV-D of the federal
social security act. The registry shall:
(a) Provide a central unit for collection of support payments made
to the registry;
(b) Account for and disburse all support payments received by the
registry;
(c) Maintain the necessary records including, but not limited to,
information on support orders, support debts, the date and amount of
support due; the date and amount of payments; and the names, social
security numbers, and addresses of the parties;
(d) Develop procedures for providing information to the parties
regarding action taken by, and support payments collected and
distributed by the registry; and
(e) Maintain a state child support case registry to compile and
maintain records on all child support orders entered in the state of
Washington.
(2) The division of child support may assess and collect interest
((at the rate of twelve percent)) per year on unpaid child support that
has accrued under any support order entered into the registry at the
uniform interest rate set forth in section 2 of this act. This
interest rate shall not apply to those support orders already
specifying an interest assessment at a different rate.
(3) The secretary of social and health services shall adopt rules
for the maintenance and retention of records of support payments and
for the archiving and destruction of such records when the support
obligation terminates or is satisfied. When a support obligation
established under court order entered in a superior court of this state
has been satisfied, a satisfaction of judgment form shall be prepared
by the registry and filed with the clerk of the court in which the
order was entered.

Sec. 16 RCW 26.23.090 and 1997 c 296 s 13 and 1997 c 58 s 894 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The employer shall be liable to the Washington state support
registry, or to the agency or firm providing child support enforcement
for another state, under Title IV-D of the federal social security act
and issuing a notice, garnishment, or wage assignment attaching wages
or earnings in satisfaction of a support obligation, for the amount of
support moneys which should have been withheld from the employee's
earnings, if the employer:
(a) Fails or refuses, after being served with a notice of payroll
deduction, or substantially similar action issued by the agency or firm
providing child support enforcement for another state, under Title IV-D
of the federal social security act, to deduct and promptly remit from
unpaid earnings the amounts of money required in the notice;
(b) Fails or refuses to submit an answer to the notice of payroll
deduction, or substantially similar action issued by the agency or firm
providing child support enforcement for another state, under Title IV-D
of the federal social security act, after being served; or
(c) Is unwilling to comply with the other requirements of RCW
26.23.060.
(2) Liability may be established in superior court or may be
established pursuant to RCW 74.20A.350. Awards in superior court and
in actions pursuant to RCW 74.20A.350 shall include costs, interest
under ((RCW 19.52.020 and 4.56.110)) section 2 of this act, and
reasonable attorneys' fees and staff costs as a part of the award.
Debts established pursuant to this section may be collected by the
division of child support using any of the remedies available under
chapter 26.09, 26.18, ((26.21)) 26.21A, 26.23, 74.20, or 74.20A RCW for
the collection of child support.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.17.240 and 1991 c 85 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Interest ((at the rate of one percent)) per month((, or fraction
thereof,)) shall accrue on debts owed to the state, starting on the
date the debts become past due at the uniform interest rate set forth
in section 2 of this act. This section does not apply to: (1) Any
instance where such interest rate would conflict with the provisions of
a contract or with the provisions of any other law; or (2) debts to be
paid by other governmental units. The office of financial management
may adopt rules specifying circumstances under which state agencies may
waive interest, such as when assessment or collection of interest would
not be cost-effective. This section does not affect any authority of
the state to charge or collect interest under any other law on a debt
owed to the state by a governmental unit. This section applies only to
debts which become due on or after July 28, 1991.

Sec. 18 RCW 46.87.310 and 1996 c 91 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any owner whose application for proportional registration has been
accepted shall preserve the records on which the application is based
for a period of four years following the preceding year or period upon
which the application is based. These records shall be complete and
shall include, but not be limited to, the following: Copies of
proportional registration applications and supplements for all
jurisdictions in which the fleet is prorated; proof of proportional or
full registration with other jurisdictions; vehicle license or trip
permits; temporary authorization permits; documents establishing the
latest purchase year and cost of each fleet vehicle in ready-for-the-road condition; weight certificates indicating the unladen, ready-for-the-road, weight of each vehicle in the fleet; periodic summaries of
mileage by fleet and by individual vehicles; individual trip reports,
driver's daily logs, or other source documents maintained for each
individual trip that provide trip dates, points of origin and
destinations, total miles traveled, miles traveled in each
jurisdiction, routes traveled, vehicle equipment number, driver's full
name, and all other information pertinent to each trip. Upon request
of the department, the owner shall make the records available to the
department at its designated office for audit as to accuracy of
records, computations, and payments. The department shall assess and
collect any unpaid fees and taxes found to be due the state and provide
credits or refunds for overpayments of Washington fees and taxes as
determined in accordance with formulas and other requirements
prescribed in this chapter. If the owner fails to maintain complete
records as required by this section, the department shall attempt to
reconstruct or reestablish such records. However, if the department is
unable to do so and the missing or incomplete records involve mileages
accrued by vehicles while they are part of the fleet, the department
may assess an amount not to exceed the difference between the
Washington proportional fees and taxes paid and one hundred percent of
the fees and taxes. Further, if the owner fails to maintain complete
records as required by this section, or if the department determines
that the owner should have registered more vehicles in this state under
this chapter, the department may deny the owner the right of any
further benefits provided by this chapter until any final audit or
assessment made under this chapter has been satisfied.
The department may audit the records of any owner and may make
arrangements with agencies of other jurisdictions administering motor
vehicle registration laws for joint audits of any such owner. No
assessment for deficiency or claim for credit may be made for any
period for which records are no longer required. Any fees, taxes,
penalties, or interest found to be due and owing the state upon audit
shall bear interest ((at the rate of one percent)) per month((, or
fraction thereof,)) from the first day of the calendar month after the
amount should have been paid until the date of payment at the uniform
interest rate set forth in section 2 of this act. If the audit
discloses a deliberate and willful intent to evade the requirements of
payment under RCW 46.87.140, a penalty of ten percent shall also be
assessed.
If the audit discloses that an overpayment to the state in excess
of ten dollars has been made, the department shall certify the
overpayment to the state treasurer who shall issue a warrant for the
overpayment to the vehicle operator. Overpayments shall bear interest
((at the rate of eight percent)) per annum from the date on which the
overpayment is incurred until the date of payment at the uniform
interest rate set forth in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 19 RCW 49.48.083 and 2006 c 89 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an employee files a wage complaint with the department, the
department shall investigate the wage complaint. Unless otherwise
resolved, the department shall issue either a citation and notice of
assessment or a determination of compliance: (a) No later than sixty
days after the date on which the department received the wage
complaint, unless the department extends this time period for good
cause; and (b) no later than three years after the date on which the
cause of action accrued, unless a longer period of time applies under
law. Such cause of action for wage claims accrues from the date when
the wages are due. The department shall send the citation and notice
of assessment or the determination of compliance to both the employer
and the employee by service of process or certified mail to their last
known addresses.
(2) If the department determines that an employer has violated a
wage payment requirement and issues to the employer a citation and
notice of assessment, the department may order the employer to pay
employees all wages owed, including interest ((of one percent)) per
month on all wages owed, to the employee, at the uniform interest rate
set forth in section 2 of this act.
(3) If the department determines that the violation of the wage
payment requirement was a willful violation, the department also may
order the employer to pay the department a civil penalty as specified
in (a) of this subsection.
(a) A civil penalty for a willful violation of a wage payment
requirement shall be not less than five hundred dollars or an amount
equal to ten percent of the total amount of unpaid wages, whichever is
greater. The maximum civil penalty for a willful violation of a wage
payment requirement shall be twenty thousand dollars.
(b) The department may not assess a civil penalty if the employer
reasonably relied on: (i) A rule related to any wage payment
requirement; (ii) a written order, ruling, approval, opinion, advice,
determination, or interpretation of the director; or (iii) an
interpretive or administrative policy issued by the department and
filed with the office of the code reviser. In accordance with the
department's retention schedule obligations under chapter 40.14 RCW,
the department shall maintain a complete and accurate record of all
written orders, rulings, approvals, opinions, advice, determinations,
and interpretations for purposes of determining whether an employer is
immune from civil penalties under (b)(ii) of this subsection.
(c) The department shall waive any civil penalty assessed against
an employer under this section if the director determines that the
employer has provided payment to the employee of all wages that the
department determined that the employer owed to the employee, including
interest, within ten business days of the employer's receipt of the
citation and notice of assessment from the department.
(d) The department may waive at any time a civil penalty assessed
under this section, in whole or in part, if the director determines
that the employer paid all wages owed to an employee.
(e) The department shall deposit civil penalties paid under this
section in the supplemental pension fund established under RCW
51.44.033.
(4) Upon payment by an employer, and acceptance by an employee, of
all wages and interest assessed by the department in a citation and
notice of assessment issued to the employer, the fact of such payment
by the employer, and of such acceptance by the employee, shall: (a)
Constitute a full and complete satisfaction by the employer of all
specific wage payment requirements addressed in the citation and notice
of assessment; and (b) bar the employee from initiating or pursuing any
court action or other judicial or administrative proceeding based on
the specific wage payment requirements addressed in the citation and
notice of assessment. The citation and notice of assessment shall
include a notification and summary of the specific requirements of this
subsection.

Sec. 20 RCW 49.70.177 and 1986 c 310 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
If payment of any fee assessed under RCW 49.70.170 is not received
by the department by the due date, there shall be assessed a penalty of
five percent of the amount of the fee. If the fee is not received
within thirty days after the due date, there shall be assessed a total
penalty of ten percent of the amount of the fee. If the fee is not
received within sixty days after the due date, there shall be assessed
a total penalty of twenty percent of the amount of the fee. No penalty
added may be less than ten dollars. If a warrant is issued by the
department for the collection of fees, penalties, and interest, there
shall be an additional penalty of five percent of the amount of the
fee, but not less than five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars.
Warrants shall earn interest ((at the rate of one percent)) per
month((, or fraction thereof,)) from and after the date of entry of the
warrant at the uniform interest rate set forth in section 2 of this
act. The department may utilize the procedures for collection of fees,
penalties, and interest set forth in Title 51 RCW.

Sec. 21 RCW 50.24.040 and 1987 c 111 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
If contributions are not paid on the date on which they are due and
payable as prescribed by the commissioner, the whole or part thereof
remaining unpaid shall bear interest ((at the rate of one percent)) per
month or fraction thereof from and after such date until payment plus
accrued interest is received by ((him)) the commissioner. Interest
under this section shall be computed at the uniform interest rate set
forth in section 2 of this act. The date as of which payment of
contributions, if mailed, is deemed to have been received may be
determined by such regulations as the commissioner may prescribe.
Interest collected pursuant to this section shall be paid into the
administrative contingency fund. Interest ((shall)) may not accrue on
contributions from any estate in the hands of a receiver, executor,
administrator, trustee in bankruptcy, common law assignee or other
liquidating officer subsequent to the date when such receiver,
executor, administrator, trustee in bankruptcy, common law assignee or
other liquidating officer qualifies as such, but contributions accruing
with respect to employment of persons by any receiver, executor,
administrator, trustee in bankruptcy, common law assignee or other
liquidating officer shall become due and shall draw interest in the
same manner as contributions due from other employers. Where adequate
information has been furnished the department and the department has
failed to act or has advised the employer of no liability or inability
to decide the issue, interest may be waived.

Sec. 22 RCW 51.48.210 and 1987 c 111 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
If payment of any tax due is not received by the department by the
due date, there shall be assessed a penalty of five percent of the
amount of the tax for the first month or part thereof of delinquency;
there shall be assessed a total penalty of ten percent of the amount of
the tax for the second month or part thereof of delinquency; and there
shall be assessed a total penalty of twenty percent of the amount of
the tax for the third month or part thereof of delinquency. No penalty
so added may be less than ten dollars. If a warrant is issued by the
department for the collection of taxes, increases, and penalties, there
shall be added thereto a penalty of five percent of the amount of the
tax, but not less than five dollars nor greater than one hundred
dollars. In addition, delinquent taxes shall bear interest ((at the
rate of one percent of the delinquent amount)) per month ((or fraction
thereof)) from and after the due date until payment, increases, and
penalties are received by the department at the uniform interest rate
set forth in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 23 RCW 70.94.431 and 1995 c 403 s 630 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 43.05.060 through 43.05.080 and
43.05.150, and in addition to or as an alternate to any other penalty
provided by law, any person who violates any of the provisions of
chapter 70.94 RCW, chapter 70.120 RCW, or any of the rules in force
under such chapters may incur a civil penalty in an amount not to
exceed ten thousand dollars per day for each violation. Each such
violation shall be a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a
continuing violation, each day's continuance shall be a separate and
distinct violation.
Any person who fails to take action as specified by an order issued
pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty of not
more than ten thousand dollars for each day of continued noncompliance.
(2) Penalties incurred but not paid shall accrue interest,
beginning on the ninety-first day following the date that the penalty
becomes due and payable, at the ((highest)) uniform interest rate
((allowed by RCW 19.52.020 on)) set forth in section 2 of this act the
date that the penalty becomes due and payable. If violations or
penalties are appealed, interest shall not begin to accrue until the
thirty-first day following final resolution of the appeal.
The maximum penalty amounts established in this section may be
increased annually to account for inflation as determined by the state
office of the economic and revenue forecast council.
(3) Each act of commission or omission which procures, aids or
abets in the violation shall be considered a violation under the
provisions of this section and subject to the same penalty. The
penalties provided in this section shall be imposed pursuant to RCW
43.21B.300.
(4) All penalties recovered under this section by the department
shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the air pollution
control account established in RCW 70.94.015 or, if recovered by the
authority, shall be paid into the treasury of the authority and
credited to its funds. If a prior penalty for the same violation has
been paid to a local authority, the penalty imposed by the department
under subsection (1) of this section shall be reduced by the amount of
the payment.
(5) To secure the penalty incurred under this section, the state or
the authority shall have a lien on any vessel used or operated in
violation of this chapter which shall be enforced as provided in RCW
60.36.050.
(6) Public or private entities that are recipients or potential
recipients of department grants, whether for air quality related
activities or not, may have such grants rescinded or withheld by the
department for failure to comply with provisions of this chapter.
(7) In addition to other penalties provided by this chapter,
persons knowingly under-reporting emissions or other information used
to set fees, or persons required to pay emission or permit fees who are
more than ninety days late with such payments may be subject to a
penalty equal to three times the amount of the original fee owed.
(8) By January 1, 1992, the department shall develop rules for
excusing excess emissions from enforcement action if such excess
emissions are unavoidable. The rules shall specify the criteria and
procedures for the department and local air authorities to determine
whether a period of excess emissions is excusable in accordance with
the state implementation plan.

Sec. 24 RCW 70.119A.040 and 1995 c 376 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to or as an alternative to any other penalty or
action allowed by law, a person who violates a law or rule regulating
public water systems and administered by the department of health is
subject to a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars per day for
every such violation, or, in the case of a violation that has been
determined to be a public health emergency, a penalty of not more than
ten thousand dollars per day for every such violation. Every such
violation shall be a separate and distinct offense. The amount of fine
shall reflect the health significance of the violation and the previous
record of compliance on the part of the public water supplier. In case
of continuing violation, every day's continuance shall be a separate
and distinct violation.
(b) In addition, a person who constructs, modifies, or expands a
public water system or who commences the construction, modification, or
expansion of a public water system without first obtaining the required
departmental approval is subject to penalties of not more than five
thousand dollars per service connection, or, in the case of a system
serving a transient population, a penalty of not more than four hundred
dollars per person based on the highest average daily population the
system serves or is anticipated to serve may be imposed. The total
penalty that may be imposed pursuant to this subsection (1)(b) is five
hundred thousand dollars. For the purpose of computing the penalty
under this subsection, a service connection shall include any new
service connection actually constructed, any anticipated service
connection the system has been designed to serve, and, in the case of
a system modification not involving expansions, each existing service
connection that benefits or would benefit from the modification.
(c) Every person who, through an act of commission or omission,
procures, aids, or abets a violation is considered to have violated the
provisions of this section and is subject to the penalty provided in
this section.
(2) The penalty provided for in this section shall be imposed by a
notice in writing to the person against whom the civil penalty is
assessed and shall describe the violation. The notice shall be
personally served in the manner of service of a summons in a civil
action or in a manner that shows proof of receipt. A penalty imposed
by this section is due twenty-eight days after receipt of notice unless
application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed as provided in
subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Within twenty-eight days after notice is received, the person
incurring the penalty may file an application for an adjudicative
proceeding and may pursue subsequent review as provided in chapter
34.05 RCW and applicable rules of the department or board of health.
(4) A penalty imposed by a final administrative order is due upon
service of the final administrative order. A person who fails to pay
a penalty assessed by a final administrative order within thirty days
of service of the final administrative order shall pay, in addition to
the amount of the penalty, interest ((at the rate of one percent of
the)) on any unpaid balance of the assessed penalty for each month or
part of a month that the penalty remains unpaid, which interest shall
be assessed at the uniform interest rate set forth in section 2 of this
act; commencing with the month in which the notice of penalty was
served and such reasonable attorney's fees as are incurred in securing
the final administrative order.
(5) A person who institutes proceedings for judicial review of a
final administrative order assessing a civil penalty under this chapter
shall place the full amount of the penalty in an interest bearing
account in the registry of the reviewing court. At the conclusion of
the proceeding the court shall, as appropriate, enter a judgment on
behalf of the department and order that the judgment be satisfied to
the extent possible from moneys paid into the registry of the court or
shall enter a judgment in favor of the person appealing the penalty
assessment and order return of the moneys paid into the registry of the
court together with accrued interest to the person appealing. The
judgment may award reasonable attorney's fees for the cost of the
attorney general's office in representing the department.
(6) If no appeal is taken from a final administrative order
assessing a civil penalty under this chapter, the department may file
a certified copy of the final administrative order with the clerk of
the superior court in which the public water system is located or in
Thurston county, and the clerk shall enter judgment in the name of the
department and in the amount of the penalty assessed in the final
administrative order.
(7) A judgment entered under subsection (5) or (6) of this section
shall have the same force and effect as, and is subject to all of the
provisions of law relating to, a judgment in a civil action, and may be
enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court in which
it is entered.
(8) All penalties imposed under this section shall be payable to
the state treasury and credited to the safe drinking water account, and
shall be used by the department to provide training and technical
assistance to system owners and operators.
(9) Except in cases of public health emergencies, the department
may not impose monetary penalties under this section unless a prior
effort has been made to resolve the violation informally.

Sec. 25 RCW 82.32.050 and 2007 c 111 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If upon examination of any returns or from other information
obtained by the department it appears that a tax or penalty has been
paid less than that properly due, the department shall assess against
the taxpayer such additional amount found to be due and shall add
thereto interest on the tax only. The department shall notify the
taxpayer by mail, or electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, of
the additional amount and the additional amount shall become due and
shall be paid within thirty days from the date of the notice, or within
such further time as the department may provide.
(a) For tax liabilities arising before January 1, 1992, interest
shall be computed at the rate of nine percent per annum from the last
day of the year in which the deficiency is incurred until the earlier
of December 31, 1998, or the date of payment. After December 31, 1998,
the rate of interest shall be variable and computed as provided in
subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed shall be adjusted
on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest
for that calendar year.
(b) For tax liabilities arising after December 31, 1991, the rate
of interest shall be variable and computed as provided in subsection
(2) of this section from the last day of the year in which the
deficiency is incurred until the date of payment. The rate so computed
shall be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in
computing interest for that calendar year.
(c) Interest imposed after December 31, 1998, and before January 1,
2009, shall be computed from the last day of the month following each
calendar year included in a notice, and the last day of the month
following the final month included in a notice if not the end of a
calendar year, until the due date of the notice. If payment in full is
not made by the due date of the notice, additional interest shall be
computed until the date of payment. The rate of interest shall be
variable and computed as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
The rate so computed shall be adjusted on the first day of January of
each year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.
(d) Interest imposed after December 31, 2008, shall be computed
from the last day of the month following each calendar year included in
a notice, and the last day of the month following the final month
included in a notice if not the end of a calendar year, until the due
date of the notice. If payment in full is not made by the due date of
the notice, additional interest shall be computed until the date of
payment. The rate of interest shall be computed as provided in
subsection (3) of this section. The rate so computed shall be adjusted
on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest
for that calendar year.
(2) For the purposes of this section for interest imposed before
January 1, 2009, the rate of interest to be charged to the taxpayer
shall be an average of the federal short-term rate as defined in 26
U.S.C. Sec. 1274(d) plus two percentage points. The rate set for each
new year shall be computed by taking an arithmetical average to the
nearest percentage point of the federal short-term rate, compounded
annually. That average shall be calculated using the rates from four
months: January, April, and July of the calendar year immediately
preceding the new year, and October of the previous preceding year.
(3) For the purposes of this section for interest imposed after
January 1, 2009, the rate of interest to be charged to the taxpayer
shall be the uniform interest rate set forth in section 2 of this act.
(4) No assessment or correction of an assessment for additional
taxes, penalties, or interest due may be made by the department more
than four years after the close of the tax year, except (a) against a
taxpayer who has not registered as required by this chapter, (b) upon
a showing of fraud or of misrepresentation of a material fact by the
taxpayer, or (c) where a taxpayer has executed a written waiver of such
limitation. The execution of a written waiver shall also extend the
period for making a refund or credit as provided in RCW 82.32.060(2).
(((4))) (5) For the purposes of this section, "return" means any
document a person is required by the state of Washington to file to
satisfy or establish a tax or fee obligation that is administered or
collected by the department of revenue and that has a statutorily
defined due date.

Sec. 26 RCW 83.100.070 and 2005 c 516 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For periods before January 2, 1997, any tax due under this
chapter which is not paid by the due date under RCW 83.100.060(1) shall
bear interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum from the date the
tax is due until the date of payment.
(2) Interest imposed under this section for periods after January
1, 1997, and before January 1, 2009, shall be computed at the rate as
computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate so computed shall be
adjusted on the first day of January of each year.
(3) Interest imposed under this section for periods after January
1, 2009, shall be computed at the uniform interest rate set forth in
section 2 of this act. The rate so computed shall be adjusted on the
first day of January of each year.
(4)(a) If the Washington return is not filed when due under RCW
83.100.050 and the person required to file the Washington return under
RCW 83.100.050 voluntarily files the Washington return with the
department before the department notifies the person in writing that
the department has determined that the person has not filed a
Washington return, no penalty is imposed on the person required to file
the Washington return.
(b) If the Washington return is not filed when due under RCW
83.100.050 and the person required to file the Washington return under
RCW 83.100.050 does not file a return with the department before the
department notifies the person in writing that the department has
determined that the person has not filed a Washington return, the
person required to file the Washington return shall pay, in addition to
interest, a penalty equal to five percent of the tax due for each month
after the date the return is due until filed. However, in no instance
may the penalty exceed the lesser of twenty-five percent of the tax due
or one thousand five hundred dollars.
(c) If the department finds that a return due under this chapter
has not been filed by the due date, and the delinquency was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the responsible person, the
department shall waive or cancel any penalties imposed under this
chapter with respect to the filing of such a tax return. The
department shall adopt rules for the waiver or cancellation of the
penalties imposed by this section.

Sec. 27 RCW 84.52.018 and 1994 c 124 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever any property value or claim for exemption or cancellation
of a property assessment is appealed to the state board of tax appeals
or court of competent jurisdiction and the dollar difference between
the total value asserted by the taxpayer and the total value asserted
by the opposing party exceeds one-fourth of one percent of the total
assessed value of property in the county, the assessor shall use only
that portion of the total value which is not in controversy for
purposes of computing the levy rates and extending the tax on the tax
roll in accordance with this chapter, unless the state board of tax
appeals has issued its determination at the time of extending the tax.
When the state board of tax appeals or court of competent
jurisdiction makes its final determination, the proper amount of tax
shall be extended and collected for each taxing district if this has
not already been done. The amount of tax collected and extended shall
include interest at the uniform interest rate ((of nine percent)) set
forth in section 2 of this act per year on the amount of the board's
final determination minus the amount not in controversy. The interest
shall accrue from the date the taxes on the amount not in controversy
were first due and payable. Any amount extended in excess of that
permitted by chapter 84.55 RCW shall be held in abeyance and used to
reduce the levy rates of the next succeeding levy.

Sec. 28 RCW 84.33.140 and 2007 c 54 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has been designated as forest land under RCW
84.33.130, a notation of the designation shall be made each year upon
the assessment and tax rolls. A copy of the notice of approval
together with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for
the land shall, at the expense of the applicant, be filed by the
assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded.
(2) In preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002, for
taxes payable in 2003 and each January 1st thereafter, the assessor
shall list each parcel of designated forest land at a value with
respect to the grade and class provided in this subsection and adjusted
as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The assessor shall
compute the assessed value of the land using the same assessment ratio
applied generally in computing the assessed value of other property in
the county. Values for the several grades of bare forest land shall be
as follows:

LAND
GRADE OPERABILITY
CLASS VALUES
PER ACRE

1 $234

1 2 229

3 217

4 157

1 198

2 2 190

3 183

4 132

1 154

3 2 149

3 148

4 113

1 117

4 2 114

3 113

4 86

1 85

5 2 78

3 77

4 52

1 43

6 2 39

3 39

4 37

1 21

7 2 21

3 20

4 20

8 1

(3) On or before December 31, 2001, the department shall adjust by
rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, the forest land values contained in
subsection (2) of this section in accordance with this subsection, and
shall certify the adjusted values to the assessor who will use these
values in preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002. For the
adjustment to be made on or before December 31, 2001, for use in the
2002 assessment year, the department shall:
(a) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1996, and June 30, 2001, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(b) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1995, and June 30, 2000, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(c) Adjust the forest land values contained in subsection (2) of
this section by a percentage equal to one-half of the percentage change
in the average values of harvested timber reflected by comparing the
resultant values calculated under (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(4) For the adjustments to be made on or before December 31, 2002,
and each succeeding year thereafter, the same procedure described in
subsection (3) of this section shall be followed using harvester excise
tax returns filed under RCW 84.33.074. However, this adjustment shall
be made to the prior year's adjusted value, and the five-year periods
for calculating average harvested timber values shall be successively
one year more recent.
(5) Land graded, assessed, and valued as forest land shall continue
to be so graded, assessed, and valued until removal of designation by
the assessor upon the occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove the designation;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership making the land exempt from ad
valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of forest land
designation continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or
devisee of a deceased owner, shall not, by itself, result in removal of
designation. The signed notice of continuance shall be attached to the
real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW 82.45.150. The
notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the department.
If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and
attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all compensating
taxes calculated under subsection (11) of this section shall become due
and payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor
shall not accept an instrument of conveyance regarding designated
forest land for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed the
notice of continuance or the compensating tax has been paid, as
evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the
treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the new
assessed valuation calculated under subsection (11) of this section to
the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of
equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that:
(i) The land is no longer primarily devoted to and used for growing
and harvesting timber. However, land shall not be removed from
designation if a governmental agency, organization, or other recipient
identified in subsection (13) or (14) of this section as exempt from
the payment of compensating tax has manifested its intent in writing or
by other official action to acquire a property interest in the
designated forest land by means of a transaction that qualifies for an
exemption under subsection (13) or (14) of this section. The
governmental agency, organization, or recipient shall annually provide
the assessor of the county in which the land is located reasonable
evidence in writing of the intent to acquire the designated land as
long as the intent continues or within sixty days of a request by the
assessor. The assessor may not request this evidence more than once in
a calendar year;
(ii) The owner has failed to comply with a final administrative or
judicial order with respect to a violation of the restocking, forest
management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest
debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules under Title
76 RCW; or
(iii) Restocking has not occurred to the extent or within the time
specified in the application for designation of such land.
(6) Land shall not be removed from designation if there is a
governmental restriction that prohibits, in whole or in part, the owner
from harvesting timber from the owner's designated forest land. If
only a portion of the parcel is impacted by governmental restrictions
of this nature, the restrictions cannot be used as a basis to remove
the remainder of the forest land from designation under this chapter.
For the purposes of this section, "governmental restrictions" includes:
(a) Any law, regulation, rule, ordinance, program, or other action
adopted or taken by a federal, state, county, city, or other
governmental entity; or (b) the land's zoning or its presence within an
urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110.
(7) The assessor shall have the option of requiring an owner of
forest land to file a timber management plan with the assessor upon the
occurrence of one of the following:
(a) An application for designation as forest land is submitted; or
(b) Designated forest land is sold or transferred and a notice of
continuance, described in subsection (5)(c) of this section, is signed.
(8) If land is removed from designation because of any of the
circumstances listed in subsection (5)(a) through (c) of this section,
the removal shall apply only to the land affected. If land is removed
from designation because of subsection (5)(d) of this section, the
removal shall apply only to the actual area of land that is no longer
primarily devoted to the growing and harvesting of timber, without
regard to any other land that may have been included in the application
and approved for designation, as long as the remaining designated
forest land meets the definition of forest land contained in RCW
84.33.035.
(9) Within thirty days after the removal of designation as forest
land, the assessor shall notify the owner in writing, setting forth the
reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal
the removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(10) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal a copy of the notice
of removal with a notation of the action, if any, upon appeal, together
with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for the land
removed from designation shall, at the expense of the applicant, be
filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded and a
notation of removal from designation shall immediately be made upon the
assessment and tax rolls. The assessor shall revalue the land to be
removed with reference to its true and fair value as of January 1st of
the year of removal from designation. Both the assessed value before
and after the removal of designation shall be listed. Taxes based on
the value of the land as forest land shall be assessed and payable up
until the date of removal and taxes based on the true and fair value of
the land shall be assessed and payable from the date of removal from
designation.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c), (13), or (14) of this
section, a compensating tax shall be imposed on land removed from
designation as forest land. The compensating tax shall be due and
payable to the treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the
amount of this tax. As soon as possible after the land is removed from
designation, the assessor shall compute the amount of compensating tax
and mail a notice to the owner of the amount of compensating tax owed
and the date on which payment of this tax is due. The amount of
compensating tax shall be equal to the difference between the amount of
tax last levied on the land as designated forest land and an amount
equal to the new assessed value of the land multiplied by the dollar
rate of the last levy extended against the land, multiplied by a
number, in no event greater than nine, equal to the number of years for
which the land was designated as forest land, plus compensating taxes
on the land at forest land values up until the date of removal and the
prorated taxes on the land at true and fair value from the date of
removal to the end of the current tax year.
(12) Compensating tax, together with applicable interest thereon,
shall become a lien on the land which shall attach at the time the land
is removed from designation as forest land and shall have priority to
and shall be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance,
mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with
which the land may become charged or liable. The lien may be
foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in
the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent
real property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax
unpaid on its due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the
date of delinquency until paid, interest shall be charged at the
((same)) uniform interest rate ((applied by law to delinquent ad
valorem property taxes)) set forth in section 2 of this act.
(13) The compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation under
subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other forest
land located within the state of Washington;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) A donation of fee title, development rights, or the right to
harvest timber, to a government agency or organization qualified under
RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those
sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to a governmental entity
or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW
64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands
recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural
heritage council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70
RCW or approved for state natural resources conservation area purposes
as defined in chapter 79.71 RCW. At such time as the land is not used
for the purposes enumerated, the compensating tax specified in
subsection (11) of this section shall be imposed upon the current
owner;
(d) The sale or transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation
commission for park and recreation purposes;
(e) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located that disallows the
present use of the land;
(f) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(g) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040; or
(h) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34
RCW continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(13)(h).
(14) In a county with a population of more than one million
inhabitants, the compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation as forest
land under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) An action described in subsection (13) of this section; or
(b) A transfer of a property interest to a government entity, or to
a nonprofit historic preservation corporation or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or
enhance public resources, or to preserve, maintain, improve, restore,
limit the future use of, or otherwise to conserve for public use or
enjoyment, the property interest being transferred. At such time as
the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax shall be imposed upon the current owner.

Sec. 29 RCW 84.34.108 and 2007 c 54 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, a
notation of the classification shall be made each year upon the
assessment and tax rolls and the land shall be valued pursuant to RCW
84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal of all or a portion of the
classification by the assessor upon occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove all or a portion of
the classification;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership, except a transfer that
resulted from a default in loan payments made to or secured by a
governmental agency that intends to or is required by law or regulation
to resell the property for the same use as before, making all or a
portion of the land exempt from ad valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of classification
continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or devisee of
a deceased owner shall not, by itself, result in removal of
classification. The notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared
by the department. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the
new owner and attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all
additional taxes calculated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section
shall become due and payable by the seller or transferor at time of
sale. The auditor shall not accept an instrument of conveyance
regarding classified land for filing or recording unless the new owner
has signed the notice of continuance or the additional tax has been
paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto
by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the
new assessed valuation calculated under subsection (4) of this section
to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board
of equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that all or a portion of the
land no longer meets the criteria for classification under this
chapter. The criteria for classification pursuant to this chapter
continue to apply after classification has been granted.
The granting authority, upon request of an assessor, shall provide
reasonable assistance to the assessor in making a determination whether
the land continues to meet the qualifications of RCW 84.34.020 (1) or
(3). The assistance shall be provided within thirty days of receipt of
the request.
(2) Land may not be removed from classification because of:
(a) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120; or
(b) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040.
(3) Within thirty days after such removal of all or a portion of
the land from current use classification, the assessor shall notify the
owner in writing, setting forth the reasons for the removal. The
seller, transferor, or owner may appeal the removal to the county board
of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(4) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal, the assessor shall
revalue the affected land with reference to its true and fair value on
January 1st of the year of removal from classification. Both the
assessed valuation before and after the removal of classification shall
be listed and taxes shall be allocated according to that part of the
year to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, an additional tax, applicable interest,
and penalty shall be imposed which shall be due and payable to the
treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the amount of the
additional tax. As soon as possible, the assessor shall compute the
amount of additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty and the
treasurer shall mail notice to the owner of the amount thereof and the
date on which payment is due. The amount of the additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty shall be determined as follows:
(a) The amount of additional tax shall be equal to the difference
between the property tax paid as "open space land," "farm and
agricultural land," or "timber land" and the amount of property tax
otherwise due and payable for the seven years last past had the land
not been so classified;
(b) The amount of applicable interest shall be equal to the
interest upon the amounts of the additional tax paid at the ((same
statutory)) uniform interest rate charged on delinquent property taxes
as set forth in section 2 of this act and RCW 84.56.020, from the dates
on which the additional tax could have been paid without penalty if the
land had been assessed at a value without regard to this chapter;
(c) The amount of the penalty shall be as provided in RCW
84.34.080. The penalty shall not be imposed if the removal satisfies
the conditions of RCW 84.34.070.
(5) Additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty, shall become
a lien on the land which shall attach at the time the land is removed
from classification under this chapter and shall have priority to and
shall be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage,
judgment, debt, obligation or responsibility to or with which the land
may become charged or liable. This lien may be foreclosed upon
expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner
provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property
taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any additional tax unpaid on its
due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the date of
delinquency until paid, interest shall be charged at the ((same))
uniform interest rate ((applied by law to delinquent ad valorem
property taxes)) set forth in section 2 of this act.
(6) The additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty specified
in subsection (4) of this section shall not be imposed if the removal
of classification pursuant to subsection (1) of this section resulted
solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other land
located within the state of Washington;
(b)(i) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent
domain, or (ii) sale or transfer to an entity having the power of
eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such power, said
entity having manifested its intent in writing or by other official
action;
(c) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or
other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the landowner
changing the use of the property;
(d) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located which disallows the
present use of the land;
(e) Transfer of land to a church when the land would qualify for
exemption pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;
(f) Acquisition of property interests by state agencies or agencies
or organizations qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the
purposes enumerated in those sections. At such time as these property
interests are not used for the purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and
64.04.130 the additional tax specified in subsection (4) of this
section shall be imposed;
(g) Removal of land classified as farm and agricultural land under
RCW 84.34.020(2)(e);
(h) Removal of land from classification after enactment of a
statutory exemption that qualifies the land for exemption and receipt
of notice from the owner to remove the land from classification;
(i) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(j) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040; or
(k) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this
chapter continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(6)(k).

Sec. 30 RCW 84.56.020 and 2007 c 105 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county treasurer shall be the receiver and collector of all
taxes extended upon the tax rolls of the county, whether levied for
state, county, school, bridge, road, municipal or other purposes, and
also of all fines, forfeitures or penalties received by any person or
officer for the use of his or her county. No treasurer shall accept
tax payments or issue receipts for the same until the treasurer has
completed the tax roll for the current year's collection and provided
notification of the completion of the roll. Notification may be
accomplished electronically, by posting a notice in the office, or
through other written communication as determined by the treasurer.
All taxes upon real and personal property made payable by the
provisions of this title shall be due and payable to the treasurer on
or before the thirtieth day of April and, except as provided in this
section, shall be delinquent after that date.
(2) Each tax statement shall include a notice that checks for
payment of taxes may be made payable to "Treasurer of . . . . . .
County" or other appropriate office, but tax statements shall not
include any suggestion that checks may be made payable to the name of
the individual holding the office of treasurer nor any other
individual.
(3) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on personal
property or on any lot, block or tract of real property payable by one
person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax be paid on
or before the thirtieth day of April, the remainder of such tax shall
be due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October
following and shall be delinquent after that date.
(4) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on any lot,
block or tract of real property or on any mobile home payable by one
person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax be paid
after the thirtieth day of April but before the thirty-first day of
October, together with the applicable interest and penalty on the full
amount of tax payable for that year, the remainder of such tax shall be
due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October following
and shall be delinquent after that date.
(5) Delinquent taxes under this section are subject to interest per
year at the uniform interest rate ((of twelve percent per annum)) set
forth in section 2 of this act, computed on a monthly basis on the full
year amount of tax unpaid from the date of delinquency until paid.
Interest shall be calculated at the rate in effect at the time of
payment of the tax, regardless of when the taxes were first delinquent.
In addition, delinquent taxes under this section are subject to
penalties as follows:
(a) A penalty of three percent of the full year amount of tax
unpaid shall be assessed on the tax delinquent on June 1st of the year
in which the tax is due.
(b) An additional penalty of eight percent shall be assessed on the
amount of tax delinquent on December 1st of the year in which the tax
is due.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section notwithstanding, no interest or
penalties may be assessed during any period of armed conflict on
delinquent taxes imposed on the personal residences owned by active
duty military personnel who are participating as part of one of the
branches of the military involved in the conflict and assigned to a
duty station outside the territorial boundaries of the United States.
(7) For purposes of this chapter, "interest" means both interest
and penalties.
(8) All collections of interest on delinquent taxes shall be
credited to the county current expense fund; but the cost of
foreclosure and sale of real property, and the fees and costs of
distraint and sale of personal property, for delinquent taxes, shall,
when collected, be credited to the operation and maintenance fund of
the county treasurer prosecuting the foreclosure or distraint or sale;
and shall be used by the county treasurer as a revolving fund to defray
the cost of further foreclosure, distraint and sale for delinquent
taxes without regard to budget limitations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 This act only applies to interest rates
imposed after December 31, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 Section 2 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 4 RCW.

--- END ---