BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the global
production of plastic has significant environmental impacts each year,
including the consumption of millions of barrels of oil, and the deaths
of thousands of marine animals through ingestion and entanglement.
Each year, millions of plastic bottles and bags are put in landfills or
littered. Most plastic does not biodegrade. Most plastic photogrades,
breaking into small bits of plastic. These small bits of plastic
contaminate soil and waterways and enter into the food web when animals
accidentally ingest these materials. The degradation of styrofoam in
nature may take several hundred years. Styrofoam is rarely recycled
because it is usually not cost-effective. While compostable plastics
are made from food crops such as corn, this has the potential to
reduce the global availability of food and increase prices. The
legislature recognizes the state's need for compostable plastics made
from nonfood crops and biomass as an alternative to petroleum-based
plastic bags, petroleum-based plastic bottles, and petroleum-based
styrofoam.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Washington State University is directed to
research and develop nonfood-based compostable plastic that can be used
in place of petroleum-based plastic bags, petroleum-based plastic
bottles, and petroleum-based styrofoam single-use food service
packaging.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Washington State University shall consult
with representatives from the petroleum-based plastic and
petroleum-based styrofoam industries and other stakeholders as deemed
appropriate by the university.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Washington State University shall present
its research in a report to the governor and to the legislature by
December 1, 2008. The report must include an evaluation of all
alternative nonfood-based compostable plastic researched and developed.
In evaluating alternatives, the university must consider:
(1) The environmental impacts caused by the cultivation and harvest
of the plant or plants that form the biobase of the alternative;
(2) The environmental impacts of manufacturing, use, composting,
recycling and disposal of the alternative;
(3) The effectiveness and performance of each alternative as a
replacement for petroleum-based plastic bags, petroleum-based plastic
bottles, and petroleum-based styrofoam; and
(4) The economic impacts of implementing each alternative option.

--- END ---