BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.050 and 2007 c 111 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If upon examination of any returns or from other information
obtained by the department it appears that a tax or penalty has been
paid less than that properly due, the department shall assess against
the taxpayer such additional amount found to be due and shall add
thereto interest on the tax only. The department shall notify the
taxpayer by mail, or electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, of
the additional amount and the additional amount shall become due and
shall be paid within thirty days from the date of the notice, or within
such further time as the department may provide.
(a) For tax liabilities arising before January 1, 1992, interest
shall be computed at the rate of nine percent per annum from the last
day of the year in which the deficiency is incurred until the earlier
of December 31, 1998, or the date of payment. After December 31, 1998,
the rate of interest shall be variable and computed as provided in
subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed shall be adjusted
on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest
for that calendar year.
(b) For tax liabilities arising after December 31, 1991, the rate
of interest shall be variable and computed as provided in subsection
(2) of this section from the last day of the year in which the
deficiency is incurred until the date of payment. The rate so computed
shall be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in
computing interest for that calendar year.
(c) Interest imposed after December 31, 1998, shall be computed
from the last day of the month following each calendar year included in
a notice, and the last day of the month following the final month
included in a notice if not the end of a calendar year, until the due
date of the notice. If payment in full is not made by the due date of
the notice, additional interest shall be computed until the date of
payment. The rate of interest shall be variable and computed as
provided in subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed shall
be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in
computing interest for that calendar year.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the rate of interest to be
charged to the taxpayer shall be an average of the federal short-term
rate as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1274(d) plus two percentage points.
The rate set for each new year shall be computed by taking an
arithmetical average to the nearest percentage point of the federal
short-term rate, compounded annually. That average shall be calculated
using the rates from four months: January, April, and July of the
calendar year immediately preceding the new year, and October of the
previous preceding year.
(3) No assessment or correction of an assessment for additional
taxes, penalties, or interest due may be made by the department more
than four years after the close of the tax year, except (a) against a
taxpayer who has not registered as required by this chapter, (b) upon
a showing of fraud or of misrepresentation of a material fact by the
taxpayer, or (c) where a taxpayer has executed a written waiver of such
limitation. The execution of a written waiver shall also extend the
period for making a refund or credit as provided in RCW 82.32.060(2).
(4) For the purposes of this section, "return" means any document
a person is required by the state of Washington to file to satisfy or
establish a tax or fee obligation that is administered or collected by
the department of revenue and that has a statutorily defined due date.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no
interest or penalties may be assessed during any period of armed
conflict on delinquent taxes imposed on a business where the majority
owner of the business is an individual who is on active duty in the
military, and the individual is participating in a conflict and
assigned to a duty station outside the territorial boundaries of the
United States. However, a business is not exempt from interest and
penalties, as provided in this subsection, if the gross income of the
business exceeded one million dollars in the calendar year prior to the
individual's initial deployment outside the United States for the armed
conflict. Interest and penalties may not be waived for more than
twenty-four months.

--- END ---