BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.36.230 (Regional transportation investment district and
regional transit authority single ballot) and 2007 c 509 s 4;
(2) RCW 36.120.010 (Findings) and 2002 c 56 s 101;
(3) RCW 36.120.020 (Definitions) and 2006 c 334 s 13, 2006 c 311 s
4, & 2002 c 56 s 102;
(4) RCW 36.120.030 (Planning committee -- Formation) and 2006 c 311
s 5 & 2002 c 56 s 103;
(5) RCW 36.120.040 (Planning committee -- Duties) and 2006 c 311 s 6,
2003 c 194 s 1, & 2002 c 56 s 104;
(6) RCW 36.120.045 (Planning committee -- State route No. 520
improvements) and 2006 c 311 s 7;
(7) RCW 36.120.050 (Planning committee -- Taxes, fees, and tolls) and
2006 c 311 s 13, 2003 c 350 s 4, & 2002 c 56 s 105;
(8) RCW 36.120.060 (Project selection -- Performance criteria) and
2002 c 56 s 106;
(9) RCW 36.120.070 (Submission of ballot propositions to the
voters) and 2007 c 509 s 2, 2006 c 311 s 8, & 2002 c 56 s 107;
(10) RCW 36.120.080 (Formation -- Certification) and 2006 c 311 s 10
& 2002 c 56 s 108;
(11) RCW 36.120.090 (Governing board -- Composition) and 2002 c 56 s
109;
(12) RCW 36.120.100 (Governing board -- Organization) and 2002 c 56
s 110;
(13) RCW 36.120.110 (Governing board -- Powers and duties -- Intent)
and 2006 c 311 s 11 & 2002 c 56 s 111;
(14) RCW 36.120.120 (Treasurer) and 2002 c 56 s 112;
(15) RCW 36.120.130 (Indebtedness -- Bonds -- Limitation) and 2003 c
372 s 1 & 2002 c 56 s 113;
(16) RCW 36.120.140 (Transportation project or plan modification--Accountability) and 2003 c 194 s 2 & 2002 c 56 s 114;
(17) RCW 36.120.150 (Department of transportation -- Role) and 2002
c 56 s 115;
(18) RCW 36.120.160 (Ownership of improvements) and 2002 c 56 s
116;
(19) RCW 36.120.170 (Dissolution of district) and 2002 c 56 s 117;
(20) RCW 36.120.180 (Findings -- Regional models -- Grants) and 2002 c
56 s 118;
(21) RCW 36.120.190 (Joint ballot measure) and 2002 c 56 s 201;
(22) RCW 36.120.200 (Regional transportation investment district
account) and 2002 c 56 s 401;
(23) RCW 36.120.210 (Advisory ballot for Alaskan Way viaduct
improvements -- Preferred alternative for Alaskan Way viaduct and Seattle
Seawall improvements) and 2006 c 311 s 29;
(24) RCW 36.120.900 (Captions and subheadings not law -- 2002 c 56)
and 2002 c 56 s 501;
(25) RCW 36.120.901 (Severability -- 2002 c 56) and 2002 c 56 s 503;
(26) RCW 47.56.076 (Regional transportation investment district--Tolls) and 2006 c 311 s 19, 2005 c 335 s 3, & 2002 c 56 s 403;
(27) RCW 47.56.0761 (Regional transportation investment district--Tolls on Lake Washington bridges) and 2006 c 311 s 20;
(28) RCW 82.14.430 (Sales and use tax for regional transportation
investment district) and 2006 c 311 s 17 & 2002 c 56 s 405;
(29) RCW 82.32.470 (Transfer of sales and use tax on toll projects)
and 2002 c 56 s 407;
(30) RCW 82.80.005 ("District" defined) and 2002 c 56 s 415;
(31) RCW 82.80.100 (Regional transportation investment district--Local option vehicle license fee) and 2002 c 56 s 408;
(32) RCW 82.80.110 (Motor vehicle and special fuel tax -- Dedication
by county to regional transportation investment district plan) and 2003
c 350 s 2; and
(33) RCW 82.80.120 (Motor vehicle and special fuel tax -- Regional
transportation investment district) and 2006 c 311 s 18 & 2003 c 350 s
3.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.80.010 and 2003 c 350 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.
(2) Subject to the conditions of this section, any county may levy,
by approval of its legislative body and a majority of the registered
voters of the county voting on the proposition at a general or special
election, additional excise taxes equal to ten percent of the statewide
motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the
county. Vehicles paying an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are
exempt from the county fuel excise tax. An election held under this
section must be held not more than twelve months before the date on
which the proposed tax is to be levied. The ballot setting forth the
proposition shall state the tax rate that is proposed. The county's
authority to levy additional excise taxes under this section includes
the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county. The
additional excise taxes are subject to the same exceptions and rights
of refund as applicable to other motor vehicle fuel and special fuel
excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. The proposed
tax shall not be levied less than one month from the date the election
results are certified by the county election officer. The commencement
date for the levy of any tax under this section shall be the first day
of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of a county to
a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a county shall contract with the department of
revenue for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the levying
county and cities contained therein the proceeds of the additional
excise taxes collected under this section, after the deductions for
payments and expenditures as provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and (b)
and under the conditions and limitations provided in RCW 82.80.080.
(8) The proceeds of the additional excise taxes levied under this
section shall be used strictly for transportation purposes in
accordance with RCW 82.80.070.
(((9) A county may not levy the tax under this section if they are
levying the tax in RCW 82.80.110 or if they are a member of a regional
transportation investment district levying the tax in RCW 82.80.120.))

Sec. 3 RCW 82.80.030 and 2005 c 336 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions of this section, the legislative
authority of a county((,)) or city((, or district)) may fix and impose
a parking tax on all persons engaged in a commercial parking business
within its respective jurisdiction. ((A city or county may impose the
tax only to the extent that it has not been imposed by the district,
and a district may impose the tax only to the extent that it has not
been imposed by a city or county.)) The jurisdiction of a county, for
purposes of this section, includes only the unincorporated area of the
county. The jurisdiction of a city ((or district)) includes only the
area within its boundaries.
(2) In lieu of the tax in subsection (1) of this section, a
city((,)) or a county in its unincorporated area((, or a district)) may
fix and impose a tax for the act or privilege of parking a motor
vehicle in a facility operated by a commercial parking business.
The city((,)) or county((, or district)) may provide that:
(a) The tax is paid by the operator or owner of the motor vehicle;
(b) The tax applies to all parking for which a fee is paid, whether
paid or leased, including parking supplied with a lease of
nonresidential space;
(c) The tax is collected by the operator of the facility and
remitted to the city((,)) or county((, or district));
(d) The tax is a fee per vehicle or is measured by the parking
charge;
(e) The tax rate varies with zoning or location of the facility,
the duration of the parking, the time of entry or exit, the type or use
of the vehicle, or other reasonable factors; and
(f) Tax exempt carpools, vehicles with handicapped decals, or
government vehicles are exempt from the tax.
(3) "Commercial parking business" as used in this section, means
the ownership, lease, operation, or management of a commercial parking
lot in which fees are charged. "Commercial parking lot" means a
covered or uncovered area with stalls for the purpose of parking motor
vehicles.
(4) The rate of the tax under subsection (1) of this section may be
based either upon gross proceeds or the number of vehicle stalls
available for commercial parking use. The rates charged must be
uniform for the same class or type of commercial parking business.
(5) The county((,)) or city((, or district)) levying the tax
provided for in subsection (1) or (2) of this section may provide for
its payment on a monthly, quarterly, or annual basis. Each local
government may develop by ordinance or resolution rules for
administering the tax, including provisions for reporting by commercial
parking businesses, collection, and enforcement.
(6) The proceeds of the commercial parking tax fixed and imposed by
a city or county under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be
used for transportation purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070 or
for transportation improvements in accordance with chapter 36.73 RCW.
((The proceeds of the parking tax imposed by a district must be used as
provided in chapter 36.120 RCW.))

Sec. 4 RCW 81.100.030 and 2002 c 56 s 410 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A county with a population of one million or more, or a county
with a population of from two hundred ten thousand to less than one
million that is adjoining a county with a population of one million or
more, and having within its boundaries existing or planned
high-occupancy vehicle lanes on the state highway system((, or a
regional transportation investment district for capital improvements)),
but only to the extent that the tax has not already been imposed by the
county, may, with voter approval, impose an excise tax of up to two
dollars per employee per month on all employers or any class or classes
of employers, public and private, including the state located in the
agency's jurisdiction, measured by the number of full-time equivalent
employees. In no event may the total taxes imposed under this section
exceed two dollars per employee per month for any single employer. The
county ((or investment district)) imposing the tax authorized in this
section may provide for exemptions from the tax to such educational,
cultural, health, charitable, or religious organizations as it deems
appropriate.
Counties ((or investment districts)) may contract with the state
department of revenue or other appropriate entities for administration
and collection of the tax. Such contract shall provide for deduction
of an amount for administration and collection expenses.
(2) The tax shall not apply to employment of a person when the
employer has paid for at least half of the cost of a transit pass
issued by a transit agency for that employee, valid for the period for
which the tax would otherwise be owed.
(3) A county ((or investment district)) shall adopt rules that
exempt from all or a portion of the tax any employer that has entered
into an agreement with the county ((or investment district)) that is
designed to reduce the proportion of employees who drive in single-occupant vehicles during peak commuting periods in proportion to the
degree that the agreement is designed to meet the goals for the
employer's location adopted under RCW 81.100.040.
The agreement shall include a list of specific actions that the
employer will undertake to be entitled to the exemption. Employers
having an exemption from all or part of the tax through this subsection
shall annually certify to the county ((or investment district)) that
the employer is fulfilling the terms of the agreement. The exemption
continues as long as the employer is in compliance with the agreement.
((If the tax authorized in RCW 81.100.060 is also imposed, the
total proceeds from both tax sources each year shall not exceed the
maximum amount which could be collected under RCW 81.100.060.))

Sec. 5 RCW 81.100.060 and 2006 c 318 s 2 and 2006 c 311 s 15 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A county with a population of one million or more and a county
with a population of from two hundred ten thousand to less than one
million that is adjoining a county with a population of one million or
more, having within their boundaries existing or planned high-occupancy
vehicle lanes on the state highway system((, or a regional
transportation investment district, but only to the extent that the
surcharge has not already been imposed by the county)), may, with voter
approval, impose a local surcharge of not more than three-tenths of one
percent in the case of a county((, or eight-tenths of one percent in
the case of a regional transportation investment district)), of the
value on vehicles registered to a person residing within the county
((or investment district)) and not more than 13.64 percent on the state
sales and use taxes paid under the rate in RCW 82.08.020(2) on retail
car rentals within the county ((or investment district. A county may
impose the surcharge only to the extent that it has not been imposed by
the district)). No surcharge may be imposed on vehicles licensed under
RCW 46.16.070 except vehicles with an unladen weight of six thousand
pounds or less, RCW 46.16.079, 46.16.085, or 46.16.090.
(2) Counties ((or investment districts)) imposing a surcharge under
this section shall contract, before the effective date of the
resolution or ordinance imposing a surcharge, administration and
collection to the state department of licensing, and department of
revenue, as appropriate, which shall deduct a percentage amount, as
provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes, for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department.
(3) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.32 RCW shall, insofar as they are applicable to state sales and
use taxes, be applicable to surcharges imposed under this section.
(4) If a surcharge, authorized under this section, is first imposed
before June 7, 2006, all administrative provisions in chapters 82.03,
82.32, and 82.44 RCW shall, insofar as they are applicable to motor
vehicle excise taxes, be applicable to such surcharges ((imposed under
this section)). ((All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03,
82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW shall, insofar as they are applicable to
state sales and use taxes, be applicable to surcharges imposed under
this section. A surcharge imposed under this section, or a change to
the))
(5) If a surcharge, authorized under this section, is first imposed
on or after June 7, 2006:
(a) Motor vehicles subject to such surcharge shall be administered
in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 2006; and
(b) The surcharge or a change to the surcharge shall take effect no
sooner than seventy-five days after the department of licensing or the
department of revenue receives notice of the surcharge or change to the
surcharge, and shall take effect only on the first day of January,
April, July, or October. Unless waived by the department of licensing
or the department of revenue, notice includes providing the appropriate
department with digital mapping and legal descriptions of areas in
which the ((tax)) surcharge will be collected.
((If the tax authorized in RCW 81.100.030 is also imposed, the
total proceeds from tax sources imposed under this section and RCW
81.100.030 each year shall not exceed the maximum amount which could be
collected under this section.))

Sec. 6 RCW 82.14.050 and 2005 c 336 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
The counties, cities, and transportation authorities under RCW
82.14.045, public facilities districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57
RCW, public transportation benefit areas under RCW 82.14.440,
((regional transportation investment districts,)) and transportation
benefit districts under chapter 36.73 RCW shall contract, prior to the
effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use
tax, the administration and collection to the state department of
revenue, which shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. The
remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter that is
collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited by the state
department of revenue in the local sales and use tax account hereby
created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local sales and use tax
account may be spent only for distribution to counties, cities,
transportation authorities, public facilities districts, public
transportation benefit areas, ((regional transportation investment
districts,)) and transportation benefit districts imposing a sales and
use tax. All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08,
82.12, and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended,
shall, insofar as they are applicable to state sales and use taxes, be
applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter. Counties,
cities, transportation authorities, and public facilities districts((,
and regional transportation investment districts)) may not conduct
independent sales or use tax audits of sellers registered under the
streamlined sales tax agreement. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190,
all earnings of investments of balances in the local sales and use tax
account shall be credited to the local sales and use tax account and
distributed to the counties, cities, transportation authorities, public
facilities districts, public transportation benefit areas, ((regional
transportation investment districts,)) and transportation benefit
districts monthly.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.80.080 and 2002 c 56 s 414 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state treasurer shall distribute revenues, less authorized
deductions, generated by the local option taxes authorized in RCW
82.80.010 ((and 82.80.020)), levied by counties to the levying
counties, and cities contained in those counties, based on the relative
per capita population. County population for purposes of this section
is equal to one and one-half of the unincorporated population of the
county. In calculating the distributions, the state treasurer shall
use the population estimates prepared by the state office of financial
management and shall further calculate the distribution based on
information supplied by the departments of licensing and revenue, as
appropriate.
(2) The state treasurer shall distribute revenues, less authorized
deductions, generated by the local option taxes authorized in RCW
82.80.010 ((and 82.80.020)) levied by qualifying cities and towns to
the levying cities and towns.
(((3) The state treasurer shall distribute to the district
revenues, less authorized deductions, generated by the local option
taxes under RCW 82.80.010 or fees under RCW 82.80.100 levied by a
district.))

Sec. 8 RCW 81.100.010 and 2002 c 56 s 409 are each amended to
read as follows:
The need for mobility, growing travel demand, and increasing
traffic congestion in urban areas necessitate accelerated development
and increased utilization of the high-occupancy vehicle system. RCW
81.100.030 and 81.100.060 provide taxing authority that counties ((or
regional transportation investment districts)) can use in the near term
to accelerate development and increase utilization of the
high-occupancy vehicle system by supplementing available federal,
state, and local funds.

Sec. 9 RCW 81.100.080 and 2006 c 311 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Funds collected under RCW 81.100.030 or 81.100.060 and any
investment earnings accruing thereon shall be used by the county ((or
the regional transportation investment district)) in a manner
consistent with the regional transportation plan only for costs of
collection, costs of preparing, adopting, and enforcing agreements
under RCW 81.100.030(3), for construction of high occupancy vehicle
lanes and related facilities, mitigation of environmental concerns that
result from construction or use of high occupancy vehicle lanes and
related facilities, payment of principal and interest on bonds issued
for the purposes of this section, for high occupancy vehicle programs
as defined in RCW 81.100.020(5), or for commuter rail projects in
accordance with RCW 81.104.120. ((Except for funds raised by an
investment district,)) No funds collected under RCW 81.100.030 or
81.100.060 after June 30, 2000, may be pledged for the payment or
security of the principal or interest on any bonds issued for the
purposes of this section. Not more than ten percent of the funds may
be used for transit agency high occupancy vehicle programs.
(2) ((Notwithstanding the limitations in this chapter, a regional
transportation investment district may use funds collected under RCW
81.100.030 or 81.100.060 and any investment earnings accruing thereon
for projects contained in a plan developed under chapter 36.120 RCW.
These expenditures shall not be limited to high occupancy vehicle
systems.
(3))) Priorities for construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes
and related facilities shall be as follows:
(a)(i) To accelerate construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes
on the interstate highway system, as well as related facilities;
(ii) To finance or accelerate construction of high occupancy
vehicle lanes on the noninterstate state highway system, as well as
related facilities.
(b) To finance construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes on
local arterials, as well as related facilities.
(((4))) (3) Moneys received by a county under this chapter shall be
used in addition to, and not as a substitute for, moneys currently used
by the county for the purposes specified in this section.
(((5))) (4) Counties ((and investment districts)) may contract with
cities or the state department of transportation for construction of
high occupancy vehicle lanes and related facilities, and may issue
general obligation bonds to fund such construction and use funds
received under this chapter to pay the principal and interest on such
bonds.

Sec. 10 RCW 81.104.140 and 2002 c 56 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Agencies authorized to provide high capacity transportation
service, including transit agencies and regional transit authorities,
((and regional transportation investment districts acting with the
agreement of an agency,)) are hereby granted dedicated funding sources
for such systems. These dedicated funding sources, as set forth in RCW
81.104.150, 81.104.160, and 81.104.170, are authorized only for
agencies located in (a) each county with a population of two hundred
ten thousand or more and (b) each county with a population of from one
hundred twenty-five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand
except for those counties that do not border a county with a population
as described under (a) of this subsection. In any county with a
population of one million or more or in any county having a population
of four hundred thousand or more bordering a county with a population
of one million or more, these funding sources may be imposed only by a
regional transit authority ((or a regional transportation investment
district. Regional transportation investment districts may, with the
approval of the regional transit authority within its boundaries,
impose the taxes authorized under this chapter, but only upon approval
of the voters and to the extent that the maximum amount of taxes
authorized under this chapter have not been imposed)).
(2) Agencies planning to construct and operate a high capacity
transportation system should also seek other funds, including federal,
state, local, and private sector assistance.
(3) Funding sources should satisfy each of the following criteria
to the greatest extent possible:
(a) Acceptability;
(b) Ease of administration;
(c) Equity;
(d) Implementation feasibility;
(e) Revenue reliability; and
(f) Revenue yield.
(4) Agencies participating in regional high capacity transportation
system development are authorized to levy and collect the following
voter-approved local option funding sources:
(a) Employer tax as provided in RCW 81.104.150((, other than by
regional transportation investment districts));
(b) Special motor vehicle excise tax as provided in RCW 81.104.160;
and
(c) Sales and use tax as provided in RCW 81.104.170.
Revenues from these taxes may be used only to support those
purposes prescribed in subsection (10) of this section. Before the
date of an election authorizing an agency to impose any of the taxes
enumerated in this section and authorized in RCW 81.104.150,
81.104.160, and 81.104.170, the agency must comply with the process
prescribed in RCW 81.104.100 (1) and (2) and 81.104.110. No
construction on exclusive right-of-way may occur before the
requirements of RCW 81.104.100(3) are met.
(5) Authorization in subsection (4) of this section shall not
adversely affect the funding authority of transit agencies not provided
for in this chapter. Local option funds may be used to support
implementation of interlocal agreements with respect to the
establishment of regional high capacity transportation service. Except
when a regional transit authority exists, local jurisdictions shall
retain control over moneys generated within their boundaries, although
funds may be commingled with those generated in other areas for
planning, construction, and operation of high capacity transportation
systems as set forth in the agreements.
(6) Agencies planning to construct and operate high capacity
transportation systems may contract with the state for collection and
transference of voter-approved local option revenue.
(7) Dedicated high capacity transportation funding sources
authorized in RCW 81.104.150, 81.104.160, and 81.104.170 shall be
subject to voter approval by a simple majority. A single ballot
proposition may seek approval for one or more of the authorized taxing
sources. The ballot title shall reference the document identified in
subsection (8) of this section.
(8) Agencies shall provide to the registered voters in the area a
document describing the systems plan and the financing plan set forth
in RCW 81.104.100. It shall also describe the relationship of the
system to regional issues such as development density at station
locations and activity centers, and the interrelationship of the system
to adopted land use and transportation demand management goals within
the region. This document shall be provided to the voters at least
twenty days prior to the date of the election.
(9) For any election in which voter approval is sought for a high
capacity transportation system plan and financing plan pursuant to RCW
81.104.040, a local voter's pamphlet shall be produced as provided in
chapter ((29.81A)) 29A.32 RCW.
(10) Agencies providing high capacity transportation service shall
retain responsibility for revenue encumbrance, disbursement, and
bonding. Funds may be used for any purpose relating to planning,
construction, and operation of high capacity transportation systems and
commuter rail systems, personal rapid transit, busways, bus sets, and
entrained and linked buses.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.36.071 and 2006 c 311 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided to the contrary in RCW 82.14.036, 82.46.021,
or 82.80.090, the ballot title of any referendum filed on an enactment
or portion of an enactment of a local government and any other question
submitted to the voters of a local government consists of three
elements: (a) An identification of the enacting legislative body and
a statement of the subject matter; (b) a concise description of the
measure; and (c) a question. The ballot title must conform with the
requirements and be displayed substantially as provided under RCW
29A.72.050, except that the concise description must not exceed
seventy-five words((; however, a concise description submitted on
behalf of a proposed or existing regional transportation investment
district may exceed seventy-five words)). If the local governmental
unit is a city or a town, the concise statement shall be prepared by
the city or town attorney. If the local governmental unit is a county,
the concise statement shall be prepared by the prosecuting attorney of
the county. If the unit is a unit of local government other than a
city, town, or county, the concise statement shall be prepared by the
prosecuting attorney of the county within which the majority area of
the unit is located.
(2) A referendum measure on the enactment of a unit of local
government shall be advertised in the manner provided for nominees for
elective office.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if another
provision of law specifies the ballot title for a specific type of
ballot question or proposition.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2007 c 523 s 5, 2007 c 357 s 21, and
2007 c 214 s 14 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the family leave insurance account, the fruit and vegetable inspection
account, the future teachers conditional scholarship account, the game
farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and science
scholarship account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account,
the produce railcar pool account, ((the regional transportation
investment district account,)) the rural rehabilitation account, the
stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility
account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse
racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the
individual development account program account, the Washington horse
racing commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse
racing commission operating account must be credited to the Washington
horse racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, and the
reading achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed
shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 13 RCW 47.56.075 and 2002 c 56 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall approve for construction only such toll roads
as the legislature specifically authorizes or such toll facilities as
are specifically sponsored by a ((regional transportation investment
district,)) city, town, or county.

Sec. 14 RCW 81.112.030 and 2007 c 509 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Two or more contiguous counties each having a population of four
hundred thousand persons or more may establish a regional transit
authority to develop and operate a high capacity transportation system
as defined in chapter 81.104 RCW.
The authority shall be formed in the following manner:
(1) The joint regional policy committee created pursuant to RCW
81.104.040 shall adopt a system and financing plan, including the
definition of the service area. This action shall be completed by
September 1, 1992, contingent upon satisfactory completion of the
planning process defined in RCW 81.104.100. The final system plan
shall be adopted no later than June 30, 1993. In addition to the
requirements of RCW 81.104.100, the plan for the proposed system shall
provide explicitly for a minimum portion of new tax revenues to be
allocated to local transit agencies for interim express services. Upon
adoption the joint regional policy committee shall immediately transmit
the plan to the county legislative authorities within the adopted
service area.
(2) The legislative authorities of the counties within the service
area shall decide by resolution whether to participate in the
authority. This action shall be completed within forty-five days
following receipt of the adopted plan or by August 13, 1993, whichever
comes first.
(3) Each county that chooses to participate in the authority shall
appoint its board members as set forth in RCW 81.112.040 and shall
submit its list of members to the secretary of the Washington state
department of transportation. These actions must be completed within
thirty days following each county's decision to participate in the
authority.
(4) The secretary shall call the first meeting of the authority, to
be held within thirty days following receipt of the appointments. At
its first meeting, the authority shall elect officers and provide for
the adoption of rules and other operating procedures.
(5) The authority is formally constituted at its first meeting and
the board shall begin taking steps toward implementation of the system
and financing plan adopted by the joint regional policy committee. If
the joint regional policy committee fails to adopt a plan by June 30,
1993, the authority shall proceed to do so based on the work completed
by that date by the joint regional policy committee. Upon formation of
the authority, the joint regional policy committee shall cease to
exist. The authority may make minor modifications to the plan as
deemed necessary and shall at a minimum review local transit agencies'
plans to ensure feeder service/high capacity transit service
integration, ensure fare integration, and ensure avoidance of parallel
competitive services. The authority shall also conduct a minimum
thirty-day public comment period.
(6) If the authority determines that major modifications to the
plan are necessary before the initial ballot proposition is submitted
to the voters, the authority may make those modifications with a
favorable vote of two-thirds of the entire membership. Any such
modification shall be subject to the review process set forth in RCW
81.104.110. The modified plan shall be transmitted to the legislative
authorities of the participating counties. The legislative authorities
shall have forty-five days following receipt to act by motion or
ordinance to confirm or rescind their continued participation in the
authority.
(7) If any county opts to not participate in the authority, but two
or more contiguous counties do choose to continue to participate, the
authority's board shall be revised accordingly. The authority shall,
within forty-five days, redefine the system and financing plan to
reflect elimination of one or more counties, and submit the redefined
plan to the legislative authorities of the remaining counties for their
decision as to whether to continue to participate. This action shall
be completed within forty-five days following receipt of the redefined
plan.
(8) The authority shall place on the ballot within two years of the
authority's formation, a single ballot proposition to authorize the
imposition of taxes to support the implementation of an appropriate
phase of the plan within its service area. In addition to the system
plan requirements contained in RCW 81.104.100(2)(d), the system plan
approved by the authority's board before the submittal of a proposition
to the voters shall contain an equity element which:
(a) Identifies revenues anticipated to be generated by corridor and
by county within the authority's boundaries;
(b) Identifies the phasing of construction and operation of high
capacity system facilities, services, and benefits in each corridor.
Phasing decisions should give priority to jurisdictions which have
adopted transit-supportive land use plans; and
(c) Identifies the degree to which revenues generated within each
county will benefit the residents of that county, and identifies when
such benefits will accrue.
A simple majority of those voting within the boundaries of the
authority is required for approval. If the vote is affirmative, the
authority shall begin implementation of the projects identified in the
proposition. However, the authority may not submit any authorizing
proposition for voter-approved taxes prior to July 1, 1993; nor may the
authority issue bonds or form any local improvement district prior to
July 1, 1993.
(9) If the vote on a proposition fails, the board may redefine the
proposition, make changes to the authority boundaries, and make
corresponding changes to the composition of the board. If the
composition of the board is changed, the participating counties shall
revise the membership of the board accordingly. The board may then
submit the revised proposition or a different proposition to the
voters. No single proposition may be submitted to the voters more than
twice. Beginning no sooner than the 2007 general election, the
authority may place additional propositions on the ballot to impose
taxes to support additional phases of plan implementation.
(10) ((At the 2007 general election, the authority shall submit a
proposition to support a system and financing plan or additional
implementation phases of the authority's system and financing plan as
part of a single ballot proposition that includes a plan to support a
regional transportation investment plan developed under chapter 36.120
RCW. The authority's plan shall not be considered approved unless both
a majority of the persons voting on the proposition residing within the
authority vote in favor of the proposition and a majority of the
persons voting on the proposition residing within the proposed regional
transportation investment district vote in favor of the proposition.
(11) Additional phases of plan implementation may include a
transportation subarea equity element which (a) identifies the combined
authority and regional transportation investment district revenues
anticipated to be generated by corridor and by county within the
authority's boundaries, and (b) identifies the degree to which the
combined authority and regional transportation investment district
revenues generated within each county will benefit the residents of
that county, and identifies when such benefits will accrue. For
purposes of the transportation subarea equity principle established
under this subsection, the authority may use the five subareas within
the authority's boundaries as identified in the authority's system plan
adopted in May 1996.
(12))) If the authority is unable to achieve a positive vote on a
proposition within two years from the date of the first election on a
proposition, the board may, by resolution, reconstitute the authority
as a single-county body. With a two-thirds vote of the entire
membership of the voting members, the board may also dissolve the
authority.

Sec. 15 RCW 82.80.070 and 2005 c 319 s 139 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The proceeds collected pursuant to the exercise of the local
option authority of RCW 82.80.010, 82.80.030, and 82.80.050 (hereafter
called "local option transportation revenues") shall be used for
transportation purposes only, including but not limited to the
following: The operation and preservation of roads, streets, and other
transportation improvements; new construction, reconstruction, and
expansion of city streets, county roads, and state highways and other
transportation improvements; development and implementation of public
transportation and high-capacity transit improvements and programs; and
planning, design, and acquisition of right-of-way and sites for such
transportation purposes. The proceeds collected from excise taxes on
the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel
under RCW 82.80.010 shall be used exclusively for "highway purposes" as
that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the state
Constitution.
(2) The local option transportation revenues shall be expended for
transportation uses consistent with the adopted transportation and land
use plans of the jurisdiction expending the funds and consistent with
any applicable and adopted regional transportation plan for
metropolitan planning areas.
(3) Each local government with a population greater than eight
thousand that levies or expends local option transportation funds, is
also required to develop and adopt a specific transportation program
that contains the following elements:
(a) The program shall identify the geographic boundaries of the
entire area or areas within which local option transportation revenues
will be levied and expended.
(b) The program shall be based on an adopted transportation plan
for the geographic areas covered and shall identify the proposed
operation and construction of transportation improvements and services
in the designated plan area intended to be funded in whole or in part
by local option transportation revenues and shall identify the annual
costs applicable to the program.
(c) The program shall indicate how the local transportation plan is
coordinated with applicable transportation plans for the region and for
adjacent jurisdictions.
(d) The program shall include at least a six-year funding plan,
updated annually, identifying the specific public and private sources
and amounts of revenue necessary to fund the program. The program
shall include a proposed schedule for construction of projects and
expenditure of revenues. The funding plan shall consider the
additional local tax revenue estimated to be generated by new
development within the plan area if all or a portion of the additional
revenue is proposed to be earmarked as future appropriations for
transportation improvements in the program.
(4) Local governments with a population greater than eight thousand
exercising the authority for local option transportation funds shall
periodically review and update their transportation program to ensure
that it is consistent with applicable local and regional transportation
and land use plans and within the means of estimated public and private
revenue available.
(5) In the case of expenditure for new or expanded transportation
facilities, improvements, and services, priorities in the use of local
option transportation revenues shall be identified in the
transportation program and expenditures shall be made based upon the
following criteria, which are stated in descending order of weight to
be attributed:
(a) First, the project serves a multijurisdictional function;
(b) Second, it is necessitated by existing or reasonably
foreseeable congestion;
(c) Third, it has the greatest person-carrying capacity;
(d) Fourth, it is partially funded by other government funds, such
as from the state transportation improvement board, or by private
sector contributions, such as those from the local transportation act,
chapter 39.92 RCW; and
(e) Fifth, it meets such other criteria as the local government
determines is appropriate.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that as a condition of
levying, receiving, and expending local option transportation revenues,
no local government agency use the revenues to replace, divert, or loan
any revenues currently being used for transportation purposes to
nontransportation purposes.
(7) Local governments are encouraged to enter into interlocal
agreements to jointly develop and adopt with other local governments
the transportation programs required by this section for the purpose of
accomplishing regional transportation planning and development.
(8) Local governments may use all or a part of the local option
transportation revenues for the amortization of local government
general obligation and revenue bonds issued for transportation purposes
consistent with the requirements of this section.
(((9) Subsections (1) through (8) of this section do not apply to
a regional transportation investment district imposing a tax or fee
under the local option authority of this chapter. Proceeds collected
under the exercise of local option authority under this chapter by a
district must be used in accordance with chapter 36.120 RCW.))

--- END ---