BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that some of the
most important deliberations by public bodies occur in closed executive
sessions with no requirement in law that there be kept a verbatim
record of the discussions. Recording executive sessions will allow
current and future governing members to review the history of issues
that have come before the governing body, and for use of the governing
body, to memorialize legal or other advice provided in executive
session.
(2) The purpose of this act is to encourage governing bodies to
strictly comply with the rules governing executive sessions and promote
the public interest by creating greater governmental accountability in
the use of executive sessions. However, it is not the purpose of this
act to inhibit full and robust discussions of issues relating to
permissible subjects for consideration in executive sessions.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.30.110 and 2005 c 424 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed to prevent
a governing body from holding an executive session during a regular or
special meeting:
(a) To consider matters affecting national security;
(b) To consider the selection of a site or the acquisition of real
estate by lease or purchase when public knowledge regarding such
consideration would cause a likelihood of increased price;
(c) To consider the minimum price at which real estate will be
offered for sale or lease when public knowledge regarding such
consideration would cause a likelihood of decreased price. However,
final action selling or leasing public property shall be taken in a
meeting open to the public;
(d) To review negotiations on the performance of publicly bid
contracts when public knowledge regarding such consideration would
cause a likelihood of increased costs;
(e) To consider, in the case of an export trading company,
financial and commercial information supplied by private persons to the
export trading company;
(f) To receive and evaluate complaints or charges brought against
a public officer or employee. However, upon the request of such
officer or employee, a public hearing or a meeting open to the public
shall be conducted upon such complaint or charge;
(g) To evaluate the qualifications of an applicant for public
employment or to review the performance of a public employee. However,
subject to RCW 42.30.140(4), discussion by a governing body of
salaries, wages, and other conditions of employment to be generally
applied within the agency shall occur in a meeting open to the public,
and when a governing body elects to take final action hiring, setting
the salary of an individual employee or class of employees, or
discharging or disciplining an employee, that action shall be taken in
a meeting open to the public;
(h) To evaluate the qualifications of a candidate for appointment
to elective office. However, any interview of such candidate and final
action appointing a candidate to elective office shall be in a meeting
open to the public;
(i) To discuss with legal counsel representing the agency matters
relating to agency enforcement actions, or to discuss with legal
counsel representing the agency litigation or potential litigation to
which the agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official
capacity is, or is likely to become, a party, when public knowledge
regarding the discussion is likely to result in an adverse legal or
financial consequence to the agency.
This subsection (1)(i) does not permit a governing body to hold an
executive session solely because an attorney representing the agency is
present. For purposes of this subsection (1)(i), "potential
litigation" means matters protected by RPC 1.6 or RCW 5.60.060(2)(a)
concerning:
(((A))) (i) Litigation that has been specifically threatened to
which the agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official
capacity is, or is likely to become, a party;
(((B))) (ii) Litigation that the agency reasonably believes may be
commenced by or against the agency, the governing body, or a member
acting in an official capacity; or
(((C))) (iii) Litigation or legal risks of a proposed action or
current practice that the agency has identified when public discussion
of the litigation or legal risks is likely to result in an adverse
legal or financial consequence to the agency;
(j) To consider, in the case of the state library commission or its
advisory bodies, western library network prices, products, equipment,
and services, when such discussion would be likely to adversely affect
the network's ability to conduct business in a competitive economic
climate. However, final action on these matters shall be taken in a
meeting open to the public;
(k) To consider, in the case of the state investment board,
financial and commercial information when the information relates to
the investment of public trust or retirement funds and when public
knowledge regarding the discussion would result in loss to such funds
or in private loss to the providers of this information;
(l) To consider proprietary or confidential nonpublished
information related to the development, acquisition, or implementation
of state purchased health care services as provided in RCW 41.05.026;
(m) To consider in the case of the life sciences discovery fund
authority, the substance of grant applications and grant awards when
public knowledge regarding the discussion would reasonably be expected
to result in private loss to the providers of this information.
(2) Before convening in executive session, the presiding officer of
a governing body shall publicly announce the purpose for excluding the
public from the meeting place, and the time when the executive session
will be concluded. The executive session may be extended to a stated
later time by announcement of the presiding officer.
(3)(a) A governing body holding an executive session under this
subsection shall make a verbatim audio recording of the complete
executive session and retain the recording for a period of two years.
Such recordings are public records not subject to public inspection and
copying under chapter 42.56 RCW except by court order as specified in
(b) of this subsection, or unless authorized by the governing body.
(b)(i) In an action under this chapter alleging a violation of the
executive session provisions in this section, a party challenging the
lawfulness of the executive session bears the burden of proof.
(ii) If the party challenging the lawfulness of the executive
session supports its allegation with credible evidence, supported by
declaration or affidavit, the court shall review the entire verbatim
audio recording in camera. As part of the in camera proceeding,
without divulging the contents of the tape to the plaintiff or its
counsel, the court may make inquiry of the parties, as necessary, to
fairly and fully resolve any issues before it.
(iii) After such review, if the court finds that the executive
session was not in compliance with the provisions of this chapter
related to such session, it may order disclosure of only those portions
of the verbatim audio recording of the executive session found not in
compliance, subject to such other exemptions as may exist in law. The
remainder of the verbatim audio recording found to comply with this
chapter shall not be disclosed.

--- END ---