BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.28.110 and 1939 c 172 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person producing, manufacturing, bottling or distributing
wine shall put upon all packages a distinctive label such as will
provide the consumer with adequate information as to the identity and
quality of the product, the alcoholic content thereof, the net contents
of the package, the name of the producer, manufacturer or bottler
thereof and such other information as the board may by regulation
prescribe.
(2) If the appellation of origin claimed or implied anywhere on a
wine label is: (a) "Washington"; (b) the name of one or more counties
in Washington; or (c) the name of an American viticultural area wholly
within Washington approved by the board, then an appellation in (a),
(b), or (c) of this subsection is allowed only if all of the grapes
used in the production of the wine were grown in Washington and at
least ninety-five percent of the grapes used in the production of the
wine were grown within the defined boundaries of the appellation of
origin.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply if the director
of agriculture has made a disaster declaration for the county in which
a significant portion of the grapes the manufacturer planned to use are
grown.

--- END ---