BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that concerns over tax fairness can
affect the rate of voluntary compliance, as well as businesses and
property owners' confidence in government. Fair and efficient
resolution of tax controversies are in everyone's interests. Concerns
exist as to whether the current systems available for appealing
administrative tax decisions provide tax fairness in this state that is
in accord with the best interests of the state and taxpayers, including
property owners and the business community.
(2) Therefore, the legislature must study whether the existing tax
appeals system is fair and efficient in resolving tax controversies and
whether a new tax court should be established in Washington state to
hear tax controversies, and if so recommended, its role and basic
operating concepts. The committee established under this section may
consider topics and issues necessary for an evaluation of the tax
appeals system. The committee must consider the following:
(a) The jurisdiction and role of the board of tax appeals and any
recommended changes;
(b) Whether taxpayers should be required to pay the taxes under
controversy to obtain review of administrative actions and to obtain
access to the superior courts, board of tax appeals, or any tribunal;
(c) Jurisdictional, forum selection, and other procedural issues;
(d) The precedential effect of department determinations; superior
court, board of tax appeals, and tax court decisions;
(e) The role of tax professionals other than members of the bar in
tax appeals;
(f) Whether excise and property tax controversies involving towns,
cities, counties, or any other taxing district should be resolved in
different tribunals than those used to resolve state tax controversies;
(g) Whether the salary level of employment positions with the board
of tax appeals is sufficient for such positions to be competitive in
attracting and retaining the needed work staff; and
(h) Other topics deemed to be useful or prudent for the legislature
to consider by the committee created under this section.
(3) To perform the study, a committee must be convened with the
following members:
(a) One representative from the attorney general's office to be
chosen by the attorney general;
(b) One representative from among the administrative law judges of
the department's appeals division to be chosen by the director of the
department;
(c) One representative from the board of tax appeals to be chosen
by the board;
(d) One representative of Thurston county superior court to be
chosen by the presiding judge;
(e) One representative of the Washington state supreme court to be
chosen by the supreme court;
(f) Two members of the Washington state bar association, to be
chosen by the Washington state bar association, who must be in private
practice with substantial state and local tax experience; and one of
the two members must be from a law firm of more than twenty lawyers and
the other member must be from a law firm of twenty, or less than
twenty, lawyers;
(g) Two members of the Washington society of certified public
accountants, to be chosen by the Washington society of certified public
accountants, who are in private practice with substantial state and
local tax experience; and one of the two members must be from a
certified public accountant firm of more than twenty certified public
accountants and the other member must be from a certified public
accountant firm of twenty, or less than twenty, certified public
accountants;
(h) One representative from the department, to be chosen by the
department;
(i) One representative from local government, to be chosen by the
mutual agreement of the association of Washington cities and the
Washington state association of counties; and
(j) Two representatives of the taxpaying business community, to be
chosen by the association of Washington business, whose primary
responsibilities include overseeing tax compliance, audit, and appeals
of Washington state and local tax controversies for their respective
employers.
(4) The committee must choose its chair from among its membership.
(5) Legislative staff from the house of representatives and senate
fiscal committees with senate committee services and the office of
program research must provide lead support staff to the committee,
along with additional staff support from the department, the board of
tax appeals, the supreme court, and the Thurston county superior court.
(6) The department must report its preliminary findings and
recommendations to the appropriate legislative committee by November
30, 2008, and its final recommendations no later than September 1,
2009.

--- END ---