BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that mathematics
education in Washington is in a state of flux. There is ongoing
discussion about revisions to the mathematics academic learning
standards, which drive both instruction and assessment in mathematics.
There is also ongoing debate about the level and content of mathematics
that all high school students need to earn a diploma, including both
students who seek a four-year baccalaureate degree and those who seek
other equally valuable educational and career pathways. Furthermore,
a recent survey by the professional educator standards board found a
need for at least four hundred fifty additional mathematics teachers if
a third credit of mathematics is required for graduation. Efforts to
recruit and train new teachers are underway, but will take time to
produce a sufficient corps of teachers to meet demand. Therefore, the
legislature finds that directing the state board of education
immediately to add a third credit of mathematics to graduation
requirements is premature. More debate and discussion is needed of the
short-term and long-term implications on students and schools.
Furthermore, the legislature finds that the implications are
significant enough to warrant that the final decision be formally
approved by the legislature rather than being delegated to the state
board of education.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.305.215 and 2007 c 396 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The activities in this section revise and strengthen the state
learning standards that implement the goals of RCW 28A.150.210, known
as the essential academic learning requirements, and improve alignment
of school district curriculum to the standards.
(2) The state board of education shall be assisted in its work
under subsections (3) and (5) of this section by: (a) An expert
national consultant in each of mathematics and science retained by the
state board; and (b) the mathematics and science advisory panels
created under RCW 28A.305.219, as appropriate, which shall provide
review and formal comment on proposed recommendations to the
superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education
on new revised standards and curricula.
(3) By September 30, 2007, the state board of education shall
recommend to the superintendent of public instruction revised essential
academic learning requirements and grade level expectations in
mathematics. The recommendations shall be based on:
(a) Considerations of clarity, rigor, content, depth, coherence
from grade to grade, specificity, accessibility, and measurability;
(b) Study of:
(i) Standards used in countries whose students demonstrate high
performance on the trends in international mathematics and science
study and the programme for international student assessment;
(ii) College readiness standards;
(iii) The national council of teachers of mathematics focal points
and the national assessment of educational progress content frameworks;
and
(iv) Standards used by three to five other states, including
California, and the nation of Singapore; and
(c) Consideration of information presented during public comment
periods.
(4) By January 31, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction
shall revise the essential academic learning requirements and the grade
level expectations for mathematics and present the revised standards to
the state board of education and the education committees of the senate
and the house of representatives as required by RCW 28A.655.070(4).
The superintendent shall adopt the revised essential academic learning
requirements and grade level expectations unless otherwise directed by
the legislature during the 2008 legislative session.
(5) By June 30, 2008, the state board of education shall recommend
to the superintendent of public instruction revised essential academic
learning requirements and grade level expectations in science. The
recommendations shall be based on:
(a) Considerations of clarity, rigor, content, depth, coherence
from grade to grade, specificity, accessibility, and measurability;
(b) Study of standards used by three to five other states and in
countries whose students demonstrate high performance on the trends in
international mathematics and science study and the programme for
international student assessment; and
(c) Consideration of information presented during public comment
periods.
(6) By December 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction
shall revise the essential academic learning requirements and the grade
level expectations for science and present the revised standards to the
state board of education and the education committees of the senate and
the house of representatives as required by RCW 28A.655.070(4). The
superintendent shall adopt the revised essential academic learning
requirements and grade level expectations unless otherwise directed by
the legislature during the 2009 legislative session.
(7)(a) By May 15, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction
shall present to the state board of education recommendations for no
more than three basic mathematics curricula each for elementary,
middle, and high school grade spans.
(b) By June 30, 2008, the state board of education shall provide
official comment and recommendations to the superintendent of public
instruction regarding the recommended mathematics curricula. The
superintendent of public instruction shall make any changes based on
the comment and recommendations from the state board of education and
adopt the recommended curricula.
(c) By May 15, 2009, the superintendent of public instruction shall
present to the state board of education recommendations for no more
than three basic science curricula each for elementary, middle, and
high school grade spans.
(d) By June 30, 2009, the state board of education shall provide
official comment and recommendations to the superintendent of public
instruction regarding the recommended science curricula. The
superintendent of public instruction shall make any changes based on
the comment and recommendations from the state board of education and
adopt the recommended curricula.
(e) In selecting the recommended curricula under this subsection
(7), the superintendent of public instruction shall provide information
to the mathematics and science advisory panels created under RCW
28A.305.219, as appropriate, and seek the advice of the appropriate
panel regarding the curricula that shall be included in the
recommendations.
(f) The recommended curricula under this subsection (7) shall align
with the revised essential academic learning requirements and grade
level expectations. In addition to the recommended basic curricula,
appropriate diagnostic and supplemental materials shall be identified
as necessary to support each curricula.
(g) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose and availability
of the curricula, at least one of the curricula in each grade span and
in each of mathematics and science shall be available to schools and
parents online at no cost to the school or parent.
(8) By ((December 1, 2007)) January 1, 2009, the state board of
education shall ((revise)) recommend whether the high school graduation
requirements under RCW 28A.230.090 ((to)) should include a minimum of
three credits of mathematics, one of which may be a career and
technical course equivalent in mathematics, and ((prescribe)) recommend
the mathematics content in ((the three)) required credits. The
recommendations of the state board shall be forwarded to the governor
and the education committees of the legislature. After the effective
date of this section, any additional mathematics credits required for
high school graduation and any changes in the required content in those
credits shall take effect only if formally approved by the legislature
through the omnibus appropriations act or statute.
(9) Nothing in this section requires a school district to use one
of the recommended curricula under subsection (7) of this section.
However, the statewide accountability plan adopted by the state board
of education under RCW 28A.305.130 shall recommend conditions under
which school districts should be required to use one of the recommended
curricula. The plan shall also describe the conditions for exception
to the curriculum requirement, such as the use of integrated academic
and career and technical education curriculum. Required use of the
recommended curricula as an intervention strategy must be authorized by
the legislature as required by RCW 28A.305.130(4)(e) before
implementation.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2006 c 114 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except those
equivalencies established by local high schools or school districts
under RCW 28A.230.097, and except as provided in RCW 28A.305.215(8).
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of
education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board. The
state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements for students
enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and technical
education programs, particularly those programs that lead to a
certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized. The
purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in these
programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of academic
achievement, complete the program and earn the program's certificate or
credential, and complete other state and local graduation requirements.
The board shall ((reports [report])) report its findings and
recommendations for additional flexibility in graduation requirements,
if necessary, to the legislature by December 1, 2007.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---