BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The state board of education shall
contract with an independent third party to examine the feasibility of
using nationally available assessments, such as the Iowa test of basic
skills or other similar assessments, in lieu of the Washington
assessment of student learning for purposes of school and school
district accountability in grades three through eight under the federal
no child left behind act. The contractor shall objectively analyze:
(a) The steps the state would need to take to secure approval of
such an assessment from the United States department of education for
purposes of federal accountability, including the extent that
Washington's current standards, the Washington assessment of student
learning, and/or the national assessment might require some adjustment;
(b) The short-term and longer-term costs and potential cost savings
of using such an assessment, including costs to the state and to school
districts and including development and transition costs;
(c) Potential advantages such as reduced testing time, opportunity
to compare results to other states, and other issues; and
(d) Any potential disadvantages or trade-offs.
(2) The contractor shall present findings and results of the
analysis to the state board of education, the governor, the
superintendent of public instruction, and the education committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2008.

--- END ---