BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.155.050 and 2007 c 520 s 6036 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Upon legislative approval
of a specific list of projects, the board may reimburse projects for
allowable expenses incurred during the preceding fiscal year. Moneys
in the account may also be appropriated to provide for state match
requirements under federal law for projects and activities conducted
and financed by the board under the drinking water assistance account.
Not more than fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget
appropriation to the public works board from this account may be
expended or obligated for preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or
loans for capital facility planning under this chapter; of this amount,
not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation
may be expended for emergency loans and not more than one percent of
the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for capital
facility planning loans. For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the
account may be used for grants for projects identified in section 138,
chapter 488, Laws of 2005.
(2) The job development fund is hereby established in the state
treasury. Up to fifty million dollars each biennium from the public
works assistance account may be transferred into the job development
fund. Money in the job development fund may be used solely for job
development fund program grants, administrative expenses related to the
administration of the job development fund program created in RCW
43.160.230, and for the report prepared by the joint legislative audit
and review committee pursuant to RCW 44.28.801(2). Moneys in the job
development fund may be spent only after appropriation. The board
shall prepare a prioritized list of proposed projects of up to fifty
million dollars as part of the department's 2007-09 biennial budget
request. The board may provide an additional alternate job development
fund project list of up to ten million dollars. The legislature may
remove projects from the list recommended by the board. The
legislature may not change the prioritization of projects recommended
for funding by the board, but may add projects from the alternate list
in order of priority, as long as the total funding does not exceed
fifty million dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.155.050 and 2007 c 520 s 6037 are each amended to
read as follows:
The public works assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Upon legislative approval
of a specific list of projects, the board may reimburse projects for
allowable expenses incurred during the preceding fiscal year. Moneys
in the account may also be appropriated to provide for state match
requirements under federal law for projects and activities conducted
and financed by the board under the drinking water assistance account.
Not more than fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget
appropriation to the public works board from this account may be
expended or obligated for preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or
loans for capital facility planning under this chapter; of this amount,
not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation
may be expended for emergency loans and not more than one percent of
the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for capital
facility planning loans. For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the
account may be used for grants for projects identified in section 138,
chapter 488, Laws of 2005 and section 1033, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30,
2011.

--- END ---