BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.155.050 and 2007 c 520 s 6036 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Upon legislative approval
of a specific list of projects, or after February 1st of each year as
allowed for in RCW 43.155.070(7), the board may reimburse projects for
allowable expenses incurred during the preceding fiscal year. Moneys
in the account may also be appropriated to provide for state match
requirements under federal law for projects and activities conducted
and financed by the board under the drinking water assistance account.
Not more than fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget
appropriation to the public works board from this account may be
expended or obligated for preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or
loans for capital facility planning under this chapter; of this amount,
not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation
may be expended for emergency loans and not more than one percent of
the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for capital
facility planning loans. For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the
account may be used for grants for projects identified in section 138,
chapter 488, Laws of 2005.
(2) The job development fund is hereby established in the state
treasury. Up to fifty million dollars each biennium from the public
works assistance account may be transferred into the job development
fund. Money in the job development fund may be used solely for job
development fund program grants, administrative expenses related to the
administration of the job development fund program created in RCW
43.160.230, and for the report prepared by the joint legislative audit
and review committee pursuant to RCW 44.28.801(2). Moneys in the job
development fund may be spent only after appropriation. The board
shall prepare a prioritized list of proposed projects of up to fifty
million dollars as part of the department's 2007-09 biennial budget
request. The board may provide an additional alternate job development
fund project list of up to ten million dollars. The legislature may
remove projects from the list recommended by the board. The
legislature may not change the prioritization of projects recommended
for funding by the board, but may add projects from the alternate list
in order of priority, as long as the total funding does not exceed
fifty million dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.155.050 and 2007 c 520 s 6037 are each amended to
read as follows:
The public works assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Upon legislative approval
of a specific list of projects, or after February 1st of each year as
allowed for in RCW 43.155.070(7), the board may reimburse projects for
allowable expenses incurred during the preceding fiscal year. Moneys
in the account may also be appropriated to provide for state match
requirements under federal law for projects and activities conducted
and financed by the board under the drinking water assistance account.
Not more than fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget
appropriation to the public works board from this account may be
expended or obligated for preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or
loans for capital facility planning under this chapter; of this amount,
not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation
may be expended for emergency loans and not more than one percent of
the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for capital
facility planning loans. For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the
account may be used for grants for projects identified in section 138,
chapter 488, Laws of 2005 and section 1033, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.155.070 and 2007 c 341 s 24 and 2007 c 231 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board
must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if such request
is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040
which has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited
from receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if the
comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required
by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a loan or loan
guarantee.
(3) In considering awarding loans for public facilities to special
districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board shall
consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) The board shall develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board shall attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
shall consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority
to a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(d) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(e) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;
(f) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(g) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(h) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(i) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system;
(j) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(k) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government
applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure additional
local or other sources of funding for each public works project for
which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(6) Before November 1st of each year, the board shall develop and
submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives a description of the loans made under RCW 43.155.065,
43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section during the preceding
fiscal year and a prioritized list of projects which are recommended
for funding by the legislature, including one copy to the staff of each
of the committees. The list shall include, but not be limited to, a
description of each project and recommended financing, the terms and
conditions of the loan or financial guarantee, the local government
jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration of the jurisdiction's
critical need for the project and documentation of local funds being
used to finance the public works project. The list shall also include
measures of fiscal capacity for each jurisdiction recommended for
financial assistance, compared to authorized limits and state averages,
including local government sales taxes; real estate excise taxes;
property taxes; and charges for or taxes on sewerage, water, garbage,
and other utilities.
(7) Prior to February 1st of each year, the board shall not sign
contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds from the public works
assistance account before the legislature has appropriated funds for a
specific list of public works projects. After February 1st of each
year, if the legislature has not acted on legislation that approves a
specific list of public works projects, the board's recommended list is
considered approved by the legislature, and the board may financially
obligate funds from the public works assistance account. The
legislature may remove projects from the list recommended by the board.
The legislature shall not change the order of the priorities
recommended for funding by the board.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does not apply to loans made
under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section.
(9) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans shall be
exempted from subsection (7) of this section.
(10) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or recycling
facilities under this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that
the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent with and necessary
to implement the comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by
the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.
(11) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be funded under
this section only if the project is not in conflict with the action
agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30,
2011.

--- END ---