BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.86.010 and 2007 c 357 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Application year" means the twelve-month period beginning on
the ((first day of the calendar week in which an individual files an
application for family leave insurance benefits and, thereafter, the
twelve-month period beginning with the first day of the calendar week
in which the individual next files an application for family leave
insurance benefits after the expiration of the individual's last
preceding application year)) date of the birth of a child of the
individual or the placement of a child with the individual for
adoption.
(2) "Calendar quarter" means the same as in RCW 50.04.050.
(3) "Child" means a biological or an adopted child.
(4) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the department.
(5) "Department" means the ((state agency to be directed to
administer the family leave insurance program)) employment security
department.
(((5) "Director" means the director of the department.))
(6) "Employer" means: (a) The same as in RCW 50.04.080; and (b)
the state and its political subdivisions.
(7) "Employment" has the meaning provided in RCW 50.04.100.
(8) "Family leave" means leave: (a) Because of the birth of a
child of the employee and in order to care for the child; or (b)
because of the placement of a child with the employee for adoption.
(9) "Family leave insurance benefits" means the benefits payable
under RCW 49.86.050 and 49.86.060.
(10) "Federal family and medical leave act" means the federal
family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107
Stat. 6).
(11) "Qualifying year" means the first four of the last five
completed calendar quarters or, if eligibility is not established, the
last four completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first
day of the individual's application year.
(12) "Regularly working" means the average number of hours per
workweek that an individual worked in the two quarters of the
individual's qualifying year in which total wages were highest.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.86.020 and 2007 c 357 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and administer a family leave
insurance program and pay family leave insurance benefits as specified
in this chapter.
(2) The department shall establish procedures and forms for filing
claims for benefits under this chapter. The department shall notify
the employer within five business days of a claim being filed under RCW
49.86.030.
(3) The department shall use information sharing and integration
technology to facilitate the disclosure of relevant information or
records by the ((employment security)) department, so long as an
individual consents to the disclosure as required under RCW
49.86.030(4).
(4) Information contained in the files and records pertaining to an
individual under this chapter are confidential and not open to public
inspection, other than to public employees in the performance of their
official duties. However, the individual or an authorized
representative of an individual may review the records or receive
specific information from the records on the presentation of the signed
authorization of the individual. An employer or the employer's duly
authorized representative may review the records of an individual
employed by the employer in connection with a pending claim. At the
department's discretion, other persons may review records when such
persons are rendering assistance to the department at any stage of the
proceedings on any matter pertaining to the administration of this
chapter.
(5) The department shall develop and implement an outreach program
to ensure that individuals who may be eligible to receive family leave
insurance benefits under this chapter are made aware of these benefits.
Outreach information shall explain, in an easy to understand format,
eligibility requirements, the claims process, weekly benefit amounts,
maximum benefits payable, notice requirements, reinstatement and
nondiscrimination rights, confidentiality, and coordination of leave
under this chapter and other laws, collective bargaining agreements,
and employer policies. Outreach information shall be available in
English and other primary languages as defined in RCW 74.04.025.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.86.030 and 2007 c 357 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning October 1, 2009, family leave insurance benefits are
payable to an individual during a period in which the individual is
unable to perform his or her regular or customary work because he or
she is on family leave if the individual:
(1) Files a claim for benefits ((in each week in which the
individual is on family leave)) in the six-week period beginning on the
first day of the calendar week in which the individual is on family
leave, and as required by rules adopted by the ((director))
commissioner;
(2) Has been employed for at least six hundred eighty hours in
employment during the individual's qualifying year;
(3) Establishes an application year. An application year may not
be established if the qualifying year includes hours worked before
establishment of a previous application year;
(4) Consents to the disclosure of information or records deemed
private and confidential under chapter 50.13 RCW. Initial disclosure
of this information and these records by the ((employment security))
department to the department is solely for purposes related to the
administration of this chapter. Further disclosure of this information
or these records is subject to RCW 49.86.020(3);
(5) Discloses whether or not he or she owes child support
obligations as defined in RCW 50.40.050; and
(6) ((Documents that he or she has provided)) Provides the employer
from whom family leave is to be taken with written notice of the
individual's intention to take family leave in the same manner as an
employee is required to provide notice in RCW 49.78.250, and in the
individual's claim for benefits, attests that written notice has been
provided.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.86.050 and 2007 c 357 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The maximum number of weeks during which family leave insurance
benefits are payable in an application year is five weeks. However,
benefits are not payable during a waiting period consisting of the
first seven calendar days of family leave taken in an application year,
whether the first seven calendar days of family leave are employer paid
or unpaid.
(2)(a) The first payment of benefits must be made to an individual
within two weeks after the claim is filed or the family leave began,
whichever is later, and subsequent payments must be made
((semimonthly)) biweekly thereafter.
(b) The payment of benefits under this chapter shall not be
considered a binding determination of the obligations of the department
under this chapter. The acceptance of compensation by the individual
shall likewise not be considered a binding determination of his or her
rights under this chapter. Whenever any payment of benefits under this
chapter has been made and timely appeal therefrom has been made where
the final decision is that the payment was improper, the individual
shall repay it and recoupment may be made from any future payment due
to the individual on any claim under this chapter. The ((director))
commissioner may exercise his or her discretion to waive, in whole or
in part, the amount of any such payments where the recovery would be
against equity and good conscience.
(c) If an individual dies before he or she receives a payment of
benefits, the payment shall be made by the department and distributed
consistent with the terms of the decedent's will or, if the decedent
dies intestate, consistent with the terms of RCW 11.04.015.

Sec. 5 RCW 49.86.060 and 2007 c 357 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The amount of family leave insurance benefits shall be determined
as follows:
(1) The weekly benefit shall be two hundred fifty dollars per week
for an individual who at the time of beginning family leave was
regularly working thirty-five hours or more per week.
(2) If an individual who at the time of beginning family leave was
regularly working thirty-five hours or more per week is on family leave
for less than thirty-five hours but at least eight hours in a week, the
individual's weekly benefit shall be .025 times the maximum weekly
benefit times the number of hours of family leave taken in the week.
Benefits are not payable for less than eight hours of family leave
taken in a week.
(3) For an individual who at the time of beginning family leave was
regularly working less than thirty-five hours per week, the department
shall calculate a prorated schedule for a weekly benefit amount and a
minimum number of hours of family leave that must be taken in a week
for benefits to be payable, with the prorated schedule based on the
amounts and the calculations specified under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section.
(4) If an individual discloses that he or she owes child support
obligations under RCW 49.86.030 and the department determines that the
individual is eligible for benefits, the department shall notify the
applicable state or local child support enforcement agency and deduct
and withhold an amount from benefits in a manner consistent with RCW
50.40.050.
(((5) If the internal revenue service determines that family leave
insurance benefits under this chapter are subject to federal income tax
and an individual elects to have federal income tax deducted and
withheld from benefits, the department shall deduct and withhold the
amount specified in the federal internal revenue code in a manner
consistent with RCW 49.86.070.))

Sec. 6 RCW 49.86.070 and 2007 c 357 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) If the internal revenue service determines that family
leave insurance benefits under this chapter are subject to federal
income tax, the department must advise an individual filing a ((new))
claim for family leave insurance benefits, at the time of filing such
claim, that((:
(a))) the internal revenue service has determined that benefits are
subject to federal income tax((;
(b))) , and that requirements exist pertaining to estimated tax
payments((;
(c) The individual may elect to have federal income tax deducted
and withheld from the individual's payment of benefits at the amount
specified in the federal internal revenue code; and
(d) The individual is permitted to change a previously elected
withholding status.
(2) Amounts deducted and withheld from benefits must remain in the
family leave insurance account until transferred to the federal taxing
authority as a payment of income tax.
(3) The director shall follow all procedures specified by the
federal internal revenue service pertaining to the deducting and
withholding of income tax)).

Sec. 7 RCW 49.86.090 and 2007 c 357 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During a period in which an individual receives family leave
insurance benefits or earns waiting period credits under this chapter,
the individual is entitled to family leave and, at the established
ending date of leave, to be restored to a position of employment with
the employer from whom leave was taken.
(2) The individual entitled to leave under this section shall be
restored to a position of employment in the same manner as an employee
entitled to leave under chapter 49.78 RCW is restored to a position of
employment, as specified in RCW 49.78.280.
(3) This section applies only to an individual if:
(a) The employer from whom the individual takes family leave
employs more than twenty-five employees for each working day during
each of twenty or more calendar workweeks in the current or preceding
calendar year within seventy-five miles of the employee's worksite; and
(b) The individual has been employed for at least twelve months by
that employer, and for at least one thousand two hundred fifty hours of
service with that employer during the previous twelve-month period.
(4) This section does not apply if the employment from which the
individual takes family leave is with a staffing company and the
individual is assigned on a temporary basis to perform work at or
services for another organization to support or supplement the other
organization's workforces, or to provide assistance in special work
situations such as, but not limited to, employee absences, skill
shortages, seasonal workloads, or to perform special assignments or
projects, all under the direction and supervision of the organization
to which the individual is assigned.
(5) This section does not apply if an employee was hired for a
specific term or only to perform work on a discrete project, the
employment term or project is over, and the employer would not
otherwise have continued to employ the employee.
(6) This section shall be enforced by the department of labor and
industries as provided in chapter 49.78 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 49.86.110 and 2007 c 357 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An employer of individuals not covered by this chapter or a
self-employed person, including a sole proprietor, partner, or joint
venturer, may elect coverage under this chapter for all individuals in
its employ for an initial period of not less than three years or a
subsequent period of not less than one year immediately following
another period of coverage. The employer or self-employed person must
file a notice of election in writing with the ((director))
commissioner, as required by the department. The election becomes
effective on the date of filing the notice.
(2) An employer or self-employed person who has elected coverage
may withdraw from coverage within thirty days after the end of the
three-year period of coverage, or at such other times as the
((director)) commissioner may prescribe by rule, by filing written
notice with the ((director)) commissioner, such withdrawal to take
effect not sooner than thirty days after filing the notice. Within
five days of filing written notice of the withdrawal with the
((director)) commissioner, an employer must provide written notice of
the withdrawal to all individuals in the employer's employ.

Sec. 9 RCW 49.86.120 and 2007 c 357 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person aggrieved by a decision of the department under this
chapter must file a notice of appeal with the ((director))
commissioner, by mail or personally, within thirty days after the date
on which a copy of the department's decision was communicated to the
person. Upon receipt of the notice of appeal, the ((director))
commissioner shall request the assignment of an administrative law
judge in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW to conduct a hearing and
issue a proposed decision and order. The hearing shall be conducted in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The administrative law judge's proposed decision and order
shall be final and not subject to further appeal unless, within thirty
days after the decision is communicated to the interested parties, a
party petitions for review by the ((director)) commissioner. If the
((director's)) commissioner's review is timely requested, the
((director)) commissioner may order additional evidence by the
administrative law judge. On the basis of the evidence before the
administrative law judge and such additional evidence as the
((director)) commissioner may order to be taken, the ((director))
commissioner shall render a decision affirming, modifying, or setting
aside the administrative law judge's decision. The ((director's))
commissioner's decision becomes final and not subject to further appeal
unless, within thirty days after the decision is communicated to the
interested parties, a party files a petition for judicial review as
provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. The ((director)) commissioner is a
party to any judicial action involving the ((director's))
commissioner's decision and shall be represented in the action by the
attorney general.
(3) If, upon ((administrative or)) judicial review, the final
decision of the department is reversed or modified, ((the
administrative law judge or)) the court in its discretion may award
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the prevailing party.
Attorneys' fees and costs owed by the department, if any, are payable
from the family leave insurance account.

Sec. 10 RCW 49.86.160 and 2007 c 357 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((director)) commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this chapter. The director of the department of labor and
industries may adopt rules as necessary to implement RCW 49.86.090. In
adopting rules, the commissioner and the director shall maintain
consistency with the rules adopted to implement the federal family and
medical leave act, and chapter 49.78 RCW, to the extent such rules are
not in conflict with this chapter.

Sec. 11 RCW 49.86.170 and 2007 c 357 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
The family leave insurance account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
the purposes of the family leave insurance program. Only the
((director of the department of labor and industries)) commissioner or
the ((director's)) commissioner's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW. An appropriation is required for
administrative expenses, but not for benefit payments.

Sec. 12 RCW 49.86.190 and 2007 c 357 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
((If necessary)) To ensure that money is available in the family
leave insurance account for the initial administration of the family
leave insurance program, the director of labor and industries may, from
time to time before July 1, ((2009)) 2008, lend funds from the
supplemental pension fund to the family leave insurance account. The
department of labor and industries shall enter into an interagency
agreement with the employment security department to implement this
loan. These loaned funds may be expended solely by the employment
security department for the initial administration of the program under
this chapter. ((The director of labor and industries)) As specified in
the interagency agreement, the commissioner shall repay the
supplemental pension fund, plus ((its proportionate share of earnings
from investment of moneys in the supplemental pension fund during the
loan period)) interest, from the family leave insurance account
((within two years of the date of the loan)). This section expires
October 1, 2011.

Sec. 13 RCW 49.86.210 and 2007 c 357 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
Beginning September 1, 2010, the department shall report to the
legislature by September 1st of each year on projected and actual
program participation, premium rates, fund balances, benefits paid,
information on program participants, costs of providing benefits, and
outreach efforts.

Sec. 14 RCW 49.86.080 and 2007 c 357 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If family leave insurance benefits are paid erroneously or as
a result of willful misrepresentation, or if a claim for family leave
benefits is rejected after benefits are paid, RCW 51.32.240 shall
apply, except that appeals are governed by RCW 49.86.120, penalties are
paid into the family leave insurance account, and the department shall
seek repayment of benefits from the recipient. The department shall
issue an overpayment assessment setting forth the reasons for and the
amount of the overpayment.
(2) Whenever such an overpayment assessment becomes conclusive and
final, the department may file with the superior court clerk of any
county within the state a warrant in the amount of the overpayment
assessment plus a filing fee under RCW 36.18.012(10). However, the
department must first give at least twenty days notice by certified
mail return receipt requested, to the individual's last known address
of the intended action.
(a) The clerk of the county where the warrant is filed shall
immediately designate a superior court cause number for the warrant.
The clerk shall cause to be entered in the judgment docket under the
superior court cause number assigned to the warrant the name of the
person or persons mentioned in the warrant, the amount of the
overpayment assessment, and the date when the warrant was filed.
(b) The amount of the warrant as docketed shall become a lien upon
the title to, and any interest in, all real and personal property of
the person or persons against whom the warrant is issued, the same as
a judgment in a civil case duly docketed in the office of the clerk.
A warrant so docketed shall be sufficient to support the issuance of
writs of execution and writs of garnishment in favor of the state in
the manner provided by law for a civil judgment.
(c) A copy of the warrant shall be mailed to the person or persons
mentioned in the warrant by certified mail to the person's last known
address within ten days of its filing with the clerk.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 49.86 RCW
to read as follows:
The commissioner shall appoint a state advisory committee. The
committee shall aid the commissioner in formulating policies related to
the administration of this chapter and of assuring consistency with
program intent and impartiality and freedom from political influence in
the solution of issues that may arise. The committee shall serve
without compensation. Advisory committee members shall be reimbursed
for travel expenses incurred in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The employment security department shall
conduct a study of the impacts, if any, of the family leave insurance
program on the unemployment compensation system, and options for
mitigating impacts. The department shall report on its study to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2011.

Sec. 17 RCW 50.29.021 and 2007 c 146 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to benefits charged to the experience
rating accounts of employers for claims that have an effective date on
or after January 4, 2004.
(2)(a) An experience rating account shall be established and
maintained for each employer, except employers as described in RCW
50.44.010, 50.44.030, and 50.50.030 who have properly elected to make
payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers
as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to
make payments in lieu of contributions, based on existing records of
the employment security department.
(b) Benefits paid to an eligible individual shall be charged to the
experience rating accounts of each of such individual's employers
during the individual's base year in the same ratio that the wages paid
by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to the
wages paid by all employers to that individual during that base year,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c) When the eligible individual's separating employer is a covered
contribution paying base year employer, benefits paid to the eligible
individual shall be charged to the experience rating account of only
the individual's separating employer if the individual qualifies for
benefits under:
(i) RCW 50.20.050(2)(b)(i), as applicable, and became unemployed
after having worked and earned wages in the bona fide work; or
(ii) RCW 50.20.050(2)(b) (v) through (x).
(3) The legislature finds that certain benefit payments, in whole
or in part, should not be charged to the experience rating accounts of
employers except those employers described in RCW 50.44.010, 50.44.030,
and 50.50.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of
contributions, taxable local government employers described in RCW
50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments in
lieu of contributions, as follows:
(a) Benefits paid to any individual later determined to be
ineligible shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer. However, when a benefit claim becomes
invalid due to an amendment or adjustment of a report where the
employer failed to report or inaccurately reported hours worked or
remuneration paid, or both, all benefits paid will be charged to the
experience rating account of the contribution paying employer or
employers that originally filed the incomplete or inaccurate report or
reports. An employer who reimburses the trust fund for benefits paid
to workers and who fails to report or inaccurately reported hours
worked or remuneration paid, or both, shall reimburse the trust fund
for all benefits paid that are based on the originally filed incomplete
or inaccurate report or reports.
(b) Benefits paid to an individual filing under the provisions of
chapter 50.06 RCW shall not be charged to the experience rating account
of any contribution paying employer only if:
(i) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after receiving
crime victims' compensation for a disability resulting from a nonwork-related occurrence; or
(ii) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(2).
(c) Benefits paid which represent the state's share of benefits
payable as extended benefits defined under RCW 50.22.010(6) shall not
be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(d) In the case of individuals who requalify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050 or 50.20.060, benefits based on wage credits earned prior to
the disqualifying separation shall not be charged to the experience
rating account of the contribution paying employer from whom that
separation took place.
(e) Individuals who qualify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050(2)(b)(iv), as applicable, shall not have their benefits
charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(f) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after the
first Sunday following April 22, 2005, benefits paid that exceed the
benefits that would have been paid if the weekly benefit amount for the
claim had been determined as one percent of the total wages paid in the
individual's base year shall not be charged to the experience rating
account of any contribution paying employer.
(4)(a) A contribution paying base year employer, not otherwise
eligible for relief of charges for benefits under this section, may
receive such relief if the benefit charges result from payment to an
individual who:
(i) Last left the employ of such employer voluntarily for reasons
not attributable to the employer;
(ii) Was discharged for misconduct or gross misconduct connected
with his or her work not a result of inability to meet the minimum job
requirements;
(iii) Is unemployed as a result of closure or severe curtailment of
operation at the employer's plant, building, worksite, or other
facility. This closure must be for reasons directly attributable to a
catastrophic occurrence such as fire, flood, or other natural disaster;
((or))
(iv) Continues to be employed on a regularly scheduled permanent
part-time basis by a base year employer and who at some time during the
base year was concurrently employed and subsequently separated from at
least one other base year employer. Benefit charge relief ceases when
the employment relationship between the employer requesting relief and
the claimant is terminated. This subsection does not apply to shared
work employers under chapter 50.06 RCW; or
(v) Worked for an employer for six weeks or less, and was laid off
at the end of temporary employment when that individual temporarily
replaced a permanent employee taking family leave as defined in chapter
49.86 RCW, and the lay off is due to the return of that permanent
employee. This subsection applies to claims with an effective date on
or after October 4, 2009.
(b) The employer requesting relief of charges under this subsection
must request relief in writing within thirty days following mailing to
the last known address of the notification of the valid initial
determination of such claim, stating the date and reason for the
separation or the circumstances of continued employment. The
commissioner, upon investigation of the request, shall determine
whether relief should be granted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Sections 1 through 10, 13, and 14 of this
act take effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---