BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Technology has changed the breadth and
depth of educational opportunities available by providing access to
higher education through online, web-based learning and other digital
technologies. These technological advances have expanded access to
help meet the needs of all students, including those with historically
low levels of participation in higher education. Technology has
enabled nontraditional students, many of whom work full time and have
family responsibilities, to access postsecondary education on a
schedule that accommodates their lifestyle. The legislature finds that
distance learning has expanded beyond correspondence courses and other
forms of off-site education to include online, web-based learning,
videoconferencing, podcasting, and any other digital medium that
connects students to learning opportunities.
(2) Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to establish and
maintain a comprehensive set of best practices and standards of
accountability and quality for all eLearning programs to guide students
and their families when making course and program degree selections.
(3) Consistent with the strategic master plan for higher education
adopted by the higher education coordinating board, the state board for
community and technical colleges shall convene a work group that
includes representatives from the workforce training and education
coordinating board, the prosperity partnership, the technology
alliance, the higher education coordinating board, a private career or
vocational school, a four-year public institution of higher education,
the council of faculty representatives, the united faculty of
Washington state, community and technical college faculty, as well as
a community or technical college student to take the following actions
related to eLearning:
(a) Review, and to the extent necessary, establish standards and
best practices regarding electronic learning and related support
services including online help desk support, advising, mentoring,
counseling, and tutoring;
(b) Recommend methods to increase student access to eLearning
programs of study and identify barriers to program of study
participation and completion;
(c) Determine methods to increase the institutional supply and
quality of open course materials, with a focus on the OpenCourseWare
initiative at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology;
(d) Recommend methods to increase the availability and use of
digital open textbooks;
(e) Review and report demographic information on eLearning programs
of study enrollments, retention, and completions; and
(f) Create a subgroup of the work group, led by the workforce
training and education coordinating board and including additional
industry representation, to examine worksite eLearning programs and
options for improvement and expansion of such programs. The subgroup's
findings and recommendations shall be included in the report to the
legislature as outlined in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The work group shall submit a preliminary report of its
findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2008, and a final report by December 1,
2009.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "eLearning" means a program of study in which digital
technologies are used to support learning in flexible, anytime,
anywhere learning spaces. The "e" in "eLearning" stands variously for
enhanced, electronic, or extended.
(b) "Program of study" means a credit or noncredit class, degree,
or certificate program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---