BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a person in
respect to the business of log hauling in the state of Washington. To
qualify for the exemption, the person's vehicle must be subject to the
licensing fee in schedule A of RCW 46.16.070 and the logs must be
processed in the state of Washington.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a person in
respect to the business of log hauling in the state of Washington. To
qualify for the exemption, the person's vehicle must be subject to the
licensing fee in schedule A of RCW 46.16.070 and the logs must be
processed in the state of Washington.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---