BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Music therapist" means any person licensed to practice music
therapy under this chapter.
(3) "Practice of music therapy" means:
(a) The assessment of a client's emotional and physical health,
social functioning, communication abilities, and cognitive skills
through the client's history and the observation and interaction of the
client in music and nonmusic settings;
(b) The development and implementation of treatment plans, based on
a client's assessed needs, using music interventions including music
improvisation, receptive music listening, song writing, lyric
discussion, music and imagery, music performance, learning through
music, and movement to music; and
(c) The evaluation and documentation of the client's response to
treatment.
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 In addition to any other authority, the
secretary has the authority to:
(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this
chapter;
(2) Establish all licensure, examination, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250;
(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(4) Issue licenses to applicants who have met the education,
experience, and examination requirements for obtaining a license and to
deny a license to applicants who do not meet the requirements;
(5) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff
as needed to implement this chapter and hire individuals, including
those licensed under this chapter, to serve as consultants as necessary
to implement and administer this chapter;
(6) Determine minimum education requirements, including the
completion of a bachelor's degree or higher in music therapy, and
evaluate and designate those educational programs from which graduation
will be accepted as proof of eligibility to take a qualifying
examination for applicants for obtaining a license;
(7) Establish practice parameters consistent with the practice of
music therapy as defined in section 1 of this act;
(8) Prepare, grade, and administer, or determine the nature of, and
supervise the grading and administration of examinations for obtaining
a license;
(9) Determine which states have credentialing requirements
equivalent to those of this state, and issue licenses to applicants
credentialed in those states without examination;
(10) Define and approve any experience requirement for licensure,
including a minimum requirement of one thousand two hundred hours of
clinical training, including a supervised internship;
(11) Adopt rules implementing a continuing competency program;
(12) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and
license holders; and
(13) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an
examination failure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The secretary shall issue a license to any
applicant who demonstrates to the secretary that the applicant meets
the following requirements:
(1) Successful completion of a course of study in the practice of
music therapy approved by the secretary, including the completion of a
bachelor's degree or higher in music therapy;
(2) Successful completion of a music therapy experience requirement
approved by the secretary. The experience requirement must include a
minimum of one thousand two hundred hours of clinical training,
including a supervised internship;
(3) Successful completion of an examination in the practice of
music therapy administered or approved by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 After September 1, 2009:
(1) No person may practice music therapy in this state without
having a license issued pursuant to this chapter; and
(2) A person not licensed by the secretary to practice music
therapy may not represent himself or herself as a "licensed music
therapist," "music therapist," or other letters, words, signs, numbers,
or insignia indicating or implying that he or she is a music therapist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Nothing in this chapter may be construed to
prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice of music therapy by an individual who holds a
license issued by the state, other than as a music therapist, to engage
in the practice of a profession or occupation when performing services
within the authorized scope of practice of that profession or
occupation; or
(2) The practice of music therapy by an individual employed by the
government of the United States while engaged in the performance of
duties prescribed by the laws of the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 An applicant holding a credential to
practice music therapy in another state may be licensed to practice
music therapy in this state without examination if the secretary
determines that the credentialing standards of the other state are
substantially equivalent to the licensing standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The secretary shall establish by rule the
requirements and fees for renewal of a license. Failure to renew the
license invalidates the license and all privileges granted by the
license. If a license has lapsed for a period longer than three years,
the person shall demonstrate competence to the satisfaction of the
secretary by completing continuing competency requirements or meeting
other standards determined by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The date and location of examinations
must be established by the secretary. Applicants who have been found
by the secretary to meet the other requirements for obtaining a license
must be scheduled for the next examination following the filing of the
application. The secretary shall establish by rule the examination
application deadline.
(2) The secretary or the secretary's designees shall examine each
applicant, by means determined most effective, on subjects appropriate
to the scope of practice, as applicable. The examinations must be
limited to the purpose of determining whether the applicant possesses
the minimum skill and knowledge necessary to practice competently.
(3) The examinations, all grading of examinations, and the grading
of any practical work must be preserved for a period of not less than
one year after the secretary has made and published the decisions. All
examinations must be conducted under fair and wholly impartial methods.
(4) The secretary may approve an examination prepared or
administered by a private testing agency or association of
credentialing agencies for use by an applicant in meeting the
credentialing requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Applications for a license must be submitted
on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary may require any
information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need to
determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for a license
provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant
shall pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The
fee must accompany the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The uniform disciplinary act, chapter
18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of a
license, and the discipline of persons licensed under this chapter.
The secretary shall be the disciplining authority under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.130.040 and 2007 c 269 s 17, 2007 c 253 s 13, and
2007 c 70 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(viii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(ix) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(x) Persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(xi) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and
family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xii) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xiii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiv) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xvi) Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(xvii) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xviii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xix) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xx) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;
(xxi) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
(xxii) Recreational therapists;
(xxiii) Animal massage practitioners certified under chapter 18.240
RCW; ((and))
(xxiv) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW; and
(xxv) Music therapists licensed under chapter 18.-- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 11 of this act).
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW and
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses
based on the conditions and criteria established in this chapter and
the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter
also governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to
denial of licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the
applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW 18.130.160
by the disciplining authority.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---