BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that discharges from
failing on-site sewage systems are a serious cause of pollution in
Washington's waterways, including Hood Canal, and a continuing threat
to public health and the shellfish industry. The financial cost for
many homeowners to fix failing or outdated on-site sewage systems may
be prohibitive.
The legislature recognizes new technologies may have the potential
to assist homeowners who wish to repair or upgrade their on-site sewage
disposal systems. However, regulatory barriers may inhibit homeowner's
access to these new technologies.
It is the intent of the legislature to assist homeowners to
voluntarily upgrade or repair their failing on-site sewage disposal
systems by removing regulatory barriers to access of new technologies
for on-site sewage systems.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.118.020 and 1994 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter((, the terms defined in this section shall have the meanings
indicated)) unless the context clearly ((indicates)) requires
otherwise.
(1) "Nonwater-carried sewage disposal devices" means any device
that stores and treats nonwater-carried human urine and feces.
(2) "Alternative methods of effluent disposal" means systems
approved by the department ((of health)), including at least, mound
systems, alternating drainfields, anaerobic filters, evapotranspiration
systems, and aerobic systems.
(3) "Failure" means: (a) Effluent has been discharged on the
surface of the ground prior to approved treatment; or (b) effluent has
percolated to the surface of the ground; or (c) effluent has
contaminated or threatens to contaminate a groundwater supply.
(4) "Additive" means any commercial product intended to affect the
performance or aesthetics of an on-site sewage disposal system.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.
(6) "On-site sewage disposal system" means any system of piping,
treatment devices, or other facilities that convey, store, treat, or
dispose of sewage on the property where it originates or on nearby
property under the control of the user where the system is not
connected to a public sewer system. For purposes of this chapter, an
on-site sewage disposal system does not include indoor plumbing and
associated fixtures.
(7) "Chemical additive" means those additives containing acids,
bases, or other chemicals deemed unsafe by the department for use in an
on-site sewage disposal system.
(8) "Additive manufacturer" means any person who manufactures,
formulates, blends, packages, or repackages an additive product for
sale, use, or distribution within the state.
(9) "Repair" means relocation, replacement, or reconstruction of a
failed on-site sewage disposal system.
(10) "Biological remediation" includes: (a) A process that uses
microorganisms to return a contaminated environment, including a
drainfield or soil dispersal component, to a state of nonfailure; or
(b) a process that uses microorganisms to sufficiently increase the
infiltration rate through and into the soil below the infiltrative
surface of a clogged infiltrative surface on-site sewage disposal
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Manufacturers of biological remediation
technologies for use in the recovery of failed drainfields of on-site
sewage disposal systems must provide documentation of verified product
performance as required in (a) and (b) of this subsection to the local
health jurisdiction where the product will be installed. Manufacturers
of biological remediation technologies for use in the recovery of
failed drainfields of on-site sewage disposal systems are not required
to register their proprietary treatment products with the department if
the following conditions are met:
(a) Product performance is verified through:
(i) Product testing using international association of plumbing and
mechanical officials guide criteria standard 180-2003, or an equivalent
standard, which relates to aerobic bacterial generators for insert into
septic tanks, grease interceptors, and grease traps; or
(ii) Third-party field testing from within or outside the state,
accredited by the American national standards institute, university
testing data, or a department-approved entity, showing remediation of
a failed drainfield within ninety days;
(b) Product performance is verified through product testing
conducted by a testing facility conforming with the American national
standards institute requirements;
(c) The biological component of the product meets the conditions of
RCW 70.118.060 relating to additive regulation; and
(d) The biological remediation technology is used solely for the
purpose of remedying or fixing a clogged infiltrative surface in a
failed on-site sewage disposal system.
(2) The definitions in RCW 70.118.020 apply throughout this
section.
(3) This section expires on the earlier of either July 1, 2010, or
the effective date of rules adopted by the state board of health for
the use and performance criteria of biological remediation technologies
for on-site sewage disposal systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Biological remediation technology may be used in on-site sewage
disposal systems not in a state of failure for the purpose of
preventing clogged infiltrative surfaces.
(2) On-site wastewater treatment system designers licensed under
chapter 18.210 RCW, installers approved by the local health officer to
install on-site sewage disposal systems or components, professional
engineers licensed under chapter 18.43 RCW, or licensed on-site
wastewater treatment system operation and maintenance professionals may
install biological remediation products for use in on-site sewage
disposal systems not in a state of failure.
(3) A permit is not required for the installation or use of
biological remediation devices when an on-site sewage disposal system
is not in a state of failure. However, a local health jurisdiction may
require no fee registration for tracking purposes.
(4) Purchasers of biological remediation devices for use in on-site
sewage disposal systems not in a state of failure are required to
maintain an operation and maintenance contract with a licensed on-site
professional as described in subsection (2) of this section. A local
health jurisdiction may require yearly reporting of data collected from
an operation and maintenance inspection by a licensed on-site
professional.
(5) Biological remediation products used for installation in
on-site sewage disposal systems not in a state of failure must qualify
under the requirements established in section 3 of this act. Upon
adoption of rules by the department on July 1, 2010, products used
under this section must be on the state list of approved biological
remediation products for use in the state under the standards of the
rules adopted by the department. Biological remediation products that
are approved for use in the state after July 1, 2010, are still subject
to the provisions of this section and may be installed without a permit
in systems not in a state of failure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The state board of health shall adopt
rules by July 1, 2010, for verification of biological remediation
products performance and use of products with verified performance for
use in failing on-site sewage disposal systems.
(2) The rules must require monitoring of on-site sewage disposal
systems using biological remediation technology and at least annual
inspection of failing on-site sewage disposal systems that have
biological remediation technologies installed to return any component
of the on-site sewage disposal system to a state of nonfailure.
(3) The definitions in RCW 70.118A.020 apply throughout this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A local health jurisdiction may issue a
no fee permit for biological remediation products for use in failing
on-site sewage disposal systems. Prior to issuing a no fee permit for
a biological remediation product, the local health officer or on-site
wastewater treatment system designer licensed under chapter 18.210 RCW
must perform an assessment, considering site and effluent specific
characteristics, of the on-site sewage disposal system to determine if
biological remediation technology is appropriate to bring the system
into a state of nonfailure and that the biological remediation
technology will not adversely impact the environment or public health
by increased wastewater flows through the on-site sewage disposal
system and soil.
(2) The no fee permit must state inspection, monitoring, and
maintenance requirements.
(3) The local health jurisdiction must require system repairs to
meet on-site sewage disposal system requirements as found in chapter
246-272A WAC if an on-site sewage disposal system with a biological
remediation product does not remedy a clogged infiltrative surface
within three months.
(4) Each no fee permit must include:
(a) A plan with a time frame for correcting any public health
concern associated with the failing on-site sewage disposal system and
the means to protect public health until the concern is addressed;
(b) A plan for operation and maintenance that is filed with the
local health jurisdiction;
(c) A schedule for maintenance and operation reports detailing the
status of the on-site sewage disposal system with the local health
jurisdiction where the on-site sewage disposal system is located;
(d) A contract with the owner of the on-site sewage disposal system
with a biological remediation product for inspection and monitoring by
an inspector certified under RCW 70.118.120 or a no fee contract with
the local health officer;
(e) Information for the owner of an on-site sewage disposal system
with a biological remediation product that includes: (i) Instructions
for appropriate maintenance and operation of an on-site sewage system;
and (ii) a statement that if the on-site sewage disposal system remains
in a state of failure after three months, the owner will be required to
repair the on-site sewage disposal system as required by chapter 246-272A WAC, and an estimate of those costs; and
(f) A signed document from the homeowner allowing the local health
officer to enter the property for the purpose of determining if a
biological remediation product has remedied a failed drainfield after
ninety days of installation. Failure to allow access for the
inspection voids the permit and the local health jurisdiction may
prohibit the use of the system until the inspection occurs.
(5) If a biological remediation product fails to make significant
improvements in the condition of a failed drainfield within ninety days
of installation and it is determined by the local health officer that
a repair must be made to correct the failure and the purchaser of the
biological remediation device requests in writing removal of the
biological remediation device and reimbursement, the on-site
professional who installed the biological remediation device shall
reimburse the purchaser for the direct cost of the product and
installation.
(6) The definitions in RCW 70.118.020 apply throughout this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Only on-site wastewater treatment system
designers licensed under chapter 18.210 RCW, installers approved by the
local health officer to install on-site sewage disposal systems or
components, or professional engineers licensed under chapter 18.43 RCW
are permitted to install biological remediation products for use in
failing on-site sewage disposal systems.
(2) The definitions in RCW 70.118.020 apply throughout this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 5 through 7 of this act expire July
1, 2010.

--- END ---