BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington is
well known as the espresso capital of the country and that the coffee
industry is a vital part of the Washington state economy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Coffee is designated as the official beverage of the state of
Washington.

--- END ---