BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.160.060 and 2007 c 231 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board is authorized to make direct loans to political
subdivisions of the state and to federally recognized Indian tribes for
the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions and federally
recognized Indian tribes in financing the following:
(a) The cost of public facilities, including development of land
and improvements for public facilities, project-specific environmental,
capital facilities, land use, permitting, feasibility, and marketing
studies and plans; project design, site planning, and analysis; project
debt and revenue impact analysis; as well as the construction,
rehabilitation, alteration, expansion, or improvement of the
facilities;
(b) The cost of public works projects that support affordable
rental and owner-occupied housing, including the planning,
construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or
improvement of sidewalks, streets and roads, bridges, power utilities,
water systems, storm and sanitary sewage systems, and solid waste
facilities.
(i) For the purposes of this section, "affordable rental housing"
means rental housing units affordable to and occupied by households
with incomes not exceeding eighty percent of the median income for
housing located outside of high-cost areas, or equal to the median
income for housing located within high-cost areas.
(ii) For the purposes of this section, "affordable owner-occupied
housing" means housing affordable to and occupied by households with
incomes not exceeding one hundred fifteen percent of the median income
for housing located outside of high-cost areas, or one hundred fifty
percent of the median income for housing located within high-cost
areas.
(iii) For the purposes of this section, "high-cost area" means a
county where the third quarter median house price for the previous
year, as reported by the Washington center for real estate research at
Washington State University, is equal to or greater than one hundred
thirty percent of the statewide median house price published during the
same time period.
(2) A grant may also be authorized for purposes designated in this
chapter, but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is not
reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the political
subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe and the finding by
the board that financial circumstances require grant assistance to
enable the project to move forward. However, at least ten percent of
all financial assistance provided by the board in any biennium shall
consist of grants to political subdivisions and federally recognized
Indian tribes.
(3) Application for funds shall be made in the form and manner as
the board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board shall
conform to the following requirements:
(((1))) (a) The board shall not provide financial assistance:
(((a))) (i) For a project the primary purpose of which is to
facilitate or promote a retail shopping development or expansion.
(((b))) (ii) For any project that evidence exists would result in
a development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any
other community in the state.
(((c))) (iii) For the acquisition of real property, including
buildings and other fixtures which are a part of real property, except
when the acquisition is directly related to the development of
affordable rental housing and affordable owner-occupied housing defined
in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(((d))) (iv) For a project the primary purpose of which is to
facilitate or promote gambling.
(((2))) (b) The board shall only provide financial assistance:
(((a))) (i) For those projects which would result in specific
private developments or expansions (((i))) (A) in manufacturing,
production, food processing, assembly, warehousing, advanced
technology, research and development, and industrial distribution;
(((ii))) (B) for processing recyclable materials or for facilities that
support recycling, including processes not currently provided in the
state, including but not limited to, de-inking facilities, mixed waste
paper, plastics, yard waste, and problem-waste processing; (((iii)))
(C) for manufacturing facilities that rely significantly on recyclable
materials, including but not limited to waste tires and mixed waste
paper; (((iv))) (D) which support the relocation of businesses from
nondistressed urban areas to rural counties or rural natural resources
impact areas; ((or (v))) (E) which substantially support the trading of
goods or services outside of the state's borders; or (F) for public
works infrastructure that supports affordable housing as identified in
subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(((b))) (ii) For projects which it finds will improve the
opportunities for the successful maintenance, establishment, or
expansion of industrial or commercial plants or will otherwise assist
in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities.
(((c))) (iii) When the application includes convincing evidence
that a specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and
will occur only if the public facility improvement is made.
(((3))) (iv) For public works projects that support affordable
housing, identified in subsection (1)(b) of this section, and that
demonstrate convincing evidence that (A) additional residential or
mixed-use development will occur in an urban growth area designated
under RCW 36.70A.110; (B) the proposed mixed-use residential
development is within one-half mile of a transit station; and (C)
either moderate or high-density, or both, housing developments will be
constructed.
(c) The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to:
(((a))) (i) The relative benefits provided to the community by the
jobs the project would create, not just the total number of jobs it
would create after the project is completed and according to the
unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be located;
(((b))) (ii) The rate of return of the state's investment, that
includes the expected increase in state and local tax revenues
associated with the project; and
(((c))) (iii) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to
guidelines regarding its permitting process for those applying for
development permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of
2007.
(4) A responsible official of the political subdivision or the
federally recognized Indian tribe shall be present during board
deliberations and provide information that the board requests.
(5) Before any financial assistance application is approved, the
political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking
the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is
available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from
the community economic revitalization board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.160 RCW
to read as follows:
The affordable housing infrastructure account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from appropriations made to the account,
repayments of loans made pursuant to RCW 43.160.060(1)(b), and other
sources identified by the legislature must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes
identified in RCW 43.160.060(1)(b).

--- END ---