BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of early learning, in consultation with the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall
establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize
projects that assist nonprofit organizations in acquiring,
constructing, or rehabilitating facilities, including portable
structures, used for the delivery of child care services.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications from
local governments, nonprofit organizations, and other entities, as
determined by the department of early learning. The department of
community, trade, and economic development shall evaluate and rank
applications in consultation with the department of early learning.
The evaluation and ranking process shall include an examination of
existing assets that applicants may apply to projects. Priority
consideration shall be given to nonprofit organizations committed to
serving the following populations: (a) Children served by programs
under chapter 72.40 RCW; (b) sick children; (c) children whose care is
being subsidized by the department of social and health services; (d)
children who are assisted by the early childhood education and
assistance program; and (e) children who are part of the head start
program. Grant assistance under this section shall not exceed fifty
percent of the total cost of the project and the maximum amount for
each grant must not exceed five hundred thousand dollars. The nonstate
portion of the total project cost may include cash, the value of real
property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall develop and manage appropriate contracts with the grantees;
monitor project expenditures and grantee performance; report project
and contract information to the department of early learning; and
exercise due diligence and other contract management responsibilities
as required.
(4) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall include
provisions that require that capital improvements shall be held by the
grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the
grant and that facilities shall be used for the express purpose of the
grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions
of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

--- END ---