BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adjustable rate mortgage" or "ARM" means a payment option ARM
or a hybrid ARM (commonly known as a 2/28 or 3/27 loan).
(2) "Borrower" means any person who consults with or retains a
person subject to this chapter in an effort to seek information about
obtaining a residential mortgage loan, regardless of whether that
person actually obtains such a loan.
(3) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of financial
institutions.
(5) "Financial institution" means commercial banks and alien banks
subject to regulation under Title 30 RCW, savings banks subject to
regulation under Title 32 RCW, savings associations subject to
regulation under Title 33 RCW, credit unions subject to regulation
under chapter 31.12 RCW, consumer loan companies subject to regulation
under chapter 31.04 RCW, and mortgage brokers and lenders subject to
regulation under chapter 19.146 RCW.
(6) "Residential mortgage loan" means an extension of credit
secured by residential real property located in this state upon which
is constructed or intended to be constructed, a single-family dwelling
or multiple-family dwelling of four or less units. It does not include
a reverse mortgage or a borrower credit transaction that is secured by
rental property. It does not include a bridge loan. It does not
include loans to individuals making or acquiring a residential mortgage
loan solely with his or her own funds for his or her own investment.
For purposes of this subsection, a "bridge loan" is any temporary loan,
having a maturity of one year or less, for the purpose of acquisition
or construction of a dwelling intended to become the borrower's
principal dwelling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A mortgage broker, designated broker, loan
originator, and other persons working with or for mortgage brokers must
act in the utmost good faith toward the borrower, and shall not
compromise a borrower's right or interest. A mortgage broker,
designated broker, loan originator, and other persons working with or
for mortgage brokers shall not accept, provide, or charge any
undisclosed compensation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Financial institutions subject to this
chapter must use sound underwriting principles. The department shall
adopt rules to develop standards for sound underwriting principles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A financial institution may not make or
facilitate the origination of a residential mortgage loan that includes
a prepayment penalty or fee that extends beyond:
(1) Sixty days prior to the initial reset period of an adjustable
rate mortgage; or
(2) Three years after the date of the closing of the loan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act are
codified in chapter 19.--- RCW (the new chapter created in House Bill
No. 2770 or Senate Bill No. 6728.) If neither bill is enacted,
sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19
RCW.

--- END ---