BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Until January 1, 1999, every employer shall pay to each of his
or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a
rate of not less than four dollars and ninety cents per hour.
(2) Beginning January 1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than five dollars and
seventy cents per hour.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than six dollars and
fifty cents per hour.
(4)(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, beginning on
January 1, 2001, and each following January 1st as set forth under (b)
of this subsection, every employer shall pay to each of his or her
employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of
not less than the amount established under (b) of this subsection.
(b) On September 30, 2000, and on each following September 30th,
the department of labor and industries shall calculate an adjusted
minimum wage rate to maintain employee purchasing power by increasing
the current year's minimum wage rate by the rate of inflation. The
adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the nearest cent
using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical
workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months prior to
each September 1st as calculated by the United States department of
labor. Each adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under this
subsection (4)(b) takes effect on the following January 1st.
(c) Beginning January 1, 2009, employers may elect to pay employees
the adjusted minimum wage rate published in Washington State Register
(WSR) 07-24-022 instead of the adjusted minimum wage rate calculated
under (b) of this subsection. If an employer elects to pay the
adjusted minimum wage rate published in WSR 07-24-022, the employer
shall deposit the difference between that rate and the adjusted minimum
rate calculated under (b) of this subsection to accounts established
for employees to pay for health related expenses, including, but not
limited to, health savings accounts, health reimbursement accounts, and
voluntary employee beneficiary associations.
(5) The director shall by regulation establish the minimum wage for
employees under the age of eighteen years.

--- END ---