BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
A domestic health care service contractor organized as a nonprofit
organization and a domestic health maintenance organization organized
as a nonprofit organization may not use premiums received from
policyholders from this state to subsidize activities of related for-profit corporations doing business in another state.

--- END ---