BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
If a domestic health care service contractor organized as a
nonprofit organization or a domestic health maintenance organization
organized as a nonprofit organization invests premiums received from
policyholders from this state into a for-profit corporation doing
business in another state, the health care service contractor or health
maintenance organization must file the names of the board members of
that for-profit corporation with the office of the insurance
commissioner. The office of the insurance commissioner must post the
information on the agency's web site and make the information available
to any requester under the public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW.

--- END ---