BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that despite the
creation and implementation of state and local homeless housing and
assistance plans with the goal of reducing and ending homelessness, as
required by the homeless housing and assistance act, the annual
Washington homeless census continues to report unacceptable numbers of
unsheltered homeless individuals living on the streets in our
communities. Unsheltered homeless individuals experience great risk to
their personal health and safety and are vulnerable to substantial harm
and even death.
(2) Although the legislature recognizes the critical need to find
and execute long-term permanent housing solutions for homeless
individuals, the legislature also recognizes the eminent need to
provide for the immediate shelter of all unsheltered homeless
individuals living on the streets.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature to reaffirm the goals of
the homeless housing and assistance act to reduce homelessness by fifty
percent by July 1, 2015, and also to establish a new goal of providing
a minimum of immediate, short-term shelter for one hundred percent of
unsheltered homeless individuals, as reported by the Washington
homeless census.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each local homeless housing task force must present an
unsheltered homeless housing plan to its local government's legislative
authority and to the department within ninety days of the effective
date of this act, and must present an updated plan annually thereafter
on a schedule to be determined by the department.
(2) The unsheltered homeless housing plan must consist of:
(a) Recommended strategies and a recommended detailed action plan
to accomplish the goal of shelter for one hundred percent of
unsheltered homeless individuals;
(b) Estimated costs for execution of the plan and achievement of
the plan's goal; and
(c) Recommended interim assistance strategies, such as the
provision of interim survival mechanisms and other assistance to be
provided to unsheltered homeless individuals until they can be
adequately sheltered.
(3) Until and unless the Washington homeless census reports that
the number of unsheltered homeless individuals within the jurisdiction
of a local government is equal to or less than ten percent of the
number of unsheltered homeless individuals reported in the 2008
Washington homeless census, the priority for projects to be funded from
the local government's share of the surcharges in RCW 36.22.179 and
36.22.1791 must be given to projects and programs that are intended to
directly accomplish the unsheltered homeless housing goal and are
representative of recommended strategies outlined in the local
unsheltered homeless housing plan.
(4) The department shall include a summary of local jurisdiction
unsheltered homeless housing plans and reports of plan accomplishments
in its annually updated state homeless housing strategic plan as
described under RCW 43.185C.040.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.185C.010 and 2007 c 427 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(3) "Homeless person" means an individual living outside or in a
building not meant for human habitation or which they have no legal
right to occupy, in an emergency shelter, or in a temporary housing
program which may include a transitional and supportive housing program
if habitation time limits exist. This definition includes substance
abusers, people with mental illness, and sex offenders who are
homeless.
(4) "Washington homeless census" means an annual statewide census
conducted as a collaborative effort by towns, cities, counties,
community-based organizations, and state agencies, with the technical
support and coordination of the department, to count and collect data
on all homeless individuals in Washington.
(5) "Home security fund account" means the state treasury account
receiving the state's portion of income from revenue from the sources
established by RCW 36.22.179, RCW 36.22.1791, and all other sources
directed to the homeless housing and assistance program.
(6) "Homeless housing grant program" means the vehicle by which
competitive grants are awarded by the department, utilizing moneys from
the ((homeless housing)) home security fund account, to local
governments for programs directly related to housing homeless
individuals and families, addressing the root causes of homelessness,
preventing homelessness, collecting data on homeless individuals, and
other efforts directly related to housing homeless persons.
(7) "Local government" means a county government in the state of
Washington or a city government, if the legislative authority of the
city affirmatively elects to accept the responsibility for housing
homeless persons within its borders.
(8) "Housing continuum" means the progression of individuals along
a housing-focused continuum with homelessness at one end and
homeownership at the other.
(9) "Local homeless housing task force" means a voluntary local
committee created to advise a local government on the creation of a
local homeless housing plan and participate in a local homeless housing
program. It must include a representative of the county, a
representative of the largest city located within the county, at least
one homeless or formerly homeless person, such other members as may be
required to maintain eligibility for federal funding related to housing
programs and services and if feasible, a representative of a private
nonprofit organization with experience in low-income housing.
(10) "Long-term private or public housing" means subsidized and
unsubsidized rental or owner-occupied housing in which there is no
established time limit for habitation of less than two years.
(11) "Interagency council on homelessness" means a committee
appointed by the governor and consisting of, at least, policy level
representatives of the following entities: (a) The department of
community, trade, and economic development; (b) the department of
corrections; (c) the department of social and health services; (d) the
department of veterans affairs; and (e) the department of health.
(12) "Performance measurement" means the process of comparing
specific measures of success against ultimate and interim goals.
(13) "Community action agency" means a nonprofit private or public
organization established under the economic opportunity act of 1964.
(14) "Housing authority" means any of the public corporations
created by chapter 35.82 RCW.
(15) "Homeless housing program" means the program authorized under
this chapter as administered by the department at the state level and
by the local government or its designated subcontractor at the local
level.
(16) "Homeless housing plan" means the ten-year plan developed by
the county or other local government to address housing for homeless
persons.
(17) "Homeless housing strategic plan" means the ten-year plan
developed by the department, in consultation with the interagency
council on homelessness and the affordable housing advisory board.
(18) "Washington homeless client management information system"
means a database of information about homeless individuals in the state
used to coordinate resources to assist homeless clients to obtain and
retain housing and reach greater levels of self-sufficiency or economic
independence when appropriate, depending upon their individual
situations.
(19) "Unsheltered homeless individual" means an individual living
outside or in a building not intended for human habitation or in which
the individual has no legal right to occupy.
(20) "Unsheltered homeless housing plan" means a local plan to
house all unsheltered homeless individuals as described in section 2 of
this act.
(21) "Shelter" means any housing that a person has a legal right or
has received permission to occupy and may include short-term,
emergency, interim, or temporary housing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The code reviser shall alphabetize and
renumber the definitions in RCW 43.185C.010.

--- END ---