BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To assist with the overall appearance, quality, public health,
safety, and welfare, and aesthetic values of local communities, the
legislature clarifies the existing authority of all incorporated cities
and towns, including unclassified cities and towns operating under
special charters, to adopt ordinances regulating the care, safety, and
retrieval of abandoned shopping carts from grocery stores and other
retail establishments.
(2) Incorporated cities and towns adopting a new ordinance, or
reaffirming an existing ordinance, shall provide an exception from
enforcement provisions, penalties, and additional administrative fees
for retail establishments demonstrating, through a mutually agreeable
process, that they have established or have contracts in place with a
vendor to establish a qualified shopping cart recovery program. For
the purposes of this section, a qualified shopping cart recovery
program is a program that meets the following minimum requirements:
(a) Utilizes a toll-free number, which must be displayed on all
shopping carts used by the retail establishment, for the reporting of
shopping carts that have been removed from the retail establishment's
property;
(b) Maintains a maximum response time of seventy-two hours for the
recovery of shopping carts reported abandoned via the toll-free number,
unless the location of the shopping cart requires a person to risk
personal harm in recovering the shopping cart;
(c) Conducts patrols during normal business hours for the purpose
of (i) identifying locations where shopping carts are commonly
abandoned and (ii) recovering shopping carts removed from the retail
establishment's property that have not yet been reported via the toll-free number; and
(d) Provides for the retrieval of shopping carts collected and
transported to a central location by city or town personnel within one
business day of a notification via the toll-free number.
(3) Incorporated cities and towns may adopt penalties of up to
fifty dollars per shopping cart for retail establishments that
establish and administer a qualified shopping cart recovery program if
the program fails to retrieve a shopping cart within the time frames
described under subsection (2) of this section, and may provide for the
disqualification of a previously qualified shopping cart recovery
program if the program repeatedly fails to meet the minimum
requirements under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Retail establishments that elect not to establish or contract
with a vendor for a qualified shopping cart recovery program are
subject to all applicable processes, enforcement provisions, fees, and
penalties imposed under local ordinances that govern abandoned shopping
carts.
(5) All incorporated cities and towns retain the authority to
address abandoned shopping carts that pose an identifiable and
immediate risk to public health, safety, and welfare, and to utilize
fee and penalty provisions of local ordinances that govern the recovery
and return of such carts.

--- END ---