BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 On January 1, 2008, legislation became
effective, which provided municipal business and occupation tax
uniformity and fairness. This legislation had been enacted five years
earlier in House Bill No. 2030 (chapter 79, Laws of 2003). The primary
objectives of the 2003 legislation were to make the existing municipal
tax system less complex and more fair through uniformity. However, as
the law has recently become effective, certain jurisdictions have
enacted local legislation specifically designed for the purpose of
avoiding the 2003 legislative intent. For example, certain local
governments have adopted ordinances imposing business square footage
taxes. Such local ordinances hurt the business community by
unnecessarily increasing the local tax complexity and placing unfair
tax burdens on certain business activities, which directly contradicts
the 2003 legislation.
Therefore, the legislature finds that it is of the utmost
importance to enact new legislation, which further clarifies that local
governments cannot sidestep the intentions of the legislature.
Municipal business and occupation tax fairness and uniformity are vital
to a healthy business community throughout the state. For these
reasons, local governments should not be allowed to develop new taxing
systems that are the same in principal as the old taxing systems, which
the legislature worked so diligently to eliminate in 2003. The 2003
act specifically required the development of a model ordinance for
business and occupation taxes in order to achieve the goals of that
legislation. This legislature finds that the model ordinance, which is
required to be adopted by local governments, must prohibit the
imposition of business square footage taxes to ensure tax fairness and
uniformity are accomplished.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.102.040 and 2006 c 301 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The cities, working through the association of Washington
cities, shall form a model ordinance development committee made up of
a representative sampling of cities that as of July 27, 2003, impose a
business and occupation tax. This committee shall work through the
association of Washington cities to adopt a model ordinance on
municipal gross receipts business and occupation tax. The model
ordinance and subsequent amendments shall be adopted using a process
that includes opportunity for substantial input from business
stakeholders and other members of the public. Input shall be solicited
from statewide business associations and from local chambers of
commerce and downtown business associations in cities that levy a
business and occupation tax.
(b) The municipal research council shall contract to post the model
ordinance on an internet web site and to make paper copies available
for inspection upon request. The department of revenue and the
department of licensing shall post copies of or links to the model
ordinance on their internet web sites. Additionally, a city that
imposes a business and occupation tax must make copies of its ordinance
available for inspection and copying as provided in chapter 42.56 RCW.
(c) The definitions and tax classifications in the model ordinance
may not be amended more frequently than once every four years, however
the model ordinance may be amended at any time to comply with changes
in state law. Any amendment to a mandatory provision of the model
ordinance must be adopted with the same effective date by all cities.
(2) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax must adopt
the mandatory provisions of the model ordinance. The following
provisions are mandatory:
(a) A system of credits that meets the requirements of RCW
35.102.060 and a form for such use;
(b) A uniform, minimum small business tax threshold of at least the
equivalent of twenty thousand dollars in gross income annually. A city
may elect to deviate from this requirement by creating a higher
threshold or exemption but it shall not deviate lower than the level
required in this subsection. If a city has a small business threshold
or exemption in excess of that provided in this subsection as of
January 1, 2003, and chooses to deviate below the threshold or
exemption level that was in place as of January 1, 2003, the city must
notify all businesses licensed to do business within the city at least
one hundred twenty days prior to the potential implementation of a
lower threshold or exemption amount;
(c) Tax reporting frequencies that meet the requirements of RCW
35.102.070;
(d) Penalty and interest provisions that meet the requirements of
RCW 35.102.080 and 35.102.090;
(e) Claim periods that meet the requirements of RCW 35.102.100;
(f) Refund provisions that meet the requirements of RCW 35.102.110;
and
(g) Definitions, which at a minimum, must include the definitions
enumerated in RCW 35.102.030 and 35.102.120. The definitions in
chapter 82.04 RCW shall be used as the baseline for all definitions in
the model ordinance, and any deviation in the model ordinance from
these definitions must be described by a comment in the model
ordinance.
(3) Except for the deduction required by RCW 35.102.160 and the
system of credits developed to address multiple taxation under
subsection (2)(a) of this section, a city may adopt its own provisions
for tax exemptions, tax credits, and tax deductions.
(4) A city with a population of more than five hundred thousand
persons may not adopt an ordinance that places a substantially
equivalent tax burden on the taxpayer, such as a square footage tax
that imposes a business and occupation tax that contradicts the
legislative intent of promoting uniformity and fairness among municipal
business and occupation taxes.
(5) Any city that adopts an ordinance that deviates from the
nonmandatory provisions of the model ordinance shall make a description
of such differences available to the public, in written and electronic
form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies retroactively, as well as
prospectively.

--- END ---