BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
organic biomass to a qualified business.
(2) For the purposes of this section and section 2 of this act:
(a) "Organic biomass" means: (i) Solid organic fuels from wood or
forest residue that do not include wood pieces that have been treated
with chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or
copper-chrome-arsenic; or (ii) byproducts of pulping or wood
manufacturing processes, including but not limited to bark, wood chips,
sawdust, and lignin in spent pulping liquors, where wood pieces were
not treated with chemical preservatives.
(b) "Qualified business" means a pulp and paper mill located in
Washington that uses organic biomass for the primary purpose of burning
the biomass in a boiler to produce steam to either: (i) Generate
electricity; or (ii) be used in the pulp and paper production process;
or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of organic biomass, if used by a qualified business.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

--- END ---