BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.42.025 and 1971 ex.s. c 62 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following sections of the scenic and recreational highway
system are excluded from the scenic system as defined in subsection (7)
of RCW 47.42.020:
(1) Beginning on state route number 101 at the junction with
Airport Road north of Shelton, thence north to a point two thousand
feet north of Airport Road.
(2) Beginning on state route number 101 at the junction with Mill
Creek Road south of Forks, thence north two and four-tenths miles to
the Calawah River bridge.
(3) Beginning on state route number 105 at a point one-half mile
southwest of the boundary of Aberdeen, thence northeast to the boundary
of Aberdeen.
(4) Beginning on state route number 17 at a point nine-tenths of a
mile west of Grape Drive in the vicinity of Moses Lake, thence easterly
to a junction of Grape Drive.
(5) Beginning on state route number 12 at a point one-half mile
south of the south boundary of Dayton, thence northerly to the south
boundary of Dayton.
(6) Beginning on state route number 14 one-half mile west of the
west boundary of Bingen, thence east to a point one-half mile east of
the east boundary of Bingen.
(7) Beginning on state route number 7 at the junction with 276th
street east south of Spanaway, thence north to the junction with 224th
street east.

--- END ---