BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The intent of this act is to
protect the fairness of elections for the highest court in Washington
state - the supreme court. Doing so will foster the public's trust in
the integrity and independence of the court in the face of increasingly
large sums of money raised and spent by special interest groups. That
flood of money threatens the impartiality, independence, and
credibility of our judiciary. To maintain public confidence in the
judiciary, we must prevent not only corruption, but the appearance of
corruption, for the judiciary is the one branch of government that must
be uniquely impartial, independent, and unbiased in order to best serve
the residents of Washington. It would be destructive for our democracy
to allow the court to become influenced by large amounts of money, and
for our citizens to think that judicial decisions are influenced by
those large amounts of money. This act is necessary to ensure that our
highest courts continue to be unbiased and insulated from special
interests.
Therefore, this act, the judicial election reform act, introduces
a voluntary pilot project to provide an alternative source of financing
candidates for the Washington supreme court who demonstrate public
support and voluntarily accept strict fundraising and spending limits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 JUDICIAL ELECTION REFORM ACT FUND. (1) The
judicial election reform act fund is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts required to be deposited into the fund
under sections 3 through 19 of this act must be deposited into the
fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for the purposes of
the judicial election reform act, sections 1 through 19 of this act.
Only the commission may authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund
is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) When the funds in the account have been fully distributed, the
commission and treasurer shall cease making any public funds
disbursements under sections 1 through 19 of this act. No candidates
are authorized to receive any disbursements of funds beyond those they
are qualified for pursuant to sections 1 through 19 of this act, nor
are any candidates authorized to receive any further disbursements of
funds under sections 1 through 19 of this act when the appropriation
has been exhausted. Qualifying pending requests for funds in the
account at the time the account is nearing a zero balance will be
addressed in the order received, to the extent any funds are available.
The commission may adopt rules to address distribution of remaining
funds in the account for pending requests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 VOLUNTARY LIMITATIONS ON CONTRIBUTIONS FOR
JUDICIAL CAMPAIGNS. A publicly financed candidate and a publicly
financed candidate's authorized committee shall:
(1) Only accept contributions from individuals, and only as
qualifying contributions under section 4 of this act or as seed money
under section 6 of this act;
(2) Not expend more than a total of one thousand dollars of the
candidate's personal funds and only during the qualifying period;
(3) Receive and expend seed money according to the provisions of
section 6 of this act;
(4) Collect at least the minimum number of qualifying contributions
under section 4 of this act;
(5) Expend only funds received from the judicial election reform
act fund after being certified as a publicly funded candidate;
(6) Sign a joint statement with the treasurer of the publicly
financed candidate's authorized committee, under oath, promising to
comply with the provisions of this chapter; and
(7) Comply with the provisions of this chapter to the extent
required for publicly funded candidates as prescribed by the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 APPLICATION FOR CERTIFICATION. A candidate
who wishes to receive public campaign funds must:
(1) File an application with the commission declaring his or her
intent to participate in the program as a candidate for the supreme
court. The application must be filed before or during the qualifying
period. In the application, the candidate shall affirm that only one
political committee, identified with its treasurer, shall handle all
contributions, expenditures, and obligations for the publicly financed
candidate and that the candidate will comply with the provisions set
forth in sections 1 through 19 of this act and rules adopted by the
commission; and
(2) Obtain at least the minimum number of qualifying contributions
by the end of the qualifying period. Candidates must obtain at least
five hundred qualifying contributions. No payment, gift, or anything
of value may be given in exchange for a qualifying contribution. A
qualifying contribution must be:
(a) Made by a registered voter of the state;
(b) Made by a person who is not given anything of value in exchange
for the qualifying contribution;
(c) In the sum of ten dollars, exactly;
(d) Received during the qualifying period by the candidate or on
behalf of the candidate; and
(e) Made by check, money order, or credit card.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 CERTIFICATION AS A PUBLICLY FINANCED
CANDIDATE. (1) Upon receipt of an application, the commission shall
determine whether or not the candidate has complied with the following
requirements:
(a) Signed and filed an application to participate;
(b) Submitted a report itemizing the qualifying contributions
received. The report must include the name, home address, telephone
number, and county of residence for each person who made a contribution
and the date the contribution was received, and any other information
required by the commission;
(c) Submitted a check or money order equal to the total qualifying
contributions received by the candidate made out to the judicial
election reform act fund; and
(d) Submitted affidavits signed by persons collecting qualifying
contributions stating that, to the best of his or her knowledge, the
contribution was made by a registered voter in the electoral district
of the office the candidate is seeking.
(2) Once the requirements in subsection (1) of this section are
met, the commission must verify that:
(a) Pursuant to section 4 of this act, a sufficient number of
qualifying contributions were made by registered voters of the state at
the time the contribution was made; and
(b) All seed money contributions meet, as reported, the
requirements of section 6 of this act.
(3) The commission must determine if a candidate meets the
requirements for public financing within seven calendar days of the
filing of an application. If the requirements of subsection (2) of
this section are met, the commission must certify the candidate for
public financing. If the commission denies certification, it must
provide written reasons why certification is denied. Any candidate who
is denied certification may reapply one time by submitting the required
information or the number of qualifying contributions needed to
complete the certification within fourteen calendar days of the date of
the commission's decision.
(4) A candidate who is certified as a publicly financed candidate
may use that designation in campaign materials and will be so
designated in the state voters' pamphlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 SEED MONEY CONTRIBUTIONS. A publicly
financed candidate may accept contributions of no more than one hundred
dollars and only from individuals for seed money. Seed money is
limited to twenty-five thousand dollars. Seed money may be raised and
spent only during the qualifying period and may only be used for the
purpose of raising qualifying contributions. The candidate's personal
funds are considered seed money and must be spent during the qualifying
period. Any seed money not spent by the end of the qualifying period
must be paid to the judicial election reform act fund. Seed money
contributions and expenditures must be reported as required under RCW
42.17.080 and 42.17.090 or as determined by the commission by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 CONTROLS ON A PUBLICLY FINANCED CANDIDATE'S
AUTHORIZED COMMITTEE. A publicly financed candidate and the publicly
financed candidate's authorized committee shall file the reports
required pursuant to this chapter as determined by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 USES OF PUBLIC FUNDS. (1) Money in the
account of a publicly financed candidate's authorized committee may
only be used for purposes directly related to the candidate's campaign.
(2) Money in the account of a publicly financed candidate's
authorized committee may not be used to pay fines or civil penalties,
for costs or legal fees related to representation before the
commission, or for defense of an enforcement action under this chapter.
Nothing in this chapter prevents a publicly financed candidate from
having a legal defense fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RETURN OF FUNDS. (1) If a candidate
attempts to qualify for public funding but does not meet the threshold
for qualification, withdraws from the program before application, is
denied certification under section 5 of this act, or revokes
participation under section 10 of this act, the candidate must make an
effort to return all qualifying contributions to the individual donors
within thirty calendar days of receiving notice of nonqualification or
making or revoking a decision not to participate. With a donor's
permission, or if a donor cannot be located, the qualifying
contribution shall remain in, or be paid to, the judicial election
reform act fund.
(2) Publicly financed candidates must return all unused funds to
the judicial election reform act fund within thirty calendar days after
the general election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 REVOCATION. (1) A publicly financed
candidate may revoke in writing to the commission a decision to
participate in the public financing program by June 15th in the year of
the election. After a timely revocation, that candidate may accept and
expend money outside the provisions of this act. Within thirty days
after revocation, a candidate must return to the commission all money
received from the judicial election reform act fund.
(2) A publicly financed candidate who revokes a decision to
participate in the public financing program after the time period
established in subsection (1) of this section must return all money
received from the judicial election reform act fund and pay a fine of
one thousand dollars per day for each day beyond the allowed revocation
period and the day the candidate revokes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 CAMPAIGN FUNDING. (1) Within five business
days after a publicly financed candidate's name is approved to appear
on the primary ballot by the appropriate elections officer in a
contested election, and within five business days after a publicly
financed candidate's name is approved to appear on the general election
ballot in a contested election, the commission shall authorize the
state treasurer to distribute to the account of the authorized
committee of each certified publicly financed candidate an amount equal
to fifty times the filing fee as established in RCW 29A.24.091 for the
primary and an amount equal to one hundred times that filing fee for
the general election.
(2) Publicly financed candidates who are uncontested shall receive
an amount equal to four times the filing fee.
(3) A publicly financed candidate shall return within ten calendar
days to the judicial election reform act fund any amount distributed
for an election that is unspent and uncommitted as of the date the
candidate ceases to be a candidate or as of the date of the election,
whichever occurs first.
(4) The commission shall authorize and the state treasurer shall
distribute funds to publicly financed candidates in a manner that
ensures accountability and safeguards the integrity of the fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 FAIR FIGHT FUNDS. (1) When a report is
filed under this chapter or other evidence comes to the attention of
the commission indicating that a nonparticipating candidate has
received more money than his or her publicly financed opponent has
received in public funding, the commission shall notify the publicly
financed candidate of his or her eligibility for fair fight funds.
(a) A publicly financed candidate may receive fair fight funds
equal to the difference between the total amount received by the
nonparticipating candidate for each election and the amount received by
the publicly financed candidate for each election. If there are
multiple nonparticipating candidates who have received more money than
the publicly financed candidate has received, the publicly financed
candidate is eligible for fair fight funds based on the difference
between the total amount received by the nonparticipating candidate who
has received the most money and the amount received by the publicly
financed candidate.
(b) The total amount a publicly financed candidate may receive in
fair fight funds is five hundred times the filing fee for that office.
The amounts in this subsection are a total for both the primary and
general elections. A publicly financed candidate may determine when to
access available fair fight funds.
(2)(a) Independent expenditures and electioneering communications
opposing a publicly financed candidate shall be considered as
contributions to each opposing candidate and the commission shall
authorize fair fight funds pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
to the publicly financed candidate.
(b) Independent expenditures and electioneering communications
supporting one or more nonparticipating opponents of a publicly
financed candidate shall be treated as contributions to those
nonparticipating candidates and the commission shall authorize fair
fight funds pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to the publicly
financed candidate.
(c) Independent expenditures and electioneering communications
supporting a publicly financed candidate shall be considered, for every
opposing publicly financed candidate, as though the independent
expenditures or electioneering communications were a contribution to a
nonparticipating opponent and the commission shall authorize fair fight
funds pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to each opposing
publicly financed candidate.
(d) For purposes of this section, expenditures made by a
nonparticipating candidate and independent expenditures and
electioneering communications are deemed to have been made the day the
independent expenditure or electioneering communication is contracted
for, agreed to, or otherwise obligated.
(3) If adequate funding is not available to fully equalize funding
for publicly financed candidates under this section, the commission may
authorize a lesser amount.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 REPORTING PLANNED EXPENDITURES. Within
twenty-one days of an election, a nonparticipating candidate who has a
publicly financed opponent must provide to the commission a report
containing the expenditures planned by the nonparticipating candidate
for the twenty-one days before the election and the associated costs of
those expenditures. If the nonparticipating candidate does not report
planned expenditures, the commission shall authorize twice the amount
of an expenditure not reported in fair fight funds to the publicly
financed opponent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 REPORTS. (1)(a) Any nonparticipating
candidate who has a publicly financed opponent shall report total
contributions received to the commission electronically within twenty-four hours after the total amount of contributions received exceeds
eighty percent of the amount authorized for publicly financed
candidates under section 11 of this act.
(b) Any person making independent expenditures or electioneering
communications in excess of three thousand dollars in support of or
opposition to a publicly financed candidate, or in support of a
candidate opposing a publicly financed candidate, shall file with the
commission the report adopted by the commission by rule. The report
shall be filed within twenty-four hours of the date the independent
expenditure or electioneering communication is contracted for, agreed
to, or otherwise obligated.
(c) The commission may adopt rules implementing the provisions of
this section, including rules that determine (i) whether filing under
this section satisfies the filing requirements under other provisions
of this chapter, and (ii) when the reporting requirements of this
section are no longer warranted because a publicly financed candidate
has received the maximum amount of fair fight funds permitted by this
section.
(2) Publicly financed candidates shall report in accordance with
rules adopted by the commission. A publicly financed candidate who
revokes his or her participation in the program, who ceases to be a
candidate, or who loses an election shall file a final report with the
commission and return any unspent disbursements received from the
judicial election reform act fund. In developing reporting
requirements for publicly financed candidates, the commission shall use
existing campaign reporting procedures when determined practicable by
the commission.
(3) Any person who fails to report a contribution or expenditure as
required by this section is subject to a civil penalty equal to the
contribution or expenditure not reported.
(4) The commission shall ensure prompt public access to the reports
received under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 CIVIL PROCEEDING TO ENJOIN VIOLATION. (1)
Whenever it appears that a nonparticipating candidate who has a
publicly financed opponent or any person is making an independent
expenditure or an electioneering communication in the form of a radio
or television presentation that constitutes a violation of the
reporting provisions of section 14 of this act, the commission shall
initiate a civil proceeding in superior court to enjoin such violation,
and may petition the court to issue an order to the broadcasting
station for the discontinuance of the radio or television presentation
that is in violation of section 14 of this act.
(2) An action under this section shall be brought in the county in
which the violation is alleged to have taken place, and shall be
commenced by the filing of a verified complaint, or shall be
accompanied by an affidavit.
(3) If it is shown to the satisfaction of the court, either by
verified complaint or affidavit, that the nonparticipating candidate or
other person is engaged in or about to engage in any act that
constitutes a violation of section 14 of this act, the court may issue
a temporary restraining order to abate and prevent the continuance or
recurrence of the act.
(4) The court may issue a permanent injunction to restrain, abate,
or prevent the continuance or recurrence of the violation of section 14
of this act. The court may grant declaratory relief, mandatory orders,
or any other relief deemed necessary to accomplish the purposes of the
injunction. The court may retain jurisdiction of the case for the
purpose of enforcing its orders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 PUBLIC FORUMS. Publicly financed
candidates in contested races must participate in one public forum
during a primary election period and one public forum during a general
election period. The commission shall seek sponsorship of the forums
with a nonpartisan organization active in providing information to
voters on candidates or encouraging informed participation in voting.
The forums shall be conducted at times decided by the commission and in
accordance with rules prescribed by the commission. Nonparticipating
candidates may be invited to participate in the forums.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 DISQUALIFICATION FROM PROGRAM. If the
commission finds that a publicly financed candidate or the publicly
financed candidate's committee is accepting and expending money outside
the provisions of sections 1 through 19 of this act, the candidate
shall be disqualified from the program, shall be subject to a civil
penalty under RCW 42.17.390, and shall return all money received from
the judicial election reform act fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 IMPLEMENTATION AND ENFORCEMENT DUTIES. The
commission shall:
(1) Prescribe forms for reports, statements, notices, and other
documents as required by sections 1 through 19 of this act;
(2) Prepare and publish instructions to facilitate compliance with
sections 1 through 19 of this act and explaining the duties of persons
and committees under sections 1 through 19 of this act;
(3) Adopt rules to carry out the policies of sections 1 through 19
of this act. These rules are not subject to the time restrictions of
RCW 42.17.370(1); and
(4) Enforce the provisions of sections 1 through 19 of this act,
ensure that money transferred from the judicial election reform act
fund into the account of an authorized committee of a publicly financed
candidate is spent as specified, and monitor reports filed and
financial records of candidates as needed to ensure that fair fight
funds are promptly authorized to opposing qualified candidates under
section 12 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 EXPEDITED ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW. (1) The
commission shall develop an expedited administrative review process
that is not subject to the adjudicative proceedings of chapter 34.05
RCW. However, commission findings are subject to judicial review under
RCW 34.05.570(4).
(2) The following individuals may seek expedited administrative
review of commission decisions:
(a) Candidates and potential candidates whom the commission finds
ineligible to participate in the program;
(b) Publicly financed candidates who are denied fair fight funds;
and
(c) Opponents of a publicly financed candidate who disagree with a
decision by the commission to grant fair fight funds to a publicly
financed candidate.
(3) In an expedited administrative review process, the commission
shall issue a final decision no more than five calendar days after
review is requested.
(4) The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.
(5) Any petition for judicial review of a final decision in an
expedited administrative review must be filed within five calendar days
of the final decision. In any judicial review, the court shall not
grant a stay or temporary relief unless it finds the conditions
specified in RCW 34.05.550(3) (a), (b), and (c).

Sec. 20 RCW 42.17.390 and 2006 c 315 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
One or more of the following civil remedies and sanctions may be
imposed by court order in addition to any other remedies provided by
law:
(1) If the court finds that the violation of any provision of this
chapter by any candidate or political committee probably affected the
outcome of any election, the result of said election may be held void
and a special election held within sixty days of such finding. Any
action to void an election shall be commenced within one year of the
date of the election in question. It is intended that this remedy be
imposed freely in all appropriate cases to protect the right of the
electorate to an informed and knowledgeable vote.
(2) If any lobbyist or sponsor of any grass roots lobbying campaign
violates any of the provisions of this chapter, his or her registration
may be revoked or suspended and he or she may be enjoined from
receiving compensation or making expenditures for lobbying: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That imposition of such sanction shall not excuse said
lobbyist from filing statements and reports required by this chapter.
(3) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter
may be subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars
for each such violation. However, a person or entity who violates RCW
42.17.640 and 42.17.645 may be subject to a civil penalty of ten
thousand dollars or three times the amount of the contribution
illegally made or accepted, whichever is greater.
(4) Any person who fails to file a properly completed statement or
report within the time required by this chapter may be subject to a
civil penalty of ten dollars per day for each day each such delinquency
continues.
(5) Any person who fails to report a contribution or expenditure as
required by this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty equivalent
to the amount not reported as required.
(6) The court may enjoin any person to prevent the doing of any act
herein prohibited, or to compel the performance of any act required
herein.
(7)(a) The civil penalty for a violation of a contribution or
expenditure limit established under section 3 of this act by or on
behalf of a publicly financed candidate is ten times the amount by
which the expenditures or contributions exceed the applicable limit.
If the violation occurs within five days of an election, the civil
penalty is twenty times the amount by which the expenditures or
contributions exceed the applicable limit. A publicly financed
candidate found to have knowingly committed a violation of the
expenditure or contribution limits under section 3 of this act shall
pay the applicable fines, surrender all money in the candidate's
authorized committee account to the judicial election reform act fund,
and will cease to be a publicly financed candidate.
(b) In addition to any other penalties imposed by law, the civil
penalty for a violation by or on behalf of a publicly financed
candidate of a reporting requirement imposed by this chapter is one
hundred dollars per day. A civil penalty imposed under this subsection
(7)(b) may not exceed twice the amount of expenditures or contributions
not reported in a timely manner. The candidate and the candidate's
authorized committee are jointly and severally responsible for a civil
penalty imposed under this subsection.
(c) The civil penalty for a violation of the revocation requirement
imposed by sections 1 through 19 of this act is one thousand dollars
per day for each day past the period allowed for a timely revocation.
(d) The civil penalty for a violation of the reporting provisions
in section 14 of this act shall be equal to the amount not reported.
(e) All civil penalties collected under this subsection must be
deposited into the judicial election reform act fund.

Sec. 21 RCW 42.17.020 and 2007 c 358 s 1 and 2007 c 180 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with
reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.
(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(4) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition
proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal
corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency from
and after the time when the proposition has been initially filed with
the appropriate election officer of that constituency prior to its
circulation for signatures.
(5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(6) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has filed a valid certificate of
nomination with the secretary of state under chapter 29A.20 RCW;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, that is the body
authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority
on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(7) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.
(8) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(9) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(10) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(11) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(12) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.
(13) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services
of any kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW
42.17.241, the term "compensation" shall not include per diem
allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse
a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged
in the official business of the governmental entity.
(14) "Contested election" means an election in which there are two
or more candidates running for the same office whose names will appear
on the ballot.
(15) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee
that is an organization of continuing existence not established in
anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(((15))) (16)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, the person or persons named on the candidate's or
committee's registration form who direct expenditures on behalf of the
candidate or committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising or electioneering communication
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the
individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws; or
(ix) The performance of ministerial functions by a person on behalf
of two or more candidates or political committees either as volunteer
services defined in (b)(vi) of this subsection or for payment by the
candidate or political committee for whom the services are performed as
long as:
(A) The person performs solely ministerial functions;
(B) A person who is paid by two or more candidates or political
committees is identified by the candidates and political committees on
whose behalf services are performed as part of their respective
statements of organization under RCW 42.17.040; and
(C) The person does not disclose, except as required by law, any
information regarding a candidate's or committee's plans, projects,
activities, or needs, or regarding a candidate's or committee's
contributions or expenditures that is not already publicly available
from campaign reports filed with the commission, or otherwise engage in
activity that constitutes a contribution under (a)(ii) of this
subsection.
A person who performs ministerial functions under this subsection
(((15))) (16)(b)(ix) is not considered an agent of the candidate or
committee as long as he or she has no authority to authorize
expenditures or make decisions on behalf of the candidate or committee.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(((16))) (17) "Elected official" means any person elected at a
general or special election to any public office, and any person
appointed to fill a vacancy in any such office.
(((17))) (18) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special
election for public office and any election in which a ballot
proposition is submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in
which the qualifications for voting include other than those
requirements set forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the
Constitution of the state of Washington shall not be considered an
election for purposes of this chapter.
(((18))) (19) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of
or in opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(((19))) (20) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the
first day of January after the date of the last previous general
election for the office that the candidate seeks and ending on December
31st after the next election for the office. In the case of a special
election to fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the
period beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on December
31st after the special election.
(((20))) (21) "Electioneering communication" means any broadcast,
cable, or satellite television or radio transmission, United States
postal service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical that:
(a) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or judicial
office either by specifically naming the candidate, or identifying the
candidate without using the candidate's name;
(b) Is broadcast, transmitted, mailed, erected, distributed, or
otherwise published within sixty days before any election for that
office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking election;
and
(c) Either alone, or in combination with one or more communications
identifying the candidate by the same sponsor during the sixty days
before an election, has a fair market value of five thousand dollars or
more.
(((21))) (22) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
(a) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by a
candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when
the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising
appearing at least twelve months preceding his or her becoming a
candidate;
(b) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the
advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor,
so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been
invited to participate in the debate or forum;
(c) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is:
(i) Of primary interest to the general public;
(ii) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that
news medium; and
(iii) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political
committee;
(d) Slate cards and sample ballots;
(e) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar works
(i) written by a candidate when the candidate entered into a contract
for such publications or media at least twelve months before becoming
a candidate, or (ii) written about a candidate;
(f) Public service announcements;
(g) A mailed internal political communication primarily limited to
the members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(h) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized committee
of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or
(i) Any other communication exempted by the commission through rule
consistent with the intent of this chapter.
(((22))) (23) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution,
subscription, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or
anything of value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement,
whether or not legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term
"expenditure" also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer
of anything of value in exchange for goods, services, property,
facilities, or anything of value for the purpose of assisting,
benefiting, or honoring any public official or candidate, or assisting
in furthering or opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of
this chapter, agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises
to pay may be reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is
made. The term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete
repayment by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a
loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(((23))) (24) "Final report" means the report described as a final
report in RCW 42.17.080(2).
(((24))) (25) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640
means the election that results in the election of a person to a state
office. It does not include a primary.
(((25))) (26) "Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.
(((26))) (27) "Immediate family" includes the spouse, dependent
children, and other dependent relatives, if living in the household.
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, "immediate family"
means an individual's spouse, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister
of the individual and the spouse of any such person and a child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half
brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse and the
spouse of any such person.
(((27))) (28) "Incumbent" means a person who is in present
possession of an elected office.
(((28))) (29) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that
has each of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of five hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.
(((29))) (30)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits
a contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless
the contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family as
defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an
association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(((30))) (31) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions,
amendments, nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in
either house of the state legislature, and includes any other matter
that may be the subject of action by either house or any committee of
the legislature and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both
houses, are pending approval by the governor.
(((31))) (32) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature
of the state of Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule,
standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency
under the state Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes an association's or other
organization's act of communicating with the members of that
association or organization.
(((32))) (33) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in
his or her own or another's behalf.
(((33))) (34) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by
whom a lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is
compensated for acting as a lobbyist.
(((34))) (35) "Ministerial functions" means an act or duty carried
out as part of the duties of an administrative office without exercise
of personal judgment or discretion.
(((35))) (36) "Nonparticipating candidate" means a candidate for
supreme court justice who is on the ballot but has chosen not to apply
for public funds from the judicial election reform act fund or a
candidate who is on the ballot and has applied but has not been
certified to receive public funds from the judicial election reform act
fund.
(37) "Participate" means that, with respect to a particular
election, an entity:
(a) Makes either a monetary or in-kind contribution to a candidate;
(b) Makes an independent expenditure or electioneering
communication in support of or opposition to a candidate;
(c) Endorses a candidate prior to contributions being made by a
subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or
that candidate's opponent;
(d) Makes a recommendation regarding whether a candidate should be
supported or opposed prior to a contribution being made by a subsidiary
corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that
candidate's opponent; or
(e) Directly or indirectly collaborates or consults with a
subsidiary corporation or local unit on matters relating to the support
of or opposition to a candidate, including, but not limited to, the
amount of a contribution, when a contribution should be given, and what
assistance, services or independent expenditures, or electioneering
communications, if any, will be made or should be made in support of or
opposition to a candidate.
(((36))) (38) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint
venture, public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or
local governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(((37))) (39) "Person in interest" means the person who is the
subject of a record or any representative designated by that person,
except that if that person is under a legal disability, the term
"person in interest" means and includes the parent or duly appointed
legal representative.
(((38))) (40) "Political advertising" includes any advertising
displays, newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles,
tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other
means of mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing,
directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support or
opposition in any election campaign.
(((39))) (41) "Political committee" means any person (except a
candidate or an individual dealing with his or her own funds or
property) having the expectation of receiving contributions or making
expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any
ballot proposition.
(((40))) (42) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
procedure for nominating a candidate to state office under chapter
29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in large
measure, the procedures established in chapter 29A.52 RCW.
(((41))) (43) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial,
county, city, town, school district, port district, special district,
or other state political subdivision elective office.
(((42))) (44) "Public record" includes any writing containing
information relating to the conduct of government or the performance of
any governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or
retained by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(((43))) (45) "Publicly financed candidate" means a candidate who
becomes certified to receive public campaign funds under section 5 of
this act.
(46) "Qualifying contribution" means a contribution of exactly ten
dollars, made by a registered voter of the electoral district of the
office the candidate is seeking, and is received during the qualifying
period.
(47) "Qualifying period" means the period beginning February 1st of
the election year and ending on the close of the regular filing period
for the office.
(48) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the
date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29A.56.120 and ending
thirty days after the recall election.
(((44))) (49) "Seed money" means a contribution of no more than one
hundred dollars, made by an individual, and received during the
qualifying period.
(50) "Sponsor of an electioneering communications, independent
expenditures, or political advertising" means the person paying for the
electioneering communication, independent expenditure, or political
advertising. If a person acts as an agent for another or is reimbursed
by another for the payment, the original source of the payment is the
sponsor.
(((45))) (51) "State legislative office" means the office of a
member of the state house of representatives or the office of a member
of the state senate.
(((46))) (52) "State office" means state legislative office or the
office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney
general, commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner,
superintendent of public instruction, state auditor, or state
treasurer.
(((47))) (53) "State official" means a person who holds a state
office.
(((48))) (54) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political
committee or candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the
possession or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the
election for which the contributions were received, and that are in
excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the
committee or candidate prior to that election. In the case of a
continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those
contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee
that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts
when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17.065.
(((49))) (55) "Uncontested election" means an election in which a
candidate running for a specified office has no opponent on the ballot.
(56) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.
As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any
gender, the other, as the context requires.

Sec. 22 RCW 42.52.180 and 1995 c 397 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use
of facilities of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of
assisting a campaign for election of a person to an office or for the
promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition. Knowing
acquiescence by a person with authority to direct, control, or
influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using
public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation
of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited
to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state
employees of the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by
the agency.
(2) This section shall not apply to the following activities:
(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose a ballot proposition as long as (i) required notice of the
meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition, and
(ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public are
afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;
(b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes of this subsection,
it is not a violation of this section for an elected official to
respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to make
incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an
actual, measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards
shall adopt by rule a definition of measurable expenditure;
(c) Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency; ((and))
(d) De minimis use of public facilities by statewide elected
officials and legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of
permissible communications, including written and verbal communications
initiated by them of their views on ballot propositions that
foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their constitutional
or statutory responsibilities; and
(e) Activities that are undertaken by a public agency in
implementation of sections 1 through 19 of this act, the judicial
election reform act.
(3) As to state officers and employees, this section operates to
the exclusion of RCW 42.17.130.

Sec. 23 RCW 42.17.128 and 1993 c 2 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in sections 1 through 19 of this act, public
funds, whether derived through taxes, fees, penalties, or any other
sources, shall not be used to finance political campaigns for state or
local office.

Sec. 24 RCW 42.17.130 and 2006 c 215 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in sections 1 through 19 of this act, no
elective official nor any employee of his (([or her])) or her office
nor any person appointed to or employed by any public office or agency
may use or authorize the use of any of the facilities of a public
office or agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of assisting
a campaign for election of any person to any office or for the
promotion of or opposition to any ballot proposition. Facilities of a
public office or agency include, but are not limited to, use of
stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of employees of the
office or agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the office or agency, and clientele lists of persons
served by the office or agency. However, this does not apply to the
following activities:
(1) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body or by an elected board, council, or commission of a
special purpose district including, but not limited to, fire districts,
public hospital districts, library districts, park districts, port
districts, public utility districts, school districts, sewer districts,
and water districts, to express a collective decision, or to actually
vote upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to
support or oppose a ballot proposition so long as (a) any required
notice of the meeting includes the title and number of the ballot
proposition, and (b) members of the legislative body, members of the
board, council, or commission of the special purpose district, or
members of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity
for the expression of an opposing view;
(2) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry;
(3) Activities which are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency.

Sec. 25 RCW 42.36.040 and 1982 c 229 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Prior to declaring as a candidate for public office or while
campaigning for public office as defined by RCW 42.17.020 (((5) and
(25))) (9) and (43) no public discussion or expression of an opinion by
a person subsequently elected to a public office, on any pending or
proposed quasi-judicial actions, shall be a violation of the appearance
of fairness doctrine.

Sec. 26 RCW 63.29.230 and 1983 c 179 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Except as otherwise provided by this section,)) The
department shall promptly deposit in the judicial election reform act
fund created in section 2 of this act the first three million dollars
of funds received each biennium under this chapter. The department
shall deposit amounts in the general fund of this state all funds in
excess of three million dollars received under this chapter, including
the proceeds from the sale of abandoned property under RCW 63.29.220.
The department shall retain in a separate trust fund an amount not less
than two hundred fifty thousand dollars from which prompt payment of
claims duly allowed must be made by the department. Before making the
deposit, the department shall record the name and last known address of
each person appearing from the holders' reports to be entitled to the
property and the name and last known address of each insured person or
annuitant and beneficiary and with respect to each policy or contract
listed in the report of an insurance company its number, and the name
of the company. The record must be available for public inspection at
all reasonable business hours.
(2) The department of revenue may pay from the trust fund provided
in subsection (1) of this section any costs of administering this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 Sections 1 through 19 of this act may be
known and cited as the judicial election reform act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 Sections 1 through 19 of this act are each
added to chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 Captions used in this act are not part of
the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 Except for the transfers established in RCW
63.29.230, if any provision of this act or its application to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the
application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not
affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 By January 1, 2013, the public disclosure
commission shall report to the governor and to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the effectiveness of the judicial
election reform act, sections 1 through 19 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 This act expires January 1, 2014.

--- END ---