BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that this state has
entered into agreements with the federal government and otherwise may
have participated in establishing animal identification lists or
databases using emerging technologies. The legislature finds that
existing means for identifying and tracking animals have been
sufficient to trace outbreaks of animal diseases, and that there is no
scientific evidence that mass, uniform electronic tagging and tracking
of animals will improve this state's or nation's ability to prevent,
control, or respond to an outbreak of animal disease, whether natural
or intentionally introduced. The legislature finds that the fostering
of livestock ownership and farming is in the best interests of this
state and its citizens, and that the establishment of a national or
state identification system using emerging technologies is detrimental
to individual ownership and raising of livestock. The legislature
therefore directs that this state shall not participate in or establish
a mandatory or voluntary emerging technology animal identification
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Animal" means all members of the animal kingdom except humans,
fish, and insects. "Animal" does not include undomesticated animals
living in the wild.
(2) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her
duly authorized representative.
(4) "Emerging technology" includes, but is not limited to,
biotechnology, electronic identification, radio-frequency
identification devices or tattoos, cloning, and biometrics.
(5) "Livestock" means equines (horses, mules, donkeys, burros);
bovines (cattle and bison); cervids (deer and elk); ovine (sheep);
caprine (goats); porcine (swine); camelids (llamas and alpacas);
poultry (chickens, ducks, emu, geese, guineas, pheasants, quail,
turkeys); and any other animal that the federal government may have
included in the national animal identification system. "Livestock"
does not include undomesticated animals living in the wild.
(6) "Person" means individuals, corporations, partnerships,
associations, or other legal entities and agents of those entities.
(7) "Premises" means a location where livestock are raised, held,
or boarded.
(8) "Source verification program" means the national animal
identification system (NAIS) or any other program that tracks
individual animals or groups of animals in order to determine the
origin of such animal or group, the identity of all other animals that
have been in contact with it, and the location of all premises at which
it has been held in its lifetime.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) This state shall not establish nor
participate in the use of emerging technologies to create national
animal identification lists or databases.
(2) The prohibition in this section also applies to the components
of a source verification program including premises registration and
databases, animal identification and databases, and animal movement
tracing and databases.
(3) All cooperative agreements between the federal government and
this state, or between this state and other states, established before
the effective date of this section and related to the establishment of
animal tracking, electronic tagging, registration, information
databases, premises registration, use of microchips for animal tagging
purposes, and other matters related to the use of emerging technologies
to create national animal identification lists or databases are hereby
terminated and null and void as to this state's participation.
(4) Immediately upon the effective date of this section, any
identification lists or databases created using, in whole or in part,
federal funds, shall be void and shall not be used for any purpose by
any governmental, public, or private person or entity. This provision
includes lists and databases that were created solely for the purposes
of addressing specific diseases in specific species of livestock.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Nothing in this chapter may be construed as
prohibiting the state from establishing or participating in disease
control programs specifically designed to address a known disease in a
specific species of livestock. However, consent from the owner of
livestock is necessary to collect or access information about the
owner's livestock.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Nothing in this chapter may be construed as
prohibiting the state from operating livestock identification, brand
registration, and inspection programs as authorized by chapters 16.57,
16.58, and 43.23 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Disease programs that utilize databases
or emerging technologies must provide for full and informed consent of
all participants, including disclosure of the entire program, the
possible uses of information collected thereunder, and every entity or
person to whom such information may be disclosed.
(2) Persons who voluntarily enroll in a source verification program
shall be allowed to withdraw from the program at any time and their
personal information shall be permanently removed from program records.
(3) No public funds may be used to support a source verification
program.
(4) Any private source verification program shall not be used to
gain unfair competitive advantage, but shall be considered a commercial
term subject to laws restricting unfair competition.
(5) A private source verification program identification system,
device, or marking shall not obliterate or supersede or otherwise make
unreadable this state's or any local entity's brand or mark on any
animal. A source verification program's rules may not supersede this
state's brand or marking system rules as a matter of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) No services, compensation, favors,
payments, credits, benefits, licenses, permits, certifications,
insurance or risk management coverage, special consideration, or other
incentives may be provided by any public or private person, directly or
indirectly, to any participant in an animal identification or premises
registration program based solely on that person's participation in
such program.
(2) No services, compensation, favors, payments, credits, benefits,
licenses, permits, certifications, insurance or risk management
coverage, special consideration, or other incentives may be denied,
revoked, or limited by any public or private person, directly or
indirectly, based solely on that person's lack of participation in an
animal identification or premises registration program.
(3) Neither this state nor any local government in this state may
require any of its suppliers to participate in a premises registration
or animal identification program as a condition of supplying goods or
services.
(4) Failure to participate in a premises registration or animal
identification program, or the providing of services to persons who are
not participants in a premises registration or animal identification
program, shall not be a crime, an element of any crime, or evidence of
any negligence or gross negligence on the part of any livestock owner
or provider of goods or services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 16 RCW.

--- END ---