BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that not
all persons who commit sex offenses are prosecuted and convicted for
their crimes and that these people present the same danger to the
public as offenders who are caught and tried for their crimes. The
legislature further finds and declares that civil requirements, such as
sex offender registration and public notification, have been an
efficient way in which to alert the public to dangerous persons in
their communities. The legislature therefore intends to increase
public safety by enacting civil public notification requirements for
certain persons who have admitted under oath to committing sex
offenses, but who have not been convicted of a sex offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a law enforcement agency becomes aware that a person has
admitted, under oath, to committing a sex offense, the law enforcement
agency must notify the public of this information in the same manner in
which the law enforcement agency notifies the public about a level II
sex offender under RCW 4.24.550.
(2) This section does not apply to persons who are already
registered sex offenders under RCW 9A.44.130.
(3) A law enforcement agency and its employees are immune from
civil liability for damages arising from acts or omissions regarding
the implementation of this section, unless such acts or omissions
constitute gross negligence.
(4) For purposes of this section, "sex offense" has the same
meaning as in RCW 9A.44.130.

--- END ---