BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.510 and 1987 c 330 s 729 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person may sell any automobile manufactured or assembled
after January 1, 1964, nor may any owner cause such vehicle to be
registered thereafter under the provisions of chapter 46.12 RCW unless
such motor car or automobile is equipped with automobile seat belts
installed for use on the front seats thereof which are of a type and
installed in a manner conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol.
Where registration is for transfer from an out-of-state license, the
applicant shall be informed of this section by the issuing agent and
has thirty days to comply. The state patrol shall adopt and enforce
standards as to what constitutes adequate and safe seat belts and for
the fastening and installation of them. Such standards shall not be
below those specified as minimum requirements by the Society of
Automotive Engineers on June 13, 1963.
(2) Every passenger car manufactured or assembled after January 1,
1965, shall be equipped with at least two lap-type safety belt
assemblies for use in the front seating positions.
(3) Every passenger car manufactured or assembled after January 1,
1968, shall be equipped with a lap-type safety belt assembly for each
permanent passenger seating position. This requirement shall not apply
to police vehicles.
(4) Every passenger car manufactured or assembled after January 1,
1968, shall be equipped with at least two shoulder harness-type safety
belt assemblies for use in the front seating positions.
(5) The state patrol shall excuse specified types of motor vehicles
or seating positions within any motor vehicle from the requirements
imposed by subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section when
compliance would be impractical.
(6) No person may distribute, have for sale, offer for sale, or
sell any safety belt or shoulder harness for use in motor vehicles
unless it meets current minimum standards and specifications conforming
to rules adopted by the state patrol or the United States department of
transportation.
(7) Every new school bus purchased on or after September 1, 2008,
must be equipped with safety belts for use by each person riding the
bus. The safety belts must be of a design to provide a lap belt for
pelvic restraint and a shoulder belt to restrain upper torso movement.

--- END ---