BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW
to read as follows:
An on-site sewage disposal system owner is responsible for
operating, monitoring, and maintaining the owner's on-site sewage
disposal system to minimize the risk of failure. To help accomplish
this purpose, the owner is responsible for inspecting their on-site
sewage disposal system and ensuring a complete evaluation of the
on-site sewage disposal system components and property as necessary to
determine functionality, maintenance needs, and compliance with
regulations and any permits. The on-site sewage disposal system must
be inspected:
(1)(a) At least once every three years for all on-site sewage
disposal systems consisting solely of a septic tank and gravity
subsurface soil absorption system, except:
(b) Inspection frequency for on-site sewage disposal systems
included under (a) of this subsection may be increased after each
inspection by adding one year to the length of time between
inspections, provided the on-site sewage disposal system is found to be
functioning properly, for up to a maximum of seven years between
inspections; and
(2)(a) Annually for all on-site sewage disposal systems that do not
consist solely of a septic tank and gravity subsurface soil absorption
system, except:
(b) Inspection frequency for on-site sewage disposal systems
included under (a) of this subsection may be increased after each
inspection by adding six months to the length of time between
inspections, provided the on-site sewage disposal system is found to be
functioning properly and the on-site sewage disposal system is designed
to accommodate an increased inspection interval, for up to a maximum of
three years between inspections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW
to read as follows:
If during an inspection conducted under section 1 of this act an
on-site sewage disposal system is found to be functioning improperly,
the following inspection frequency applies, beginning after the on-site
sewage disposal system's function is corrected:
(1) For all on-site sewage disposal systems consisting solely of a
septic tank and gravity subsurface soil absorption system, the maximum
time allowed until the next inspection is one year less than the length
of time since the last inspection. Inspections may not be required
more frequently than annually except to resolve a performance problem.
(2) For all on-site sewage disposal systems that do not consist
solely of a septic tank and gravity subsurface soil absorption system,
the maximum time allowed until the next inspection is six months less
than the length of time since the last inspection. Inspections may not
be required more frequently than every six months except to resolve a
performance problem.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an on-site sewage disposal system consisting solely of a
septic tank and gravity subsurface soil absorption system is not
inspected at least once within the three-year period from June 30,
2009, to June 30, 2012, then, after an inspection does take place, the
inspection frequency must start at every three years provided the
on-site sewage disposal system is found to be functioning properly. If
the on-site sewage disposal system is found to be functioning
improperly, the inspection frequency must start at one year after the
on-site sewage disposal system's function is corrected.
(2) If an on-site sewage disposal system that does not consist
solely of a septic tank and gravity subsurface soil absorption system
is not inspected at least once within the one-year period from June 30,
2009, to June 30, 2010, then, after an inspection does take place, the
inspection frequency must start at one year provided the on-site sewage
disposal system is found to be functioning properly. If the on-site
sewage disposal system is found to be functioning improperly, the
inspection frequency must start at six months after the on-site sewage
disposal system's function is corrected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of health must revise WAC
246-272A-0270 in accordance with the criteria established in sections
1 through 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.118A
RCW to read as follows:
An on-site sewage disposal system owner is responsible for
operating, monitoring, and maintaining the owner's on-site sewage
disposal system to minimize the risk of failure. To help accomplish
this purpose, the owner is responsible for inspecting their on-site
sewage disposal system and ensuring a complete evaluation of the
on-site sewage disposal system components and property as necessary to
determine functionality, maintenance needs, and compliance with
regulations and any permits. The on-site sewage disposal system must
be inspected:
(1)(a) At least once every three years for all on-site sewage
disposal systems consisting solely of a septic tank and gravity
subsurface soil absorption system, except:
(b) Inspection frequency for on-site sewage disposal systems
included under (a) of this subsection may be increased after each
inspection by adding one year to the length of time between
inspections, provided the on-site sewage disposal system is found to be
functioning properly, for up to a maximum of seven years between
inspections; and
(2)(a) Annually for all on-site sewage disposal systems that do not
consist solely of a septic tank and gravity subsurface soil absorption
system, except:
(b) Inspection frequency for on-site sewage disposal systems
included under (a) of this subsection may be increased after each
inspection by adding six months to the length of time between
inspections, provided the on-site sewage disposal system is found to be
functioning properly and the on-site sewage disposal system is designed
to accommodate an increased inspection interval, for up to a maximum of
three years between inspections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.118A
RCW to read as follows:
If during an inspection conducted under section 5 of this act an
on-site sewage disposal system is found to be functioning improperly,
the following inspection frequency applies, beginning after the on-site
sewage disposal system's function is corrected:
(1) For all on-site sewage disposal systems consisting solely of a
septic tank and gravity subsurface soil absorption system, the maximum
time allowed until the next inspection is one year less than the length
of time since the last inspection. Inspections may not be required
more frequently than annually except to resolve a performance problem.
(2) For all on-site sewage disposal systems that do not consist
solely of a septic tank and gravity subsurface soil absorption system,
the maximum time allowed until the next inspection is six months less
than the length of time since the last inspection. Inspections may not
be required more frequently than every six months except to resolve a
performance problem.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.118A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If an on-site sewage disposal system consisting solely of a
septic tank and gravity subsurface soil absorption system is not
inspected at least once within the three-year period from June 30,
2009, to June 30, 2012, then, after an inspection does take place, the
inspection frequency must start at every three years provided the
on-site sewage disposal system is found to be functioning properly. If
the on-site sewage disposal system is found to be functioning
improperly, the inspection frequency must start at one year after the
on-site sewage disposal system's function is corrected.
(2) If an on-site sewage disposal system that does not consist
solely of a septic tank and gravity subsurface soil absorption system
is not inspected at least once within the one-year period from June 30,
2009, to June 30, 2010, then, after an inspection does take place, the
inspection frequency must start at one year provided the on-site sewage
disposal system is found to be functioning properly. If the on-site
sewage disposal system is found to be functioning improperly, the
inspection frequency must start at six months after the on-site sewage
disposal system's function is corrected.

--- END ---