BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop an alternative driver's license
and an alternative identicard that shall be issued to applicants for
drivers' licenses and identicards who have, in the ten years preceding
their application, two or more convictions of any offense involving
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(2) The alternative drivers' licenses and identicards developed by
the department under subsection (1) of this section must:
(a) Be distinctly designed so that the alternative driver's license
and identicard will not be confused with any other types of drivers'
licenses and identicards issued by the department; and
(b) Include a clear statement that the alternative driver's license
and identicard may not be used as acceptable forms of identification
for the purchase of liquor, as defined in RCW 66.04.010.
(3) The department may adopt rules to implement and administer this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person issued an alternative driver's license or identicard
under section 1 of this act must show that license or identicard when
purchasing or attempting to purchase any liquor.
(2) It is unlawful for any person issued an alternative driver's
license or identicard under section 1 of this act to purchase or
attempt to purchase liquor.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to sell, give, or otherwise
provide liquor to any person issued an alternative driver's license or
identicard under section 1 of this act.
(4) A violation of subsection (2) or (3) of this section is a gross
misdemeanor punishable as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

--- END ---