BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.020 and 2007 c 6 s 502 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "City" means a city or town;
(2) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04,
82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, insofar as
applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under authority of this chapter;
(3) "Taxable event" shall mean any retail sale, or any use, upon
which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW, as
they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant to RCW
82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;
(4) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the treasurer
or legal depository of a county or city.
(5) "Voice over internet protocol service provider" means a
provider of telephone services that offers access to the public
switched telephone network for a fee using broadband internet access.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14B.030 and 2007 c 54 s 17 and 2007 c 6 s 1024 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county may impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of switched access lines in an
amount not exceeding fifty cents per month for each switched access
line. The amount of tax shall be uniform for each switched access
line. Each county shall provide notice of such tax to all local
exchange companies serving in the county at least sixty days in advance
of the date on which the first payment is due.
(2) The legislative authority of a county may also impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of radio access lines whose place of
primary use is located within the county in an amount not exceeding
fifty cents per month for each radio access line. The amount of tax
shall be uniform for each radio access line. The county shall provide
notice of such tax to all radio communications service companies
serving in the county at least sixty days in advance of the date on
which the first payment is due. Any county imposing this tax shall
include in its ordinance a refund mechanism whereby the amount of any
tax ordered to be refunded by the judgment of a court of record, or as
a result of the resolution of any appeal therefrom, shall be refunded
to the radio communications service company or local exchange company
that collected the tax, and those companies shall reimburse the
subscribers who paid the tax. The ordinance shall further provide that
to the extent the subscribers who paid the tax cannot be identified or
located, the tax paid by those subscribers shall be returned to the
county.
(3) The legislative authority of a county may impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax in an amount not exceeding fifty cents per
month for each voice over internet protocol telephone subscriber. The
amount of tax shall be uniform for each voice over internet protocol
subscriber. Each county shall provide notice of such tax to all voice
over internet protocol service providers serving the county at least
sixty days in advance of the date on which the first payment is due.
(4) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all switched
access lines in the state. The amount of tax shall not exceed twenty
cents per month for each switched access line. The tax shall be
uniform for each switched access line. The tax imposed under this
subsection shall be remitted to the department of revenue by local
exchange companies on a tax return provided by the department. Tax
proceeds shall be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911
account created in RCW 38.52.540.
(((4))) (5) As of January 1, 2009, a state enhanced 911 excise tax
is imposed for each voice over internet protocol telephone subscriber.
The amount of tax shall be uniform for each voice over internet
protocol subscriber. The state shall provide notice of such tax to all
voice over internet protocol service providers serving the state at
least sixty days in advance of the date on which the first payment is
due.
(6) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all radio access
lines whose place of primary use is located within the state in an
amount of twenty cents per month for each radio access line. The tax
shall be uniform for each radio access line. The tax imposed under
this section shall be remitted to the department of revenue by radio
communications service companies, including those companies that resell
radio access lines, on a tax return provided by the department. Tax
proceeds shall be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911
account created in RCW 38.52.540. The tax imposed under this section
is not subject to the state sales and use tax or any local tax.
(((5))) (7) By August 31st of each year the state enhanced 911
coordinator shall recommend the level for the next year of the state
enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by subsection (((3))) (4) of this
section, based on a systematic cost and revenue analysis, to the
utilities and transportation commission. The commission shall by the
following October 31st determine the level of the state enhanced 911
excise tax for the following year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must study an appropriate funding mechanism for the
implementation of costs associated with next generation 911. The
department must submit a report to the finance committee of the house
of representatives and the ways and means committee of the senate by
December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---