BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature recognizes that, except for buildings on the
capitol campus, there is no policy or process for how state buildings,
facilities, or infrastructure are named. It is the intent of the
legislature that policy be developed that would prohibit naming
buildings, facilities, or infrastructure after persons until ten years
after their death.

--- END ---