BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of licensing shall
conduct a review of the need for regulation of general and specialty
contractors involved in the repair, alteration, or construction of
single-family homes using the public interest criteria set forth in RCW
18.118.010. In conducting the review, the department of licensing
shall:
(a) Consult with representatives of and suppliers to residential
contractors, consumer protection organizations and consumers, legal
authorities, and any entity or individual that may assist in
identifying the source or cause of prevalent home construction defects
or concerns;
(b) Examine any general and specialty contractor regulatory and
licensing programs in other states; and
(c) Conduct one or more public hearings to allow for industry and
consumer testimony.
(2) The department of labor and industries and the office of the
attorney general shall make available to the department of licensing
any home construction defect and related consumer complaints. The
department of licensing shall compile and evaluate consumer complaints
and use this data and other data gathered throughout the research
process to assist in conducting the review required by subsection (1)
of this section.
(3) By October 1, 2008, the department of licensing shall submit
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature
regarding:
(a) The need for regulation of general and specialty contractors
involved in the construction and remodel of residential single-family
homes; and
(b) If some form of regulation is recommended, the minimum
qualifications to meet the regulatory standard.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---