BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Entity" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability corporation, association,
foundation, joint venture, government, government subdivision, agency
or instrumentality, public corporation, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
(2) "Individual" means a unique, separate human being.
(3) "Identification or tracking device or mark" means any item,
application, device, marking, or other technology capable of storing or
passively or actively transmitting an individual's identity,
characteristics, status, group membership, travel history, or location,
or capable of storing or transmitting a number, symbol, signal,
pattern, or other identifier that could be linked with any such
information.
(4) "Track" means to locate, follow, or monitor.
(5) "Discriminate" means to make distinctions, have bias,
prejudice, or partiality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 An entity may not require an individual to
have an identification or tracking device or mark implanted or
permanently or semipermanently incorporated into or on the body, skin,
teeth, hair, or nails of that individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 An identification or tracking device or mark
may not be implanted or incorporated into or on the person of an
individual without that individual's informed written consent. Consent
of a guardian, guardian ad litem, attorney-in-fact, parent, or other
agent shall not be considered adequate consent.
The individual undergoing implantation or incorporation of an
identification or tracking device or mark must be at least eighteen
years of age and of sound mind to grant consent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 An identification or tracking device or mark
may not be implanted or incorporated into or on a human corpse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 An entity may not use an identification or
tracking device or mark in or on the person of an individual to
identify that individual or as a means of, or aid to, tracking that
individual, without the consent of the individual being identified or
tracked.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 An entity shall not use the absence of an
identification or tracking device or mark as a basis for discriminating
against an individual for any purpose whatsoever including, but not
limited to, employment, housing, insurance, medical care, voting,
education, travel, or commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

--- END ---