BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that at least one
study has shown that urine and saliva of children eating a variety of
nonorganic foods from Washington grocers contained biological markers
of food contamination. Because children's bodies are growing and
developing, they are especially vulnerable to the effects of toxic
chemicals. While the federal government assessed and reformulated the
nation's food safety laws with the 1996 enactment of the food quality
protection act, additional research may need to be conducted to
determine whether the contaminants measured in Washington children
would cause any adverse health outcomes. There is substantial
toxicologic evidence that repeated low-level exposure to food
contaminants may affect neurodevelopment and growth in developing
animals. To protect children's health, it is important to know the
extent of the presence of food contamination in our food, the effect of
repeated low-level exposure to food contamination on children, what
research has been conducted in this area, and whether further studies
or regulations are needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of health is directed to:
(1) Review existing studies of the cumulative developmental risk to
children from low-dose exposures to food contamination and report to
the legislature on:
(a) The findings, results, and recommendations from the studies;
and
(b) Any scientific gaps in these studies or scientific questions
raised by the studies that the department finds should be researched in
order to best protect children from food safety risks associated with
food contamination.
(2) Review actions taken by the United States environmental
protection agency in implementation of the 1996 food quality protection
act and report to the legislature on any areas where additional
research is needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of health shall submit its
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1,
2008. The report shall include specific recommendations for
legislative action for how the state can help reduce food contaminants.

--- END ---