BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
books and other media purchased by a governmental unit that has
established a library.
(2) This exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Governmental unit" and "library" have the same meanings as in
RCW 27.12.010.
(b) "Other media" includes phonograph records, compact discs,
digital versatile discs or digital video discs, tapes, audio or video
cassettes, periodicals, newspapers, and other printed or written
material available in a library.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of books and other media by a governmental unit that has established a
library. The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---