BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
organic biomass to a qualified business.
(2) For the purposes of this section and section 2 of this act:
(a) "Organic biomass" means: (i) Solid organic fuels from wood or
forest residue that do not include wood pieces that have been treated
with chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or
copper-chrome-arsenic; or (ii) byproducts of wood manufacturing
processes, including but not limited to bark, wood chips, and sawdust,
where wood pieces were not treated with chemical preservatives.
(b) "Qualified business" means a light and power business or forest
products company located in Washington that uses organic biomass for
the primary purpose of burning the biomass in a boiler to produce steam
to either: (i) Generate electricity; or (ii) be used in the production
process; or both.
(c) "Forest products company" means a person engaged in the
business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i) Timber into
timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products into other
timber products or wood products.
(d) "Timber products" means logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste,
and similar products obtained wholly from the processing of timber;
pulp; and recycled paper products.
(e) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; and wood
windows.
(f) "Light and power business" has the same meaning as defined
under RCW 82.16.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of organic biomass, if used by a qualified business.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

--- END ---