BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.04.245 and 2007 c 146 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the other provisions of this title, personal
services performed for, or for the benefit of, a third party pursuant
to a contract with a temporary staffing services company or services
referral agency constitutes employment for the temporary staffing
services company or services referral agency when the agency is
responsible, under contract or in fact, for the payment of wages in
remuneration for the services performed. Personal services for a
services referral agency that meet the exception tests under RCW
50.04.140 shall not be considered employment under this section.
(2) The temporary staffing services company or services referral
agency is considered the employer as defined in RCW 50.04.080.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Temporary staffing services company" means an individual or
entity that engages in: Recruiting and hiring its own employees;
finding other organizations that need the services of those employees;
and assigning those employees on a temporary basis to perform work at
or services for a client to support or supplement the client's work
forces, or to provide assistance in special work situations, such as
employee absences, skill shortages, and seasonal workloads, or to
perform special assignments or projects, all under the direction and
supervision of the client. "Temporary staffing services company" does
not include professional employer organizations as defined in RCW
50.04.298, permanent employee leasing, or permanent employee placement
services.
(b) "Services referral agency" means an individual or entity other
than a professional employer organization as defined in RCW 50.04.298
that is engaged in the business of offering the services of one or more
individuals to perform specific tasks for a third party.

--- END ---