BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(2) "Farmer" means the person responsible for planting a crop,
managing the crop, and harvesting the crop from land on which a breach
of contract or patent infringement is alleged to have occurred.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department.
(4) "Transgenic organism" means an organism including, but not
limited to, animal, plant, bacterium, cyanobacterium, fungus, protist,
or virus altered or produced through genetic modification from a donor,
vector, or recipient organism using modern molecular techniques such as
recombinant deoxyribonucleic acid methodology, and any living organisms
derived therefrom.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Before a person or his or her agent
holding a patent on a transgenic organism may enter upon any land owned
by a farmer for the purpose of obtaining crop samples to determine
whether breach of contract or patent infringement has occurred, the
person holding the patent or his or her agent shall do both of the
following:
(a) Notify the farmer in writing of the allegation that breach of
contract or patent infringement has occurred and request permission to
enter upon the farmer's land; and
(b) Obtain the written permission of the farmer.
(2)(a) The farmer shall grant or deny access in writing within ten
days of receipt of a request to enter the land pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section.
(b) If the farmer withholds permission under subsection (1) of this
section, the person holding a patent may petition the superior court in
the county in which the alleged breach of contract or patent
infringement has occurred for an order granting permission to enter
upon the farmer's land.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Either party may request the director to
provide for the collection of samples under section 2 of this act, or
to participate in or conduct any other aspect of the sampling or
analysis process. If so requested, the director shall designate an
employee of the department, or enter into an agreement with a person or
entity, to implement the specified activity as provided in rules
adopted pursuant to section 6 of this act.
(2) The person or entity designated under this section may be, but
is not required to be, an employee or department or the state.
(3) The farmer or the farmer's agent and the person holding the
patent may be present at any collection of samples conducted under this
section, and each shall be notified of the time and location of the
sampling in a timely manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If the person holding a patent believes that
the crop from which samples are to be taken under section 2 or 3 of
this act may be subject to intentional damage or destruction, the
person may seek a protective order from the superior court. The
protective order shall be crafted to minimize interruption or
interference with normal farming practices, including harvest and
tillage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Samples for analysis under section 2 or 3 of
this act may be taken from a standing crop, from representative
standing plants in the field, or from crop residue remaining in the
field after harvest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department may adopt rules to determine
sampling protocols, which may specify all of the following:
(1) Who is authorized to collect samples or conduct related
activity;
(2) Methods of sample storage; and
(3) Standards for sampling, inspecting, analyzing, and testing
seeds consistent with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The results of any testing conducted
pursuant to this chapter shall be sent by registered letter by the
testing party to all other parties within thirty days after the results
are reported from the testing laboratory.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A farmer is not liable for the breach of a
seed contract or for patent infringement if a product, in which the
seed labeler, patent holder, or licensee has rights, is possessed by
the farmer or found on real property owned or occupied by the farmer
and the presence of the product is de minimis or not intended by the
farmer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

--- END ---