BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning January 1, 2010, all pistol ammunition manufactured in
the state, imported into the state, or kept or offered for sale, sold,
or transferred in the state, must be coded ammunition as defined in RCW
9.41.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of licensing shall establish and maintain a
centralized ammunition database that contains the following
information:
(a) A registry of all pistol ammunition sellers that sell, offer
for sale, loan, distribute, or otherwise transfer pistol ammunition
within Washington;
(b) Records of all transactions for pistol ammunition that are
reported to the department of licensing under section 3 of this act.
(2) The department of licensing shall establish by rule the manner
and form for sellers of pistol ammunition regulated under this act to
register with the department of licensing and the manner and form for
sellers to report pistol ammunition transactions to the department of
licensing.
(3) Information in the ammunition database is confidential and may
be released by the department of licensing only in accordance with RCW
42.56.240.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
A seller of pistol ammunition that is required to be coded under
section 1 of this act must comply with the following requirements:
(1) Register with the department of licensing in a manner
prescribed by the department of licensing;
(2) Report to the department of licensing, in a format prescribed
by the department of licensing, the following information for each
transaction that involves pistol ammunition that is required to be
coded under section 1 of this act:
(a) The date of the transaction;
(b) The name and date of birth of the purchaser or transferee of
the pistol ammunition;
(c) The driver's license number or other government-issued
identification card number of the purchaser or transferee of the pistol
ammunition;
(d) The unique alphanumeric identifier of all pistol ammunition
transferred to the purchaser or transferee; and
(e) Other information that the department of licensing determines
is necessary.
(3) Maintain copies of all records of pistol ammunition
transactions submitted to the department of licensing under this
section for a period of not less than three years from the date of the
transaction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A seller of pistol ammunition that intentionally fails to
comply with, or falsifies the required records relating to, the
reporting requirement in section 3(2) of this act is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(2) A seller of pistol ammunition that knowingly sells or transfers
noncoded pistol ammunition in violation of section 1 of this act is
guilty of a misdemeanor.
(3) Any person who intentionally destroys, obliterates, or
otherwise renders unreadable the unique alphanumeric identifier on any
coded pistol ammunition, as required under section 1 of this act, is
guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.56.240 and 2005 c 274 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following investigative, law enforcement, and crime victim
information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this
chapter:
(1) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy;
(2) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the commission, if
disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or
property. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim,
or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such
desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with the commission
about any elected official or candidate for public office must be made
in writing and signed by the complainant under oath;
(3) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b);
(4) License applications under RCW 9.41.070; copies of license
applications or information on the applications may be released to law
enforcement or corrections agencies; ((and))
(5) Information revealing the identity of child victims of sexual
assault who are under age eighteen. Identifying information means the
child victim's name, address, location, photograph, and in cases in
which the child victim is a relative or stepchild of the alleged
perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and
the alleged perpetrator; and
(6) Records maintained by the department of licensing in the
centralized ammunition database under section 2 of this act. Records
or information in the database may be released to law enforcement
agencies or prosecuting attorneys in connection with a criminal
investigation or prosecution.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.41.010 and 2001 c 300 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Firearm" means a weapon or device from which a projectile or
projectiles may be fired by an explosive such as gunpowder.
(2) "Pistol" means any firearm with a barrel less than sixteen
inches in length, or is designed to be held and fired by the use of a
single hand.
(3) "Rifle" means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade,
and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned,
made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a
fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a
rifled bore for each single pull of the trigger.
(4) "Short-barreled rifle" means a rifle having one or more barrels
less than sixteen inches in length and any weapon made from a rifle by
any means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length
of less than twenty-six inches.
(5) "Shotgun" means a weapon with one or more barrels, designed or
redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder
and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to use the
energy of the explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire through a
smooth bore either a number of ball shot or a single projectile for
each single pull of the trigger.
(6) "Short-barreled shotgun" means a shotgun having one or more
barrels less than eighteen inches in length and any weapon made from a
shotgun by any means of modification if such modified weapon has an
overall length of less than twenty-six inches.
(7) "Machine gun" means any firearm known as a machine gun,
mechanical rifle, submachine gun, or any other mechanism or instrument
not requiring that the trigger be pressed for each shot and having a
reservoir clip, disc, drum, belt, or other separable mechanical device
for storing, carrying, or supplying ammunition which can be loaded into
the firearm, mechanism, or instrument, and fired therefrom at the rate
of five or more shots per second.
(8) "Antique firearm" means a firearm or replica of a firearm not
designed or redesigned for using rim fire or conventional center fire
ignition with fixed ammunition and manufactured in or before 1898,
including any matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type of
ignition system and also any firearm using fixed ammunition
manufactured in or before 1898, for which ammunition is no longer
manufactured in the United States and is not readily available in the
ordinary channels of commercial trade.
(9) "Loaded" means:
(a) There is a cartridge in the chamber of the firearm;
(b) Cartridges are in a clip that is locked in place in the
firearm;
(c) There is a cartridge in the cylinder of the firearm, if the
firearm is a revolver;
(d) There is a cartridge in the tube or magazine that is inserted
in the action; or
(e) There is a ball in the barrel and the firearm is capped or
primed if the firearm is a muzzle loader.
(10) "Dealer" means a person engaged in the business of selling
firearms at wholesale or retail who has, or is required to have, a
federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a). A person who
does not have, and is not required to have, a federal firearms license
under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a), is not a dealer if that person makes only
occasional sales, exchanges, or purchases of firearms for the
enhancement of a personal collection or for a hobby, or sells all or
part of his or her personal collection of firearms.
(11) "Crime of violence" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter
amended: Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony, criminal solicitation of or
criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony, manslaughter in the
first degree, manslaughter in the second degree, indecent liberties if
committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in the second degree,
arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a
child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, burglary in
the second degree, residential burglary, and robbery in the second
degree;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to June 6, 1996, which is comparable to a felony classified as a crime
of violence in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence under (a) or
(b) of this subsection.
(12) "Serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a
felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing
or hereafter amended:
(a) Any crime of violence;
(b) Any felony violation of the uniform controlled substances act,
chapter 69.50 RCW, that is classified as a class B felony or that has
a maximum term of imprisonment of at least ten years;
(c) Child molestation in the second degree;
(d) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(e) Indecent liberties;
(f) Leading organized crime;
(g) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(h) Rape in the third degree;
(i) Drive-by shooting;
(j) Sexual exploitation;
(k) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(l) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(m) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation, as "sexual motivation" is defined under RCW 9.94A.030;
(n) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602; or
(o) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996,
that is comparable to a serious offense, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a
felony classified as a serious offense.
(13) "Law enforcement officer" includes a general authority
Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or a specially
commissioned Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020.
"Law enforcement officer" also includes a limited authority Washington
peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 if such officer is duly
authorized by his or her employer to carry a concealed pistol.
(14) "Felony" means any felony offense under the laws of this state
or any federal or out-of-state offense comparable to a felony offense
under the laws of this state.
(15) "Sell" refers to the actual approval of the delivery of a
firearm in consideration of payment or promise of payment of a certain
price in money.
(16) "Barrel length" means the distance from the bolt face of a
closed action down the length of the axis of the bore to the crown of
the muzzle, or in the case of a barrel with attachments to the end of
any legal device permanently attached to the end of the muzzle.
(17) "Family or household member" means "family" or "household
member" as used in RCW 10.99.020.
(18) "Coded ammunition" means ammunition that carries a unique
alphanumeric identifier that has been applied by etching onto the base
of the bullet projectile and the inside of the cartridge casing and
that meets the following requirements:
(a) The base of the bullet and the inside of the cartridge casing
of each round in a box of ammunition are encoded with the same unique
alphanumeric identifier;
(b) The unique alphanumeric identifier is engraved in such a manner
that it is highly likely to permit identification after ammunition
discharge and bullet impact;
(c) The outside of each box of ammunition is labeled with the name
of the manufacturer and the same alphanumeric identifier used on the
bases of bullets contained in the box; and
(d) Ammunition contained in one ammunition box is not labeled with
the same alphanumeric identifier as the ammunition contained in any
other ammunition box from the same manufacturer.
(19) "Pistol ammunition" means all ammunition principally for use
in pistols, notwithstanding that the ammunition may also be used in
other firearms, including bullets used for reloading or handloading
pistol ammunition.

--- END ---