BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.60A.190 and 2007 c 11 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Develop and maintain a current list of veteran-owned
businesses; and
(b) Make the list available on the department's public web site.
(2) ((In order)) To qualify as a veteran-owned business, the
business must be at least fifty-one percent owned and controlled by:
(a) A veteran as defined in RCW 41.04.007; or
(b) An active or reserve member in any branch of the armed forces
of the United States, including the national guard, coast guard, and
armed forces reserves.
(3) To participate in the linked deposit program under chapter
43.86A RCW, a veteran-owned business qualified under this section must
be certified by the department as a business:
(a) In which the veteran owner possesses and exercises sufficient
expertise specifically in the business's field of operation to make
decisions governing the long-term direction and the day-to-day
operations of the business;
(b) That is organized for profit and performing a commercially
useful function; and
(c) That meets the criteria for a small business concern as
established under chapter 39.19 RCW.
(4) The department shall create a logo for the purpose of
identifying veteran-owned businesses to the public. The department
shall put the logo on an adhesive sticker or decal suitable for display
in a business window and distribute the stickers or decals to veteran-owned businesses listed with the department.
(((4))) (5)(a) Businesses may submit an application on a form
prescribed by the department for inclusion on the list or to apply for
certification under this section.
(b) The department must notify the state treasurer of veteran-owned
businesses that are no longer certified under this section. The
written notification to the state treasurer must contain information
regarding the reasons for the decertification and information on
financing provided to the veteran-owned business under RCW 43.86A.060.
(((5))) (6) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement
this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.86A.030 and 2007 c 500 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Funds held in public depositaries not as demand deposits as
provided in RCW 43.86A.020 and 43.86A.030, shall be available for a
time certificate of deposit investment program according to the
following formula: The state treasurer shall apportion to all
participating depositaries an amount equal to five percent of the three
year average mean of general state revenues as certified in accordance
with Article VIII, section 1(b) of the state Constitution, or fifty
percent of the total surplus treasury investment availability,
whichever is less. Within thirty days after certification, those funds
determined to be available according to this formula for the time
certificate of deposit investment program shall be deposited in
qualified public depositaries. These deposits shall be allocated among
the participating depositaries on a basis to be determined by the state
treasurer.
(2)(a) Of all funds available under this section, the state
treasurer may use up to ((one hundred fifty)) two hundred million
dollars per year ((of all funds available under this section)) for the
purposes of RCW 43.86A.060(2)(c)(i) and up to twenty-five million
dollars per year for the purposes of RCW 43.86A.060(2)(c)(ii). The
amounts made available to these public depositaries shall be equal to
the amounts of outstanding loans made under RCW 43.86A.060.
(3) The formula so devised shall be a matter of public record
giving consideration to, but not limited to deposits, assets, loans,
capital structure, investments or some combination of these factors.
However, if in the judgment of the state treasurer the amount of
allocation for certificates of deposit as determined by this section
will impair the cash flow needs of the state treasury, the state
treasurer may adjust the amount of the allocation accordingly.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.86A.060 and 2007 c 500 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state treasurer shall establish a linked deposit program
for investment of deposits in qualified public depositaries. As a
condition of participating in the program, qualified public
depositaries must make qualifying loans as provided in this section.
The state treasurer may purchase a certificate of deposit that is equal
to the amount of the qualifying loan made by the qualified public
depositary or may purchase a certificate of deposit that is equal to
the aggregate amount of two or more qualifying loans made by one or
more qualified public depositaries.
(2) Qualifying loans made under this section are those:
(a) Having terms that do not exceed ten years;
(b) Where an individual loan does not exceed one million dollars;
(c)(i) That are made to a minority or women's business enterprise
that has received state certification under chapter 39.19 RCW; or
(ii) That are made to a veteran-owned business that has received
state certification under RCW 43.60A.190;
(d) Where the interest rate on the loan to the minority or women's
business enterprise or veteran-owned business does not exceed an
interest rate that is two hundred basis points below the interest rate
the qualified public depositary would charge for a loan for a similar
purpose and a similar term, except that, if the preference given by the
state treasurer to the qualified public depositary under subsection (3)
of this section is less than two hundred basis points, the qualified
public depositary may reduce the preference given on the loan by an
amount that corresponds to the reduction in preference below two
hundred basis points given to the qualified public depositary; and
(e) Where the points or fees charged at loan closing do not exceed
one percent of the loan amount.
(3) In setting interest rates of time certificate of deposits, the
state treasurer shall offer rates so that a two hundred basis point
preference will be given to the qualified public depositary, except
that the treasurer shall lower the amount of the preference to ensure
that the effective interest rate on the time certificate of deposit is
not less than two percent.
(4) Upon notification by the state treasurer that a minority or
women's business enterprise is no longer certified under chapter 39.19
RCW or that a veteran-owned business is no longer certified under RCW
43.60A.190, the qualified public depositary shall reduce the amount of
qualifying loans by the outstanding balance of the loan made under this
section to the minority or women's business enterprise or the veteran-owned business, as applicable.
(5) The office of minority and women's business enterprises has the
authority to adopt rules to:
(a) Ensure that when making a qualified loan under the linked
deposit program, businesses that have never received a loan under the
linked deposit program are given first priority;
(b) Limit the total principal loan amount that any one business
receives in qualified loans under the linked deposit program over the
lifetime of the businesses;
(c) Limit the total principal loan amount that an owner of one or
more businesses receives in qualified loans under the linked deposit
program during the owner's lifetime; and
(d) Limit the total amount of any one qualified loan made under the
linked deposit program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of veterans affairs shall
report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2008, on the progress made in implementing this act.

--- END ---