BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 83.100.046 and 2005 c 514 s 1201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of determining the Washington taxable estate,
a deduction is allowed from the federal taxable estate for:
(a) The value of qualified real property reduced by any amounts
allowable as a deduction in respect of the qualified real property and
tangible personal property under Title 26, section 2053(a)(4) of the
internal revenue code, if the decedent was at the time of his or her
death a citizen or resident of the United States.
(b) The value of any tangible personal property used by the
decedent or a member of the decedent's family for a qualified use on
the date of the decedent's death, reduced by any amounts allowable as
a deduction in respect of the tangible personal property under Title
26, section 2053(a)(4) of the internal revenue code, if all of the
requirements of subsection (10)(f)(i)(A) of this section are met and
the decedent was at the time of his or her death a citizen or resident
of the United States.
(c) The value of real property that is not deductible under (a) of
this subsection solely by reason of subsection (10)(f)(i)(B) of this
section, reduced by any amounts allowable as a deduction in respect of
the qualified real property and tangible personal property under Title
26, section 2053(a)(4) of the internal revenue code, if the
requirements of subsection (10)(f)(i)(C) of this section are met with
respect to the property and the decedent was at the time of his or her
death a citizen or resident of the United States.
(2) Property shall be considered to have been acquired from or to
have passed from the decedent if:
(a) The property is so considered under Title 26, section 1014(b)
of the internal revenue code;
(b) The property is acquired by any person from the estate; or
(c) The property is acquired by any person from a trust, to the
extent the property is includible in the gross estate of the decedent.
(3) If the decedent and the decedent's surviving spouse at any time
held qualified real property as community property, the interest of the
surviving spouse in the property shall be taken into account under this
section to the extent necessary to provide a result under this section
with respect to the property which is consistent with the result which
would have obtained under this section if the property had not been
community property.
(4) In the case of any qualified woodland, the value of trees
growing on the woodland may be deducted if otherwise qualified under
this section.
(5) If property is qualified real property with respect to a
decedent, hereinafter in this subsection referred to as the "first
decedent," and the property was acquired from or passed from the first
decedent to the surviving spouse of the first decedent, active
management of the farm by the surviving spouse shall be treated as
material participation by the surviving spouse in the operation of the
farm.
(6) Property owned indirectly by the decedent may qualify for a
deduction under this section if owned through an interest in a
corporation, partnership, or trust as the terms corporation,
partnership, or trust are used in Title 26, section 2032A(g) of the
internal revenue code. In order to qualify for a deduction under this
subsection, the interest, in addition to meeting the other tests for
qualification under this section, must qualify under Title 26, section
6166(b)(1) of the internal revenue code as an interest in a closely
held business on the date of the decedent's death and for sufficient
other time, combined with periods of direct ownership, to equal at
least five years of the eight-year period preceding the death.
(7)(a) If, on the date of the decedent's death, the requirements of
subsection (10)(f)(i)(C)(II) of this section with respect to the
decedent for any property are not met, and the decedent (i) was
receiving old age benefits under Title II of the social security act
for a continuous period ending on such date, or (ii) was disabled for
a continuous period ending on this date, then subsection
(10)(f)(i)(C)(II) of this section shall be applied with respect to the
property by substituting "the date on which the longer of such
continuous periods began" for "the date of the decedent's death" in
subsection (10)(f)(i)(C) of this section.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, an individual shall
be disabled if the individual has a mental or physical impairment which
renders that individual unable to materially participate in the
operation of the farm.
(8) Property may be deducted under this section whether or not
special valuation is elected under Title 26, section 2032A of the
internal revenue code on the federal return. For the purposes of
determining the deduction under this section, the value of property is
its value as used to determine the value of the gross estate.
(9)(a) In the case of any qualified replacement property, any
period during which there was ownership, qualified use, or material
participation with respect to the replaced property by the decedent or
any member of the decedent's family shall be treated as a period during
which there was ownership, use, or material participation, as the case
may be, with respect to the qualified replacement property.
(b) Subsection (9)(a) of this section shall not apply to the extent
that the fair market value of the qualified replacement property, as of
the date of its acquisition, exceeds the fair market value of the
replaced property, as of the date of its disposition.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (9), the following
definitions apply:
(i) "Qualified replacement property" means any real property:
(A) Which is acquired in an exchange which qualifies under Title
26, section 1031 of the internal revenue code; or
(B) The acquisition of which results in the nonrecognition of gain
under Title 26, section 1033 of the internal revenue code.
The term "qualified replacement property" only includes property
which is used for the same qualified use as the replaced property was
being used before the exchange.
(ii) "Replaced property" means the property was:
(A) Transferred in the exchange which qualifies under Title 26,
section 1031 of the internal revenue code; or
(B) Compulsorily or involuntarily converted within the meaning of
Title 26, section 1033 of the internal revenue code.
(10) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Active management" means the making of the management
decisions of a farm, other than the daily operating decisions.
(b) "Farm" includes stock, dairy, poultry, fruit, furbearing
animal, and truck farms; plantations; ranches; nurseries; wineries;
ranges; greenhouses or other similar structures used primarily for the
raising of agricultural or horticultural commodities; and orchards and
woodlands.
(c) "Farming purposes" means:
(i) Cultivating the soil or raising or harvesting any agricultural
or horticultural commodity, including the raising, shearing, feeding,
caring for, training, and management of animals on a farm;
(ii) Handling, drying, packing, grading, or storing on a farm any
agricultural or horticultural commodity in its unmanufactured state,
but only if the owner, tenant, or operator of the farm regularly
produces more than one-half of the commodity so treated; ((and))
(iii)(A) The planting, cultivating, caring for, or cutting of
trees; or
(B) The preparation, other than milling, of trees for market; and
(iv) Vinification, bottling wine, storing wine, or selling wine if:
(A) The vinification, bottling, storing, and selling activities occur
on real property used to raise and harvest grapes; and (B) the wine
produced, bottled, stored, or sold is primarily derived from grapes
raised and harvested on the real property.
(d) "Member of the family" means, with respect to any individual,
only:
(i) An ancestor of the individual;
(ii) The spouse of the individual;
(iii) A lineal descendant of the individual, of the individual's
spouse, or of a parent of the individual; or
(iv) The spouse of any lineal descendant described in (d)(iii) of
this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection (10)(d), a legally adopted
child of an individual shall be treated as the child of such individual
by blood.
(e) "Qualified heir" means, with respect to any property, a member
of the decedent's family who acquired property, or to whom property
passed, from the decedent.
(f)(i) "Qualified real property" means real property which was
acquired from or passed from the decedent to a qualified heir of the
decedent and which, on the date of the decedent's death, was being used
for a qualified use by the decedent or a member of the decedent's
family, but only if:
(A) Fifty percent or more of the adjusted value of the gross estate
consists of the adjusted value of real or personal property which:
(I) On the date of the decedent's death, was being used for a
qualified use by the decedent or a member of the decedent's family; and
(II) Was acquired from or passed from the decedent to a qualified
heir of the decedent;
(B) Twenty-five percent or more of the adjusted value of the gross
estate consists of the adjusted value of real property which meets the
requirements of (f)(i)(A)(II) and (f)(i)(C) of this subsection; and
(C) During the eight-year period ending on the date of the
decedent's death there have been periods aggregating five years or more
during which:
(I) The real property was owned by the decedent or a member of the
decedent's family and used for a qualified use by the decedent or a
member of the decedent's family; and
(II) There was material participation by the decedent or a member
of the decedent's family in the operation of the farm. For the
purposes of this subsection (f)(i)(C)(II), material participation shall
be determined in a manner similar to the manner used for purposes of
Title 26, section 1402(a)(1) of the internal revenue code.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "adjusted value"
means:
(A) In the case of the gross estate, the value of the gross estate,
determined without regard to any special valuation under Title 26,
section 2032A of the internal revenue code, reduced by any amounts
allowable as a deduction under Title 26, section 2053(a)(4) of the
internal revenue code; or
(B) In the case of any real or personal property, the value of the
property for purposes of chapter 11 of the internal revenue code,
determined without regard to any special valuation under Title 26,
section 2032A of the internal revenue code, reduced by any amounts
allowable as a deduction in respect of such property under Title 26,
section 2053(a)(4) of the internal revenue code.
(g) "Qualified use" means the property is used as a farm for
farming purposes. In the case of real property which meets the
requirements of (f)(i)(C) of this subsection, residential buildings and
related improvements on the real property occupied on a regular basis
by the owner or lessee of the real property or by persons employed by
the owner or lessee for the purpose of operating or maintaining the
real property, and roads, buildings, and other structures and
improvements functionally related to the qualified use shall be treated
as real property devoted to the qualified use. For tangible personal
property eligible for a deduction under subsection (1)(b) of this
section, "qualified use" means the property is used primarily for
farming purposes on a farm.
(h) "Qualified woodland" means any real property which:
(i) Is used in timber operations; and
(ii) Is an identifiable area of land such as an acre or other area
for which records are normally maintained in conducting timber
operations.
(i) "Timber operations" means:
(i) The planting, cultivating, caring for, or cutting of trees; or
(ii) The preparation, other than milling, of trees for market.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to the estates of decedents
dying on or after the effective date of this act.

--- END ---