BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that improving energy
efficiency is key to achieving the state's goals to reduce greenhouse
gas emissions to 1990 levels by 2020. The legislature further finds
that increased energy efficiency saves Washington businesses money,
which in turn helps the state and local economy, as energy bill savings
can be spent on local goods and services. Washington state and federal
appliance standards passed since 2005 will produce about eighty
thousand metric tons of greenhouse gas emissions savings toward
Washington's 2020 target. However, there are a large number of
commercial devices on the market that are not subject to those
standards. In addition, there are many new products on the market that
are much more energy efficient than required by such standards, but
because they may be more expensive than standard models, they represent
only a small percentage of sales. Most commercial equipment, once
purchased, will be in use for ten to fifteen years; therefore, the more
energy efficient they are, the greater the energy and cost savings and
reductions in climate pollution.
Thus, the legislature intends to enact tax incentives as a means to
encourage Washington businesses to purchase certain high efficiency
appliances and equipment and to maximize the energy savings opportunity
available through increased and sustained market share of those
appliances and equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed in an amount equal to the state and local sales and use taxes
paid on the following items:
(a) Commercial freezers and refrigerators meeting consortium for
energy efficiency tier 2 specifications dated July 31, 2007;
(b) High efficiency commercial clothes washers meeting consortium
for energy efficiency specifications dated November 14, 2007;
(c) Commercial ice makers meeting consortium for energy efficiency
specifications dated January 1, 2006;
(d) Commercial full-sized gas convection ovens with interior
measurements of six cubic feet or larger;
(e) Commercial deep fat fryers which are rated energy star as of
August 2003;
(f) Commercial hot food holding cabinets which are rated energy
star as of August 2003; and
(g) Commercial electric and gas steam cookers, also known as
compartment cookers, which are rated energy star as of August 2003.
(2) A person may not take the credit under this section if the
person's gross income of the business in the prior calendar year
exceeded seven hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(3) A credit earned during one calendar year may be carried over to
be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. No
refunds shall be granted for credits under this section.
(4) Credits are available on a first-in-time basis. The department
shall disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the
total amount of credits claimed statewide under this section in any
year to exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars. If the seven
hundred fifty thousand dollar limitation is reached, the department
shall provide written notice to any person that has claimed tax credits
after the seven hundred fifty thousand dollar limitation in this
subsection has been met. The notice shall indicate the amount of tax
due and shall provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from the
date of such notice. The department may not assess penalties and
interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the
initial notice if the amount due is paid by the due date specified in
the notice, or any extension thereof.
(5) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must prepare and deliver a report to the legislature no later than
December 30, 2010, assessing the overall energy and cost saving impacts
of this section.
(6) Credit may not be claimed under this section for the
acquisition of an item, listed in subsection (1) of this section,
before the effective date of this section.
(7) Credit may not be claimed under this section for the
acquisition of an item, listed in subsection (1) of this section, after
June 30, 2010.
(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a)(i) "Commercial refrigerators and freezers" means refrigerators,
freezers, or refrigerator-freezers designed for use by commercial or
institutional facilities for the purpose of storing or merchandising
food products, beverages, or ice at specified temperatures that: (A)
Incorporate most components involved in the vapor-compression cycle and
the refrigerated compartment in a single cabinet; and (B) may be
configured with either solid or transparent doors as a reach-in
cabinet, pass-through cabinet, roll-in cabinet, or roll-through
cabinet.
(ii) "Commercial refrigerators and freezers" does not include: (A)
Products with eighty-five cubic feet or more of internal volume; (B)
walk-in refrigerators or freezers; (C) consumer products that are
federally regulated pursuant to Title 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6291 et seq.; (D)
products without doors; or (E) freezers specifically designed for ice
cream.
(b) "Commercial clothes washer" means a soft mount horizontal or
vertical-axis clothes washer that: (i) Has a clothes container
compartment no greater than three and one-half cubic feet in the case
of a horizontal-axis product or no greater than four cubic feet in the
case of a vertical-axis product; and (ii) is designed for use by more
than one household, such as in multifamily housing, apartments, or coin
laundries.
(c) "Commercial hot food holding cabinet" means an appliance that
is designed to hold hot food at a specified temperature, which has been
cooked using a separate appliance.
(d) "Commercial ice maker" means a factory-made assembly, not
necessarily shipped in one package, consisting of a condensing unit and
ice-making section operating as an integrated unit with means for
making and harvesting ice. It may also include integrated components
for storing or dispensing ice, or both.
(e) "Commercial open, deep-fat fryer" means an appliance, including
a cooking vessel, in which oil is placed to such a depth that the
cooking food is essentially supported by displacement of the cooking
fluid rather than by the bottom of the vessel. Heat is delivered to
the cooking fluid by means of an immersed electric element or band-wrapped vessel (electric fryers), or by heat transfer from gas burners
through either the walls of the fryer or through tubes passing through
the cooking fluid (gas fryers).
(f) "Consortium" means the consortium for energy efficiency, a
United States nonprofit public benefits corporation that promotes the
manufacture and purchase of energy efficient products and services.
The consortium's members include utilities, statewide and regional
market transformation administrators, environmental groups, research
organizations, and state energy offices in the United States and
Canada.
(g) "Energy star" is an energy efficient product that meets the
federal environmental protection agency's and federal department of
energy's criteria for use of the energy star trademark label, or is in
the upper twenty-five percent of efficiency for all similar products as
designated by the federal energy management program. Energy star is a
voluntary labeling program designed to identify and promote energy
efficient products to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.
(h) "Steam cooker" means a device with one or more food steaming
compartments, in which the energy in the steam is transferred to the
food by direct contact. Models may include countertop models, wall-mounted models, and floor models mounted on a stand, pedestal, or
cabinet-style base.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires July 1, 2010.

--- END ---