BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds:
(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
recognizes the accomplishments of classroom paraeducators to attain
professional growth development standards in order to increase
students' learning achievement; and
(b) There is a growing need to provide support for regular
education students who have been identified as not meeting state
academic standards. Highly trained paraeducators can have a
significant impact on those students who fall short of grade level
standards but do not meet the criteria to qualify for special education
or Title I resources. Increasing the knowledge and skills of
paraeducators will result in students reaching their highest potential.
(2) The purpose of this act is to develop a program for
paraeducators to increase their knowledge of learning disabilities,
addressing different learning styles, teaching strategies, and decoding
skills, which will result in a positive impact on student achievement.
The incentive provided by this act for paraeducators to pursue high
quality professional development opportunities will result in providing
assistance to students' learning needs and effectively help students
meet challenging academic standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Paraeducators who have met the eligibility requirements and
have applied to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
for certification shall receive additional compensation as a
nonnegotiable state bonus of five hundred dollars or one percent of the
annual contracted salary amount, whichever is greater.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
establishing paraeducator certification requirements. Certification
shall be for five-year periods.
(3) In order to maintain paraeducator certification, a certificated
paraeducator must enroll in additional professional development courses
offered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction's
summer institutes and winter conferences, thereby maximizing the
effectiveness of providing the resources for students to achieve state
standards, and reach their highest possible academic potential.

--- END ---