BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.025 and 2002 c 332 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The general administration services account is created in ((the
custody of)) the state ((treasurer and shall be used for all activities
previously budgeted and accounted for in the following internal service
funds: The motor transport account, the general administration
management fund, the general administration facilities and services
revolving fund, the central stores revolving fund, the surplus property
purchase revolving fund, and the energy efficiency services account.
Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW.)) treasury. All receipts from agency billings
for activities funded from this account must be deposited in the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may only be used for services provided to
state agencies including buildings and grounds, campus facilities,
lease renewal, commute trip reduction, campus utilities, and associated
administrative costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The general administration revolving account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from agency billings for
activities funded from this account must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the motor transport
account, the general administration management fund, the general
administration facilities and services revolving fund, the central
stores revolving fund, the surplus property revolving fund, and the
energy efficiency services account. Only the director of general
administration or the director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.32.035 and 1998 c 105 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The general administration ((services)) revolving account shall be
administered by the director of general administration and be used for
the purchase, lease or other acquisition from time to time of surplus
property from any federal, state, or local government surplus property
disposal agency. The director may purchase, lease or acquire such
surplus property on the requisition of an eligible donee and without
such requisition at such time or times as he or she deems it
advantageous to do so; and in either case he or she shall be
responsible for the care and custody of the property purchased so long
as it remains in his or her possession.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.32.040 and 1998 c 105 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In purchasing federal surplus property on requisition for any
eligible donee the director may advance the purchase price thereof from
the general administration ((services)) revolving account, and he or
she shall then in due course bill the proper eligible donee for the
amount paid by him or her for the property plus a reasonable amount to
cover the expense incurred by him or her in connection with the
transaction. In purchasing surplus property without requisition, the
director shall be deemed to take title outright and he or she shall
then be authorized to resell from time to time any or all of such
property to such eligible donees as desire to avail themselves of the
privilege of purchasing. All moneys received in payment for surplus
property from eligible donees shall be deposited by the director in the
general administration ((services)) revolving account. The director
shall sell federal surplus property to eligible donees at a price
sufficient only to reimburse the general administration ((services))
revolving account for the cost of the property to the account, plus a
reasonable amount to cover expenses incurred in connection with the
transaction. Where surplus property is transferred to an eligible
donee without cost to the transferee, the director may impose a
reasonable charge to cover expenses incurred in connection with the
transaction. The governor, through the director of general
administration, shall administer the surplus property program in the
state and shall perform or supervise all those functions with respect
to the program, its agencies and instrumentalities.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.35.060 and 2001 c 292 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may impose fees upon affected public agencies for
the review of life-cycle cost analyses. The fees shall be deposited in
the general administration ((services)) revolving account. The purpose
of the fees is to recover the costs by the department for review of the
analyses. The department shall set fees at a level necessary to
recover all of its costs related to increasing the energy efficiency of
state-supported new construction. The fees shall not exceed one-tenth
of one percent of the total cost of any project or exceed two thousand
dollars for any project unless mutually agreed to. The department
shall provide detailed calculation ensuring that the energy savings
resulting from its review of life-cycle cost analysis justify the costs
of performing that review.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.19.1923 and 2001 c 292 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The general administration ((services)) revolving account shall be
used for the purchase of supplies and equipment handled or rented
through central stores, and the payment of salaries, wages, and other
costs incidental to the acquisition, operation, and maintenance of the
central stores, and other activities connected therewith, which shall
include utilities services. The account shall be credited with all
receipts from the rental, sale, or distribution of supplies, equipment,
and services rendered to the various state agencies. Central stores,
utilities services, and other activities within the general
administration ((services)) revolving account shall be treated as
separate operating entities for financial and accounting control.
Financial records involving the general administration ((services))
revolving account shall be designed to provide data for achieving
maximum effectiveness and economy of each individual activity within
the account.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.19.1925 and 1998 c 105 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
To supply such funds as may be necessary for making combined
purchases of items or services of common use by central stores, state
agencies shall, upon request of the division of purchasing, from time
to time, make advance payments into the general administration
((services)) revolving account from funds regularly appropriated to
them for the procurement of supplies, equipment, and services:
PROVIDED, That advance payment for services shall be on a quarterly
basis: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any person, firm or corporation other
than central stores rendering services for which advance payments are
made shall deposit cash or furnish surety bond coverage to the state in
an amount as shall be fixed by law, or if not fixed by law, then in
such amounts as shall be fixed by the director of the department of
general administration. Any such bond so furnished shall be
conditioned that the person, firm or corporation receiving the advance
payment will apply it toward performance of the contract. Funds so
advanced to central stores shall be used only for the combined
procurement, storage, and delivery of such stocks of supplies,
equipment, and services as are requisitioned by the agency and shall be
offset and repaid to the respective state agencies by an equivalent
value in merchandise supplied and charged out from time to time from
central stores. Within the general administration revolving account,
costs of operation of central stores may be recovered by charging as
part of the value of materials, supplies, or services an amount
sufficient to cover the costs of operating central stores.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.19.500 and 2005 c 330 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The general administration ((services)) revolving account shall be
used by the department of general administration for the payment of
certain costs, expenses, and charges, as specified in this section,
incurred by it in the operation and administration of the department in
the rendering of services, the furnishing or supplying of equipment,
supplies and materials, and for providing or allocating facilities,
including the operation, maintenance, rehabilitation, or furnishings
thereof to other agencies, offices, departments, activities, and other
entities enumerated in RCW 43.01.090 and including the rendering of
services in acquiring real estate under RCW 43.82.010 and the operation
and maintenance of public and historic facilities at the state capitol,
as defined in RCW 79.24.710. The department shall treat the rendering
of services in acquiring real estate and the operation and maintenance
of state capitol public and historic facilities as separate operating
entities within the account for financial accounting and control.
The schedule of services, facilities, equipment, supplies,
materials, maintenance, rehabilitation, furnishings, operations, and
administration to be so financed and recovered shall be determined
jointly by the director of general administration and the director of
financial management, in equitable amounts which, together with any
other income or appropriation, will provide the department of general
administration with funds to meet its anticipated expenditures during
any allotment period.
The director of general administration may adopt rules governing
the provisions of RCW 43.01.090 and this section and the relationships
and procedures between the department of general administration and
such other entities.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.19.610 and 1998 c 105 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
All moneys, funds, proceeds, and receipts as provided in RCW
43.19.615 and as may otherwise be provided by law shall be paid into
the general administration ((services)) revolving account.
Disbursements therefrom shall be made in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 43.19.560 through 43.19.630, 43.41.130 and 43.41.140 as
authorized by the director or a duly authorized representative and as
may be provided by law.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.19.615 and 2005 c 214 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director of general administration shall deposit in the general
administration ((services)) revolving account all receipts, including
the initial transfer of automobile pool capital from the highway
equipment fund and any other funds transferred, rentals or other fees
and charges for transportation services furnished, proceeds from the
sale of surplus or replaced property under the control of the
supervisor of motor transport and other income, and from which shall be
paid operating costs, including salaries and wages, administrative
expense, overhead, the cost of replacement vehicles, additional
passenger vehicles, and any other expenses.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.82.125 and 1998 c 105 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The general administration ((services)) revolving account shall be
used to pay all costs incurred by the department in the operation of
real estate managed under the terms of this chapter. Moneys received
into the general administration ((services)) revolving account shall be
used to pay rent to the owner of the space for occupancy of which the
charges have been made and to pay utility and operational costs of the
space utilized by the occupying agency: PROVIDED, That moneys received
into the account for occupancy of space owned by the state where
utilities and other operational costs are covered by appropriation to
the department of general administration shall be immediately
transmitted to the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---