BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.52.045 and 1987 c 314 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon filing with the employer the voluntary written
authorization of a bargaining unit employee under this chapter, the
employee organization which is the exclusive bargaining representative
of the bargaining unit shall have the right to have deducted from the
salary of the bargaining unit employee the periodic dues and initiation
fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or retaining
membership in the exclusive bargaining representative. Such employee
authorization shall not be irrevocable for a period of more than one
year. Such dues and fees shall be deducted from the pay of all
employees who have given authorization for such deduction, and shall be
transmitted by the employer to the employee organization or to the
depository designated by the employee organization.
(2) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions, but not a closed shop. If an agency shop or other union
security provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce any such
provision by deductions from the salary of bargaining unit employees
affected thereby and shall transmit such funds to the employee
organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization.
(3) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide personally
held religious beliefs or based on the tenets or teachings of a church
or religious body of which such employee is a member shall pay directly
to ((a)) any nonreligious ((charity or other)) charitable organization
an amount of money equivalent to the periodic dues and initiation fees
uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or retaining membership
in the exclusive bargaining representative. The ((charity)) charitable
organization shall be ((agreed upon by the employee and the employee
organization to which such employee would otherwise pay the dues and
fees. The employee shall furnish written proof that such payments have
been made. If the employee and the employee organization do not reach
agreement on such matter, the commission shall designate the charitable
organization)) registered with the secretary of state or recognized
under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.06.150 and 2002 c 371 s 906, 2002 c 354 s 203, 2002
c 354 s 202, and 2002 c 110 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:
The board shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and
provisions of this chapter, as now or hereafter amended, and with the
best standards of personnel administration, regarding the basis and
procedures to be followed for:
(1) The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an
employee;
(2) Certification of names for vacancies, including departmental
promotions, with the number of names equal to six more names than there
are vacancies to be filled, such names representing applicants rated
highest on eligibility lists((: PROVIDED, That)). However, when other
applicants have scores equal to the lowest score among the names
certified, their names shall also be certified;
(3) Examinations for all positions in the competitive and
noncompetitive service;
(4) Appointments;
(5) Training and career development;
(6) Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of
probationary employees, depending on the job requirements of the class,
except as follows:
(a) Entry level state park rangers shall serve a probationary
period of twelve months;
(b) The probationary period of campus police officer appointees who
are required to attend the Washington state criminal justice training
commission basic law enforcement academy shall extend from the date of
appointment until twelve months from the date of successful completion
of the basic law enforcement academy, or twelve months from the date of
appointment if academy training is not required. The board shall adopt
rules to ensure that employees promoting to campus police officer who
are required to attend the Washington state criminal justice training
commission basic law enforcement academy shall have the trial service
period extend from the date of appointment until twelve months from the
date of successful completion of the basic law enforcement academy, or
twelve months from the date of appointment if academy training is not
required;
(7) Transfers;
(8) Sick leaves and vacations;
(9) Hours of work;
(10) Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment, both
according to seniority;
(11) Collective bargaining procedures:
(a) After certification of an exclusive bargaining representative
and upon the representative's request, the director shall hold an
election among employees in a bargaining unit to determine by a
majority whether to require as a condition of employment membership in
the certified exclusive bargaining representative on or after the
thirtieth day following the beginning of employment or the date of such
election, whichever is the later, and the failure of an employee to
comply with such a condition of employment constitutes cause for
dismissal((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). No more often than once in
each twelve-month period after expiration of twelve months following
the date of the original election in a bargaining unit and upon
petition of thirty percent of the members of a bargaining unit the
director shall hold an election to determine whether a majority wish to
rescind such condition of employment((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). For
purposes of this ((clause)) subsection (11)(a), membership in the
certified exclusive bargaining representative is satisfied by the
payment of monthly or other periodic dues and does not require payment
of initiation, reinstatement, or any other fees or fines and includes
full and complete membership rights((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
Further, in order to safeguard the right of nonassociation of public
employees, based on bona fide personally held religious beliefs or
based on the tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which
such public employee is a member, such public employee shall pay ((to
the union, for purposes within the program of the union as designated
by such employee that would be in harmony with his or her individual
conscience,)) directly to any nonreligious charitable organization
registered with the secretary of state or recognized under Title 26
U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code an amount of
money equivalent to regular union dues minus any included monthly
premiums for union-sponsored insurance programs, and such employee
shall not be a member of the union but is entitled to all the
representation rights of a union member;
(b) Agreements between agencies and certified exclusive bargaining
representatives providing for grievance procedures and collective
negotiations on all personnel matters over which the appointing
authority of the appropriate bargaining unit of such agency may
lawfully exercise discretion;
(c) Written agreements may contain provisions for payroll
deductions of employee organization dues upon authorization by the
employee member and for the cancellation of such payroll deduction by
the filing of a proper prior notice by the employee with the appointing
authority and the employee organization((: PROVIDED, That)). Nothing
contained herein permits or grants to any employee the right to strike
or refuse to perform his or her official duties;
(d) A collective bargaining agreement entered into under this
subsection before July 1, 2004, covering employees subject to RCW
41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130, that expires after July 1,
2004, shall remain in full force during its duration, or until
superseded by a collective bargaining agreement entered into by the
parties under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130. However,
an agreement entered into before July 1, 2004, may not be renewed or
extended beyond July 1, 2005. This subsection (11) does not apply to
collective bargaining negotiations or collective bargaining agreements
entered into under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130;
(12) Adoption and revision of a comprehensive classification plan
for all positions in the classified service, based on investigation and
analysis of the duties and responsibilities of each such position.
(a) The board shall not adopt job classification revisions or class
studies unless implementation of the proposed revision or study will
result in net cost savings, increased efficiencies, or improved
management of personnel or services, and the proposed revision or study
has been approved by the director of financial management in accordance
with chapter 43.88 RCW.
(b) Reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments are
governed by (a) of this subsection and RCW 41.06.152;
(13) Allocation and reallocation of positions within the
classification plan;
(14) Adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect
the prevailing rates in Washington state private industries and other
governmental units but the rates in the salary schedules or plans shall
be increased if necessary to attain comparable worth under an
implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and that, for institutions of
higher education and related boards, shall be competitive for positions
of a similar nature in the state or the locality in which an
institution of higher education or related board is located, such
adoption and revision subject to approval by the director of financial
management in accordance with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW;
(15) Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay
grade based on length of service for all employees whose standards of
performance are such as to permit them to retain job status in the
classified service;
(16) Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the
agency director, whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make
a domiciliary move in accepting a transfer or other employment with the
state. An agency must provide lump sum compensation within existing
resources. If the person receiving the relocation payment terminates
or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than layoff,
disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency
director, within one year of the date of the employment, the state is
entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;
(17) Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing
statutes, with recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and
subsequent reemployment for veterans and their surviving spouses by
giving such eligible veterans and their surviving spouses additional
credit in computing their seniority by adding to their unbroken state
service, as defined by the board, the veteran's service in the military
not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section, "veteran"
means any person who has one or more years of active military service
in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who has less
than one year's service and is discharged with a disability incurred in
the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the government
and who, upon termination of such service has received an honorable
discharge, a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record,
or a release from active military service with evidence of service
other than that for which an undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable
discharge shall be given((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). However, the
surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of this
section regardless of the veteran's length of active military
service((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). For the purposes of this section
"veteran" does not include any person who has voluntarily retired with
twenty or more years of active military service and whose military
retirement pay is in excess of five hundred dollars per month;
(18) Permitting agency heads to delegate the authority to appoint,
reduce, dismiss, suspend, or demote employees within their agencies if
such agency heads do not have specific statutory authority to so
delegate((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the board may not authorize
such delegation to any position lower than the head of a major
subdivision of the agency;
(19) Assuring persons who are or have been employed in classified
positions before July 1, 1993, will be eligible for employment,
reemployment, transfer, and promotion in respect to classified
positions covered by this chapter;
(20) Affirmative action in appointment, promotion, transfer,
recruitment, training, and career development; development and
implementation of affirmative action goals and timetables; and
monitoring of progress against those goals and timetables.
The board shall consult with the human rights commission in the
development of rules pertaining to affirmative action. The department
of personnel shall transmit a report annually to the human rights
commission which states the progress each state agency has made in
meeting affirmative action goals and timetables.
Notwithstanding this section and rules of the board adopted under
this section, agencies may place employees on temporary unpaid leave
during the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium for the purpose of implementing
appropriations reductions enacted in the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act. Mandatory unpaid leave must be approved by the
agency director, and must be, to the greatest extent possible, mutually
agreeable to the employee and employer. Employees taking mandatory
temporary unpaid leave will not lose seniority, leave accrual, or
health insurance benefits.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.56.122 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 22 are each
amended to read as follows:
A collective bargaining agreement may:
(1) Contain union security provisions((: PROVIDED, That));
however, nothing in this section shall authorize a closed shop
provision((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). Further, agreements involving
union security provisions must safeguard the right of nonassociation of
public employees based on bona fide personally held religious beliefs
or based on the tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of
which such public employee is a member. Such public employee shall pay
an amount of money equivalent to regular union dues and initiation fee
directly to ((a)) any nonreligious ((charity or to another)) charitable
organization ((mutually agreed upon by the public employee affected and
the bargaining representative to which such public employee would
otherwise pay the dues and initiation fee. The public employee shall
furnish written proof that such payment has been made. If the public
employee and the bargaining representative do not reach agreement on
such matter, the commission shall designate the charitable
organization)) registered with the secretary of state or recognized
under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code. When there is a conflict between any collective bargaining
agreement reached by a public employer and a bargaining representative
on a union security provision and any charter, ordinance, rule, or
regulation adopted by the public employer or its agents, including but
not limited to, a civil service commission, the terms of the collective
bargaining agreement shall prevail.
(2) Provide for binding arbitration of a labor dispute arising from
the application or the interpretation of the matters contained in a
collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.59.100 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions including an agency shop, but not a union or closed shop.
If an agency shop provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce it
by deducting from the salary payments to members of the bargaining unit
the dues required of membership in the bargaining representative, or,
for nonmembers thereof, a fee equivalent to such dues. All union
security provisions must safeguard the right of nonassociation of
employees based on bona fide personally held religious beliefs or based
on the tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which such
employee is a member. Such employee shall pay an amount of money
equivalent to regular dues and fees directly to ((a)) any nonreligious
((charity or to another)) charitable organization ((mutually agreed
upon by the employee affected and the bargaining representative to
which such employee would otherwise pay the dues and fees. The
employee shall furnish written proof that such payment has been made.
If the employee and the bargaining representative do not reach
agreement on such matter, the commission shall designate the charitable
organization)) registered with the secretary of state or recognized
under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.76.045 and 2002 c 356 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon filing with the employer the voluntary written
authorization of a bargaining unit faculty member under this chapter,
the employee organization which is the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit shall have the right to have
deducted from the salary of the bargaining unit faculty member the
periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of
acquiring or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining
representative. Such employee authorization shall not be irrevocable
for a period of more than one year. Such dues and fees shall be
deducted from the pay of all faculty members who have given
authorization for such deduction, and shall be transmitted by the
employer to the employee organization or to the depository designated
by the employee organization.
(2) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions, but not a closed shop. If an agency shop or other union
security provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce any such
provision by deductions from the salary of bargaining unit faculty
members affected thereby and shall transmit such funds to the employee
organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization.
(3) A faculty member who is covered by a union security provision
and who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide personally
held religious beliefs or based on the tenets or teachings of a church
or religious body of which such faculty member is a member shall pay
directly to ((a)) any nonreligious ((charity or other)) charitable
organization an amount of money equivalent to the periodic dues and
initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or
retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining representative. The
((charity)) charitable organization shall be ((agreed upon by the
faculty member and the employee organization to which such faculty
member would otherwise pay the dues and fees. The faculty member shall
furnish written proof that such payments have been made. If the
faculty member and the employee organization do not reach agreement on
such matter, the dispute shall be submitted to the commission for
determination)) registered with the secretary of state or recognized
under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.80.100 and 2002 c 354 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A collective bargaining agreement may contain a union security
provision requiring as a condition of employment the payment, no later
than the thirtieth day following the beginning of employment or July 1,
2004, whichever is later, of an agency shop fee to the employee
organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative for the
bargaining unit in which the employee is employed. The amount of the
fee shall be equal to the amount required to become a member in good
standing of the employee organization. Each employee organization
shall establish a procedure by which any employee so requesting may pay
a representation fee no greater than the part of the membership fee
that represents a pro rata share of expenditures for purposes germane
to the collective bargaining process, to contract administration, or to
pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of
employment.
(2) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide personally
held religious beliefs or based on the tenets((,)) or teachings of a
church or religious body of which the employee is a member((,))
shall((, as a condition of employment, make payments to the employee
organization, for purposes within the program of the employee
organization as designated by the employee that would be in harmony
with his or her individual conscience. The amount of the payments
shall be equal)) pay directly to any nonreligious charitable
organization an amount of money equivalent to the periodic dues and
fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or retaining
membership in the employee organization minus any included monthly
premiums for insurance programs sponsored by the employee organization.
The charitable organization shall be registered with the secretary of
state or recognized under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code. The employee shall not be a member of the
employee organization but is entitled to all the representation rights
of a member of the employee organization.
(3) Upon filing with the employer the written authorization of a
bargaining unit employee under this chapter, the employee organization
that is the exclusive bargaining representative of the bargaining unit
shall have the exclusive right to have deducted from the salary of the
employee an amount equal to the fees and dues uniformly required as a
condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the employee
organization. The fees and dues shall be deducted each pay period from
the pay of all employees who have given authorization for the deduction
and shall be transmitted by the employer as provided for by agreement
between the employer and the employee organization.
(4) Employee organizations that before July 1, 2004, were entitled
to the benefits of this section shall continue to be entitled to these
benefits.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.64.160 and 1983 c 15 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions including an agency shop, but not a union or closed shop.
If an agency shop provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce it
by deducting from the salary payments to members of the bargaining unit
the dues required of membership in the bargaining representative, or,
for nonmembers thereof, a fee equivalent to such dues. All union
security provisions shall safeguard the right of nonassociation of
employees based on bona fide personally held religious beliefs or based
on the tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which such
employee is a member. Such employee shall pay an amount of money
equivalent to regular dues and fees directly to ((a)) any nonreligious
((charity or to another)) charitable organization ((mutually agreed
upon by the employee affected and the bargaining representative to
which such employee would otherwise pay the dues and fees. The
employee shall furnish written proof that such payment has been made.
If the employee and the bargaining representative do not reach
agreement on such matter, the commission shall designate the charitable
organization)) registered with the secretary of state or recognized
under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code.

Sec. 8 RCW 49.66.010 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
It is the public policy of the state to expedite the settlement of
labor disputes arising in connection with health care activities, in
order that there may be no lessening, however temporary, in the quality
of the care given to patients. It is the legislative purpose by this
chapter to promote collective bargaining between health care activities
and their employees, to protect the right of employees of health care
activities to organize and select collective bargaining units of their
own choosing.
It is further determined that any agreements involving union
security including an all-union agreement or agency agreement must
safeguard the rights of nonassociation of employees, based on bona fide
personally held religious beliefs or based on the tenets or teachings
of a church or religious body of which such employee is a member. Such
employee must pay an amount of money equivalent to regular union dues
and initiation fees and assessments, if any, directly to ((a)) any
nonreligious ((charity or to another)) charitable organization
((mutually agreed upon by the employee affected and the representative
of the labor organization to which such employee would otherwise pay
dues. The employee shall furnish written proof that this has been
done. If the employee and representative of the labor organization do
not reach agreement on the matter, the department shall designate such
organization)) registered with the secretary of state or recognized
under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code.

--- END ---