BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.01.140 and 2005 c 343 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county auditor, if appointed by the director of licensing
shall carry out the provisions of this title relating to the licensing
of vehicles and the issuance of vehicle license number plates under the
direction and supervision of the director and may with the approval of
the director appoint assistants as special deputies and recommend
subagents to accept applications and collect fees for vehicle licenses
and transfers and to deliver vehicle license number plates.
(2) A county auditor appointed by the director may request that the
director appoint subagencies within the county.
(a) Upon authorization of the director, the auditor shall use an
open competitive process including, but not limited to, a written
business proposal and oral interview to determine the qualifications of
all interested applicants.
(b) A subagent may recommend a successor who is either the
subagent's sibling, spouse, or child, or a subagency employee, as long
as the recommended successor participates in the open, competitive
process used to select an applicant. In making successor
recommendation and appointment determinations, the following provisions
apply:
(i) If a subagency is held by a partnership or corporate entity,
the nomination must be submitted on behalf of, and agreed to by, all
partners or corporate officers.
(ii) No subagent may receive any direct or indirect compensation or
remuneration from any party or entity in recognition of a successor
nomination. A subagent may not receive any financial benefit from the
transfer or termination of an appointment.
(iii) (a) and (b) of this subsection are intended to assist in the
efficient transfer of appointments in order to minimize public
inconvenience. They do not create a proprietary or property interest
in the appointment.
(c) The auditor shall submit all proposals to the director, and
shall recommend the appointment of one or more subagents who have
applied through the open competitive process. The auditor shall
include in his or her recommendation to the director, not only the name
of the successor who is a relative or employee, if applicable and if
otherwise qualified, but also the name of one other applicant who is
qualified and was chosen through the open competitive process. The
director has final appointment authority.
(3)(a) A county auditor who is appointed as an agent by the
department shall enter into a standard contract provided by the
director, developed with the advice of the title and registration
advisory committee.
(b) A subagent appointed under subsection (2) of this section shall
enter into a standard contract with the county auditor, developed with
the advice of the title and registration advisory committee. The
director shall provide the standard contract to county auditors.
(c) The contracts provided for in (a) and (b) of this subsection
must contain at a minimum provisions that:
(i) Describe the responsibilities, and where applicable, the
liability, of each party relating to the service expectations and
levels, equipment to be supplied by the department, and equipment
maintenance;
(ii) Require the specific type of insurance or bonds so that the
state is protected against any loss of collected motor vehicle tax
revenues or loss of equipment;
(iii) Specify the amount of training that will be provided by the
state, the county auditor, or subagents;
(iv) Describe allowable costs that may be charged to vehicle
licensing activities as provided for in (d) of this subsection;
(v) Describe the causes and procedures for termination of the
contract, which may include mediation and binding arbitration.
(d) The department shall develop procedures that will standardize
and prescribe allowable costs that may be assigned to vehicle licensing
and vessel registration and title activities performed by county
auditors.
(e) The contracts may include any provision that the director deems
necessary to ensure acceptable service and the full collection of
vehicle and vessel tax revenues.
(f) The director may waive any provisions of the contract deemed
necessary in order to ensure that readily accessible service is
provided to the citizens of the state.
(4)(a) At any time any application is made to the director, the
county auditor, or other agent pursuant to any law dealing with
licenses, registration, or the right to operate any vehicle or vessel
upon the public highways or waters of this state, excluding applicants
already paying such fee under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085, the applicant
shall pay to the director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of
three dollars for each application in addition to any other fees
required by law. Any applicant who is sixty-five years of age or older
is exempt from the fee imposed under this subsection on an application
for any motor home for which the applicant is the registered owner.
(b) Counties that do not cover the expenses of vehicle licensing
and vessel registration and title activities may submit to the
department a request for cost-coverage moneys. The request must be
submitted on a form developed by the department. The department shall
develop procedures to verify whether a request is reasonable. Payment
shall be made on requests found to be allowable from the licensing
services account.
(c) Applicants for certificates of ownership, including applicants
paying fees under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085, shall pay to the
director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of four dollars in
addition to any other fees required by law.
(d) The fees under (a) and (c) of this subsection, if paid to the
county auditor as agent of the director, or if paid to a subagent of
the county auditor, shall be paid to the county treasurer in the same
manner as other fees collected by the county auditor and credited to
the county current expense fund. If the fee is paid to another agent
of the director, the fee shall be used by the agent to defray his or
her expenses in handling the application.
(e) Applicants required to pay the three-dollar fee established
under (a) of this subsection, must pay an additional seventy-five
cents, which must be collected and remitted to the state treasurer and
distributed as follows:
(i) Fifty cents must be deposited into the department of licensing
services account of the motor vehicle fund and must be used for agent
and subagent support, which is to include but not be limited to the
replacement of department-owned equipment in the possession of agents
and subagents.
(ii) Twenty-five cents must be deposited into the license plate
technology account created under RCW 46.16.685.
(5) A subagent shall collect a service fee of (a) ten dollars for
changes in a certificate of ownership, with or without registration
renewal, or verification of record and preparation of an affidavit of
lost title other than at the time of the title application or transfer
and (b) four dollars for registration renewal only, issuing a transit
permit, or any other service under this section.
(6) If the fee is collected by the state patrol as agent for the
director, the fee so collected shall be certified to the state
treasurer and deposited to the credit of the state patrol highway
account. If the fee is collected by the department of transportation
as agent for the director, the fee shall be certified to the state
treasurer and deposited to the credit of the motor vehicle fund. All
such fees collected by the director or branches of his office shall be
certified to the state treasurer and deposited to the credit of the
highway safety fund.
(7) Any county revenues that exceed the cost of providing vehicle
licensing and vessel registration and title activities in a county,
calculated in accordance with the procedures in subsection (3)(d) of
this section, shall be expended as determined by the county legislative
authority during the process established by law for adoption of county
budgets.
(8) The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.063 and 1996 c 237 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to other fees for the licensing of vehicles there
shall be paid and collected annually for each camper, travel trailer,
and motor home as the same are defined in RCW 82.50.010 a fee of three
dollars to be deposited in the RV account of the motor vehicle fund.
Under RCW 43.135.055, the department of transportation may increase RV
account fees by a percentage that exceeds the fiscal growth factor.
After consultation with citizen representatives of the recreational
vehicle user community, the department of transportation may implement
RV account fee adjustments no more than once every four years. RV
account fee adjustments must be preceded by evaluation of the following
factors: Maintenance of a self-supporting program, levels of service
at existing RV sanitary disposal facilities, identified needs for
improved RV service at safety rest areas statewide, sewage treatment
costs, and inflation. If the department chooses to adjust the RV
account fee, it shall notify the department of licensing six months
before implementation of the fee increase. Adjustments in the RV
account fee must be in increments of no more than fifty cents per
biennium.
(2) Any individual who is sixty-five years of age or older is
exempt from the RV account fee imposed under this section on a motor
home for which the individual is the registered owner.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.237 and 2005 c 314 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All vehicle license number plates issued after January 1, 1968,
or such earlier date as the director may prescribe with respect to
plates issued in any county, shall be treated with fully reflectorized
materials designed to increase the visibility and legibility of such
plates at night. In addition to all other fees prescribed by law,
there shall be paid and collected for each vehicle license number plate
treated with such materials, the sum of two dollars and for each set of
two plates, the sum of four dollars. However, one plate is available
only to those vehicles that by law require only one plate. Such fees
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.
(2) Any individual who is sixty-five years of age or older is
exempt from the fee imposed under this section on a plate or plates for
a motor home for which the individual is the registered owner.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.270 and 2005 c 314 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
The total replacement plate fee shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund.
Upon the loss, defacement, or destruction of one or both of the
vehicle license number plates issued for any vehicle where more than
one plate was originally issued or where one or both have become so
illegible or in such a condition as to be difficult to distinguish, or
upon the owner's option, the owner of the vehicle shall make
application for new vehicle license number plates upon a form furnished
by the director. The application shall be filed with the director or
the director's authorized agent, accompanied by the certificate of
license registration of the vehicle and a fee in the amount of ten
dollars per plate, whereupon the director, or the director's authorized
agent, shall issue new vehicle license number plates to the applicant.
It shall be accompanied by a fee of two dollars for a new motorcycle
license number plate. In the event the director has issued license
period tabs or a windshield emblem instead of vehicle license number
plates, and upon the loss, defacement, or destruction of the tabs or
windshield emblem, application shall be made on a form provided by the
director and in the same manner as above described, and shall be
accompanied by a fee of one dollar for each pair of tabs or for each
windshield emblem, whereupon the director shall issue to the applicant
a duplicate pair of tabs, year tabs, and when necessary month tabs or
a windshield emblem to replace those lost, defaced, or destroyed. For
vehicles owned, rented, or leased by the state of Washington or by any
county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision of
the state of Washington or United States government, or owned or leased
by the governing body of an Indian tribe as defined in RCW 46.16.020,
a fee shall be charged for replacement of a vehicle license number
plate only to the extent required by the provisions of RCW 46.16.020,
46.16.237, and 46.01.140. For vehicles owned, rented, or leased by
foreign countries or international bodies to which the United States
government is a signatory by treaty, the payment of any fee for the
replacement of a vehicle license number plate shall not be required.
Any applicant who is sixty-five years of age or older is exempt from
the fee imposed under this subsection on a plate or plates for any
motor home for which the applicant is the registered owner.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.17.020 and 2005 c 314 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other fees or charges, there shall be paid
and collected annually for motor homes a vehicle weight fee of seventy-five dollars. This fee is due at the time of initial and renewal of
vehicle registration. The fee collected under this section shall be
deposited in the multimodal transportation account.
(2) Any individual who is sixty-five years of age or older is
exempt from the fee imposed by this section on a motor home for which
the individual is the registered owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---