BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Nada protocol" means the insertion of acupuncture needles into
specific external auricular acupuncture points of the human ear for the
purpose of assisting a person who is undergoing detoxification to treat
alcoholism, substance abuse, or chemical dependency, or distress
related to trauma or mental disorder.
(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 In addition to any other authority, the
secretary has the authority to:
(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this
chapter;
(2) Establish all endorsement, examination, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250;
(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(4) Issue endorsements to applicants who have met the requirements
for obtaining an endorsement and to deny an endorsement to applicants
who do not meet the requirements;
(5) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff
as needed to implement this chapter;
(6) Determine minimum training requirements and evaluate and
designate those training programs from which graduation will be
accepted as proof of eligibility to take a qualifying examination for
applicants for obtaining an endorsement;
(7) Determine which states have credentialing requirements
equivalent to those of this state, and issue endorsements to applicants
credentialed in those states without examination;
(8) Establish continuing competency requirements for the renewal of
an endorsement; and
(9) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and
endorsement holders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An individual who holds an endorsement
issued under subsection (2) of this section may perform the nada
protocol therapy only:
(a)(i) Within the context of an approved treatment program under
chapter 70.96A RCW;
(ii) In a hospital, prison, outpatient clinic, or other setting
approved by the secretary;
(iii) Under the appropriate supervision of an acupuncturist
licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW and trained in the nada protocol, an
advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW
and trained in the nada protocol, a naturopath licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW and trained in the nada protocol, a physician licensed under
chapter 18.71 RCW and trained in the nada protocol, or an osteopathic
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW and trained in the nada
protocol; or
(b)(i) As an emergency worker registered with a local organization
for emergency services or management as defined by chapter 38.52 RCW;
(ii) Within the context of providing assistance during an emergency
or disaster as defined in RCW 38.52.010;
(iii) At the scene of the emergency or disaster, an alternative
care site, or a hospital; and
(iv) Under the appropriate supervision of an acupuncturist licensed
under chapter 18.06 RCW and trained in the nada protocol, an advanced
registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW and
trained in the nada protocol, a naturopath licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW and trained in the nada protocol, a physician licensed under
chapter 18.71 RCW and trained in the nada protocol, or an osteopathic
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW and trained in the nada
protocol.
(2) The secretary shall issue an endorsement to any applicant who:
(a) Holds a credential as a:
(i) Licensed acupuncturist under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(ii) Certified chemical dependency professional under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(iii) Licensed mental health counselor under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(iv) Licensed naturopath under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(v) Licensed osteopathic physician under chapter 18.57 RCW;
(vi) Licensed osteopathic physicians' assistant under chapter
18.57A RCW;
(vii) Licensed physician under chapter 18.71 RCW;
(viii) Licensed physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW;
(ix) Licensed psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW;
(x) Licensed registered nurse or advanced registered nurse
practitioner under chapter 18.79 RCW; or
(xi) Licensed social worker under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(b) Demonstrates successful completion of a training program in the
nada protocol, including appropriate clean needle procedures, as
approved by the secretary; and
(c) Pays any required fees.
(3) The secretary shall establish minimum qualifications for
supervising acupuncturists, naturopaths, physicians, and osteopathic
physicians and appropriate levels of supervision. Supervision
requirements listed in subsection (1)(a)(iii) and (b)(iv) of this
section do not apply to the independent performance of the nada
protocol by an individual who meets supervisory qualifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 After September 1, 2009, no person may
perform the nada protocol in this state without having an endorsement
issued under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
to prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice by an individual who holds a credential issued by
the state to engage in the practice of a profession or occupation who
is performing services within the authorized scope of practice of that
profession or occupation;
(2) The practice by an individual employed by the government of the
United States while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by
the laws of the United States;
(3) The practice of the nada protocol by a person who is a regular
student in a training program approved by the secretary, and whose
performance of the nada protocol is pursuant to a regular course of
instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the general
supervision of the instructor; or
(4) The practice of an individual who holds a credential listed in
section 3(2)(a) of this act who does not obtain an endorsement under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Applications for an endorsement must be
submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary may
require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to
the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for an
endorsement provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each
applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW
43.70.250. The fee must accompany the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The secretary shall establish by rule the
requirements and fees for renewal of an endorsement. Failure to renew
the endorsement invalidates the endorsement and all privileges granted
by the endorsement. If an endorsement has lapsed for a period longer
than three years, the person shall demonstrate competence to the
satisfaction of the secretary by completing continuing competency
requirements or meeting other standards determined by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130
RCW, governs practice without an endorsement, the issuance and denial
of endorsements, and the disciplining of endorsement holders under this
chapter. The secretary is the disciplining authority under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.06.045 and 1995 c 323 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice by an individual credentialed under the laws of
this state and performing services within such individual's authorized
scope of practice;
(2) The practice by an individual employed by the government of the
United States while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by
the laws of the United States;
(3) The practice by a person who is a regular student in an
educational program approved by the secretary, and whose performance of
services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments
from an instructor and under the general supervision of the instructor;
(4) The practice of acupuncture by any person credentialed to
perform acupuncture in any other jurisdiction where such person is
doing so in the course of regular instruction of a school of
acupuncture approved by the secretary or in an educational seminar by
a professional organization of acupuncture, provided that in the latter
case, the practice is supervised directly by a person licensed under
this chapter or licensed under any other healing art whose scope of
practice includes acupuncture;
(5) The practice of the nada protocol by an individual holding an
endorsement issued under chapter 18.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 9 of this act).

Sec. 11 RCW 18.130.040 and 2007 c 269 s 17, 2007 c 253 s 13, and
2007 c 70 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(viii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(ix) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(x) Persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(xi) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and
family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xii) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xiii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiv) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xvi) Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(xvii) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xviii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xix) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xx) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;
(xxi) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
(xxii) Recreational therapists;
(xxiii) Animal massage practitioners certified under chapter 18.240
RCW; ((and))
(xxiv) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW; and
(xxv) Persons holding an endorsement under chapter 18.-- RCW (the
new chapter created in section 9 of this act).
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW and
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses
based on the conditions and criteria established in this chapter and
the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter
also governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to
denial of licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the
applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW 18.130.160
by the disciplining authority.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---