BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The sum of fifty million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2009, from the state building construction account to the
office of financial management, working with and through other state
agencies, the Chehalis basin flood control authority, and other local
governments as appropriate, to participate in flood hazard mitigation
projects for the Chehalis river basin.
(1) Up to two million five hundred thousand dollars of the
appropriation is for the Chehalis basin flood control authority or
other authorized local government groups to develop or participate in
the development of flood hazard mitigation measures throughout the
basin.
(2) The office of financial management shall participate as the
nonfederal sponsor of United States army corps of engineers flood
hazard mitigation projects for the Chehalis river basin area, including
the project authorized by the water resources development act of 2007
and projects to be developed under the basin-wide study authorized by
United States house resolution 2581, if such projects are mutually
agreed to between the federal government, the office of financial
management, and the Chehalis basin flood control authority or other
authorized local government group. The office of financial management
shall prepare the necessary agreements to ensure an active partnership
with federal and state agencies, local governments, the Chehalis river
flood control authority, and others as needed.
(3) The office of financial management shall not allot funds for
construction of flood hazard mitigation projects for the Chehalis river
basin until a project agreement between nonfederal project partners has
been signed and copies have been provided to the governor, the majority
and minority leaders of the senate, and the speaker and minority leader
of the house of representatives. The project agreement must delineate
responsibility for the ongoing operations and maintenance of the
project. The agreement must also include a plan to meet applicable
floodplain management requirements and to address any applicable
federal requirements for managing the effect of future land use
developments on the extent and severity of flooding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---