BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.02.050 and 2007 c 156 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A health care provider or health care facility may disclose
health care information about a patient without the patient's
authorization to the extent a recipient needs to know the information,
if the disclosure is:
(a) To a person who the provider or facility reasonably believes is
providing health care to the patient;
(b) To any other person who requires health care information for
health care education, or to provide planning, quality assurance, peer
review, or administrative, legal, financial, actuarial services to, or
other health care operations for or on behalf of the health care
provider or health care facility; or for assisting the health care
provider or health care facility in the delivery of health care and the
health care provider or health care facility reasonably believes that
the person:
(i) Will not use or disclose the health care information for any
other purpose; and
(ii) Will take appropriate steps to protect the health care
information;
(c) To any other health care provider or health care facility
reasonably believed to have previously provided health care to the
patient, to the extent necessary to provide health care to the patient,
unless the patient has instructed the health care provider or health
care facility in writing not to make the disclosure;
(d) To any person if the health care provider or health care
facility reasonably believes that disclosure will avoid or minimize an
imminent danger to the health or safety of the patient or any other
individual, however there is no obligation under this chapter on the
part of the provider or facility to so disclose;
(e) To immediate family members of the patient, including a
patient's state registered domestic partner, or any other individual
with whom the patient is known to have a close personal relationship,
if made in accordance with good medical or other professional practice,
unless the patient has instructed the health care provider or health
care facility in writing not to make the disclosure;
(f) To a health care provider or health care facility who is the
successor in interest to the health care provider or health care
facility maintaining the health care information;
(g) For use in a research project that an institutional review
board has determined:
(i) Is of sufficient importance to outweigh the intrusion into the
privacy of the patient that would result from the disclosure;
(ii) Is impracticable without the use or disclosure of the health
care information in individually identifiable form;
(iii) Contains reasonable safeguards to protect the information
from redisclosure;
(iv) Contains reasonable safeguards to protect against identifying,
directly or indirectly, any patient in any report of the research
project; and
(v) Contains procedures to remove or destroy at the earliest
opportunity, consistent with the purposes of the project, information
that would enable the patient to be identified, unless an institutional
review board authorizes retention of identifying information for
purposes of another research project;
(h) To a person who obtains information for purposes of an audit,
if that person agrees in writing to:
(i) Remove or destroy, at the earliest opportunity consistent with
the purpose of the audit, information that would enable the patient to
be identified; and
(ii) Not to disclose the information further, except to accomplish
the audit or report unlawful or improper conduct involving fraud in
payment for health care by a health care provider or patient, or other
unlawful conduct by the health care provider;
(i) To an official of a penal or other custodial institution in
which the patient is detained;
(j) To provide directory information, unless the patient has
instructed the health care provider or health care facility not to make
the disclosure;
(k) To fire, police, sheriff, or another public authority, that
brought, or caused to be brought, the patient to the health care
facility or health care provider if the disclosure is limited to the
patient's name, residence, sex, age, occupation, condition, diagnosis,
estimated or actual discharge date, or extent and location of injuries
as determined by a physician, and whether the patient was conscious
when admitted;
(l) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities and the
health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor
believes in good faith that the health care information disclosed
constitutes evidence of criminal conduct that occurred on the premises
of the health care provider, health care facility, or third-party
payor;
(m) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities, when
the health care provider is providing medical care in a health care
facility immediately after a motor vehicle accident to a person
reasonably believed to be the operator of a motor vehicle involved in
the accident and the health care provider becomes aware, as a result of
any blood test performed in the course of that treatment, that the
person's blood alcohol level meets or exceeds the percent specified in
RCW 46.20.308. The health care provider may report the person's name,
the blood alcohol level disclosed by the test, and the date and time of
the test, to the federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities
within five calendar days of the date the test was administered;
(n) To another health care provider, health care facility, or
third-party payor for the health care operations of the health care
provider, health care facility, or third-party payor that receives the
information, if each entity has or had a relationship with the patient
who is the subject of the health care information being requested, the
health care information pertains to such relationship, and the
disclosure is for the purposes described in RCW 70.02.010(8) (a) and
(b); or
(((n))) (o) For payment.
(2) A health care provider shall disclose health care information
about a patient without the patient's authorization if the disclosure
is:
(a) To federal, state, or local public health authorities, to the
extent the health care provider is required by law to report health
care information; when needed to determine compliance with state or
federal licensure, certification or registration rules or laws; or when
needed to protect the public health;
(b) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities to the
extent the health care provider is required by law;
(c) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities, upon
receipt of a written or oral request made to a nursing supervisor,
administrator, or designated privacy official, in a case in which the
patient is being treated or has been treated for a bullet wound,
gunshot wound, powder burn, or other injury arising from or caused by
the discharge of a firearm, or an injury caused by a knife, an ice
pick, or any other sharp or pointed instrument which federal, state, or
local law enforcement authorities reasonably believe to have been
intentionally inflicted upon a person, or a blunt force injury that
federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities reasonably believe
resulted from a criminal act, the following information, if known:
(i) The name of the patient;
(ii) The patient's residence;
(iii) The patient's sex;
(iv) The patient's age;
(v) The patient's condition;
(vi) The patient's diagnosis, or extent and location of injuries as
determined by a health care provider;
(vii) Whether the patient was conscious when admitted;
(viii) The name of the health care provider making the
determination in (c)(v), (vi), and (vii) of this subsection;
(ix) Whether the patient has been transferred to another facility;
and
(x) The patient's discharge time and date;
(d) To county coroners and medical examiners for the investigations
of deaths;
(e) Pursuant to compulsory process in accordance with RCW
70.02.060.
(3) All state or local agencies obtaining patient health care
information pursuant to this section shall adopt rules establishing
their record acquisition, retention, and security policies that are
consistent with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.02 RCW
to read as follows:
Any health care provider participating in good faith in the making
of a report under RCW 70.02.050(1)(m) is immune from any liability,
civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed with
respect to the making or the content of such report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other reporting requirements, if a health
care provider is providing emergency medical care to a person in a
health care facility and has reason to believe that the person is under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, is about to drive a
motor vehicle on a highway or a premises open to the public, and is a
clear and present danger to society, the health care provider may
notify, as soon as reasonably possible, the law enforcement agency
which has jurisdiction over the health care facility site.
(2) The notice shall consist of the name and physical description
of the person being treated and the fact that the health care provider
believes the person is intoxicated and is about to drive a motor
vehicle.
(3) The health care provider may inform the person if the health
care provider intends to notify the law enforcement agency, but the
person's consent is not required.
(4) Any health care provider participating in good faith in the
making of a report under this section is immune from any liability,
civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed with
respect to the making or the content of such report.

--- END ---