BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 To protect taxpayers, many state programs
require the costs of licensing, registration, certification, and
related government services to be borne by the profession or industry
that uses the services, rather than by the taxpaying public as a whole.
State standards that govern the professional duties of these industries
are intended to protect the general public by safeguarding health,
safety, employees, and consumers. The legislative approval of the
fees and fee increases in this act is intended to ensure that the
general public is not assessed these costs while also providing
adequate funding to statutory programs that safeguard and improve
Washington's health, safety, employees, and consumers.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.12.070 and 2006 c 230 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES--PREVAILING WAGE--CERTIFICATION
OF AFFIDAVITS. The department of labor and industries may charge fees
to awarding agencies on public works for the approval of statements of
intent to pay prevailing wages and the certification of affidavits of
wages paid. The department may also charge fees to persons or
organizations requesting the arbitration of disputes under RCW
39.12.060. The amount of the fees shall be established by rules
adopted by the department under the procedures in the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. The fees shall apply to all
approvals, certifications, and arbitration requests made after the
effective date of the rules. All fees shall be deposited in the public
works administration account. The department may refuse to arbitrate
for contractors, subcontractors, persons, or organizations which have
not paid the proper fees. The department may, if necessary, request
the attorney general to take legal action to collect delinquent fees.
The department shall set the fees permitted by this section at a
level that generates revenue that is as near as practicable to the
amount of the appropriation to administer this chapter, including, but
not limited to, the performance of adequate wage surveys, and to
investigate and enforce all alleged violations of this chapter,
including, but not limited to, incorrect statements of intent to pay
prevailing wage, incorrect certificates of affidavits of wages paid,
and wage claims, as provided for in this chapter and chapters 49.48 and
49.52 RCW. However, the fees charged for the approval of statements of
intent to pay prevailing wages and the certification of affidavits of
wages paid shall be ((no greater than twenty-five)) forty dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2008.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.22.434 and 2005 c 274 s 296 are each amended to
read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES--FACTORY ASSEMBLED
STRUCTURES/MOBILE/MANUFACTURED HOMES. (1) The director or the
director's authorized representative may conduct such inspections,
investigations, and audits as may be necessary to adopt or enforce
manufactured and mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending
units, medical units, recreational vehicle, park trailer, factory built
housing, and factory built commercial structure rules adopted under the
authority of this chapter or to carry out the director's duties under
this chapter.
(2) For purposes of enforcement of this chapter, persons duly
designated by the director upon presenting appropriate credentials to
the owner, operator, or agent in charge may:
(a) At reasonable times and without advance notice enter any
factory, warehouse, or establishment in which manufactured and mobile
homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicles, park trailers, factory built housing, and
factory built commercial structures are manufactured, stored, or held
for sale;
(b) At reasonable times, within reasonable limits, and in a
reasonable manner inspect any factory, warehouse, or establishment as
required to comply with the standards adopted by the secretary of
housing and urban development under the national manufactured home
construction and safety standards act of 1974. Each inspection shall
be commenced and completed with reasonable promptness; and
(c) As requested by an owner of a conversion vending unit or
medical unit, inspect an alteration.
(3) For purposes of determining compliance with this chapter's
permitting requirements for alterations of mobile and manufactured
homes, the department may audit the records of a contractor as defined
in chapter 18.27 RCW or RCW 18.106.020(1) or an electrical contractor
as defined in RCW 19.28.006 when the department has reason to believe
that a violation of the permitting requirements has occurred. The
department shall adopt rules implementing the auditing procedures.
Information obtained from a contractor through an audit authorized by
this subsection is confidential and not open to public inspection under
chapter 42.56 RCW.
(4)(((a))) The department shall set a schedule of fees by rule
which will cover the costs incurred by the department in the
administration of RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.490, and is hereby
authorized to do so pursuant to RCW 43.135.055. The department may
waive mobile/manufactured home alteration permit fees for indigent
permit applicants.
(((b)(i) Until April 1, 2009, subject to (a) of this subsection,
the department may adopt by rule a temporary statewide fee schedule
that decreases fees for mobile/manufactured home alteration permits and
increases fees for factory-built housing and commercial structures plan
review and inspection services.
(ii) Effective April 1, 2009, the department must adopt a new fee
schedule that is the same as the fee schedule that was in effect
immediately prior to the temporary fee schedule authorized in (b)(i) of
this subsection. However, the new fee schedule must be adjusted by the
fiscal growth factors not applied during the period that the temporary
fee schedule was in effect.))

Sec. 5 RCW 70.74.137 and 1988 c 198 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES--EXPLOSIVES. Every person
applying for a purchaser's license, or renewal thereof, shall pay an
annual license fee of ((five)) twenty-five dollars. The director of
labor and industries may adjust the amount of the license fee to
reflect the administrative costs of the department. The fee shall not
exceed ((fifteen)) one hundred dollars.
Said license fee shall accompany the application and shall be
transmitted by the department to the state treasurer: PROVIDED, That
if the applicant is denied a purchaser's license the license fee shall
be returned to said applicant by registered mail.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.74.140 and 1988 c 198 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES--EXPLOSIVES. Every person
engaging in the business of keeping or storing of explosives shall pay
an annual license fee for each magazine maintained, to be graduated by
the department of labor and industries according to the quantity kept
or stored therein, of ((ten)) fifty dollars. The director of labor and
industries may adjust the amount of the license fee to reflect the
administrative costs of the department. The fee shall not exceed
((one)) four hundred dollars.
Said license fee shall accompany the application and shall be
transmitted by the department to the state treasurer.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.74.142 and 1988 c 198 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES--EXPLOSIVES. Every person
applying for a user's license, or renewal thereof, under this chapter
shall pay an annual license fee of ((five)) fifty dollars. The
director of labor and industries may adjust the amount of the license
fee to reflect the administrative costs of the department. The fee
shall not exceed ((fifteen)) two hundred dollars.
Said license fee shall accompany the application, and be ((turned
over)) transmitted by the department to the state treasurer: PROVIDED,
That if the applicant is denied a user's license the license fee shall
be returned to said applicant by registered mail.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.74.144 and 1988 c 198 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES--EXPLOSIVES. Every person
engaged in the business of manufacturing explosives shall pay an annual
license fee of ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars. The director of labor
and industries may adjust the amount of the license fee to reflect the
administrative costs of the department. The fee shall not exceed
((fifty)) two hundred dollars.
Businesses licensed to manufacture explosives are not required to
have a dealer's license, but must comply with all of the dealer
requirements of this chapter when they sell explosives.
The license fee shall accompany the application and shall be
transmitted by the department to the state treasurer.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.74.146 and 1988 c 198 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES--EXPLOSIVES. Every person
engaged in the business of selling explosives shall pay an annual
license fee of ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars. The director of labor
and industries may adjust the amount of the license fee to reflect the
administrative costs of the department. The fee shall not exceed
((fifty)) two hundred dollars.
Businesses licensed to sell explosives must comply with all of the
dealer requirements of this chapter.
The license fee shall accompany the application and shall be
transmitted by the department to the state treasurer.

Sec. 10 RCW 70.74.360 and 1988 c 198 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES--EXPLOSIVES. (1) The director
of labor and industries shall require, as a condition precedent to the
original issuance or renewal of any explosive license, fingerprinting
and criminal history record information checks of every applicant. In
the case of a corporation, fingerprinting and criminal history record
information checks shall be required for the management officials
directly responsible for the operations where explosives are used if
such persons have not previously had their fingerprints recorded with
the department of labor and industries. In the case of a partnership,
fingerprinting and criminal history record information checks shall be
required of all general partners. Such fingerprints as are required by
the department of labor and industries shall be submitted on forms
provided by the department to the identification section of the
Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the
federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search
their records for prior convictions of the individuals fingerprinted.
The Washington state patrol shall provide to the director of labor and
industries such criminal record information as the director may
request. The applicant shall give full cooperation to the department
of labor and industries and shall assist the department of labor and
industries in all aspects of the fingerprinting and criminal history
record information check. The applicant ((may)) shall be required to
pay ((a)) the current federal and state fee ((not to exceed twenty
dollars to the agency that performs the fingerprinting and criminal
history process)) for fingerprint-based criminal history background
checks.
(2) The director of labor and industries shall not issue a license
to manufacture, purchase, store, use, or deal with explosives to:
(a) Any person under twenty-one years of age;
(b) Any person whose license is suspended or whose license has been
revoked, except as provided in RCW 70.74.370;
(c) Any person who has been convicted in this state or elsewhere of
a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, perjury, false swearing,
or bomb threats or a crime involving a schedule I or II controlled
substance, or any other drug or alcohol related offense, unless such
other drug or alcohol related offense does not reflect a drug or
alcohol dependency. However, the director of labor and industries may
issue a license if the person suffering a drug or alcohol related
dependency is participating in or has completed an alcohol or drug
recovery program acceptable to the department of labor and industries
and has established control of their alcohol or drug dependency. The
director of labor and industries shall require the applicant to provide
proof of such participation and control; or
(d) Any person who has previously been adjudged to be mentally ill
or insane, or to be incompetent due to any mental disability or disease
and who has not at the time of application been restored to competency.
(3) The director of labor and industries may establish reasonable
licensing fees for the manufacture, dealing, purchase, use, and storage
of explosives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 70.74 RCW
to read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES--EXPLOSIVES. All funds
collected by the department under RCW 70.74.137 through 70.74.146 and
70.74.360 shall be transferred to the state treasurer for deposit into
the accident and medical aid funds under RCW 51.44.010 and 51.44.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 18.130
RCW to read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH--HEALTH PROFESSIONS BACKGROUND CHECKS. In
accordance with RCW 43.135.055, to implement the background check
activities conducted pursuant to RCW 18.130.--- (section 7 of Fourth
Substitute House Bill No. 1103, health professions), the department may
establish fees as necessary to recover the cost of these activities
and, except as precluded by RCW 43.70.110, the department shall require
applicants to submit the required fees along with other information
required by the state patrol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 18.130
RCW to read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH--HEALTH PROFESSIONS. In accordance with RCW
43.135.055, the department may annually increase application and
renewal fees as necessary to recover the cost of implementing the
administrative and disciplinary provisions of chapter . . ., Laws of
2008 (Fourth Substitute House Bill No. 1103)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 18.84 RCW
to read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH--RADIOLOGY ASSISTANTS. In accordance with RCW
43.135.055, the department may establish application, certification,
and renewal fees as necessary to recover the cost of implementing
chapter . . ., Laws of 2008 (Substitute House Bill No. 6439, radiology
assistants).

Sec. 15 RCW 15.58.070 and 2002 c 274 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE--PESTICIDE FEES. (1) All registrations
issued by the department expire December 31st of the following year
except that registrations issued by the department to a registrant who
is applying to register an additional pesticide during the second year
of the registrant's registration period shall expire December 31st of
that year.
(2) An application for registration ((shall)) must be accompanied
by a fee of ((two)) three hundred ninety dollars for each pesticide,
except that a registrant who is applying to register an additional
pesticide during the year the registrant's registration expires shall
pay a fee of one hundred ((forty-five)) ninety-five dollars for each
additional pesticide.
(3) Fees ((shall)) must be deposited in the agricultural local fund
to support the activities of the pesticide program within the
department.
(4) Any registration approved by the director and in effect on the
last day of the registration period, for which a renewal application
has been made and the proper fee paid, continues in full force and
effect until the director notifies the applicant that the registration
has been renewed, or otherwise denied in accord with the provision of
RCW 15.58.110.

Sec. 16 RCW 15.58.180 and 1997 c 242 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE--PESTICIDE FEES. (1) Except as provided
in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, it is unlawful for any
person to act in the capacity of a pesticide dealer or advertise as or
assume to act as a pesticide dealer without first having obtained an
annual license from the director. The license ((shall)) expires on the
master license expiration date. A license is required for each
location or outlet located within this state from which pesticides are
distributed. A manufacturer, registrant, or distributor who has no
pesticide dealer outlet licensed within this state and who distributes
((such)) pesticides directly into this state ((shall)) must obtain a
pesticide dealer license for his or her principal out-of-state location
or outlet, but such a licensed out-of-state pesticide dealer is exempt
from the pesticide dealer manager requirements.
(2) Application for a license ((shall)) must be accompanied by a
fee of ((fifty)) sixty-seven dollars and ((shall)) must be made through
the master license system and ((shall)) must include the full name of
the person applying for the license and the name of the individual
within the state designated as the pesticide dealer manager. If the
applicant is a partnership, association, corporation, or organized
group of persons, the full name of each member of the firm or
partnership or the names of the officers of the association or
corporation ((shall)) must be given on the application. The
application ((shall further)) must state the principal business address
of the applicant in the state and elsewhere, the name of a person
domiciled in this state authorized to receive and accept service of
summons of legal notices of all kinds for the applicant, and any other
necessary information prescribed by the director.
(3) It is unlawful for any licensed dealer outlet to operate
without a pesticide dealer manager who has a license of qualification.
((The department shall be notified forthwith of any change in the
pesticide dealer manager designee during the licensing period.))
(4) This section does not apply to (a) a licensed pesticide
applicator who sells pesticides only as an integral part of the
applicator's pesticide application service when ((such)) pesticides are
dispensed only through apparatuses used for ((such)) pesticide
application, or (b) any federal, state, county, or municipal agency
that provides pesticides only for its own programs.
(5) A user of a pesticide may distribute a properly labeled
pesticide to another user who is legally entitled to use that pesticide
without obtaining a pesticide dealer's license if the exclusive purpose
of distributing the pesticide is keeping it from becoming a hazardous
waste as defined in chapter 70.105 RCW.

Sec. 17 RCW 15.58.200 and 1997 c 242 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE--PESTICIDE FEES. The director shall
require each pesticide dealer manager to demonstrate to the director
knowledge of pesticide laws and rules; pesticide hazards; and the safe
distribution, use and application, and disposal of pesticides by
satisfactorily passing a written examination after which the director
shall issue a license of qualification. Application for a license
((shall)) must be accompanied by a fee of ((twenty-five)) thirty-three
dollars. The pesticide dealer manager license ((shall be an annual
license expiring)) expires annually on a date set by rule by the
director.

Sec. 18 RCW 15.58.205 and 2003 c 212 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,)) No
individual may perform services as a structural pest inspector or
advertise that they perform services of a structural pest inspector
without obtaining a structural pest inspector license from the
director. The license expires annually on a date set by rule by the
director. Application for a license must be on a form prescribed by
the director and must be accompanied by a fee of ((forty-five)) sixty
dollars.
(2) The following are exempt from the application fee requirement
((of subsection (1))) of this section when acting within the
authorities of their existing licenses issued under this chapter
((15.58)) or chapter 17.21 RCW: Licensed pest control consultants;
licensed commercial pesticide applicators and operators; licensed
private-commercial applicators; and licensed demonstration and research
applicators.
(3) The following are exempt from the structural pest inspector
licensing requirement: Individuals inspecting for damage caused by
wood destroying organisms if the inspections are solely for the purpose
of: (a) Repairing or making specific recommendations for the repair of
the damage, or (b) assessing a monetary value for the structure
inspected. Individuals performing wood destroying organism inspections
that incorporate but are not limited to the activities described in (a)
or (b) of this subsection are not exempt from the structural pest
inspector licensing requirement.
(4) ((Persons holding a valid license to act as a structural pest
inspector on July 1, 2003, are exempt from this requirement until
expiration of that license.
(5))) A structural pest inspector license is not valid for
conducting a complete wood destroying organism inspection unless the
inspector owns or is employed by a business with a structural pest
inspection company license.

Sec. 19 RCW 15.58.210 and 2003 c 212 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE--PESTICIDE FEES. (1) ((Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section,)) No individual may perform
services as a pest control consultant without obtaining a license from
the director. The license ((shall)) expires annually on a date set by
rule by the director. Application for a license ((shall)) must be on
a form prescribed by the director and ((shall)) must be accompanied by
a fee of ((forty-five)) sixty dollars.
(2) The following are exempt from the licensing requirements of
((subsection (1) of)) this section when acting within the authorities
of their existing licenses issued under chapter 17.21 RCW: Licensed
commercial pesticide applicators and operators; licensed private-commercial applicators; and licensed demonstration and research
applicators. The following are also exempt from the licensing
requirements of ((subsection (1) of)) this section: Employees of
federal, state, county, or municipal agencies when acting in their
official governmental capacities; and pesticide dealer managers and
employees working under the direct supervision of the pesticide dealer
manager and only at a licensed pesticide dealer's outlet.

Sec. 20 RCW 15.58.220 and 1997 c 242 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE--PESTICIDE FEES. For the purpose of this
section public pest control consultant means any individual who is
employed by a governmental agency or unit to act as a pest control
consultant ((as defined in RCW 15.58.030(28))). No person ((shall))
may act as a public pest control consultant without first obtaining a
license from the director. The license ((shall)) expires annually on
a date set by rule by the director. Application for a license
((shall)) must be on a form prescribed by the director and ((shall))
must be accompanied by a fee of ((twenty-five)) thirty-three dollars.
Federal and state employees whose principal responsibilities are in
pesticide research, the jurisdictional health officer or a duly
authorized representative, public pest control consultants licensed and
working in the health vector field, and public operators licensed under
RCW 17.21.220 shall be exempt from this licensing provision.

Sec. 21 RCW 17.21.070 and 1997 c 242 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE--PESTICIDE FEES. It ((shall be)) is
unlawful for any person to engage in the business of applying
pesticides to the land of another without a commercial pesticide
applicator license. Application for a commercial applicator license
((shall)) must be accompanied by a fee of ((one hundred seventy)) two
hundred fifteen dollars and in addition a fee of twenty-seven dollars
for each apparatus, exclusive of one, used by the applicant in the
application of pesticides((: PROVIDED, That the provisions of this
section shall not apply to any person employed only to operate any
apparatus used for the application of any pesticide, and in which such
person has no financial interest or other control over such apparatus
other than its day to day mechanical operation for the purpose of
applying any pesticide)).

Sec. 22 RCW 17.21.110 and 1997 c 242 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE--PESTICIDE FEES. It ((shall be)) is
unlawful for any person to act as an employee of a commercial pesticide
applicator and apply pesticides manually or as the operator directly in
charge of any apparatus which is licensed or should be licensed under
((the provisions of)) this chapter for the application of any
pesticide, without having obtained a commercial pesticide operator
license from the director. The commercial pesticide operator license
((shall be)) is in addition to any other license or permit required by
law for the operation or use of any such apparatus. Application for a
commercial operator license ((shall)) must be accompanied by a fee of
((fifty)) sixty-seven dollars. ((The provisions of)) This section
((shall)) does not apply to any individual who is a licensed commercial
pesticide applicator.

Sec. 23 RCW 17.21.122 and 1997 c 242 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE--PESTICIDE FEES. It ((shall be)) is
unlawful for any person to act as a private-commercial pesticide
applicator without having obtained a private-commercial pesticide
applicator license from the director. Application for a private-commercial pesticide applicator license ((shall)) must be accompanied
by a fee of ((twenty-five)) thirty-three dollars.

Sec. 24 RCW 17.21.126 and 2004 c 100 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE--PESTICIDE FEES. It is unlawful for any
person to act as a private applicator, limited private applicator, or
rancher private applicator without first complying with requirements
determined by the director as necessary to prevent unreasonable adverse
effects on the environment, including injury to the pesticide
applicator or other persons, for each specific pesticide use.
(1) Certification standards to determine the individual's
competency with respect to the use and handling of the pesticide or
class of pesticides for which the private applicator, limited private
applicator, or rancher private applicator is certified ((shall)) must
be relative to hazards of the particular type of application, class of
pesticides, or handling procedure. In determining these standards the
director ((shall)) must take into consideration standards of the EPA
and is authorized to adopt these standards by rule.
(2) Application for a private applicator or a limited private
applicator license((, or the renewal of such licenses under RCW
17.21.132(4), shall)) must be accompanied by a fee of ((twenty-five))
thirty-three dollars. Application for a rancher private applicator
license((, or renewal of such license under RCW 17.21.132(4), shall))
must be accompanied by a fee of ((seventy-five)) one hundred dollars.
Individuals with a valid certified applicator license, pest control
consultant license, or dealer manager license who qualify in the
appropriate statewide or agricultural license categories are exempt
from the private applicator, limited private applicator, or rancher
private applicator fee requirements. However, licensed public
pesticide operators, otherwise exempted from the public pesticide
operator license fee requirement, are not also exempted from the fee
requirements under this subsection.

Sec. 25 RCW 17.21.129 and 1997 c 242 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE--PESTICIDE FEES. Except as provided in
RCW 17.21.203, it is unlawful for a person to use or supervise the use
of any experimental use pesticide or any restricted use pesticide on
small experimental plots for research purposes when no charge is made
for the pesticide and its application without a demonstration and
research applicator's license.
(1) Application for a demonstration and research license ((shall))
must be accompanied by a fee of ((twenty-five)) thirty three dollars.
(2) Persons licensed ((in accordance with)) under this section are
exempt from the requirements of RCW 17.21.160, 17.21.170, and
17.21.180.

Sec. 26 RCW 17.21.220 and 1997 c 242 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE--PESTICIDE FEES. (1) All state agencies,
municipal corporations, and public utilities or any other governmental
((agency shall be)) agencies are subject to ((the provisions of)) this
chapter and its rules ((adopted thereunder concerning the application
of pesticides)).
(2) It ((shall be)) is unlawful for any employee of a state agency,
municipal corporation, public utility, or any other government agency
to use or to supervise the use of any restricted use pesticide, or any
pesticide by means of an apparatus, without having obtained a public
operator license from the director. Application for a public operator
license ((shall)) must be accompanied by a fee of ((twenty-five))
thirty-three dollars. The fee ((shall)) does not apply to public
operators licensed and working in the health vector field. The public
operator license ((shall be)) is valid only when the operator is acting
as an employee of a government agency.
(3) The jurisdictional health officer or his or her duly authorized
representative is exempt from this licensing provision when applying
pesticides that are not restricted use pesticides to control pests
other than weeds.
(4) ((Such)) Agencies, municipal corporations, and public utilities
((shall be)) are subject to legal recourse by any person damaged by
such application of any pesticide, and ((such)) action may be brought
in the county where the damage or some part ((thereof)) of the damage
occurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE--PESTICIDE FEES.
Sections 15 through 26 of this act take effect January 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 A new section is added to chapter 16.36 RCW
to read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE--ANIMAL INSPECTION. (1) The director may
adopt rules establishing fees for:
(a) The establishment and inspection of animal holding facilities
authorized under this chapter;
(b) The inspection and monitoring of animals in authorized animal
holding facilities; and
(c) Special inspections of animals or animal facilities that the
director may provide at the request of the animal owner or interested
persons.
(2) The fees shall, as closely as practicable, cover the cost of
the service provided.
(3) All fees collected under this section shall be deposited in an
account in the agricultural local fund and used to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 A new section is added to chapter 18.185
RCW to read as follows:
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING--BAIL BOND RECOVERY AGENTS. Pursuant to
RCW 43.24.086 and 43.135.055, the department may increase fees as
necessary to defray the cost of administering chapter ---, Laws of 2008
(Substitute House Bill No. 2759).

Sec. 30 RCW 18.240.050 and 2007 c 70 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary
has the authority to:
(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as required to implement
this chapter;
(2) Establish all certification and renewal fees in accordance with
RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250 as follows:
(a) Large animal application fee, two hundred dollars;
(b) Large animal license renewal, one hundred seventy dollars;
(c) Large animal late renewal penalty, eighty-five dollars;
(d) Large animal expired license reissuance, eighty-five dollars;
and
(e) Large animal duplicate license, fifteen dollars;
(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(4) Certify an applicant or deny certification based upon
unprofessional conduct or impairment governed by the uniform
disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;
(5) Deny certification to applicants who do not meet the training,
competency evaluation, and conduct requirements for certification;
(6) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff
as needed to implement this chapter;
(7) Maintain the official department record for all applicants and
persons with certifications;
(8) Review coursework and training taken by an applicant in another
state to determine whether it is substantially equivalent to that
required under this chapter and determine whether additional coursework
or training is needed before taking an examination for certification
under RCW 18.240.060;
(9) Approve education and training programs; and
(10) Convene temporary work groups of individuals knowledgeable in
the practice of animal massage to advise the secretary on appropriate
standards of practice and credentialing, as necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 GAMBLING COMMISSION. The gambling
commission is authorized to increase license fees up to 5.5 percent in
fiscal year 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 PUBLIC BACCALAUREATE INSTITUTIONS. The
tuition fees, as defined in RCW 28B.15.020, charged to students at the
state's institutions of higher education may be adjusted by the
governing boards of the state universities, regional universities, and
The Evergreen State College for the 2007-08 and 2008-09 academic years,
including summer sessions, subject to the limitations set forth in this
section.
Additionally, the fees charged students at the institutions of
higher education for enrollment in self-supporting degree programs
including summer school, authorized by RCW 28B.15.031, and all other
fees authorized by RCW 28B.15.031, may be adjusted by the governing
boards of the state universities, regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College for the 2007-08 and 2008-09 academic years,
subject to the limitations set forth as follows:
(1) For the 2008-09 academic year, the governing boards of the
research universities may implement an increase no greater than seven
percent over tuition fees charged to resident undergraduate students
for the 2007-08 academic year. The regional universities and The
Evergreen State College may implement an increase no greater than five
percent over tuition fees charged to resident undergraduate students
for the 2007-08 academic year.
(2) For the 2008-09 academic year, each of the governing boards of
the public four-year institutions is authorized to raise nonresident
undergraduate and resident and nonresident graduate and professional
tuition pursuant to RCW 28B.15.067.
(3) For the 2008-09 academic year, each of the governing boards of
the public four-year institutions is authorized to raise summer quarter
or semester enrollment fees for resident and nonresident undergraduate,
graduate, and professional students pursuant to RCW 28B.15.067.
(4) For the 2008-09 academic year, each of the governing boards of
the public four-year institutions is authorized to increase fees for
fee-based degree programs; fee-based credit courses; fee-based
noncredit workshops and courses; and fee-based special contract
courses.
(5) For the 2008-09 academic year, each of the governing boards of
the public four-year institutions is authorized to increase services
and activities fees for all categories of students by the amounts
authorized in RCW 28B.15.069.
(6) For the 2008-09 academic year, each of the governing boards of
the public four-year institutions is authorized to adopt or increase
technology fees as provided in RCW 28B.15.051.
(7) For the 2008-09 academic year each of the governing boards of
the public four-year institutions may adopt or increase all other fees
included in RCW 28B.15.031.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL
COLLEGES. (1) For the 2008-09 academic year, the state board for
community and technical colleges may increase tuition and fees by no
more than two percent over tuition and fees charged to resident and
nonresident students for the 2007-08 academic year. For the 2007-2009
biennium, the state board for community and technical colleges may
increase tuition fees under this subsection differentially based on
student credit hour load at their discretion, provided that the overall
increase in average tuition revenue per student does not exceed two
percent.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges may
increase tuition and fees by no more than five percent over tuition and
fees charged for upper division courses in applied baccalaureate
programs in the 2007-08 academic year.
(3) For the 2008-09 academic year, the technical colleges may
increase operating fees by no more than two percent over operating fees
charged to full-time resident and nonresident students for the 2007-08
academic year, to conform with the percentage increase in community
college operating fees.
(4) For the 2008-09 academic year, technical colleges may increase
their building fee by three cents per clock hour and by forty-five
cents per credit hour. The purpose of these fee increases is to
progress towards parity with the community colleges.
(5) The state board for community and technical colleges may
increase the maximum allowable services and activities fee up to two
percent in the 2008-09 academic year. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055,
community and technical colleges are authorized to increase services
and activities fee charges up to the maximum level authorized by the
state board for community and technical colleges.
(6) During fiscal years 2008 and 2009, the community and technical
colleges may increase fees as follows:
(a) Administrative fees (FY 2008 and FY 2009), up to 5.57% per
fiscal year;
(b) Application fees (FY 2008 and FY 2009), up to 5.57% per fiscal
year;
(c) Graduation fees (FY 2008 and FY 2009), up to 5.57% per fiscal
year;
(d) Lab and class fees (FY 2008 and FY 2009), up to 5.57% per
fiscal year;
(e) Testing fees (FY 2008 and FY 2009), up to 5.57% per fiscal
year;
(f) Transcript fees (FY 2008 and FY 2009), up to 5.57% per fiscal
year;
(g) 2-D and 3-D design lab fee (FY 2009), community and technical
colleges may establish a new fee of up to $20;
(h) Student health insurance fee (FY 2009), community and technical
colleges may establish a new fee of up to $25;
(i) Arts field trip fee (FY 2008), community and technical colleges
may establish a new fee of up to $10;
(j) Computer lab fee (FY 2009), community and technical colleges
may establish a new fee of up to $45;
(k) Credit for prior experiential learning (FY 2009), community and
technical colleges may establish a new fee of up to $40;
(l) Early childhood education practicum fee (FY 2009), community
and technical colleges may establish a new fee of up to $25;
(m) Electronic lab fee (FY 2009), community and technical colleges
may establish a new fee of up to $95;
(n) E-portfolio fee (FY 2009), community and technical colleges may
establish a new fee of up to $35;
(o) Fire science lab fee (FY 2009), community and technical
colleges may establish a new fee of up to $21.20;
(p) LPN test (FY 2009), community and technical colleges may
establish a new fee of up to $327;
(q) Mac studio (FY 2009), community and technical colleges may
establish a new fee of up to $66.50;
(r) Materials fee A (FY 2009), community and technical colleges may
establish a new fee of up to $25;
(s) Materials fee B (FY 2009), community and technical colleges may
establish a new fee of up to $50;
(t) Materials fee C (FY 2009), community and technical colleges may
establish a new fee of up to $75;
(u) Materials fee D (FY 2009), community and technical colleges may
establish a new fee of up to $100;
(v) Math course fee (FY 2009), community and technical colleges may
establish a new fee of up to $10;
(w) Media production fee (FY 2009), community and technical
colleges may establish a new fee of up to $30;
(x) Patient care tech fee (FY 2009), community and technical
colleges may establish a new fee of up to $66.10;
(y) Payment plan fee (FY 2009), community and technical colleges
may establish a new fee of up to $25;
(z) Photography deposit (FY 2009), community and technical colleges
may establish a new fee of up to $150;
(aa) Printing fee A (FY 2009), community and technical colleges may
establish a new fee of up to $20;
(bb) Printing fee B (FY 2009), community and technical colleges may
establish a new fee of up to $40;
(cc) Printing fee C (FY 2009), community and technical colleges may
establish a new fee of up to $60;
(dd) Printing fee D (FY 2009), community and technical colleges may
establish a new fee of up to $80;
(ee) Respiratory care data ARC fee (FY 2009), community and
technical colleges may establish a new fee of up to $60;
(ff) Respiratory care testing fee (FY 2009), community and
technical colleges may establish a new fee of up to $40;
(gg) RN test (FY 2009), community and technical colleges may
establish a new fee of up to $360;
(hh) Selective admission fee (FY 2009), community and technical
colleges may establish a new fee of up to $40;
(ii) Surgical tech preassessment (FY 2008), community and technical
colleges may establish a new fee of up to $35;
(jj) Survey course fee (FY 2009), community and technical colleges
may establish a new fee of up to $25;
(kk) University center test proctor fee (FY 2009), community and
technical colleges may establish a new fee of up to $25;
(ll) College level examination program (FY 2008 and FY 2009),
community and technical colleges may establish a new fee of up to $25;
(mm) Course management software (FY 2009), community and technical
colleges may establish a new fee of up to $1.00.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS.
During fiscal years 2008 and 2009, the department of financial
institutions may increase fees as follows:
(1) Credit union hourly fee for examination, investigation, and
processing applications, by not more than 5.57% (FY 2009);
(2) Credit union quarterly asset assessment, by not more than 5.57%
(FY 2009);
(3) Loan originator license amendment fee, to add a mortgage broker
relationship, by not more than $50 (FY 2008);
(4) Mortgage broker license amendment fee, change of designated
broker, by not more than $25 (FY 2008);
(5) Mortgage broker license application fee, main office location,
by not more than $1 (FY 2008);
(6) Banks exam hourly fees, by not more than 5.53% (FY 2008);
(7) Banks semi-annual assessment, by not more than 5.53% (FY 2008);
(8) Banks semi-annual assessment, interstate assets, by not more
than $183,321 (FY 2008).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING. During fiscal
years 2008 and 2009, the department of licensing may increase fees as
follows:
(1) Real estate appraiser certification, original, by not more than
$30 (FY 2009);
(2) Real estate appraiser certification, original via reciprocity,
by not more than $30 (FY 2009);
(3) Security guard license, original, by not more than $30 (FY
2009);
(4) Security guard license, renewal, by not more than $30 (FY
2009);
(5) Skills testing fee, the department is authorized to establish
a new fee of not more than $100 for drivers generally and not more than
$75 for nonprofit ECEAP or Head Start program (FY 2009).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES. During
fiscal years 2008 and 2009, the department of labor and industries may
increase fees as follows:
(1) Boiler inspection permits and fees, by not more than 5.53% (FY
2008);
(2) Boiler permit fees, by not more than 5.53% (FY 2008);
(3) Plumbers continuing education, by not more than 5.53% (FY
2008);
(4) Plumbers licensing and examination fees, by not more than 5.53%
(FY 2008).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY. During fiscal years
2008 and 2009, the department of ecology may increase fees as follows:
(1) Wastewater discharge permit, up to 5.57% (FY 2009);
(2) Dam periodic inspection, up to 5.57% (FY 2009);
(3) Dam construction permit, up to 5.57% (FY 2009);
(4) Mixed waste management, up to 14.14% (FY 2009).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE. During fiscal
year 2009, the department of agriculture may increase the apple pest
certification assessment by up to $0.015 per hundred weight of fruit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH. During fiscal years
2008 and 2009, the department of health may increase fees as follows:
(1) Acupuncture, up to $9 (FY 2009);
(2) Advanced registered nurse practitioner, up to $20 (FY 2009);
(3) Athletic trainers, up to $200 (FY 2009);
(4) Certificate of need (medical facilities), up to 30% in fiscal
year 2008 and up to 5.57% in fiscal year 2009;
(5) Chemical dependency professional certification, up to $185 (FY
2009);
(6) Childbirth centers, up to 19% (FY 2008);
(7) Chiropractic X-ray technician registration, up to $10 (FY
2009);
(8) Chiropractor license, up to $300 (FY 2009);
(9) Counselor registration, up to $130 (FY 2009);
(10) Dental assistants, up to $40 (FY 2009);
(11) Dental assistants--expanded functions, up to $175 (FY 2009);
(12) Dental hygiene license, up to $15 (FY 2009);
(13) Dental hygiene limited license, up to $10 (FY 2009);
(14) Dentist license, up to $400 (FY 2009);
(15) Denturist license, up to $450 (FY 2009);
(16) Health care assistant certification, up to $70 (FY 2009);
(17) Hearing and speech--audiologist license, up to $10 (FY 2009);
(18) Hearing and speech--instrument fitter and dispenser license,
up to $10 (FY 2009);
(19) Hearing and speech--speech language pathologist license, up to
$10 (FY 2009);
(20) In-home service agencies, up to 10% in fiscal year 2008 and up
to 5.57% in fiscal year 2009;
(21) Licensed practical nurse, up to $20 (FY 2009);
(22) Marriage and family therapists license, up to $130 (FY 2009);
(23) Massage practitioner license, up to $65 (FY 2009);
(24) Mental health counselor license, up to $130 (FY 2009);
(25) Naturopathic physician license, up to $300 (FY 2009);
(26) Nursing assistant certification, up to $35 (FY 2009);
(27) Nursing assistant registration, up to $35 (FY 2009);
(28) Nursing home administrator in training approval, up to $100
(FY 2009);
(29) Nursing home administrator license, up to $155 (FY 2009);
(30) Nursing pool registration, up to $30 (FY 2009);
(31) Occupational therapist license, up to $50 (FY 2009);
(32) Occupational therapy assistant license, up to $50 (FY 2009);
(33) Optician dispensing license, up to $50 (FY 2009);
(34) Optometrist license, up to $75 (FY 2009);
(35) Orthotist license, up to $30 (FY 2009);
(36) Osteopathic physician and surgeon license, up to $650 (FY
2009);
(37) Osteopathic physician assistant license, up to $200 (FY 2009);
(38) Pharmacy, up to $235 (FY 2009);
(39) Physical therapist assistant license, up to $125 (FY 2009);
(40) Physical therapist interim permit, up to $25 (FY 2009);
(41) Physical therapist license, up to $55 (FY 2009);
(42) Physician and surgeon license, up to $175 (FY 2009);
(43) Physician assistant license, up to $50 (FY 2009);
(44) Podiatric physician and surgeon license, up to $800 (FY 2009);
(45) Prosthetist license, up to $30 (FY 2009);
(46) Psychologist license, up to $40 (FY 2009);
(47) Radioactive materials, up to 30% (FY 2009);
(48) Radiologic technologist assistant, up to $200 (FY 2009);
(49) Radiologic technologist certification, up to $155 (FY 2009);
(50) Recreation therapist registration, up to $95 (FY 2009);
(51) Registered nurse, up to $20 (FY 2009);
(52) Residential treatment facilities, up to 32% in fiscal year
2008 and up to 5.57% in fiscal year 2009;
(53) Respiratory care practitioner license, up to $130 (FY 2009);
(54) Sex offender treatment provider affiliate certification, up to
$400 (FY 2009);
(55) Sex offender treatment provider certification, up to $400 (FY
2009);
(56) Shellfish sanitary control, up to 5.53% (FY 2009);
(57) Social worker advanced independent license, up to $130 (FY
2009);
(58) Veterinarian license, up to $30 (FY 2009);
(59) X-ray facility, up to 40% (FY 2009);
(60) Ambulatory surgery centers, up to $4,000 (FY 2009).

Sec. 40 RCW 18.250.080 and 2007 c 253 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each applicant and license holder must comply with
administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees under
RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280 and subsection (2) of this section. The
secretary shall furnish a license to any person who applies and who has
qualified under the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The secretary must collect fees under this chapter as follows:
(a) Application fee, one hundred seventy-five dollars;
(b) Renewal fee, two hundred dollars;
(c) Late renewal penalty fee, two hundred dollars;
(d) Expired license reactivation fee, one hundred dollars;
(e) Inactive license reactivation fee, forty dollars;
(f) Duplicate license copy fee, fifteen dollars; and
(g) License verification fee, twenty-five dollars.

Sec. 41 RCW 18.260.020 and 2007 c 269 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a
registered dental assistant by use of any title or description without
being registered by the commission as having met the standards
established for registration under this chapter unless he or she is
exempt under RCW 18.260.110.
(b) The secretary must collect the following fees from persons
seeking or maintaining the status of a registered dental assistant
under this chapter:
(i) Application fee, forty dollars; and
(ii) Renewal fee, twenty dollars.
(2)(a) No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a
licensed expanded function dental auxiliary by use of any title or
description without being licensed by the commission under this chapter
unless he or she is exempt under RCW 18.260.110.
(b) The secretary must collect the following fees from persons
seeking or maintaining the status of a licensed expanded function
dental auxiliary under this chapter:
(i) Application fee, one hundred seventy-five dollars; and
(ii) Renewal fee, one hundred sixty dollars.

Sec. 42 RCW 18.74.030 and 2007 c 98 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for a license as a physical therapist shall have
the following minimum qualifications:
(a) Be of good moral character; and
(b) Have obtained either (i) a baccalaureate degree in physical
therapy from an institution of higher learning approved by the board or
(ii) a baccalaureate degree from an institution of higher learning and
a certificate or advanced degree from a school of physical therapy
approved by the board.
(2) An applicant for a license as a physical therapist assistant
must have the following minimum qualifications:
(a) Be of good moral character; ((and))
(b) Have successfully completed a board-approved physical therapist
assistant program; and
(c) Pay a license application fee of one hundred dollars to the
secretary.
(3) The applicant shall present proof of qualification to the board
in the manner and on the forms prescribed by the board.

Sec. 43 RCW 18.74.070 and 2007 c 98 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every licensed physical therapist and physical therapist
assistant shall apply to the secretary for a renewal of the license and
pay ((to the state treasurer)) a fee determined by the secretary as
provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(2) Every physical therapist assistant seeking to renew his or her
license must pay a fee to the secretary as follows:
(a) Renewal fee, one hundred twenty-five dollars;
(b) Late renewal fee, sixty-two dollars and fifty cents; and
(c) Expired license reissuance fee, seventy-five dollars.

Sec. 44 RCW 18.74.073 and 2007 c 98 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed
under this chapter not practicing physical therapy or providing
services may place his or her license in an inactive status. The board
shall prescribe requirements for maintaining an inactive status and
converting from an inactive or active status. The secretary may
establish fees for alterations in license status.
(2) The secretary must collect the following fees from a physical
therapist assistant seeking to place his or her license on inactive
status:
(a) Inactive status fee, fifty dollars; and
(b) Expired inactive status reissuance fee, seventy-five dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 45 A new section is added to chapter 18.74 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary must collect the following fees from physical
therapist assistants under this chapter:
(1) Issuance of a duplicate license fee, fifteen dollars; and
(2) Certification of a license fee, twenty-five dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 46 Sections 40 through 45 of this act take
effect July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 47 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 48 Except for sections 2, 15 through 26, and
40 through 45 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---