BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in January 2007,
the blue ribbon commission on health care costs and access issued their
report which included a recommendation to give individuals and families
more choice in selecting private insurance plans that work for them.
This recommendation specifically stated, "Washington needs a
multipronged approach to tackle the challenges facing our uninsured
population. Over half of Washington's total uninsured population
consists of young adults ages nineteen to thirty-four. In addition,
fifty thousand are employees of small businesses who have incomes in
excess of two hundred percent of the federal poverty level. Providing
these and other individuals affordable insurance options on the private
market will go a long way in decreasing the number of uninsured in the
state."
The legislature further finds that in the 2007 legislative session,
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 titled "an act
relating to providing high quality, affordable health care to
Washingtonians based on the recommendations of the blue ribbon
commission on health care costs and access" was introduced and passed
without any provisions related to the recommendation described in this
section.
The legislature further finds that, according to the 2004
Washington state population survey, self-employed individuals and their
dependents account for thirty-three percent of the uninsured. These
individuals must purchase health insurance through the individual
health insurance market and they do not get the same tax benefits on
health insurance costs as employers and their employees. The
legislature intends to implement the recommendation of the blue ribbon
commission on health care costs and access, and implement a
multipronged approach that provides more affordable health insurance
options in the private market to decrease the number of uninsured in
Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.43.041 and 2000 c 79 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All individual health benefit plans, other than catastrophic
health plans((, offered or renewed on or after October 1, 2000)) and
plans for young adults as described in subsection (3) of this section,
shall include benefits described in this section. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to require a carrier to offer an individual
health benefit plan.
(a) Maternity services that include, with no enrollee cost-sharing
requirements beyond those generally applicable cost-sharing
requirements: Diagnosis of pregnancy; prenatal care; delivery; care
for complications of pregnancy; physician services; hospital services;
operating or other special procedure rooms; radiology and laboratory
services; appropriate medications; anesthesia; and services required
under RCW 48.43.115; and
(b) Prescription drug benefits with at least a two thousand dollar
benefit payable by the carrier annually.
(2) If a carrier offers a health benefit plan that is not a
catastrophic health plan to groups, and it chooses to offer a health
benefit plan to individuals, it must offer at least one health benefit
plan to individuals that is not a catastrophic health plan.
(3) Carriers may design and offer a separate health plan targeted
at young adults between nineteen and thirty-four years of age. The
plan may include the benefits required under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section but is not required to include these benefits. The health
plan designed for young adults may be exempt from the requirements of
RCW 48.43.045(1), 48.43.515(5), 48.44.327, 48.20.392, and 48.46.277.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.44.022 and 2006 c 100 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for health benefit plans covered under RCW 48.44.021,
premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be subject
to the following provisions:
(a) The health care service contractor shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age;
(iv) Tenure discounts; and
(v) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health care service contractor shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1,
1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred
seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the family composition;
(ii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the
individual; or
(iii) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(h) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan
of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage,
except individuals purchasing coverage under RCW 48.44.021, and shall
not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of health
benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.44.023. Carriers
may treat young adults, between twenty-one and thirty-four years of
age, and products developed specifically for them as a single banded
experience pool for purposes of establishing rates. The rates
established for this age group are not subject to subsection (1)(d) of
this section. After two years of experience with these products,
carriers must report to the office of the insurance commissioner on the
product rates, the number of newly insured young adults, and the impact
on other segments of the market.
(3) As used in this section and RCW 48.44.023 "health benefit
plan," "small employer," "adjusted community rates," and "wellness
activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.46.064 and 2006 c 100 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for health benefit plans covered under RCW 48.46.063,
premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be subject
to the following provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age;
(iv) Tenure discounts; and
(v) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1,
1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred
seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the family composition;
(ii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the
individual; or
(iii) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(h) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan
of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage,
except individuals purchasing coverage under RCW 48.46.063, and shall
not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of health
benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.46.066. Carriers
may treat young adults, between twenty-one and thirty-four years of
age, and products developed specifically for them as a single banded
experience pool for purposes of establishing rates. The rates
established for this age group are not subject to subsection (1)(d) of
this section. After two years of experience with these products,
carriers shall report to the office of the insurance commissioner on
the product rates, the number of newly insured young adults, and the
impact on other segments of the market.
(3) As used in this section and RCW 48.46.066, "health benefit
plan," "adjusted community rate," "small employer," and "wellness
activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.20.029 and 2006 c 100 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Premiums for health benefit plans for individuals who purchase
the plan as a member of a purchasing pool:
(a) Consisting of five hundred or more individuals affiliated with
a particular industry;
(b) To whom care management services are provided as a benefit of
pool membership; and
(c) Which allows contributions from more than one employer to be
used towards the purchase of an individual's health benefit plan;
shall be calculated using the adjusted community rating method that
spreads financial risk across the entire purchasing pool of which the
individual is a member. All such rates shall conform to the following:
(i) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(A) Geographic area;
(B) Family size;
(C) Age;
(D) Tenure discounts; and
(E) Wellness activities.
(ii) The adjustment for age in (c)(i)(C) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(iii) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer, and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates are subject to the requirements of this subsection.
(iv) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1,
1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred
seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(v) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs not to exceed twenty percent.
(vi) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(A) Changes to the family composition;
(B) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the individual;
or
(C) Changes in government requirements affecting the health benefit
plan.
(vii) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(viii) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health
plan of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of health
benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.21.045. Carriers
may treat young adults, between twenty-one and thirty-four years of
age, and products developed specifically for them as a single banded
experience pool for purposes of establishing rates. The rates
established for this age group are not subject to subsection (1)(c)(iv)
of this section. After two years of experience with these products,
carriers shall report to the office of the insurance commissioner on
the product rates, the number of newly insured young adults, and the
impact on other segments of the market.
(3) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "adjusted
community rates," and "wellness activities" mean the same as defined in
RCW 48.43.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of the insurance commissioner shall make available
educational and outreach materials targeted to young adults aged
nineteen to thirty-four, as funding becomes available. Education and
outreach efforts shall focus on educating young consumers on the
importance and value of health insurance, including educational
materials, public service messages, and other outreach activities. The
commissioner is authorized to fund these activities with grants,
donations, in-kind contributions, or other funding that may be
available.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.21.045 and 2007 c 260 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a))) An insurer offering any health benefit plan to a small
employer, either directly or through an association or member-governed
group formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing health care,
may offer and actively market to the small employer ((a)) no more than
one health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of covered health
care services. ((Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an insurer
from offering, or a small employer from purchasing, other health
benefit plans that may have more comprehensive benefits than those
included in the product offered under this subsection. An insurer
offering a health benefit plan under this subsection shall clearly
disclose all covered benefits to the small employer in a brochure filed
with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140, 48.21.141, 48.21.142,
48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197, 48.21.200,
48.21.220, 48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235, 48.21.240, 48.21.244,
48.21.250, 48.21.300, 48.21.310, or 48.21.320.
(2))) (a) The plan offered under this subsection may be offered
with a choice of cost-sharing arrangements, and may, but need not,
comply with: RCW 48.21.130 through 48.21.240, 48.21.244 through
48.21.280, 48.21.300 through 48.21.320, 48.43.045(1) except as required
in (b) of this subsection, 48.43.093, 48.43.115 through 48.43.185,
48.43.515(5), or 48.42.100.
(b) In offering the plan under this subsection, the insurer must
offer the small employer the option of permitting every category of
health care provider to provide health services or care for conditions
covered by the plan pursuant to RCW 48.43.045(1).
(2) An insurer offering the plan under subsection (1) of this
section must also offer and actively market to the small employer at
least one additional health benefit plan.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from
offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit plans with
benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under subsection
(1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be
submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan
offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to the
benefits thereto.
(((3))) (4) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small
employers as defined in this section shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(a) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (((3))) (4).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account as defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
small groups purchasing coverage, including the small group
participants in the health insurance partnership established in RCW
70.47A.030. However, annual rate adjustments for each small group
health benefit plan may vary by up to plus or minus ((four)) eight
percentage points from the overall adjustment of a carrier's entire
small group pool((, such overall adjustment to be approved by the
commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified by a member of
the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The variation is a result
of deductible leverage, benefit design, or provider network
characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period, the projected
weighted average of all small group benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool. Variations of
greater than four percentage points are subject to review by the
commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days of
submittal)) if certified by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible leverage,
benefit design, claims cost trend for the plan, or provider network
characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period, the projected
weighted average of all small group benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool. Variations of
greater than eight percentage points are subject to review by the
commissioner, and must be approved or denied within thirty days of
submittal. A variation that is not denied within ((sixty)) thirty days
shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier
a detailed actuarial justification for any denial ((within thirty
days)) at the time of the denial.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of
employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.
(((5))) (6)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements
used by an insurer in determining whether to provide coverage to a
small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers
applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) An insurer shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) An insurer may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(((6))) (7) An insurer must offer coverage to all eligible
employees of a small employer and their dependents. An insurer may not
offer coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small
employer group or to only part of the group. An insurer may not modify
a health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee
or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.
(((7))) (8) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," "adjusted community rate," and "wellness activities" mean
the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.44.023 and 2007 c 260 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a))) A health care services contractor offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer ((a)) no more than one health benefit plan featuring a
limited schedule of covered health care services. ((Nothing in this
subsection shall preclude a contractor from offering, or a small
employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more
comprehensive benefits than those included in the product offered under
this subsection. A contractor offering a health benefit plan under
this subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits to the
small employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, 48.44.290,
48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330, 48.44.335,
48.44.340, 48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450, and
48.44.460.
(2))) (a) The plan offered under this subsection may be offered
with a choice of cost-sharing arrangements, and may, but is not
required to, comply with: RCW 48.44.210, 48.44.212, 48.44.225,
48.44.240 through 48.44.245, 48.44.290 through 48.44.340, 48.44.344,
48.44.360 through 48.44.380, 48.44.400, 48.44.420, 48.44.440 through
48.44.460, 48.44.500, 48.43.045(1) except as required in (b) of this
subsection, 48.43.093, 48.43.115 through 48.43.185, 48.43.515(5), or
48.42.100.
(b) In offering the plan under this subsection, the health care
service contractor must offer the small employer the option of
permitting every category of health care provider to provide health
services or care for conditions covered by the plan pursuant to RCW
48.43.045(1).
(2) A health care service contractor offering the plan under
subsection (1) of this section must also offer and actively market to
the small employer at least one additional health benefit plan.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care service
contractor from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(((3))) (4) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small
employers as defined in this section shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(a) The contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (((3))) (4).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account as defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage, including the small group participants in
the health insurance partnership established in RCW 70.47A.030.
However, annual rate adjustments for each small group health benefit
plan may vary by up to plus or minus ((four)) eight percentage points
from the overall adjustment of a carrier's entire small group pool((,
such overall adjustment to be approved by the commissioner, upon a
showing by the carrier, certified by a member of the American academy
of actuaries that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible
leverage, benefit design, or provider network characteristics; and (ii)
for a rate renewal period, the projected weighted average of all small
group benefit plans will have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's
small group pool. Variations of greater than four percentage points
are subject to review by the commissioner, and must be approved or
denied within sixty days of submittal)) if certified by a member of the
American academy of actuaries, that: (i) The variation is a result of
deductible leverage, benefit design, claims cost trend for the plan, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than eight percentage points are subject to
review by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within
thirty days of submittal. A variation that is not denied within
((sixty)) thirty days shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must
provide to the carrier a detailed actuarial justification for any
denial ((within thirty days)) at the time of the denial.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of
employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.
(((5))) (6)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements
used by a contractor in determining whether to provide coverage to a
small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers
applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A contractor shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A contractor may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(((6))) (7) A contractor must offer coverage to all eligible
employees of a small employer and their dependents. A contractor may
not offer coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small
employer group or to only part of the group. A contractor may not
modify a health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible
employee or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to
restrict or exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical
conditions, or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 9 RCW 48.46.066 and 2007 c 260 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a))) A health maintenance organization offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer ((a)) no more than one health benefit plan featuring a
limited schedule of covered health care services. ((Nothing in this
subsection shall preclude a health maintenance organization from
offering, or a small employer from purchasing, other health benefit
plans that may have more comprehensive benefits than those included in
the product offered under this subsection. A health maintenance
organization offering a health benefit plan under this subsection shall
clearly disclose all the covered benefits to the small employer in a
brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.46.275, 48.46.280, 48.46.285, 48.46.290,
48.46.350, 48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480, 48.46.510,
48.46.520, and 48.46.530.
(2))) (a) The plan offered under this subsection may be offered
with a choice of cost-sharing arrangements, and may, but is not
required to, comply with: RCW 48.46.250, 48.46.272 through 48.46.290,
48.46.320, 48.46.350, 48.46.375, 48.46.440 through 48.46.460,
48.46.480, 48.46.490, 48.46.510, 48.46.520, 48.46.530, 48.46.565,
48.46.570, 48.46.575, 48.43.045(1) except as required in (b) of this
subsection, 48.43.093, 48.43.115 through 48.43.185, 48.43.515(5), or
48.42.100.
(b) In offering the plan under this subsection, the health
maintenance organization must offer the small employer the option of
permitting every category of health care provider to provide health
services or care for conditions covered by the plan pursuant to RCW
48.43.045(1).
(2) A health maintenance organization offering the plan under
subsection (1) of this section must also offer and actively market to
the small employer at least one additional health benefit plan.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health maintenance
organization from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(((3))) (4) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small
employers as defined in this section shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (((3))) (4).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account as defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage, including the small group participants in
the health insurance partnership established in RCW 70.47A.030.
However, annual rate adjustments for each small group health benefit
plan may vary by up to plus or minus ((four)) eight percentage points
from the overall adjustment of a carrier's entire small group pool((,
such overall adjustment to be approved by the commissioner, upon a
showing by the carrier, certified by a member of the American academy
of actuaries that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible
leverage, benefit design, or provider network characteristics; and (ii)
for a rate renewal period, the projected weighted average of all small
group benefit plans will have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's
small group pool. Variations of greater than four percentage points
are subject to review by the commissioner, and must be approved or
denied within sixty days of submittal)) if certified by a member of the
American academy of actuaries, that: (i) The variation is a result of
deductible leverage, benefit design, claims cost trend for the plan, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the health maintenance organization's
small group pool. Variations of greater than eight percentage points
are subject to review by the commissioner, and must be approved or
denied within thirty days of submittal. A variation that is not denied
within ((sixty)) thirty days shall be deemed approved. The
commissioner must provide to the carrier a detailed actuarial
justification for any denial ((within thirty days)) at the time of the
denial.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of
employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.
(((5))) (6)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements
used by a health maintenance organization in determining whether to
provide coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly among
all small employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from
the carrier.
(b) A health maintenance organization shall not require a minimum
participation level greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A health maintenance organization may not increase any
requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small
employer at any time after the small employer has been accepted for
coverage.
(((6))) (7) A health maintenance organization must offer coverage
to all eligible employees of a small employer and their dependents. A
health maintenance organization may not offer coverage to only certain
individuals or dependents in a small employer group or to only part of
the group. A health maintenance organization may not modify a health
plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or
dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who conducts business as a sole proprietorship may credit
against the tax imposed by this chapter, fifty percent of the value
paid during the reporting period for health insurance premiums. The
credit may not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for the
reporting period. Unused credit may be carried over and used in
subsequent tax reporting periods. No refunds are granted for credits
under this section.

--- END ---