BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
WASHINGTON STATE BIOLOGICAL LABORATORY RULES
PREAMBLE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Biotechnology research promises advances in
fields ranging from medicine and agriculture to combating bioterrorism.
It is a well-funded and rapidly growing enterprise in research centers
around the United States, including Seattle.
As with other technologies such as nuclear energy, research in
biotechnology also carries risks. Some materials used in biotechnology
labs are dangerous and/or environmentally destructive. Improper
handling of those materials could cause loss of life, personal injury,
environmental destruction, and property damage.
Although research in biotechnology is relatively new, exposures to
dangerous substances from various biotechnology labs around the
country, including exposures at a biotechnology lab operated in
downtown Seattle, already have occurred. Nonetheless, biotechnology
research in Seattle is largely unregulated. Indeed, human exposures
have occurred without the public ever being informed.
Safe and responsible biotechnology research requires that the
research be transparent, subject to independent oversight and
regulation, and that violations of those regulations be effectively
sanctioned. These regulations are established in order to accomplish
those ends.

PART I
BIOLOGICAL RESEARCH LABORATORY HEALTH AND SAFETY PROGRAM
FOR WASHINGTON STATE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Biological agent" means any naturally occurring,
bioengineered, or genetically altered or synthesized microorganism
including, but not limited to, bacteria, virus, fungus, and protozoa,
or infectious substance or vector, or component of any such
microorganism or infectious substance capable of causing death,
disease, or other physiological change in a human, an animal, a plant,
or other living organism; deterioration of food, water, equipment,
supplies, or material of any kind; or having a deleterious effect on
the environment.
(2) "Biosafety level 2 laboratory" means a laboratory that is
designed, equipped, or operated as a biosafety level 2 laboratory as
defined by the United States national institutes of health guidelines
for research involving recombinant DNA molecules.
(3) "Biosafety level 3 laboratory" means a laboratory that is
designed, equipped, or operated as a biosafety level 3 laboratory as
defined by the United States national institutes of health guidelines
for research involving recombinant DNA molecules.
(4) "Biosafety level 4 laboratory" means a laboratory that is
designed, equipped, or operated as a biosafety level 4 laboratory as
defined by the United States national institutes of health guidelines
for research involving recombinant DNA molecules.
(5) "Commission" means the Washington state biosafety commission
created in section 5 of this act.
(6) "Department" means the department of health.
(7) "Facility" means a building or combination of buildings under
common control and ownership containing one or more laboratories
subject to a common institutional biosafety committee.
(8) "Laboratory" means a room or rooms used primarily for
biological research, development, nonroutine testing, or
experimentation activity, or any room or rooms where vertebrate animals
are contained under animal biosafety levels described in national
institutes of health guidelines including, but not limited to, all
enclosed areas with a laboratory containment area, including any rooms,
closets, facilities, freezers, refrigerators, or incubators where
biological agents are stored, fermented, grown, proliferated, or
colonized.
(9) "Principal investigator" means the individual designated by a
research sponsor to direct the biological research project or program
the research sponsor conducts at biosafety laboratory levels 2 or 3,
who is responsible to the research sponsor for the scientific and
technical direction of that project or program.
(10) "Research sponsor" means any state, public or private
corporation or authority, individual, trust, firm, joint stock company,
limited liability company, partnership, research group, task force,
university program, association, or entity or group thereof, group of
persons, and agency or political subdivision of the state of
Washington, the federal government, or other government, subdivision,
agent or agency thereof, which operates or which proposes to operate a
biosafety level 2 and/or biosafety level 3 laboratory in Washington
state.
(11) "Toxin" means any toxic material or product of plants,
animals, microorganisms including, but not limited to, bacteria, virus,
fungus, rickettsia, or protozoa, misfolded protein, infectious
substance, or a recombinant or synthesized molecule, whatever its
origin or method of production. "Toxin" includes any poisonous
substance or biological product that may be engineered as a result of
biotechnology produced by a living organism; or any poisonous isomer or
biological product, homolog, or derivative of such substance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 There is established in the department, a
high containment biological research laboratory health and safety
program for biosafety level 2 and 3 laboratories located in Washington
state.
(1) The program shall provide standards for location, operation,
and maintenance of high containment biological research laboratories
and the oversight of such laboratories to protect the safety of
laboratory workers, the public, and the environment from regulated
agents and toxins.
(2) The program shall provide standards for the transportation,
relocation, shipment, delivery, conveyance, and receipt of regulated
agents and toxins.
(3) The program shall provide for procedures which would allow the
department to order biosafety level 2 and 3 laboratories to immediately
cease and desist work on a project and lock down and/or refrain from
any activity that the department determines could cause immediate and
irreparable injury, loss, or damage.
(4) The program shall be administered by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department shall adopt rules for the
implementation of the program that establish the criteria for
determining appropriate locations for siting a building or facility
that contains a laboratory, including whether a laboratory may be
created within an existing building. The criteria shall include, at a
minimum, that:
(1) Sites shall not be within a floodplain, within eight hundred
yards of property whose regular use could endanger the site due to fire
or explosion; or near an area of traffic congestion that might impede
emergency access for evacuation or endanger motorists or pedestrians.
(2) Sites shall have sufficient land available to provide for a
reasonable buffer around the buildings which shall be no less than one
hundred fifty unobstructed feet in each direction.
(3) Other criteria for consideration shall include proximity of
wetlands, waterways, and water bodies; the relationship of the site to
groundwater elevation; the nature and extent of residential areas and
schools in proximity to the site; the availability and suitability of
access roads to the site, including the ability of first responders to
access the site in an emergency; the potential for adverse public
health and safety impacts; potential impact of increased traffic volume
on adjacent roads; and the potential threat of terrorist attack or
infiltration of the building.
(4) The department shall set forth procedures, consistent with this
section, for the submission, review, and approval of permit and
construction applications, and the issuance and renewal of permit and
construction applications. Permits may be issued which contain
conditions or restrictions that serve and protect public health and
safety.
(a) The application for a permit or renewal of a permit shall be
acted upon within sixty days of submission of a completed application.
The department is not obligated to review incomplete applications. If,
at the conclusion of the sixty-day period, the review of the
application is not complete, the department may issue to a research
sponsor a provisional permit if the application is complete and it
establishes substantial compliance with this chapter. A provisional
permit shall not exceed one hundred twenty days in duration, and shall
not be renewed or extended.
(b) To the extent that the permit application may require the
submission or review of trade secret information under RCW 19.108.010,
the research sponsor may submit such information under seal.
Commission members and their staff shall be prohibited from disclosing
trade secret information submitted under seal pursuant to this
subsection to any third party, and such matter shall be used by the
commission and its staff for no purpose other than the permitting
process. Reckless or intentional disclosure of trade secret
information submitted under seal is a misdemeanor.
(c) The denial of a permit application may be appealed pursuant to
the rules of practice and procedure of the King county board of
appeals.
(d) Prior to issuance of any permit for a biosafety level 3
laboratory under this chapter, the department must hold, with sixty
days, notice to the public of the application and its contents, a
public hearing on the application with opportunity for reasonable
public comment on whether the application should be granted.

PART II
WASHINGTON STATE BIOSAFETY COMMISSION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department shall appoint a
Washington state biosafety commission composed of both scientific and
community representatives drawn from lists submitted to it from
community and neighborhood organizations, universities, colleges, and
public interest organizations located within Washington state to assist
in regulating biological laboratories and facilities operating under
the auspices of this chapter. The commission shall include at least
nine members and one salaried executive director who shall be selected
by the department for a term of four years. Members will be appointed
for a two-year term and may be removed only for cause. Members shall
have no financial, professional, familial, close social, or business
relationship in or with the regulated research sponsors, their
affiliates, subsidiaries, employees, contractors, subcontractors,
investors, or funders. Members appointed to fill vacancies shall serve
for a full term. Any member of the commission is eligible for
reappointment for up to three consecutive terms. Members of the
commission shall serve without compensation, but their reasonable costs
and expenses shall be reimbursed by the department.
(2) The commission shall periodically report to the department and
provide technical assistance, review of the effectiveness of this
chapter and advise and/or deliberate as needed about technical issues
arising out of permits and applications of this chapter.
(3) The commission shall consider policy changes or possible
amendments to this chapter, improve the system of laboratory and
facility regulation, for the safe handling, relocation, shipment,
delivery, conveyance, receipt, and transportation of biological agents
or toxins and deliberate as needed.
(4) The commission shall meet monthly or with sufficient frequency
to assure its ability to carry out its duties and responsibilities.

PART III
INSTITUTIONAL BIOSAFETY COMMITTEE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A research sponsor that holds a permit
issued under this chapter shall have an institutional biosafety
committee for each facility to ensure the public safety and conformance
with this chapter. Composition of the committee shall include at least
two community representatives who have no financial, professional,
familial, close social, or business relationship in or with the
regulated research sponsor, its affiliates or subsidiaries, employees,
contractors, subcontractors, or investors. Community representatives
shall be selected by joint approval of the department and neighborhood
organizations representing the communities or community where the
laboratory is located. Community representatives shall be individuals
whose principal residence is within three miles of the laboratory, and
whose principal residence has been within three miles of the laboratory
for at least two years immediately preceding their selection as such.
(2) Each committee shall report to the commission. The committee
will meet at least four times a year and at such other times as may be
specified by the commission, or guidelines issued under this chapter,
or as requested by any member of the committee. Except for executive
sessions, meetings of the committee and all of its subcommittees shall
be open to the public. Notice of such public meetings and the conduct
of public meetings shall be in accordance with the Washington state
open public meetings act.
(3) Each committee shall file an annual report with the commission.
The report shall include, at a minimum, complete copies of all
committee minutes for the preceding reporting period, certification
that the laboratory and/or facility is in compliance with this chapter,
a report on any quality assurance and quality improvement efforts made
during the period, a complete roster of current committee members, and
an update of any information relative to the permit application. To
the extent committee minutes contain information that jeopardizes trade
secret information as defined by RCW 19.108.010, the commission shall
develop procedures for assuring confidentiality of said information.
Committee minutes shall, at a minimum, conform to the national
institutes of health office of biotechnology activities issued guidance
concerning the preparation of, and public access to, minutes of
committee meetings and department of health and human services guidance
on the content of minutes of committee meetings, dated February 23,
2007.

PART IV
PERMIT FEES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department is authorized to establish
fees for the issuance and renewal of permits which may vary according
to the type of use and scale of activity being conducted. All fees
shall be directly related to the costs incurred by the department
and/or the commission for any issuance of permits, the inspection of
laboratories, and any other costs associated with implementation of
this chapter. Full payment of such fees shall be a condition for the
granting or renewal of any permit.

PART V
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH PREAPPROVAL REQUIRED FOR CERTAIN RESEARCH
NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Any research sponsor operating or
proposing to operate a biological laboratory or laboratories, or any
research sponsor conducting or proposing to conduct any biological
research at biosafety level 2 or 3 laboratories, shall obtain a permit
from the commission. The permittee shall ensure that all persons in
such laboratories comply with the requirements set forth in this
chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.
(2) Each permit application shall include the following:
(a) Name and location of the research sponsor;
(b) The location and biosafety level rating or ratings for each
laboratory that will operate under the permit;
(c) Roster, biographical information, and contact information of
the institutional biosafety committee indicating the chair, and
community members;
(d) Name, title, and contact information of each of the following:
(i) A health officer responsible for the health of the laboratory or
facility, known as the "health officer"; (ii) an officer responsible
for biological safety at the laboratory or facility, known as the
"biological safety officer"; and (iii) an official responsible for the
overall operation of the laboratory or facility, known as the
"responsible official";
(e) Project information including, but not limited to, the title
and brief description of the project, grant identification number or
other unique institutional identifier number, the principal
investigator, and the agent or agents used in the project, including
all biological agents and toxins for each project or program;
(f) Procedures and policies relating to laboratory safety
including, but not limited to, research, training, security, laboratory
inspections, transportation, waste disposal, commissioning,
decommissioning, decontamination, termination of work with biological
agents and toxins, training of all employees, visitors, or students,
and first responder plans including evacuation and emergency response;
(g) Other information as required by the commission and guidelines
issued under this chapter; and
(h) Any incident in which the research sponsor, any of its
officers, employees, or any other person who will work in the lab or
exercise authority over activity in the lab was found to have violated,
or was sanctioned for violating, any law, rule, or ordinance regulating
the environment, health, safety, public disclosure, and/or the
truthfulness of statements.

PART VI
EMERGENCY SUSPENSION OF PERMIT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If the secretary of the department becomes
aware of credible evidence that activity at a facility licensed for, or
seeking a license for, operation under this chapter is likely to pose
a significant and imminent threat to human health or to the environment
or to cause substantial property damage, the secretary may find that
immediate closure of the facility is required to avert such danger and
order all research and related activity at that facility suspended
until such time as the secretary finds that threat to have been
resolved. If the research sponsor believes the secretary's finding to
have been unwarranted, it may seek reversal of the decision in a county
superior court based on clear and convincing evidence.

PART VII
REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The licensed research sponsor must,
within twenty-four hours, report to the commission any incident in
which there was human exposure to a biological agent or toxin, and/or
a reasonable likelihood of such exposure, including all incidents
resulting in actual or recommended prophylactic quarantine or drug use.
(2) A research sponsor shall report any release or spread of a
biological agent or toxin, or the reasonable likelihood of a release or
spread, outside the primary containment area of a biosafety level
laboratory to the department as soon as possible and in no case more
than twenty-four hours after the event. The report shall also be
provided to the commission.
(3) The facility or laboratory shall also provide the institutional
biosafety committee with a detailed report of all incidents, accidents,
and other events that cause or are suspected to have caused a threat to
the public health, death, illness, or bodily injury to any person to
report said incident not later than seventy-two hours after the
incident. The report shall be a public record.
(4) On an annual basis, the facility or laboratory shall provide
the commission with third party certification for all biosafety
cabinets, autoclaves, tissue digesters, incubators, centrifuges, and
all other major laboratory equipment.

PART VIII
TRAINING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Each facility with a laboratory shall have
and implement a plan to provide adequate training for the proper
handling of biological agents and toxins that might be present therein.
Such training shall include, but not be limited to, decontamination
methods, personnel safety precautions and work habits, early warning
disease surveillance, and accident response actions and notifications,
access control and monitoring, personnel management, inventory and
accountability, information security, and transport of biological
agents. Each facility shall provide a training plan to its
institutional biosafety committee and to the commission for approval
and shall update the plan annually, or as necessary. The training plan
shall ensure that all laboratory staff, facility workers, and
researchers, including the principal investigator for each facility,
are trained adequately. The principal investigator shall participate
in the creation and implementation of the training plan. No individual
other than a local, state, or federal government representative with
authorized access for regulatory compliance for investigative purposes
may enter the biosafety level laboratory located within a facility
without first completing the facility's training plan.

PART IX
WASTE MANAGEMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Each facility regulated by this chapter
shall implement a waste management and decontamination plan submitted
to and approved in advance as a condition of permitting by the
commission.

PART X
EMERGENCY RESPONSE PLAN
NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A facility regulated by this chapter shall
develop an emergency response plan, in conjunction with local and state
officials, that addresses security threats and releases involving the
spread of biological agents and toxins. The emergency response plan
shall comply with local, state, and federal plans already in existence.
The plan must address such events as severe weather, earthquakes, power
outages, power line breaks, terrorism, and other natural, accidental,
or intentional disasters or emergencies. The emergency response plan
shall, at a minimum, address the following:
(1) Particular hazards associated with specific biological agents
and toxins located at the facility or its laboratories;
(2) Personnel roles, lines of authority, training, and
communication;
(3) Emergency assessment and prevention;
(4) Site security and control;
(5) Evacuation routes and procedures;
(6) Decontamination;
(7) Emergency medical treatment and first aid;
(8) Emergency alerting and response procedures;
(9) Personal protective and emergency equipment;
(10) Regulatory scheduled preparedness exercises coordinated with
Seattle public health and safety officials;
(11) Critique of response and follow up subsequent to an incident;
and
(12) Communication to the public and the local news media.

PART XI
INSPECTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The commission has the authority to review
all documentation relating to the operations of the facility and any
laboratories therein, and to conduct a physical inspection of any
facility or laboratory, with or without prior notice, so long as such
inspection is conducted at a reasonable time under the circumstances
and in a manner that maintains the health and safety systems of the
laboratories involved. Failure to provide any requested documentation
or access to a laboratory for the purpose of inspection will result in
a fine and/or the immediate suspension or restriction of a research
sponsor's permit to operate. A failure to provide requested
documentation or access to a laboratory for the purpose of inspection
for a period exceeding seven days shall result in suspension of the
facility or laboratory permit to operate at least until such time as
the failure has been rectified.

PART XII
PROHIBITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) Any biosafety level 2 or 3 laboratory
research or project is forbidden in Washington state if it is
reasonably likely to:
(a) Be used to harm human health, human habitat, agriculture, or
the breeding or raising of livestock;
(b) Render an immunization ineffective or lessen immunity in
humans, animals, or plants;
(c) Confer to a biological agent or toxin resistance of clinically
and/or agriculturally useful prophylaxes or therapeutics against that
agent or toxin;
(d) Enhance the virulence of a biological agent or render a
nonpathogen virulent;
(e) Enhance the ease of transmission of a biological agent from
human to human, animal to animal, or animal to human;
(f) Enable the evasion of diagnostic/detection modalities;
(g) Alter the host range or vector of a biological agent or toxin;
(h) Enhance the susceptibility of a host population; or
(i) Create a novel biological agent or toxin, reconstitute or
revitalize an eradicated, inactive, dormant, or extinct biological
agent that is harmful to humans, human habitat, agriculture, or
livestock.
(2) A principal investigator may seek an exemption to the
prohibitions listed in subsection (1) of this section for a specific
research project by submitting to the commission, in advance, a written
request which specifies in detail the precise research proposed to be
carried out, the purpose and need for the exemption, the names of all
research sponsors for the research that will be subject to the
exemption, the unavailability of alternative means of conducting the
research, a clear explanation of any special risks involved in the
research or project proposed for exemption, and any extraordinary
safeguards and precautions which need to be implemented. The
commission may permit exemptions to the prohibitions listed in
subsection (1) of this section, only on a research project by project
basis; it may not issue a blanket exemption to any particular principal
investigator or research sponsor, nor may the commission issue a
blanket exemption for a particular type of research project. Any
exemption permitted under this section shall be updated and resubmitted
to the commission annually for review and reconsideration. Research or
projects that are subject to the prohibitions described in subsection
(1) of this section shall not be exempted solely on the basis that the
research or project has dual purposes or uses, some of which may not
violate subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Biosafety level 4 laboratories and facilities that contain them
are not permitted within Washington state.

PART XIII
NOTICE POSTING AND DISTRIBUTION OF THIS CHAPTER
NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) A copy of this chapter shall be
distributed to all employees, students, and any other person who has
regular access to any portion of a facility or laboratory permitted
under this chapter. All entities permitted under this chapter shall
have a system for reporting health and safety violations, including a
method to report in an anonymous manner to the health and safety
officer and a method to report in an anonymous manner to the
institutional biosafety committee.
(2) A person is not required to conduct scientific research,
experimentation, study, or take other action in a laboratory that
violates any provision of this chapter or permits issued under this
chapter or has reasonable potential to adversely affect public or
employee health and safety. A person or employer shall not discharge,
refuse to hire, discipline, or in any manner retaliate or take any
adverse action against any employee, applicant, or other person because
such employee, applicant, or person discloses or threatens to disclose
to a supervisor or a governmental agency an activity, policy, or
practice that the person reasonably believes is in violation of this
chapter; or objects to or refuses to participate in any activity,
policy, or practice that the person reasonably believes is in violation
of this chapter. In addition to any other remedy provided by law, an
employee, researcher, or student aggrieved by a violation of this
subsection, within two years, may file a complaint with the attorney
general, who, after a proper investigation, may, in proper
circumstances, bring an action in the name of the state against the
facility alleged to have violated this section. If the attorney
general declines to bring an action based on the complaint filed, the
attorney general shall expeditiously provide notice of decline to the
grievant. The aggrieved employee, researcher, or student may, within
one year after said notice, institute a civil action in court of
jurisdiction where the facility is located. Any party to said action
shall be entitled to trial by jury. Remedies available in common law
tort actions shall be available to prevailing parties, in addition to
any legal or equitable relief. The court may, in addition to issuing
temporary restraining orders or preliminary or permanent injunctions,
order the reinstatement of an employee's, researcher's, or student's
position, the restatement of salary and fringe benefits and rights,
compensation of three times lost wages and benefits or other
remuneration, interest for liquidated damages, and/or repayment by the
facility of employee's, researcher's, or student's reasonable costs and
attorneys' fees.

PART XIV
VIOLATION OF THIS CHAPTER
NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) The intentional or reckless violation
of any conditional restriction of a permit or any provision of this
chapter subjects the violator to conviction of a gross misdemeanor.
Each violation constitutes a separate and distinct offense. Any false
statement contained in an application for a permit under this chapter
or in any report or disclosure required under this chapter, including
a false statement that matter is a trade secret, constitutes a
violation subject to the sanctions listed in section 17 of this act.
(2) Any violation of this chapter at the laboratory or pertaining
to the laboratory or any violation of any condition or restriction on
a laboratory permit, regardless of the identity or affiliation of the
violator, may result in the suspension of the research sponsor's permit
to operate one or more laboratories for a period of not less than one
year, and may result in more serious sanctions including permanent
revocation of the permit and assessment of a civil penalty against the
research sponsor of up to three hundred thousand dollars. Where the
violation was caused by the reckless or intentional conduct of research
sponsor or agent thereof, suspension of the research sponsor's permit
to operate the laboratory at which the violation occurred for a period
of not less than one year and assessment of three hundred thousand
dollars against the research sponsor shall be the minimum sanction.
Each violation constitutes a separate and distinct ground for sanction
under this section.
(3) Any violation of this chapter at the laboratory or pertaining
to the laboratory or any violation of a condition or restriction on a
laboratory permit, regardless of the identity or affiliation of the
violator, which is preceded by two prior violations will result in
revocation of all the research sponsor's permits to operate any
biosafety level 2 or 3 laboratory for a period of two years, and in the
preclusion of the research sponsor's obtaining any additional permits
to operate any biosafety level 2 or 3 laboratory for a period of two
years.

PART XV
SEVERABILITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

PART XVI
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Sections 1 through 19 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---