BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) A majority of the retail electric load in the western United
States is presently served by electric utilities that are subject to
renewable portfolio standards, mandating that they acquire renewable
energy resources in prescribed amounts by specific timelines under
penalty of law;
(b) Washington utilities must compete with other electric
utilities, some much larger and better capitalized, to acquire cost-effective renewable energy resources, and this competition, along with
other factors, has been shown to drive up the cost of renewable energy
resources;
(c) Future legislation requiring the electricity sector to reduce
greenhouse gas emissions will further heighten competition among
electric utilities in the western United States for renewable energy
resources; and
(d) The renewable portfolio standard laws of other states,
particularly California and Oregon, give electric utilities subject to
those laws a competitive advantage over Washington's utilities through
their ability to: (i) Acquire renewable energy resources from a
broader geographic region; (ii) count existing hydropower generation
and other low-emitting or zero-emitting generation resources against a
renewable portfolio standard; (iii) bank renewable energy credits to
comply with future renewable energy standards; (iv) account for and
recover the full costs of financing, developing, integrating, and
delivering renewable energy in a timely manner that respects procedural
rights; and (v) invest in distributed generation that has above-market
costs.
(2) The legislature declares that the requirements of the energy
independence act should be reconciled with conceptually similar laws in
neighboring states to facilitate the achievement of the act's
objectives in a manner that promotes the development of eligible
renewable resources and the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions at
the lowest reasonable cost.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.285.030 and 2007 c 1 s 3 (Initiative Measure No.
937) are each amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(4) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, or distribution.
(5) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(6) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(7) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases electricity
for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(8) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development or its successor.
(9) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of such
facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five megawatts.
(10) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than fresh water that commences operation after March
31, ((1999, where: (i))) 1995, when the facility is located ((in the
Pacific Northwest; or (ii) the electricity from the facility is
delivered into Washington state on a real-time basis without shaping,
storage, or integration services)) within the geographic boundary of
the western electricity coordinating council or its successor; ((or))
(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements completed after March 31, ((1999)) 1995, to hydroelectric
generation projects owned by a qualifying utility or nonqualifying
utility and located ((in the Pacific Northwest)) within the geographic
area of the western electricity coordinating council or its successor
or to hydroelectric generation in irrigation pipes and canals located
((in the Pacific Northwest, where)) within the geographic area of the
western electricity coordinating council or its successor when the
additional generation in either case does not result in new water
diversions or impoundments; or
(c) Electricity from a generation facility powered by qualified
hydropower, biomass, landfill gas, municipal solid waste, or solar
energy that commenced operation before March 31, 1995, and the facility
is located in the state.
(11) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 19.29A.010.
(12) "Joint operating agency" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 43.52.250.
(13) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of electricity
delivered in the most recently completed year by a qualifying utility
to its Washington retail customers.
(((13))) (14) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally
related characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and
other electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions
of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.
(((14))) (15) "Nonqualifying utility" means an electric utility as
defined in RCW 19.29A.010 that serves less than twenty-five thousand
customers in the state of Washington, a joint operating agency as
defined under RCW 43.52.250, and the Bonneville power administration.
The number of customers served may be based on data reported by a
utility in form 861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the
energy information administration, United States department of energy.
(16) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined for the
Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific Northwest
electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698; 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 839a).
(((15))) (17) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 39.35C.010.
(((16))) (18) "Qualified hydropower" means electricity from: (i)
A generating facility powered by water with generation capacity of
thirty megawatts or less and the facility commenced operation before
March 31, 1995; (ii) efficiency improvements made after March 31, 1995,
to a generating facility powered by water that is owned or marketed by
a nonqualifying electric utility; and (iii) an impoundment that is
modified after March 31, 1995, to produce electricity.
(19) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as the term
"electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves more than
twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington. The number
of customers served may be based on data reported by a utility in form
861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the energy
information administration, United States department of energy.
(((17))) (20) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable
certificate of proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible
renewable resource where the generation facility is ((not powered by
fresh water)) an eligible renewable resource, the certificate includes
all of the nonpower attributes associated with that one megawatt-hour
of electricity, and the certificate is verified by a renewable energy
credit tracking system selected by the department.
(((18))) (21) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c)
solar energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean,
or tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; ((and)) (i) biomass energy
based on animal waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or
field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include (i) wood
pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as
creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) ((black
liquor byproduct from paper production; (iii))) wood from old growth
forests; or (((iv))) (iii) municipal solid waste; and (j) spent pulping
liquor.
(((19))) (22) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other
entity of Washington state government to carry out the intent and
purposes of this chapter.
(((20))) (23) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing
January 1st and ending December 31st.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.285.040 and 2007 c 1 s 4 (Initiative Measure No.
937) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation
that is cost-effective, reliable, and feasible.
(a) By January 1, 2010, using methodologies consistent with those
used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council in its most recently published regional power plan, each
qualifying utility shall identify its achievable cost-effective
conservation potential through 2019. At least every two years
thereafter, the qualifying utility shall review and update this
assessment for the subsequent ten-year period.
(b) Beginning January 2010, each qualifying utility shall establish
and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for cost-effective conservation consistent with its identification of achievable
opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that target during
the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each biennial target
must be no lower than the qualifying utility's pro rata share for that
two-year period of its cost-effective conservation potential for the
subsequent ten-year period.
(c) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may
count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric
customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the
sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a
common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the
facility has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output. The reduction in load due to
high-efficiency cogeneration shall be: (i) Calculated as the ratio of
the fuel chargeable to power heat rate of the cogeneration facility
compared to the heat rate on a new and clean basis of a
best-commercially available technology combined-cycle natural gas-fired
combustion turbine; and (ii) counted towards meeting the biennial
conservation target in the same manner as other conservation savings.
(d) The commission may determine if a conservation program
implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the
commission's policies and practice.
(e) The commission may rely on its standard practice for review and
approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.
(2)(a) Each qualifying utility shall use eligible renewable
resources or acquire equivalent renewable energy credits or make
alternative compliance payments pursuant to section 6 of this act, or
((a)) any combination of ((both)) these options, to meet the following
annual targets:
(i) At least three percent of its load by January 1, 2012, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2015;
(ii) At least nine percent of its load by January 1, 2016, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2019; and
(iii) At least fifteen percent of its load by January 1, 2020, and
each year thereafter.
(b) A qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double
the facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has
contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable
energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated
renewable energy credits.
(c) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this subsection, a
qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based on the average
of the utility's load for the previous two years.
(d) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not increase
over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the utility did not
commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of electricity
from resources other than renewable resources other than on a daily
spot price basis and the electricity is not offset by equivalent
renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility invested at least one
percent of its total annual retail revenue requirement that year on
eligible renewable resources, renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both.
(e) The requirements of this section may be met for any given year
with renewable energy credits produced during that year, the preceding
year, or the subsequent year. Each renewable energy credit may be used
only once to meet the requirements of this section. Renewable energy
credits may be traded, sold, or otherwise transferred. Renewable
energy credits that are not used by a qualifying utility to comply with
the requirements of this subsection (2) in any given year may be banked
and carried forward indefinitely. Banked renewable energy credits with
the oldest issuance date must be used to comply with the annual target
before banked renewable energy credits with more recent issuance dates
are used. A qualifying utility must demonstrate that a renewable
energy credit used to comply with the requirements of this subsection
(2) is derived from an eligible renewable resource and that the
qualifying utility has not used, traded, sold, or otherwise transferred
the credit. A qualifying utility that uses a renewable energy credit
to comply with a renewable energy standard imposed by any other state
may not use the same credit to comply with the requirements of this
section.
(f) In complying with the targets established in (a) of this
subsection, a qualifying utility may not count((:
(i))) eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where
the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate
entity((; or
(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits
obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the
program established in RCW 19.29A.090)).
(g) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are cofired in
one generating unit located in the Pacific Northwest where the cofiring
commenced after March 31, ((1999)) 1995, the unit shall be considered
to produce eligible renewable resources in direct proportion to the
percentage of the total heat value represented by the heat value of the
renewable resources.
(h)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible renewable
resource or renewable energy credit may count that acquisition at one
and two-tenths times its base value:
(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility
that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and
(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship
programs approved by the council during facility construction.
(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to
be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra
credit.
(i) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if events beyond the reasonable
control of the utility that could not have been reasonably anticipated
or ameliorated prevented it from meeting the renewable energy target.
Such events include weather-related damage, mechanical failure,
strikes, lockouts, and actions of a governmental authority that
adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of an
eligible renewable resource under contract to a qualifying utility.
(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31,
2006, shall meet the requirements in this section on a time frame
comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of
December 7, 2006.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.285.050 and 2007 c 1 s 5 (Initiative Measure No.
937) are each amended to read as follows:
(1)(((a))) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance
with an annual target created in RCW 19.285.040(2) for a given year if
the utility invested four percent of its total annual retail revenue
requirement on the incremental costs of eligible renewable resources,
the cost of renewable energy credits, or a combination of both, but a
utility may elect to invest more than this amount. Qualifying electric
utilities are encouraged to acquire eligible renewable resources and
associated transmission, including components necessary for the
development of eligible renewable resources and associated
transmission, in advance of the annual targets under RCW
19.285.040(2)(a) if such an acquisition can be reasonably expected to
reduce the cost of complying with an annual target.
(((b))) (2) The incremental cost of an eligible renewable resource
is calculated as the difference between the levelized delivered cost of
the eligible renewable resource, regardless of ownership, compared to
the levelized delivered cost of an equivalent amount of reasonably
available substitute resources that do not qualify as eligible
renewable resources, where the resources being compared have the same
contract length or facility life. In determining the levelized
delivered cost of an eligible renewable resource, the commission shall
use the net present value of delivered cost, including: (a) Capital,
operating, and maintenance costs of generating facilities; (b)
financing costs attributable to capital, operating, and maintenance
expenditures for generating facilities; (c) transmission and substation
costs; (d) load following and ancillary services costs; and (e) costs
associated with using other assets, physical or financial, to
integrate, firm, or shape renewable energy sources on a firm annual
basis to meet retail electricity needs.
(((2) An investor-owned utility is entitled to recover all
prudently incurred costs associated with compliance with this chapter.
The commission shall address cost recovery issues of qualifying
utilities that are investor-owned utilities that serve both in
Washington and in other states in complying with this chapter.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall by rule: (a) Address cost recovery issues
of electrical companies that serve both in Washington and in other
states in complying with chapter 19.285 RCW; and (b) establish a
process for allocating the use of renewable energy credits by an
electrical company that makes sales of electricity to retail customers
in more than one state.
(2)(a) All prudently incurred costs by an electrical company to
comply with the requirements of RCW 19.285.040(2) are recoverable in
the rates of an electric company, including interconnection costs,
costs associated with using physical or financial assets to integrate,
firm, or shape renewable energy sources on a firm annual basis to meet
retail electricity needs, and other costs associated with transmission
and delivery of qualifying electricity to retail electricity consumers.
(b) The commission shall allow an electrical company to recover the
reasonable costs of procuring renewable energy credits in rates. All
revenues received by an electrical company from the sale of renewable
energy credits, the cost of which had been recovered in rates, shall
accrue to the benefit of ratepayers.
(3) The commission shall establish an automatic adjustment clause
or another method that allows timely recovery of costs prudently
incurred by an electrical company to construct or otherwise acquire
facilities that generate electricity from eligible renewable resources
and for associated electricity transmission. Upon the request of any
interested person the commission shall conduct a proceeding to
establish the terms of the automatic adjustment clause or other method
for timely recovery of costs. The commission shall provide parties to
the proceeding with the procedural rights described under chapter 34.05
RCW, including but not limited to the opportunity to develop an
evidentiary record, conduct discovery, introduce evidence, conduct
cross-examination, and submit written briefs and oral argument. The
commission shall issue a written order with findings on the evidentiary
record developed in the proceeding.
(4) An electric company must file with the commission for approval
of a proposed rate change to recover costs under the terms of an
automatic adjustment clause or other method for timely recovery of
costs established under subsection (3) of this section. Upon the
request of any interested person the commission shall conduct a
proceeding to determine whether to approve a proposed change in rates
under the automatic adjustment clause or other method for timely
recovery of costs. The commission shall provide parties to the
proceeding with the procedural rights described under chapter 34.05
RCW, including but not limited to the opportunity to develop an
evidentiary record, conduct discovery, introduce evidence, conduct
cross-examination, and submit written briefs and oral argument. The
commission shall issue a written order with findings on the evidentiary
record developed in the proceeding. A filing made under this
subsection is subject to the commission's authority to suspend a rate,
or schedule of rates, for investigation.
(5) The commission shall establish the automatic adjustment clause
or another method for timely recovery of costs as required by this
section no later than January 1, 2010. The clause or method applies to
all prudently incurred costs described in this section incurred by an
electric company since the date of the company's last general rate case
that was decided by the commission before the effective date of this
section.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "automatic adjustment clause"
means a provision of a rate schedule that provides for rate increases,
decreases, or both, without prior hearing, reflecting increases,
decreases, or both in costs incurred or revenues earned by a utility
and that is subject to review by the commission at least once every two
years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall establish an alternative compliance rate
for each compliance year for each electrical company subject to the
requirements of RCW 19.285.040(2). The rate shall be expressed in
dollars per megawatt-hour.
(2) The commission shall establish an alternative compliance rate
based on the cost of qualifying electricity, contracts that the
electrical company has acquired for future delivery of qualifying
electricity, and the number of renewable energy credits that the
company anticipates using in the compliance year to meet the annual
target under RCW 19.285.040(2)(a). The commission shall also consider
any determinations made under RCW 19.285.070 in reviewing the reports
made by the electrical company for the previous compliance year. In
establishing an alternative compliance rate, the commission shall set
the rate to provide adequate incentive for the electrical company to
purchase or generate qualifying electricity in lieu of using
alternative compliance payments to meet the requirements of RCW
19.285.040(2).
(3) An electrical company may elect to use, or may be required by
the commission to use, alternative compliance payments to comply with
the requirements of RCW 19.285.040. Any election by an electrical
company to use alternative compliance payments is subject to review by
the commission. An electrical company may not be required to make
alternative compliance payments that would result in the company
exceeding the cost cap established under RCW 19.285.050.
(4) The commission shall determine for each electrical company the
extent to which alternative compliance payments may be recovered in the
rates of the company. Each electrical company shall deposit any
amounts recovered in the rates of the company for alternative
compliance payments in a holding account established by the company.
Amounts in the holding account shall accrue interest at the rate of
return authorized by the commission for the electrical company.
(5) Amounts in holding accounts established under subsection (4) of
this section may be expended by an electrical company only for costs of
acquiring new generating capacity from eligible renewable resources,
investments in efficiency upgrades to electricity generating facilities
owned by the company, and energy conservation programs within the
company's service area. The commission must approve expenditures by an
electrical company from a holding account established under subsection
(4) of this section. Amounts that are collected from customers and
spent by an electrical company under this subsection may not be
included in the company's rate base.
(6) The commission shall establish initial alternative compliance
rates as required under this section no later than July 1, 2010.
(7) For the purposes of this section, (a) "eligible renewable
resource" has the same meaning as defined under RCW 19.285.030; and (b)
"qualifying electricity" means electricity produced from an eligible
renewable resource.

--- END ---