BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.44.010 and 1961 c 23 s 51.44.010 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be, in the office of the state treasurer, a fund to
be known and designated as the "accident fund."
(2) Expenditures from the accident fund shall be made only for
purposes related to the payment of benefits or the administration of
industrial insurance programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.44.020 and 1961 c 23 s 51.44.020 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be, in the office of the state treasurer, a fund to
be known and designated as the "medical aid fund."
(2) Expenditures from the medical aid fund shall be made only for
purposes related to the payment of benefits or the administration of
industrial insurance programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 51.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any ratepayer or group of ratepayers, acting as a class, may
file an action in superior court to protest the improper use of the
accident fund, the medical aid fund, or the supplemental pension fund.
(2) If a court finds that expenditures from the accident fund, the
medical aid fund, or the supplemental pension fund are not related to
a purpose under RCW 51.44.010, 51.44.020, or 51.44.033, the department
shall be prohibited from making the expenditures, and the ratepayer or
ratepayers must be compensated for actual attorneys' fees and an award
of triple damages.

--- END ---